It can originate only out of itself, i.e.
it must have already existed in the bud, or germ, as it were.
To be sure, besides this cause, or root-condition, or seed, there are still many minor conditions required for its actual arising and its development, just as the mango tree besides its main cause, the seed, requires for its germinating, growth and development such further conditions as earth, water, light, heat, etc.
Thus the true cause of the birth of a being, together with its character and destiny, goes back to the kamma-volitions produced in a former birth.
According to Buddhism, there are three factors necessary for the rebirth of a human being, that is, for the formation of the embryo in the mother's womb.
They are: the female ovum, the male sperm, and the karma-energy, which in the Suttas is metaphorically called “gandhabba,” i.e.
“ghost,” or “soul.” This kamma-energy is sent forth by a dying individual at the moment of his death.
The father and mother only provide the necessary physical material for the formation of the embryonic body.
With regard to the characteristic features, the tendencies and faculties lying latent in the embryo, the Buddha's teaching may be explained in the following way: The dying individual, with his whole being convulsively clinging to life, at the very moment of his death sends forth kammic energies which, like a flash of lightning, hit at a new mother's womb ready for conception.
Thus, through the impinging of the kamma-energies on ovum and sperm, there appears just as a precipitate the so-called primary cell.
This process may be compared with the functioning of the air-vibrations produced through speech, which, by impinging on the acoustic organ of another man, produce a sound, which is a purely subjective sensation.
On this occasion no transmigration of a sound-sensation takes place, but simply a transference of energy, called the air vibrations.
In a similar way, the kamma-energies, sent out by the dying individual, produce from the material furnished by the parents the new embryonic being.
But no transmigration of a real being, or a soul-entity, takes place on that occasion, but simply the transmission of kamma-energy.
Hence we may say that the present life-process is the objectification of the corresponding pre-natal kamma-process, and that the future life-process is the objectification of the corresponding present kamma-process.
Thus nothing transmigrates from one life to the next.
And what we call our ego is in reality only this process of continual change, of continual arising and passing away.
Thus follows moment after moment, day after day, year after year, life after life.
Just as the wave that apparently hastens over the surface of the pond is in reality nothing but a continuous rising and falling of ever new masses of water, each time called forth through the transmission of energy, even so, closely considered, in the ultimate sense there is no permanent ego-entity that passes through the ocean of Samsara, but merely a process of physical and psychical phenomena takes place, ever and again being whipped up by the impulse and will for life.
It is undoubtedly true that the mental condition of the parents at the moment of conception has a considerable influence upon the character of the embryonic being, and that the nature of the mother may make a deep impression on the character of the child she bears in her womb.
The indivisible unity of the psychic individuality of the child, however, can in no way be produced by the parents.
One must here never confound the actual cause — the preceding state out of which the later state arises — with the influences and conditions from without.
If it were really the case that the new individual, as an inseparable whole, was begotten by its parents, twins could never exhibit totally opposite tendencies.
In such a case, children, especially twins, would, with positively no exception, always be found to possess the same character as the parents.
At all times, and in probably all the countries on earth, the belief in rebirth has been held by many people; and this belief seems to be due to an intuitional instinct that lies dormant in all beings.
At all times many great thinkers too have taught a continuation of life after death.
Already from time immemorial there was taught some form of metempsychosis, i.e.
“transformation of soul,” or metamorphosis, i.e.
“transformation of body,” etc., thus by the esoteric doctrines of old Egypt, by Pythagoras, Empedocles, Plato, Plotinus, Pindaros, Vergil, also by some African tribes.
Many modern thinkers too teach a continuation of the life-process after death.
The great German scientist Edgar Dacque, in his book The Primeval World, Saga and Mankind, speaking about the widespread belief shared by all peoples of the world in a transmigration after death, gives the following warning:
Peoples with culture and acquaintance with science, such as the old Egyptians and wise Indians, acted and lived in accordance with this belief.
They lost this belief only after the rise of the naively realistic and rationalistic Hellenism and Judaism.
For this reason it would be better, concerning this problem, not to assume the bloodless attitude of modern sham-civilization, but rather adopt a reverential attitude in trying to solve this problem and grasp it in its profundity.
This law of rebirth can be made comprehensible only by the subconscious life-stream, which is mentioned in the Abhidhamma Pitaka and further explained in the commentaries, especially the Visuddhimagga.
The fundamental import of bhavanga-sota, or the subconscious life-stream, as a working hypothesis for the explanation of the various Buddhist doctrines, such as rebirth, kamma, remembrance of former births, etc., has up to now not yet sufficiently been recognized, or understood, by Western scholars.
The term bhavanga-sota, is identical with what the modern psychologists, such as Jung, etc., call the soul, or the unconscious, thereby not meaning, of course, the eternal soul-entity of Christian teaching but an ever-changing subconscious process.
This subconscious life-stream is the necessary condition of all life.
In it, all impressions and experiences are stored up, or better said, appear as a multiple process of past images, or memory pictures, which however, as such, are hidden to full consciousness, but which, especially in dreams, cross the threshold of consciousness and make themselves fully conscious.
Professor James says: “Many achievements of genius have here their beginning.
In conversion, mystical experience, and as prayer, it co-operates with religious life.
It contains all momentarily inactive reminiscences and sources of all our dimly motivated passions, impulses, intuitions, hypotheses, fancies, superstitions; in short, all our non-rational operations result therefrom.
It is the source of dreams, etc.
Jung, in his Soul Problems of the Present Day, says: “From the living source of instinct springs forth everything creative.” And in another place: “Whatever has been created by the human mind, results from contents which were really unconscious germs.” And: “The term 'instinct' is of course nothing but a collective term for all possible organic and psychic factors, whose nature is for the greater part unknown to us.
The existence of the subconscious life-stream, or bhavanga-sota, is a necessary postulate of our thinking.
If whatever we have seen, heard, felt, perceived, thought, experienced and done were not, without exception, registered somewhere and in some way, either in the extremely complex nervous system or in the subconscious or unconscious, we would not even be able to remember what we were thinking at the preceding moment; we would not know anything of the existence of other beings and things; we would not know our parents, teachers, friends, and so on; we would not even be able to think at all, as thinking is conditioned by the remembrance of former experiences; and our mind would be a complete tabula rasa and emptier than the actual mind of an infant just born, nay even of the embryo in the mother's womb.
Thus this subconscious life-stream, or bhavanga-sota, can be called the precipitate of all our former actions and experiences, which must have been going on since time immemorial and must continue for still immeasurable periods of time to come.
Therefore what constitutes the true and innermost nature of man, or any other being, is this subconscious life-stream, of which we do not know whence it came and whither it will go.
As Heraclitus says: “We never enter the same stream.
We are identical with it, and we are not.” Just so it is said in the Milindapañha: “na ca so, na ca añño; neither is it the same, nor is it another.” All life, be it corporeal, conscious or subconscious, is a flowing, a continual process of becoming, change and transformation.
No persistent element is there to be discovered in this process.
Hence there is no permanent ego, or personality, to be found, but merely these transitory phenomena.
About this unreality of the ego, the Hungarian psychologist Volgyesi in his Message to the Nervous World says:
Under the influence of the newest knowledge the psychologists already begin to realize the truth about the delusive nature of the ego-entity, the mere relative value of the ego-feeling, the great dependency of this tiny man on the inexhaustible and complex working factors of the whole world… The idea of an independent ego, and of a self-reliant free will: these ideas we should give up and reconcile ourselves to the truth that there does not exist any real ego at all.
What we take for our ego-feeling, is in reality nothing but one of the most wonderful fata-morgana plays of nature.
In the ultimate sense, there do not even exist such things as mental states, i.e.
stationary things.
Feeling, perception, consciousness, etc., are in reality mere passing processes of feeling, perceiving, becoming conscious, etc., within which and outside of which no separate or permanent entity lies hidden.
Thus a real understanding of the Buddha's doctrine of kamma and rebirth is possible only to one who has caught a glimpse of the egoless nature, or anattata, and of the conditionality, or idappaccayata, of all phenomena of existence.
Therefore it is said in the Visuddhimagga:
Everywhere, in all the realms of existence, the noble disciple sees only mental and corporeal phenomena kept going through the concatenation of causes and effects.
No producer of the volitional act or kamma does he see apart from the kamma, no recipient of the kamma-result apart from the result.
And he is well aware that wise men are using merely conventional language, when, with regard to a kammical act, they speak of a doer, or with regard to a kamma-result, they speak of the recipient of the result.
In the Milindapañha the King asks Nagasena:
“What is it, Venerable Sir, that will be reborn?
“A psycho-physical combination, O King.
“But how, Venerable Sir?
Is it the same psycho-physical combination as this present one?
“No, O King.
But the present psycho-physical combination produces kammically wholesome and unwholesome volitional activities, and through such kamma a new psycho-physical combination will be born.
As in the ultimate sense there is no such thing as a real ego-entity, or personality, one cannot properly speak of the rebirth of such a one.
What we are here concerned with is this psycho-physical process, which is cut off at death, in order to continue immediately thereafter somewhere else.
Similarly we read in the Milindapañha:
“Does, Venerable Sir, rebirth take place without transmigration?
“Yes, O King.
“But how, Venerable Sir, can rebirth take place without the passing over of anything?
Please, illustrate this matter for me.
“If, O King, a man should light a lamp with the help of another lamp, does the light of the one lamp pass over to the other lamp?
“No, Venerable Sir.
“Just so, O King, does rebirth take place without transmigration.
Further, in the Visuddhimagga it is said:
Whosoever has no clear idea about death and does not know that death consists in the dissolution of the five groups of existence, he thinks that it is a person, or being, that dies and transmigrates to a new body, etc.
And whosoever has no clear idea about rebirth, and does not know that rebirth consists in the arising of the five groups of existence, he thinks that it is a person, or being, that is reborn, or that the person reappears in a new body.
And whosoever has no clear idea about Samsara, the round of rebirths, he thinks that a real person wanders from this world to another world, comes from that world to this world, etc.
And whosoever has no clear idea about the phenomena of existence, he thinks that the phenomena are his ego or something appertaining to the ego, or something permanent, joyful, or pleasant.
And whosoever has no clear idea about the conditional arising of the phenomena of existence, and about the arising of kammic volitions conditioned through ignorance, he thinks that it is the ego that understands or fails to understand, that acts or causes to act, that enters into a new existence at rebirth.
Or he thinks that the atoms or the Creator, etc., with the help of the embryonic process, shape the body, provide it with various faculties; that it is the ego that receives the sensuous impression, that feels, that desires, that becomes attached, that enters into existence again in another world.
Or he thinks that all beings come to life through fate or chance.
When this conditionally arisen bodily-mental phenomenon arises, one says that it has entered into existence.
However, no being, or life-principle, has transmigrated from the previous existence into this existence, and yet this embryo could not have come into existence without a previous cause.
This fact may be compared with the reflection of one's face in the mirror, or with the calling forth of an echo by one's voice.
Now, just as the image in the mirror or the echo are produced by one's face or voice without any passing over of face or voice, just so it is with the arising of rebirth-consciousness.
Should there exist a full identity or sameness between the earlier and the later birth, in that case milk could never turn into curd; and should there exist an entire otherness, curd could never be conditioned through milk.
Therefore one should admit neither a full identity, nor an entire otherness of the different stages of existence.
Hence na ca so, na ca añño: “neither is it the same, nor is it another one.” As already said above: all life, be it corporeal, conscious or subconscious, is a flowing, a continual process of becoming, change and transformation.
To sum up the foregoing, we may say: There are in the ultimate sense no real beings or things, neither creators nor created; there is but this process of corporeal and mental phenomena.
This whole process of existence has an active side and a passive side.
The active or causal side of existence consists of the kamma-process, i.e.
of wholesome and unwholesome kamma-activity, while the passive or caused side consists of kamma-results, or vipaka, the so-called rebirth-process, i.e.
the arising, growing, decaying and passing away of all these kammically neutral phenomena of existence.
Thus, in the absolute sense, there exists no real being that wanders through this round of rebirths, but merely this ever-changing twofold process of kamma-activities and kamma-results takes place.
The present life is, as it were, the reflection of the past one, and the future life the reflection of the present one.
The present life is the result of the past kammic activity, and the future life the result of the present kammic activity.
Therefore, nowhere is there to be found an ego-entity that could be the performer of the kammic activity or the recipient of the kamma-result.
Hence Buddhism does not teach any real transmigration, as in the highest sense there is no such thing as a being, or ego-entity, much less the transmigration of such a one.
In every person, as already mentioned, there seems to lie dormant the dim instinctive feeling that death cannot be the end of all things, but that somehow continuation must follow.
In which way this may be, however, is not immediately clear.
It is perhaps quite true that a direct proof for rebirth cannot be given.
We have, however, the authentic reports about children in Burma and elsewhere, who sometimes are able to remember quite distinctly events of their previous life.
By the way, what we see in dreams are mostly distorted reflexes of real things and happenings experienced in this or a previous life.
And how could we ever explain the birth of such prodigies as Jeremy Bentham, who already in his fourth year could read and write Latin and Greek; or John Stuart Mill, who at the age of three read Greek and at the age of six wrote a history of Rome; or Babington Macaulay, who in his sixth year wrote a compendium of world history; or Beethoven, who gave public concerts when he was seven; or Mozart, who already before his sixth year had written musical compositions; or Voltaire, who read the fables of Lafontaine when he was three years old.
Should all these prodigies and geniuses, who for the most part came from illiterate parents, not already in previous births have laid the foundations to their extraordinary faculties?
“Natura non facit saltus: nature makes no leaps.
We may rightly state that the Buddhist doctrine of kamma and rebirth offers the only plausible explanation for all the variations and dissimilarities in nature.
From the apple seed only an apple tree may come, no mango tree; from a mango seed only a mango tree, no apple tree.
Just so, all animate things, as man, animal, etc., probably even plants, nay even crystals, must of necessity be manifestations or objectifications of some specific kind of subconscious impulse or will for life.
Buddhism says nothing on the last-mentioned points; it simply states that all vegetable life belongs to the germinal order, or bija-niyama.
Buddhism teaches that if in previous births the bodily, verbal and mental kamma, or volitional activities, have been evil and low and thus have unfavorably influenced the subconscious life-stream, then also the results, manifested in the present life, must be disagreeable and evil; and so must be the character and the new actions induced or conditioned through the evil pictures and images of the subconscious life-stream.
If the beings, however, have in former lives sown good seeds, then they will reap good fruits in the present life.
In Majjhima Nikaya a brahman raises the problem:
There are found people who are short-lived, and those that are long-lived; there are found people who are very sick, and those that are healthy; there are found people who are hideous, and those that are beautiful; there are found people who are powerless, and those that are powerful; there are found people who are poor, and those that are rich; there are found people who are of low family, and those that are of high family; there are found people who are stupid, and those that are intelligent.
What then, Master Gotama, is the reason that among human beings such inferiority and superiority are found?
The Blessed One gave the reply:
Beings are owners of their kamma, heirs of their kamma; kamma is the womb from which they have sprung, kamma is their friend and refuge.
Thus kamma divides beings into the high and low.
In Anguttara Nikaya III, it is said: “Killing, stealing, adultery, lying, backbiting, harsh speech and empty prattling, practiced, cultivated and frequently engaged in, will lead to hell, the animal world or the realm of ghosts.” Further: “Whoso kills and is cruel, will either go to hell, or if reborn as a human, will be short-lived.
Whoso tortures other beings, will be afflicted with disease.
The hater will be hideous, the envious will be without influence, the stubborn will be of low rank, the indolent will be ignorant.” In the reverse case, a person will be reborn in a heavenly world; or, if reborn as a human being, will be endowed with health, beauty, influence, riches, noble rank and intelligence.
George Grimm, in his book The Doctrine of the Buddha, tries to show how the law of affinity may at the moment of death regulate the grasping of the new germ.
He says:
Whoso, devoid of compassion can kill men, or even animals, carries deep within himself the inclination to shorten life.
He finds satisfaction, or even pleasure, in the short-livedness of other creatures.
Short-lived germs have therefore some affinity for him, an affinity which makes itself known after his death in the grasping of another germ, which then takes place to his own detriment.
Even so, germs bearing within themselves the power of developing into a deformed body, have an affinity for one who finds pleasure in ill-treating and disfiguring other.
Any angry person begets within himself an affinity for ugly bodies and their respective germs, since it is the characteristic mark of anger to disfigure the face.
Whoever is jealous, niggardly, haughty, carries within himself the tendency to grudge everything to others, and to despise them.
Accordingly, germs that are destined to develop in poor outward circumstances, possess affinity for him.
Here I should like to rectify several wrong applications of the term “kamma” prevailing in the West, and to state once for all: Pali kamma, comes from the root kar, to do, to make, to act, and thus means “deed, action,” etc.
As a Buddhist technical term, kamma is a name for wholesome and unwholesome volition or will and the consciousness and mental factors associated therewith, manifested as bodily, verbal or mere mental action.
Already in the Suttas it is said: “Volition, monks, do I call kamma.
Through volition one does the kamma by means of body, speech or mind”.
Thus kamma is volitional action, nothing more, nothing less.
From this fact result the following three statements:
The term “kamma” never comprises the result of action, as most people in the West, misled by Theosophy, wish this term to be understood.
Kamma is wholesome or unwholesome volitional action and kamma-vipaka is the result of action.
There are some who consider every happening, even our new wholesome and unwholesome actions, as the result of our prenatal kamma.
In other words, they believe that the results again become the causes of new results, and so ad infinitum.
Thus they are stamping Buddhism as fatalism; and they will have to come to the conclusion that, in this case, our destiny can never be influenced or changed, and no deliverance ever be attained.
There is a third wrong application of the term “kamma,” being an amplification of the first view, i.e.
that the term “kamma” comprises also the result of action.
It is the assumption of a so-called joint kamma, mass-kamma, or group-kamma, or collective kamma.
According to this view, a group of people, e.g.
a nation, should be responsible for the bad deeds formerly done by this so-called “same” people.
In reality, however, this present people may not consist at all of the same individuals who did these bad deeds.
According to Buddhism it is of course quite true that anybody who suffers bodily, suffers for his past or present bad deeds.
Thus also each of those individuals born within that suffering nation must, if actually suffering bodily, have done evil somewhere, here or in one of the innumerable spheres of existence, but he may not have had anything to do with the bad deeds of the so-called nation.
We might say that through his evil kamma he was attracted to the hellish condition befitting him.
In short, the term “kamma” applies, in each instance, only to wholesome and unwholesome volitional activity of the single individual.
Kamma thus forms the cause, or seed, from which the results will accrue to the individual, be it in this life or hereafter.
Hence man has it in his power to shape his future destiny by means of his will and actions.
It depends on his actions, or kamma, whether his destiny will lead him up or down, either to happiness or to misery.
Moreover, kamma is the cause and seed not only for the continuation of the life-process after death, i.e.
for the so-called rebirth, but already in this present life-process our actions, or kamma, may produce good and bad results, and exercise a decisive influence on our present character and destiny.
Thus, for instance, if day by day we are practicing kindness towards all living beings, humans as well as animals, we will grow in goodness, while hatred, and all evil actions done through hatred, as well as all the evil and agonizing mental states produced thereby, will not so easily rise again in us; and our nature and character will become firm, happy, peaceful and calm.
If we practice unselfishness and liberality, greed and avarice will become less.
If we practice love and kindness, anger and hatred will vanish.
If we develop wisdom and knowledge, ignorance and delusion will more and more disappear.
The less greed, hatred and ignorance dwell in our hearts, the less will we commit evil and unwholesome actions of body, speech and mind.
For all evil things, and all evil destiny, are really rooted in greed, hate and ignorance; and of these three things ignorance or delusion is the chief root and the primary cause of all evil and misery in the world.
If there is no more ignorance, there will be no more greed and hatred, no more rebirth, no more suffering.
This goal, however, in the ultimate sense, will be realized only by the Holy Ones, i.e.
by those who, forever and all time, are freed from these three roots; and this is accomplished through the penetrating insight, or vipassana, into the impermanency, unsatisfactoriness and egolessness of this whole life-process, and through the detachment from all forms of existence resulting therefrom.
As soon as greed, hate and ignorance have become fully and forever extinguished, and thereby the will for life, convulsively clinging to existence, and the thirsting for life have come to an end, then there will be no more rebirth, and there will have been realized the goal shown by the Enlightened One, namely: extinction of all rebirth and suffering.
Thus, the Arahant performs no more kamma, i.e.
no more kammically wholesome or unwholesome volitional actions.
He is freed from this life-affirming will expressed in bodily actions, words or thoughts, freed from this seed, or cause, of all existence and life.
Now what is called character is in reality the sum of these subconscious tendencies produced partly by the prenatal, partly by the present volitional activity, or kamma.
And these tendencies may, during life, become an inducement to wholesome or unwholesome volitional activity by body, speech or mind.
If, however, this thirst for life rooted in ignorance is fully extinguished, then there will be no new entering again into existence.
Once the root of a coconut tree has been fully destroyed, the tree will die off.
In exactly the same way, there will be no entering again into a new existence once the life-affirming three evil roots — greed, hate and ignorance — have been forever destroyed.
Here one should not forget that all such personal expressions as “I,” “He,” “Holy One,” etc., are merely conventional names for this really impersonal life-process.
In this connection I have to state that, according to Buddhism, it is merely the last kammical volition just before death, the so-called death-proximate kamma, that decides the immediately following rebirth.
In Buddhist countries it is therefore the custom to recall to the dying man's memory the good actions performed by him, in order to rouse in him a happy and pure kammical state of mind, as a preparation for a favorable rebirth.
Or his relations let him see beautiful things which they, for his good and benefit, wish to offer to the Buddha, saying: “This, my dear, we shall offer to the Buddha for your good and welfare.” Or they let him hear a religious sermon, or let him smell the odor of flowers, or give him sweets to taste, or let him touch precious cloth, saying: “This we shall offer to the Buddha for your own good and welfare.
In the Visuddhimagga it is said that, at the moment before death, as a rule, there will appear to the memory of the evil-doer the mental image of any evil deed, kamma, formerly done; or that there will appear before his mental eyes an attendant circumstance, or object, called kamma-nimitta, connected with that bad deed, such as blood or a blood-stained dagger, etc.; or he may see before his mind an indication of his imminent miserable rebirth, gati-nimitta, such as fiery flames, etc.
To another dying man there may appear before his mind the image of a voluptuous object inciting his sensual lust.
To a good man there may appear before his mind any noble deed, kamma, formerly done by him; or an object that was present at that time, the so-called kamma-nimitta; or he may see in his mind an indication of his imminent rebirth, gati-nimitta, such as heavenly palaces, etc.
Already in the Suttas there are distinguished three kinds of kamma, or volitional actions, with regard to the time of their bearing fruit, namely: kamma bearing fruit in this life-time; kamma bearing fruit in the next life; kamma bearing fruit in later lives.
The explanations of this subject are somewhat too technical for the general reader.
They imply the following: The kamma-volitional stage of the process in mind consists of a number of impulsive thought moments, or javana-citta, which flash up, one after the other, in rapid succession.
Now, of these impulsive moments, the first one will bear fruit in this life-time, the last one in the next birth, and those between these two moments will bear fruit in later lives.
The two kinds of kamma bearing fruit in this life-time and in the next birth may sometimes become ineffective.
Kamma, however, that bears fruit in later lives will, whenever and wherever there is an opportunity, be productive of kamma-result; and as long as this life-process continues, this kamma will never become ineffective.
The Visuddhimagga divides kamma, according to its functions, into four kinds: generative kamma, supportive kamma, counteractive kamma and destructive kamma, which all may be either wholesome or unwholesome.
Amongst these four kinds, the “generative” generates at rebirth, and during the succeeding life-continuity, corporeal and neutral mental phenomena, such as the five kinds of sense-consciousness and the mental factors associated therewith, such as feeling, perception, sense-impression, etc.
The “supportive”, however, does not generate any kamma-result; but as soon as any other kamma-volition has effected rebirth and a kamma-result been produced, then it supports, according to its nature, the agreeable or disagreeable phenomena and keeps them going.
The “counteractive” also does not generate any kamma-result; but as soon as any other kamma-volition has effected rebirth and a kamma-result been produced, then it counteracts, according to its nature, the agreeable or disagreeable phenomena and does not allow them to keep going on.
Again, the “destructive” does not generate any kamma-result; but as soon as any other kamma-volition has effected rebirth and a kamma-result been produced, then it destroys the weaker kamma and admits only its own agreeable or disagreeable kamma-results.
In the Commentary to Majjhima Nikaya, generative kamma is compared with a farmer sowing the seeds; supportive kamma, with irrigating, manuring, and watching the field, etc.; counteractive kamma,with the drought that causes a poor harvest; destructive kamma, with a fire that destroys the whole harvest.
Another illustration is this: The rebirth of Devadatta in a royal family was due to his good generative kamma.
His becoming a monk and attaining high spiritual powers was a good supportive kamma.
His intention of killing the Buddha was a counteractive kamma, while his causing a split in the Order of monks was destructive kamma, owing to which he was born in a world of misery.
It lies outside the scope of this short exposition to give detailed descriptions of all the manifold divisions of kamma found in the Commentaries.
What I chiefly wanted to make clear by this lecture is: that the Buddhist doctrine of rebirth has nothing to do with the transmigration of any soul or ego-entity, as in the ultimate sense there does not exist any such ego or I, but merely a continually changing process of psychic and corporeal phenomena.
And further I wanted to point out that the kamma-process and rebirth-process may both be made comprehensible only by the assumption of a subconscious stream of life underlying everything in living nature.
It is rather with some hesitation that I dare to speak to you on that profoundest of all Buddhist doctrines, paticca-samuppada, “dependent origination,” that is to say, the conditional arising of all those mental and physical phenomena generally summed up by the conventional names “living being,” or “individual,” or “person.” Thus, being well aware of the great difficulty of speaking on this most intricate subject before an audience perhaps only little acquainted with Buddhist philosophy, I shall try my utmost to avoid, as far as possible, all the highly technical or confusing details.
I shall use very plain and simple language, so that any one of you may be able to follow my explanations.
At the same time I shall not lose sight of the real goal and purpose for which the Buddha taught this doctrine to the world.
Thus I would beg you to listen carefully and give my words full and undivided attention.
And I further beg you to try to retain in mind those very few technical terms in Pali and English which in the course of my talk I shall be repeatedly using.
You may not be aware that, up to this day, the real significance and purpose of paticca-samuppada are practically unknown to Western scholars.
By this, however, I do not mean to say that nobody in the West has ever written or spoken on this doctrine.
No, quite the contrary is the case.
For there is no other Buddhist doctrine about which Western scholars, and would-be scholars, have written and discussed so much — but understood so little — as just this doctrine of paticca-samuppada.
If you wish to get a fair idea of those mostly absurd and immature speculations and fanciful interpretations, often based on mere imagination, you may read the Appendix to my Guide through the Abhidhamma Pitaka.
It seems that scarcely one of those Western authors and lecturers has ever put to himself the question, for what earthly reason the Buddha ever should have thought it necessary to teach such a doctrine.
It was surely not for the sake of mental gymnastics and dialectics.
No, quite to the contrary!
For paticca-samuppada shows the causes and conditions of all the suffering in the world; and how, through the removal of these conditions, suffering may rise no more in the future.
P.S.
in fact shows that our present existence, with all its woe and suffering, is conditioned, or more exactly said caused, by the life-affirming volitions or kamma in a former life, and that again our future life depends on the present life-affirming volitions or kamma; and that without these life-affirming volitions, no more future rebirth will take place; and that thereby deliverance will have been found from the round of rebirths, from the restless cycle of Samsara.
And this is the final goal and purpose of the Buddha's message, namely, deliverance from rebirth and suffering.
I think that after what you have heard just now, it will not be necessary to tell you that P.S.
is not intended, as various scholars in the West have imagined, as an explanation of the primary beginning of all things; and that its first link, avijja or ignorance, is not to be considered the causeless first principle out of which, in the course of time, all physical and conscious life has evolved.
P.S.
simply teaches the conditionality, or dependent nature, of all the manifold mental and physical phenomena of existence; of everything that happens, be it in the realm of the physical or the mental.
P.S.
shows that the sum of mental and physical phenomena known by the conventional name “person” or “individual” is not at all the mere play of blind chance; but that each phenomenon in this process of existence is entirely dependent upon other phenomena as conditions; and that therefore with the removal of those phenomena that form the conditions for rebirth and suffering, rebirth and therewith all suffering will necessarily cease and come to an end.
And this, as already stated, is the vital point and goal of the Buddha's teaching: deliverance from the cycle of rebirth with all its woe and suffering.
Thus P.S.
serves in the elucidation of the second and third noble truths about the origin and extinction of suffering, by explaining these two truths from their very foundations upwards, and giving them a fixed philosophical form.
In the discourses of the Buddha, P.S.
is usually expounded by way of twelve links arranged in eleven propositions.
They are as follows:
Our first proposition was: Avijja-paccaya sankhara: “Through ignorance the kamma-formations are conditioned.
Avijja, also called moha, is delusion, infatuation: regarding fleeting things as permanent, miserable things as enjoyment, and egoless things as a self or ego.
Avijja is ignorance, not understanding that all our existence is merely an ever-changing process of mental and physical phenomena; it is not understanding that these phenomena, in the ultimate sense, do not form any real permanent entity, or person, or ego; and that there does not exist any permanent entity in, or behind, these fleeting physical and mental phenomena; that therefore what we call “I,” or “you,” or “he,” or “person,” or “Buddha,” etc., does not, in the ultimate sense, possess any reality apart from these ever-changing physical and mental phenomena of existence.
Avijja, or moha, is the primary root-condition underlying all moral defilement and depravity.
In avijja are rooted all the greed, hatred, conceit, envy and misery in the world.
And the overcoming and extinction of avijja, and therewith of all evil and misery, is the final aim of the Buddha's teaching, the ideal for any true Buddhist.
And it is for these reasons that avijja is mentioned first in the formula of P.S.
By sankhara, lit.
“formations,” are here meant the rebirth-producing, kammically unwholesome or wholesome volitions, or volitional activities.
Let us therefore remember sankhara as kamma-formations, or simply as kamma.
Now, all such evil volitions manifested by body, speech or mind, as above alluded to, are called akusala or unwholesome kamma-formations, as they bring unhappy results, here and in the after-life.
Kusala or wholesome kamma-formations, however, are such volitions, or cetana, as will bring happy and pleasant results, here and in the after-life.
But even these wholesome kamma-formations are still conditioned and influenced by avijja, as otherwise they would not produce future rebirth.
And there is only one individual who no longer performs any wholesome or unwholesome kamma-formation, any life-affirming kamma.
It is the Arahant, the holy and fully enlightened disciple of the Buddha.
For through deep insight into the true nature of this empty and evanescent process of existence, he has become utterly detached from life; and he is forever freed from ignorance together with all its evil consequences, freed from any further rebirth.
Avijja is to all unwholesome kamma-formations, or volitional activities, an indispensable condition by way of its presence and simultaneous arising.
For example, whenever an evil manifestation of will, an evil kamma-formation, arises, at that very same moment its arising is conditioned through the simultaneous arising and presence of avijja.
Without the co-arising of avijja, there is no evil kamma-formation.
When, for example, an infatuated man, filled with greed or anger, commits various evil deeds by body, speech or mind, at that time these evil kamma-formations are all entirely conditioned through the co-arising and presence of avijja, or ignorance.
Thus if there is no avijja, there are no evil kamma-formations.
Therefore it is said that avijja is to its associated kamma-formations a condition by way of co-nascence, or simultaneous arising.
Further, as there is no evil kamma-formation without the presence of avijja, and no avijja without the presence of evil kamma-formations, therefore both are at any time, and under all circumstances, also mutual conditions to each other; and thus avijja and the evil kamma-formations are inseparable.
In so far as avijja is an ever-present root of all evil kamma-formations, we say that avijja is to the unwholesome kamma-formations an indispensable condition by way of root.
But there is still another and entirely different way in which avijja may be a condition to unwholesome kamma-formations, that is, as inducement.
For example, if a man, being filled with greed or anger, is induced by his infatuation and delusive thoughts to commit various crimes, such as murder, theft, adultery, etc., in that case avijja is the direct inducement and driving power for the subsequent arising of all those bad manifestations of will, i.e.
of all those unwholesome kamma-formations.
In other words, those bad unwholesome kamma-formations are conditioned by a preceding state of avijja as a direct inducement.
There is still another way in which avijja may become an inducement to unwholesome kamma-formations, namely, as object of thinking.
Suppose somebody remembers some evil and foolish pleasure once enjoyed by him; and while he is pondering over that former foolish state, he finds delight in it and becomes again filled with infatuation and greed for it; or he becomes sad and despondent that he cannot enjoy it any more.
In consequence of wrongly brooding over such a foolish object, over such a state of ignorance, many evil, unwholesome states arise in his mind.
In such a way, avijja may be to unwholesome kamma-formations a condition by way of inducement as object.
Here I have to point out that for a detailed understanding of P.S., we should have to know at least something about those twenty-four different modes in which mental or physical phenomena may be the condition to other mental and physical phenomena.
The entire Patthana, the last book of the Abhidhamma Pitaka, which fills six bulky volumes, treats exclusively of these twenty-four conditions, or paccaya, which it first describes and then applies to all the innumerable mental and physical phenomena of existence.
Here we shall consider only those most prominent ones, which we have already alluded to and applied to avijja, namely: hetu-paccaya, root condition; sahajata-paccaya, condition by way of co-nascence, i.e.
co-arising; aññam-añña-paccaya, condition by way of mutuality; upanissaya-paccaya, condition by way of either direct inducement, or inducement through object.
Here, it may be mentioned that all these translations of technical Pali terms are only very inadequate makeshifts, and should be taken as such.
I am therefore giving those technical terms repeatedly in both languages, in English as well as in Pali.
The Patthana Commentary compares the hetu-paccaya, or root condition, to the root of a tree.
The tree rests on its roots; and it has life only as long as these roots are not destroyed.
In the same way, all kammically wholesome and unwholesome kamma-formations are at any time conditioned through the presence and co-nascence, or simultaneity, of their respective wholesome or unwholesome roots.
The three unwholesome roots are lobha, dosa, moha, i.e.
greed, hate and delusion.
The three wholesome roots are alobha, adosa, amoha, i.e.
non-greed, or unselfishness; non-hate, or kindness; non-delusion, or knowledge.
Let us now consider sahajata-paccaya, the condition by way of co-nascence.
Sahajata, literally means: “arisen together” or “arising together,” hence our term “co-nascence,” or simultaneous arising.
This condition of co-nascence applies, above all, to consciousness and its concomitant mental phenomena, such as feeling, perception, volition, sense-impression, attention, etc.
For consciousness and all these mental phenomena are mutually conditioned through their simultaneous arising.
One cannot arise or exist without the other.
All are inseparably associated.
Thus if we say that feeling is to consciousness a condition by way of co-nascence, we mean to say that without the simultaneous arising of feeling, consciousness will never be able to arise.
In exactly the same way it is with all the other mental phenomena.
Once a well-known Buddhist author, in a discussion with me, to my greatest surprise positively declared that there may be painful feeling without consciousness, for example during a painful operation whilst being under chloroform.
This indeed is a most extraordinary blunder.
How will it ever be possible to feel pain without being conscious of it?
Painful feeling is a mental phenomenon and as such inseparable from consciousness and the other mental phenomena.
If we do not perceive pain, and are not conscious of pain, how can we feel pain?
Thus consciousness, feeling, perception and all the other mental phenomena are mutually conditioned by way of co-nascence.
Now let us consider upanissaya-paccaya, the condition by way of inducement.
This condition is of various kinds, and it forms combinations with certain other conditions.
It applies to a very wide field, in fact to anything whatsoever.
We shall treat this condition here only in a very general way, without making any distinctions.
Anything past or future, physical or mental, real or imaginary, may become an inducement to the arising of mental phenomena, or of actions, or occurrences.
So, for example, the Buddha and his Dhamma had been a condition for my coming to the East.
So were the Pali scholars whose translations I had read.
So was the first Buddhist lecture I had heard in Germany in.
Or Nibbana, as object of our thinking, may become an inducement to our joining the Order, or living a pure life, etc.
Also all those past thinkers, scientists and artists were by their works and activities an inducement to the developed culture of later generations.
Money, as object of our desire, may become an inducement to our making the necessary exertions to get it; or it also may become an inducement to theft and robbery.
Faith, knowledge, mental concentration, etc., may be a direct inducement to various noble and unselfish actions.
Good or bad friends may be a direct inducement to good or bad conduct.
Suitable or unsuitable climate, food, dwelling, etc., may be an inducement to physical health or ill-health; physical health or ill-health to mental health or ill-health.
Thus all these things are conditioned through other things by way of inducement.
Now we shall consider arammana-paccaya, the condition by way of object.
The object may be either one of the five sense-objects, as visible object, sound, smell, taste, or bodily impression; or it may be any object of the mind.
Anything whatever may become the object of mind, be it physical or mental, past, present or future, real or imaginary.
Thus the visible object, consisting in differences of color, light and dark, is called the object-condition to eye-consciousness, or the visual sense.
Similar it is with the four other senses.
Without a physical sense-object no sense-consciousness ever will arise.
Further, past evil deeds, through being the object of our thinking, may, as we already have seen, become an inducement, or upanissaya, to repeat the same evil deeds; or they may arouse our disgust or repentance.
Thus past evil deeds, by wrong thinking about them, may become an inducement to an immoral life by way of object; and by right thinking about them, the same past evil deeds may become an inducement to a moral life.
In a similar way, good deeds, by right thinking about them, may become an inducement to further noble deeds; but by wrong thinking about one's own good deeds, they may become an inducement to self-conceit and vanity, and many other unwholesome states.
Hence, also such an immoral thing as avijja may become a condition to noble and wholesome kamma-formations.
To show this, let us return to our first proposition: “Through avijja are conditioned the kamma-formations.” How may such an evil state as avijja become a condition to noble and wholesome kamma-formations?
It may become so in two ways, either by way of direct inducement, or inducement as mental object.
I shall illustrate this statement by an example.
At the Buddha's time many a heretic, induced by mere vanity and delusion, went to the Buddha and tried by dialectics to defeat the Master.
However, after a short controversy he was converted: he became a virtuous follower and life-long supporter of the Blessed One, or even attained Arahantship.
Here, all these virtuous actions, even the attainment of Arahantship of the new convert, were conditioned by his former avijja as an inducement; had this delusive idea of defeating the Buddha not arisen in his mind, he perhaps might have never in his life even visited the Blessed One.
Thus avijja was to his noble and wholesome kamma-formations a condition by way of direct inducement.
Further, suppose we take avijja as object of our contemplation, considering it as something evil and rejectable, as the root-cause of all misery in the world, then we thereby may produce many noble and wholesome kamma-formations.
In this case, avijja is to these wholesome kamma-formations a condition by way of inducement as object.
Before proceeding to the second proposition, I wish to call your attention to the fact that avijja, or ignorance, though the main condition for kamma-formations, is in no way the only condition for them; and so are the kamma-formations to consciousness, etc.
Each of the conditionally arising phenomena of P.S.
is dependent on various conditions besides those given in the formula, and all may be interrelated and interdependent in manifold ways.
You may have noticed that nearly always I speak only of conditions, and rarely have I used the word “cause.” This word “cause” is often used in a very vague or wrong sense.
“Cause” refers really to that thing which — if all the necessary conditions are present — by inner necessity is in time followed by another thing as its “result,” so that already in the cause the future result is lying latent, as it were, just as in the mango seed the future mango tree lies latent.
And just as from the mango seed only a mango tree may result, never an apple tree nor any other tree, just so may a cause result only in just one single thing of a similar character, never in various things nor in things of a different character.
If, for example, a man grows furious on being scolded, people generally would say that the scolding man was the cause of the fury.
But this is a very vague statement.
The cause of the man's fury really lies in himself, in his own character, not in the person scolding him.
The scolder's words were merely an inducement to the manifestation of his latent fury.
The word “cause” signifies only one of the many kinds of conditions, and it should, in Buddhist philosophy, be reserved for kamma, i.e.
the rebirth-producing volitional activities bound up with wholesome or unwholesome roots, constituting the cause of rebirth, and resulting in rebirth as their effect, or vipaka.
Herewith we come to the second proposition: Sankhara-paccaya viññanam: “Through the kamma-formations consciousness is conditioned.” In other words: through kamma, or the volitional activities, in the past birth, the conscious life in this present birth is conditioned.
Here the following has to be stated: The five links — consciousness, mental and physical phenomena, the six bases of mental life, impression, and feeling — refer here only to kamma-resultant, neutral phenomena, thus representing the “passive” side of life.
However, the five links — ignorance, kamma-formations, craving, clinging, and kammical life-process — constitute kamma, thus representing the “active” side of life.
Hence the five passive links, as consciousness, etc., are to be considered the five results, and the five active links, as avijja, etc., the five causes.
Thus the life-affirming will, or volition, manifested in these five kammic causes, is the seed from which all life has sprung, and from which it will spring again in the future.
Our second proposition therefore shows that our present conscious life is the result of our kamma-formations produced in the past life, and that without these prenatal kamma-formations as the necessary cause, no conscious life would ever have sprung up in our mother's womb.
Hence, the kamma-formations are to the rebirth-consciousness of the embryonic being, at its conception in the mother's womb, a condition by way of kamma, or cause.
And so are the kamma-formations to all the morally neutral elements of consciousness.
Hence, also the five kinds of sense-consciousness with desirable and agreeable objects are the result, or vipaka, of the prenatal wholesome kamma-formations; and those with undesirable and disagreeable objects are the result of unwholesome kamma-formations.
Now we come to the third proposition, namely: Viññana-paccaya nama-rupam: “Through consciousness the mental and physical phenomena are conditioned.” The meaning of this proposition can be inferred from the Mahanidana Sutta, where it is said: “If consciousness were not to appear in the mother's womb, would the mental and physical phenomena arise?
The mental phenomena refer here to those seven universal mental phenomena inseparably bound up with all kamma-resultant consciousness, even with the five kinds of sense-consciousness.
These seven inseparable universal mental phenomena are: feeling, perception, impression, volition, vitality, attention, concentration; in kamma-resultant mind-consciousness they are increased by three or four further phenomena.
The physical phenomena refer to this body and its various organs, faculties and functions.
Now, how are the mental phenomena, or nama, conditioned through consciousness?
And how the physical phenomena, or rupa?
Any state of consciousness, as already explained, is to its concomitant mental phenomena, such as feeling, etc., a condition by way of co-nascence, or simultaneous arising.
Consciousness cannot arise and exist without feeling, nor feeling without consciousness; and also all the other mental phenomena which belong to the same state of consciousness are inseparably bound up with it into a single unit, and have no independent existence.
These mental phenomena are, as it were, only the different aspects of those units of consciousness which, like lightning, every moment flash up and immediately thereafter disappear forever.
But how may consciousness be a condition for the various physical phenomena?
In planes of existence where both matter and mind exist, e.g.
in the human realm, at the moment of conception consciousness is an absolutely necessary condition for the arising of organic physical phenomena; it is a condition by way of co-nascence.
If there is no consciousness, no conception takes place, and no organic material phenomena appear.
During life-continuity, however, consciousness is to the already arisen physical phenomena a condition by way of post-nascence, or later-arising, and also by way of nutriment, because consciousness forms a prop and support for the upkeep of the body.
Just as the feeling of hunger is a condition for the feeding and upkeep of this already arisen body, just so is consciousness to this already arisen body a condition and support by its post-nascence, or later arising.
If consciousness would rise no more, the physical organs would gradually cease their functioning, lose their faculties, and the body would die.
In this way we have to understand the proposition: viññana-paccaya nama-rupam: “Through consciousness the mental and physical phenomena are conditioned.
Now, we come to the fourth proposition: Nama-rupa-paccaya salayatanam: “Through the mental and physical phenomena the six bases of mental life are conditioned.” The first five of these bases are the five physical sense-organs, eye, ear, nose, tongue, body; the sixth base, the mind base, is a collective term for the many different classes of consciousness, i.e.
for the five kinds of sense-consciousness and the many kinds of mind-consciousness.
Hence five bases are physical phenomena, namely, eye, ear, etc., and the sixth base is identical with consciousness.
In which way, now, are the mental and physical phenomena a condition for the five physical bases, or sense-organs, and how for the sixth base, or consciousness?
Here we really get four chief questions:
The first question is: How are the mental phenomena a condition for the five physical bases, or sense-organs?
The seven inseparable mental phenomena associated with sense-consciousness, such as feeling, perception, etc., are to the five physical bases, or sense-organs, a condition by way of post-nascence, and in other ways.
The mental activity during life, namely, is a necessary support to the five physical bases, or sense organs, already produced at birth, as explained before.
The second question is: How are mental phenomena a condition to the mind-base or consciousness?
The mental phenomena, as feeling, perception, volition, etc., are at any time to the mind-base, or consciousness, a condition by way of simultaneous arising, or co-nascence.
You will remember that I repeatedly said that consciousness cannot arise without the co-arising of feeling and the other phenomena, because consciousness and all its mental concomitants are inseparably bound up together, and mutually dependent upon one another.
Thus I have shown how the mental phenomena are a condition to the five physical bases or sense-organs, as well as to the mind-base or consciousness.
Now we come to the third question: How are the physical phenomena a condition for the five physical bases, or sense-organs?
The four primary physical elements, i.e.
the solid, fluid, heat, and motion, are to any of the five physical bases, or sense-organs, at the very moment of their first coming into existence, a condition by way of simultaneous arising; but during life these four physical elements are to the five bases, or sense-organs, a condition by way of foundation on which the sense-organs are entirely dependent.
Further, the physical phenomenon “vitality” is to the five bases, or sense-organs, a condition by way of presence, etc.; in other words, the five bases, or sense-organs, depend on the presence of physical life, without which the five sense organs could not exist.
The physical phenomenon “nutrition” is to the five physical bases a condition by way of presence, because the five sense-organs can only exist as long as they get their necessary nutriment.
Thus I have shown how the physical phenomena, or rupa, are a condition for the five physical bases, or ayatana.
There remains only the fourth question: How are the physical phenomena a condition for the mind-base, or consciousness?
The five physical phenomena, as eye, ear, nose, etc., are to the five kinds of sense-consciousness, i.e.
to seeing, hearing, etc., a condition by way of foundation and by way of pre-nascence, presence, etc.
These five kinds of sense-consciousness, during life, cannot arise without the pre-arising of the five physical sense-organs as their foundation; therefore without the pre-arising and presence of the eye, no seeing; without the pre-arising and presence of the ear, no hearing, etc.; so that, if these five sense-organs are destroyed, no corresponding sense-consciousness can arise any longer.
In a similar way is the physical organ of mind the condition for the various stages of mind-consciousness.
In the canonical books no special physical organ is mentioned by name as the physical foundation of the mind-consciousness, neither the brain nor the heart, though the heart is taught as such by all the commentaries, as well as by the general Buddhist tradition.
I think it is my Burmese friend Shwe Zan Aung who first made this fact known in his Compendium of Philosophy.
For the Buddhist it matters little whether it is the heart or the brain or any other organ that constitutes the physical base of mind.
Thus we have seen how the physical phenomena are a condition to the mind-base, or consciousness.
And herewith we have settled the meaning of the proposition: “Through the mental and physical phenomena the six bases of mental life are conditioned.
Now we come to the fifth propostion: Salayatana-paccaya phasso: “Through the six bases sense-impression is conditioned.” In other words: Conditioned through the physical eye is visual impression, conditioned through the ear sound impression, conditioned through the nose smell impression, conditioned through the tongue taste impression, conditioned through the body bodily impression, conditioned through the mind-base or consciousness mental impression.
The five physical bases are to their corresponding sense-impressions a condition by way of foundation and by way of pre-nascence and in other ways besides.
The five sense-organs are not only the foundation for consciousness, as we have seen, but also for all its mental concomitants, hence also for sense-impression.
And as these five bases, or sense-organs, have already come into existence at birth, they are called a pre-nascent condition to the later arising five sense-impressions.
The mind-base or consciousness is at any time to its concomitant sensory or mental impression a condition by way of simultaneous arising or co-nascence, etc.
In other words, eye-consciousness arises simultaneously with visual impression, ear-consciousness with sound impression, etc., and mind-consciousness with mental impression.
Also the external physical bases — the five sense-objects, as the visual object, sound, smell, etc.
— these too are an indispensable condition to the arising of sense-impression.
So visual impression could never arise without the pre-arising of the visible object, sound impression never without the pre-arising of the sound-object, etc.
Hence the arising of the five sense-impressions depends on the pre-arising of the visual object, the sound-object, etc.
Therefore the arising of the five sense-impressions depends just as much on the pre-arising and presence of the five physical sense-objects as on the pre-arising of the five sense-organs, as already stated.
Thus sense-impression is also conditioned through the five external physical bases, i.e.
through the five sense-objects.
Further, as all the physical sense-objects may also become objects of mind-consciousness, therefore they are also a condition for mind-consciousness as well as for its concomitant phenomena, such as mental impression, etc.
Thus without physical sense-organ and physical sense-object there is no sense-impression; and without mind and mind-object no mental impression.
Therefore it is said: “Through the six sense bases sense-impression is conditioned.
Thereafter follows the sixth proposition: Phassa-paccaya vedana: “Through impression feeling is conditioned.” There are six kinds of feeling: feeling associated with visual impression, feeling associated with sound impression, feeling associated with smell impression, feeling associated with taste impression, feeling associated with bodily impression, and feeling associated with mental impression.
Bodily feeling may be either agreeable or disagreeable, according to whether it is the result of wholesome or unwholesome kamma.
Mental feeling may be either agreeable, i.e.
joy, or disagreeable, i.e.
sadness; or it may be indifferent.
The feelings associated with visual, sound, smell and taste impression, are, as such, always indifferent, but they may have either desirable or undesirable objects, according to the kamma in a previous life.
Whatever the feeling may be — pleasant or painful, happy or unhappy or indifferent, whether feeling of body or of mind — any feeling is conditioned either through one of the five sense-impressions or through mental impression.
And these impressions are a condition to their associated feeling by way of co-nascence or simultaneous arising, and in many other ways.
Here you will again remember that all the mental phenomena in one and the same state of consciousness, hence also impression and feeling, are necessarily dependent one upon another by their simultaneous arising, their presence, their association, etc.
But to any feeling associated with the different stages of mind-consciousness following upon a sense-impression, the preceding visual or other sense-impression is an inducement by way of proximity.
In other words, the preceding sense-impression is a decisive support, or inducement, to any feeling bound up with the succeeding mind-consciousness.
Thus we have seen how through sensory and mental impression, or phassa, feeling, or vedana, is conditioned.
Now comes the seventh proposition: Vedana-paccaya tanha: “Through feeling craving is conditioned.
Corresponding to the six senses, there are six kinds of craving, namely: craving for visible objects, craving for sounds, craving for odors, craving for tastes, craving for bodily impressions, craving for mind-objects.
If the craving for any of these objects is connected with the desire for sensual enjoyment, it is called “sensuous craving”.
If connected with the belief in eternal personal existence, it is called “craving for existence”.
If connected with the belief in self-annihilation at death, it is called “craving for self-annihilation”.
Any neutral feeling, whether agreeable, disagreeable or indifferent, whether happy or unhappy feeling, may be to the subsequent craving a condition either by way of simple inducement, or of inducement as object.
For example, conditioned through pleasurable feeling due to the beautiful appearance of persons or things, there may arise craving for such visible objects.
Or conditioned through pleasurable feeling due to pleasant food, craving for tastes may arise.
Or thinking of those feelings of pleasure and enjoyment procurable by money, people may become filled with craving for money and pleasure.
Or pondering over past pleasures and feelings of happiness, people may again become filled with craving and longing for such pleasures.
Or thinking of heavenly bliss and joy, people may become filled with craving for rebirth in such heavenly worlds.
In all these cases pleasant feeling is to craving either a condition by way of simple inducement, or inducement as object of thinking.
But not only agreeable and happy feeling, but even disagreeable and unhappy feeling may become a condition for craving.
For example, to a man being tormented with bodily pain or oppressed in mind, the craving may arise to be released from such misery.
Thus, through feeling unhappy and dissatisfied with his miserable lot, a poor man, or a beggar, or an outcast, or a sick man, or a prisoner, may become filled with longing and craving for release from such a condition.
In all these cases unpleasant and miserable feeling of body and mind forms for craving a condition by way of inducement, without which such craving might never have arisen.
Even expected future feeling of happiness may, by thinking about it, become a mighty incentive, or inducement, to craving.
Thus, whatever craving arises depends in some way or other on feeling, be it past, present, or even future feeling.
Therefore it is said: Vedana-paccaya tanha: “Through feeling craving is conditioned.
Now we have reached the eighth proposition: Tanha-paccaya upadanam: “Through craving clinging is conditioned.” Upadana, or clinging, is said to be a name for developed or intensified craving.
In the texts we find four kinds of clinging: sensuous clinging, clinging to wrong views, clinging to faith in the moral efficacy of mere outward rules and rituals, and clinging to the belief in either an eternal or a temporary ego-entity.
The first one, sensuous clinging, refers to objects of sensuous enjoyment, while the three other kinds of clinging are connected with wrong views.
Whenever clinging to views or rituals arises, at that very moment also craving must arise; without the simultaneous arising of craving, there would be no such attachments to these views and rituals.
Hence craving, or tanha, is for these kinds of clinging, or upadana, a condition by way of co-nascence.
But besides this, craving may be to such kind of clinging also a condition by way of inducement.
Suppose a fool, who is craving for rebirth in heaven, thinks that by following certain outward moral rules, or by mere belief in a creator, he will attain the object of his desire.
So he firmly attaches himself to the practice of mere outward rules and rituals, or to the belief in a creator.
In this case, craving is for such kind of clinging a condition by way of inducement, or upanissaya-paccaya.
To sensuous clinging, or kamupadana, however, craving may only be a condition by way of direct inducement.
The craving for sense-objects itself gradually develops and turns into strong sensuous clinging and attachment, or kamupadana.
For example, craving and desire for objects of sensual enjoyment, for money, food, gambling, drinking, etc.
may gradually grow into a strong habit, into a firm attachment and clinging.
Thus I have shown how craving is the condition for clinging.
As it is said: Tanha-paccaya upadanam: “Through craving clinging is conditioned.
Next we come to the ninth proposition: Upadana-paccaya bhavo:”Through clinging the process of becoming is conditioned.” Now this process of becoming or existence really consists of two processes: the kamma-process, i.e.
the kammically active side of life; and the kamma-resultant rebirth-process, i.e.
the kammically passive and morally neutral side of life.
The kammically active side of this life-process is, as we have seen, represented by five links, namely: ignorance, kamma-formations, craving, clinging, kamma-process.
The passive side of life is represented by five links, namely: consciousness, mental and physical phenomena, the six bases, impression, feeling.
Thus the five passive links, as consciousness, etc., refer here only to kamma-resultant phenomena, and not to such as are associated with active kamma.
The five active links, as ignorance, etc., are the causes of the five passive links of the future, as kamma-resultant consciousness, etc.; and thus these five passive links are the results of the five active links.
In that way, the P.S.
may be represented by twenty links: five causes in the past life, and five results in the present one; five causes in the present life, and five results in the future one.
As it is said in the Visuddhimagga:
Let me here recall to you my definition of the term “cause” as “that which by inner necessity is followed in time by its result.” There are twenty-four modes of conditioning, but only one of them should be called cause, namely, kamma.
Though this kammic cause is in time followed by its result, it nevertheless may depend on a preceding kamma-result as its inducement condition.
Thus for example, feeling, within the P.S., is a kamma-result; but still, at the same time, it is an inducement-condition to the subsequent arising of craving, which latter is a kamma cause.
Now, let us return to our proposition: upadana-paccaya bhavo:”Through clinging the process of becoming is conditioned,” that is, the kamma-process, and thereafter, in the next life, the kamma-resultant rebirth-process.
The kamma-process in this ninth proposition is, correctly speaking, a collective name for rebirth-producing volition together with all the mental phenomena associated therewith; while the second link, “kamma-formations”, designates as such merely rebirth-producing volition.
But in reality both links amount to one and the same thing, namely kamma.
Clinging, or upadana, may be an inducement to all kinds of evil and unwholesome kamma.
Sensuous clinging, or attachment to sense-objects and sensual enjoyment, may be a direct inducement to murder, robbery, theft, adultery, to envy, hatred, revenge; to many evil actions of body, speech and mind.
Clinging to the blind belief in mere outward rules and rituals may lead to self-complacency, mental torpor and stagnation, to contempt of others, presumption, intolerance, fanaticism and cruelty.
In all these cases, clinging is to the kamma-process a condition by way of inducement, and is a direct inducement to evil volitional activities of body, speech or mind.
Moreover, clinging is to any evil kamma-process also a condition by way of simultaneous arising.
Thus I have shown how clinging is the condition of the kamma-process.
Now I shall show how the kamma-process is the condition for the kamma-resultant rebirth-process.
Here we come to the tenth proposition.
Bhava-paccaya jati:”Through the process of becoming rebirth is conditioned.” That means: the kamma-process dominated by the life-affirming volitions is the cause of rebirth.
Rebirth includes here the entire embryonic process which in the human world begins with conception in the mother's womb and ends with parturition.
Thus kamma volition is the seed from which all life germinates, just as from the mango seed germinates the little mango plant, which in the course of time turns into a mighty mango tree.
But how does one know that the kamma-process, or kamma volition, is really the cause of rebirth?
The Visuddhimagga gives the following answer:
Though the outward conditions at the birth of beings may be absolutely the same, there still can be seen a difference in beings with regard to their character, as wretched or noble, etc.
Even though the outward conditions, such as sperm, or blood of father and mother, may be the same, there still can be seen that difference between beings, even if they be twins.
This difference cannot be without reason, as it can be noticed at any time, and in any being.
It can have no other cause than the pre-natal kamma-process.
As also for the life of those beings which have been reborn, no other reason can be found, therefore that difference must be due to the pre-natal kamma-process.
Kamma, or volition, indeed, is the cause for the difference among beings with regard to their character, as high, low, etc.
Therefore the Buddha has said: “kamma divides beings into high and low.” In this way we should understand that the kammic process is the cause of rebirth.
Thus, according to Buddhism, the present rebirth is the result of the craving, clinging and kamma volitions in the past birth.
And the craving, clinging and kamma volitions in this present birth are the cause of future rebirth.
But just as in this ever-changing mental and physical process of existence nothing can be found that passes even from one moment to the next, just so no abiding element can be found, no entity, no ego, that would pass from one birth to the next.
In this ever repeated process of rebirth, in the absolute sense, no ego-entity is to be found besides these conditionally arising and passing phenomena.
Thus, correctly speaking, it is not myself and not my person that is reborn; nor is it another person that is reborn.
All such terms as “person” or “individual” or “man” or “I” or “you” or “mine,” etc., do not refer to any real entity; they are merely terms used for convenience sake, in Pali vohara-vacana, “conventional terms”; and there is really nothing to be found beside these conditionally arising and passing mental and physical phenomena.
Therefore the Buddha has said:
To believe that the doer of the deed will be the same, as the one who experiences its result: this is the one extreme.
To believe that the doer of the deed, and the one who experiences its result, are two different persons: this is the other extreme.
Both these extremes the Perfect One has avoided and taught the truth that lies in the middle of both, that is: Through ignorance the kamma-formations are conditioned; through the kamma-formations, consciousness; through consciousness, the mental and physical phenomena; through the mental and physical phenomena, the six bases; through the six bases, impression; through impression, feeling; through feeling, craving; through craving, clinging; through clinging, the life-process; through the life-process, rebirth; through rebirth, decay and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
Thus arises this whole mass of suffering.
This phenomenality and egolessness of existence has been beautifully expressed in two verses of the Visuddhimagga:
In hearing that Buddhism teaches that everything is determined by conditions, someone might come to the conclusion that Buddhism teaches some sort of fatalism, or that man has no free will, or that will is not free.
Now, with regard to the two questions: “Has man a free will?” and “Is will free?” the Buddhist will say that both these questions are to be rejected for being wrongly put, and therefore unanswerable.
The first question “Has man a free will?” is to be rejected for the reason that, beside these ever-changing mental and physical phenomena, in the absolute sense no such thing or entity can be found that we could call “man,” so that “man” as such is merely a name without any reality.
The second question “Is will free?” is to be rejected for the reason that “will” is only a momentary mental phenomenon, just like feeling, consciousness, etc., and thus does not yet exist before it arises, and that therefore of a non-existent thing — of a thing which is not — one could, properly speaking, not ask whether it is free or unfree.
The only admissible question would be: “Is the arising of will independent of conditions, or is it conditioned?” But the same question would equally apply also to all the other mental phenomena, as well as to all the physical phenomena, in other words, to everything and every occurrence whatever.
And the answer would be: Be it “will,” or “feeling,” or any other mental or physical phenomenon, the arising of anything whatsoever depends on conditions; and without these conditions, nothing can ever arise or enter into existence.
According to Buddhism, everything mental and physical happens in accordance with laws and conditions; and if it were otherwise, chaos and blind chance would reign.
But such a thing is impossible and contradicts all laws of thinking.
Now we have reached the eleventh and last proposition: Jati-paccaya jara-maranam: “Through rebirth decay and death are conditioned.” Without birth there cannot be decay and death.
If we had not been born, we would not have to die, and would not be exposed to all sorts of misery.
Thus rebirth is a necessary condition for decay and death, and for all other forms of misery.
Hence it was said: “Through rebirth decay and death are conditioned.
Herewith the explanation of the eleven propositions of the paticca-samuppada formula has been brought to a close.
From my explanations you will have seen that the twelve links of the formula are distributed over three successive lives, and that they may be applied to our past, present and future lives.
The first two links, avijja and kamma-formations, represent the kamma causes in the past life; the next five links, consciousness, etc., represent the kamma-results in the present life; the following three links, craving, clinging and kamma-process, represent the kammic causes in the present life; and the two last links, rebirth, and decay and death, represent the kamma-results in the future life.
You ought, however, to remember that the full kammic causes are five, namely: ignorance, kamma-formations, craving, clinging, kamma-process existence, and that thus we really get five causes in the past and five results in the present; five causes in the present and five results in the future.
Therefore it was said:
Now, if there had been no ignorance and no kamma-formations or life-affirming volitions in the past life, no consciousness and new life would have sprung up in our mother's womb, and our present birth would not have taken place.
However, if by deep penetration and deep insight into the evanescent nature and the egolessness of all existence, one becomes fully detached from all forms of existence, and freed from all ignorance, craving and clinging to existence, freed from all those selfish kamma-formations or volitions, then no further rebirth will follow, and the goal taught by the Buddha will have been realized, namely, deliverance from rebirth and suffering.
The following diagram show at a glance the relationship of dependence between three successive lives.
The whole of the Buddha's teachings may be summed up in three words: morality, mental concentration, and wisdom, sila, samadhi and pañña.
This is the threefold division of the Noble Eightfold Path leading to deliverance from the misery of Samsara.
And of this Eightfold Path, right speech, action and livelihood are included in morality, or sila; right effort, mindfulness and concentration in mental concentration, or samadhi; right understanding and thought in wisdom, or pañña.
Of these three stages, morality constitutes the foundation without which no real progress along the Eightfold Path to purity and deliverance is possible.
The two higher stages, concentration and wisdom, are brought to perfection by that which in the West usually, but rather ambiguously, is called “meditation.” By this latter term, the Buddhist Pali term bhavana is usually translated.
The word bhavana is a verbal noun derived from the causative of the verb bhavati, to be, to become, and therefore literally means “the bringing into existence,” i.e.
producing, development.
Thus the development of mind is twofold:
In this popular exposition I only wish to give a general idea of the authentic method of this twofold mental culture, and I shall not be going much into details.
It is to be regretted that in Sri Lanka one very rarely meets with laymen, or even monks, who are earnestly devoting themselves to these two higher stages of Buddhist life.
In Burma and Siam, however, the other two strongholds of original Buddhism, we still find quite a number of monks and hermits, who are living in the solitudes of deep forests or in caves, and who, detached from all worldly wishes and anxieties, are striving for the goal set forth by our Master, and are training themselves in tranquillity and insight.
Undoubtedly, for the real development of higher life, solitude, at least temporarily, is an absolute necessity.
Though the concentration exercises may serve various preliminary purposes, their ultimate object is to reach that unshakable tranquillity and purity of the mind, which is the foundation of insight leading to deliverance from the cycle of rebirth and misery.
The Buddha has said: “Now what, monks, is Nibbana?
It is the extinction of greed, hate and delusion.
And what, monks, is the path leading to Nibbana?
It is mental tranquillity and insight.
Mental tranquillity is the unshakable state of mind gained through the persevering training in mental concentration.
Tranquillity, according to the Commentary Sankhepavannana, bestows a threefold blessing: auspicious rebirth, bliss in this very life, and mental purity and fitness for insight.
Insight is a name for the flashing forth of the light of wisdom and insight into the true nature of existence, i.e.
into the impermanency, suffering and egolessness of all corporeality, feelings, perceptions, mental formations and consciousness.
For the development of concentration and mental tranquillity, there exist many different exercises.
In the Visuddhimagga forty such concentration-exercises are enumerated and minutely explained, namely: ten kasina exercises, ten cemetery meditations, ten reflections — on the qualities of the Buddha, the Dhamma, the Sangha; on morality, liberality, heavenly beings; further, on death, the body, in-and-out breathing, and the peace of detachment.
Further, the development of the four divine abodes; the four immaterial states; the perception of the filthiness of food; and the analysis of the four elements.
Before entering into a discussion of some of these forty concentration exercises, I have first to deal with the three grades of intensity of concentration, and further to speak of those higher states of mind called jhanas, or mental “absorptions,” which may be attained by a great number of these exercises.
The three grades of intensity of concentration are:
Preliminary concentration is present whenever one directs one's mind to any of the various objects of concentration.
Neighborhood concentration is that grade of concentration which approaches, or comes near, the first jhana, and is in many exercises marked by a mentally visible pure and unshakable mental image, the so-called reflex-mark, of which we shall speak later.
Attainment concentration is that grade of concentration which is present during the jhanas.
By the jhanas are meant supersensual states of perfect mental absorption, in which the fivefold sense activity is suspended.
The jhanas can only be attained in absolute solitude and by unremitting perseverance in the development of concentration.
No visual or audible impressions arise at such a time, no bodily feeling is felt.
In this state the monk appears to the outside world as if dead.
But though all the outer sense-impressions, such as seeing, hearing, etc., have disappeared, the mind still remains active, perfectly alert and fully awake.
The first jhana is a stage of peace, ecstasy and joyful bliss, yet “thought conception and discursive thinking”, i.e.
the so-called “inner speech” or “verbal activities of the mind”, are still at work.
As soon as these verbal activities of the mind have ceased, one has attained the second jhana, which is a state of highest “rapture and joyful bliss”, free from thinking and pondering.
After the fading away of rapture and ecstasy, the third jhana is reached, marked by “equanimous joy”.
After the complete fading away of joy, a state of perfect equanimity abides, called the fourth jhana.
The mind, after emerging from the fourth jhana, is again and again described in the suttas as “serene, pure, lucid, stainless, devoid of evil, pliable, able to act, firm and imperturbable.
Let us now deal separately with some of the concentration exercises.
Amongst those forty exercises described in the Visuddhimagga, the ten kasina exercises resemble somewhat certain methods of inducing hypnotic sleep, etc., by gazing at bright objects.
Therefore, in order to avoid such an outcome, one must beware of sleepiness and strive to keep the mind ever alert.
There are four color kasinas, four element kasinas, space kasina, and light kasina.
In the color kasina, a blue, yellow, red or white disk may serve as the object at which to gaze, or flowers, cloth, etc.
of these colors.
In the earth kasina exercise the object of our gazing may be a plowed field seen from a distance, or a circular piece of earth prepared for this purpose.
In the water kasina exercise we may gaze at a pond seen from a higher elevation, or at water contained in a vessel.
Similar it is with the fire kasina and wind kasina.
As an example how to practice such an exercise, let us consider the blue kasina exercise.
For this purpose let us prepare a round disk made of paper or cloth, and fix it to the wall of our room.
Then seated before the disk, we fix our whole attention upon this “preliminary mark” and so produce “preliminary concentration”.
Now, while constantly gazing at this blue disk, we must strive to remain mentally alert and steadfast, in order not to fall into hypnotic sleep, as already pointed out.
At the same time we must keep from our mind all outside impressions and thoughts on other objects, as well as all those disturbing and often dangerous mental visions and hallucinations that may arise.
While exclusively fixing our eyes and thoughts on the blue disk as our sole object, the things around the disk seem, as it were, to disappear, and the disk itself seems to become more and more a mere mental phantom.
Now, whether the eyes are opened or closed, we perceive the mentalized kasina disk, which more and more assumes the appearance of the bright orb of the moon.
This is the “acquired mark” which, though apparently seen by means of our physical eyes, is nevertheless produced and perceived only by our mind, independently of the sense activity of the eye.
As soon as this mentally produced image becomes steady and vanishes no longer, but remains safely fixed in the mind, we should move to another place and there continue our exercise.
In fixing our mental eye more and more upon the mentally produced image or light, it becomes continually steadier and brighter, till at last it may assume the appearance of the bright morning star, or something similar.
Herewith the mental “reflex mark” is attained, and along with it “neighborhood concentration”.
Already during this stage all mental hindrances have, at least temporarily, disappeared and do not arise.
No sensual lust arises in such a state.
No ill-will can irritate the mind.
All mental stiffness and dullness is overcome.
No restlessness and anxiety and no wavering doubt and scepticism can any more divert the mind.
As long as there is a possibility for the arising of these five mental hindrances, so long there can be no lasting tranquillity of the mind.
By tenaciously fixing our mind to the reflex mark we eventually reach the attainment concentration and thereby enter into the first jhana.
And by becoming more and more absorbed, and by the gradual vanishing, one by one, of thought conception and discursive thinking, of rapture and joy, we consecutively pass through the three remaining jhanas, as described before.
Next let us touch upon the “cemetery contemplations.” The goal of these exercises is to create a concentrated and tranquil state of mind by arousing disgust for the carnal desires and detachment from them.
The objects of the cemetery contemplations, being either real or imaginary, are: a putrified corpse, a corpse gnawed by wild animals or by worms, a skeleton, scattered bones, bones crumbled to dust, etc.
Of the remaining concentration exercises, I intend to speak only of the four “divine abodes”: all-embracing kindness, compassion altruistic joy and equanimity.
The development of all-embracing kindness is, according to the Visuddhimagga, to be practiced somewhat as follows:
First one should think of oneself: “May I be happy!
May I be free from suffering!” Thus, beginning with oneself, one should then in the same way extend loving and benevolent thoughts to one's teacher, then to one's friends and companions, then to all persons living in and around the same house, then to the inhabitants of the nearest street, then by and by to the whole village or town, then to the whole country; and making not the slightest difference between friend and enemy, blood relation and stranger, good people and bad people, one should finally pervade the whole world with all-embracing kindness.
And not only human beings, but also animals down to the tiniest insects, all should be embraced with kindness.
Identifying ourselves with all that lives, we should pervade the whole world with all-embracing kindness, above, below, to all sides, and should rouse in our innermost heart the fervent wish: “O, that all beings may be happy!
That all beings may be freed from greed, hate and delusion!
That all beings may find deliverance from Samsara!
By developing all-embracing kindness and goodwill, the heart will become purified of ill-feeling and anger, and filled with tranquillity, steadfastness and peace.
During this exercise the mind may eventually reach the ecstasy of the first jhana, and even gradually pass through the first three jhanas.
In a more or less similar way compassion and altruistic joy are to be developed.
In the Suttas we again and again find the stereotype words:
There, O monks, the monk with all-embracing kindness… or with compassion… altruistic joy… equanimity… pervades first one direction, then the second, then the third, then the fourth, above, below, round about, in every quarter.
And identifying himself with all, he pervades the entire universe with all-embracing kindness, with heart grown great, wide, deep, boundless, free from wrath and anger…
In the fourth divine abode, the “development of equanimity”, all persons and things are regarded with perfect equanimity and disinterestedness.
With unshakable equanimity the mind looks upon wealth and poverty, happiness and misery, free from agitation, free from inclination and aversion, steadfast and unmoved, beyond love and hatred, beyond joy and sorrow.
It may here be mentioned that concentration does not reach the same degree of intensity in each of the forty exercises.
For example, in some of them only neighborhood concentration may be reached, as in the reflections on the Buddha, the Dhamma, the Sangha, etc.
The cemetery contemplations may induce entrance into the first jhana.
The first three divine abodes may induce the first three jhanas.
The ten kasina exercises, however, as well as the exercise of equanimity and the attention on in-and-out breathing may induce all the four jhanas.
With regard to the nature, or temperament, of the person practicing concentration, it should be noted that the four color kasinas are particularly suited to an angry nature, while for an unsteady nature the kasina disk should be of small size.
We have already stated that all the concentration exercises, as such, serve only the purpose of developing mental tranquillity.
Mental tranquillity, however, is the fundamental and indispensable condition for the successful development of insight.
And this insight alone possesses the power to confer immediate entrance to the four stages of holiness, and thus to free us forever from the ten fetters that bind beings to the ever-turning wheel of existence.
Therefore our Master has said: “May you develop mental concentration, O monks.
For whoso is concentrated in mind, sees things as they really are.” Concerning insight we read in the Milindapañha: “Just as when a man brings a lamp into a dark chamber, the lamp produces light and renders all things visible, just so does insight, as soon as it arises, dispel the darkness of ignorance and bring forth the light of knowledge; and sending out its rays of wisdom, it renders clearly visible the Four Noble Truths.
And thus the earnestly striving monk, with clear and bright insight, beholds the impermanence, suffering and egolessness of all existence.” And in the Puggalapaññatti: “Just as a man in a dark and gloomy night, at the sudden flash of lightning, may with his eyes clearly recognize objects; even so one may through deep insight, perceive all things as they really are: 'This is suffering, this is the origin of suffering, this is the extinction of suffering, this is the path leading to the extinction of suffering.' “
Hence, just as morality forms the indispensable foundation for the successful development of mental tranquillity and concentration, just so, supported by morality, mental tranquillity and concentration forms the necessary foundation for the development of wisdom and insight.
And insight is the immediate condition for the entrance into the four stages of holiness.
For the successful development of insight, however, it is not an absolute necessity to have gained the jhanas.
The attainment of neighborhood concentration is sufficient for this purpose.
Moreover, during the jhanas the development of insight is not possible, as the initial practice of this exercise requires abstract thinking and analyzing, while in the first jhana abstract thinking is already weak, and totally absent in the three higher jhanas.
Insight, as already said, is induced by means of analysis and intense contemplation on all the phenomena of existence, i.e.
on corporeal phenomena, feelings, perceptions, mental formations and states of consciousness; by the contemplation on their impersonality, futility, emptiness and unsubstantiality; by contemplating the fact that in reality, neither inside nor outside these fleeting phenomena, is there to be found any ego-entity, and that “I” or “self” or “person,” etc., are nothing but conventional names.
Really, this teaching of unsubstantiality and egolessness, together with the teaching of the conditionedness of all phenomena of existence, are the only specific doctrines of Buddhism, and without insight into these profound truths nobody can ever rightly grasp the Four Noble Truths or enter the path.
All the other teachings of our Master may also be found in other philosophies or religions.
The jhanas have already been attained before, and independently of, the Buddha.
Love was preached by some other religions.
Likewise the impermanency and miserable nature of existence was taught by others.
But the liberating truths of impersonality and conditionedness of all existence have, of all religious teachers, been taught and revealed in full clarity only by the Buddha.
And these are the only specific doctrines on which the whole Buddhist structure rests.
Hence, as the understanding of egolessness and conditionedness of existence is the indispensable condition for a real understanding of the Four Noble Truths, and for deliverance from Samsara, one may rightly say that none but the Enlightened One has shown the right method of mental culture, and therewith the right way to deliverance.
The exercises for developing insight given in the Visuddhimagga are extremely varied.
Anyhow, I shall here briefly indicate the most essential ones.
Before, however, the monk begins with developing his insight, he at first should acquire a thorough knowledge of the Dhamma and know that the only true or actual elements in this evanescent existence are the five groups of existence: corporeal phenomena, feelings, perceptions, mental formations and states of consciousness.
And he should think of their impermanence, their unsatisfactoriness, their empty and conditioned nature, as well as of their twofold division into a mental and corporeal process.
Thus, after attaining and rising again from one of the jhanas, the monk may analyze the just experienced state of jhana.
And while doing so, he will realize that this mental state, called jhana, is nothing but a heap of rising and passing phenomena: thought conception, discursive thinking, joy, concentration, feeling, perception, mental formations and consciousness.
And pondering over these phenomena, he will find that this entire mental process is dependent on corporeality, and that again corporeality is a name for the four physical elements and the corporeality depending on them, as e.g.
the sense-organs, objects, etc.
Another monk may divide this mental-corporeal process into its eighteen elements, i.e.
the six sense-organs, six objects, and six kinds of consciousness, as: eye, visible object, eye-consciousness; ear, sound, ear-consciousness… mind, mind-object, mind-consciousness.
And he will understand thus: “Mere mental and physical phenomena are there, but no being, no personality, can be found.
Or just as after building up walls and roof with various materials, the enclosed space is called a house, just so this bodily structure built up by bones, flesh, sinews, etc., is called “body.
Or just as a wooden swivel-doll is empty, lifeless and inactive, but may, by means of a pulling device, move or stand and appear to be full of life and activity, just so are mind and body as such something empty, lifeless and inactive; but through the mutual influence of mind and body upon one another, this psycho-physical structure may move or stand and appear full of life and activity.
Thus the monk contemplates the conditionality of this psycho-physical process.
And he understands how all those bodily and mental phenomena come to decay and dissolution.
And he perceives the conditioned nature of the bodily and mental groups with regard to their dependent origination, namely: “Among the phenomena, old age and death can take place only if there is birth; birth only if there is the prenatal kamma-process, the kamma-process only if there is attachment to life… the kamma-formations only if there is ignorance and delusion.” In this way, all doubts vanish in the monk, such as: “Have I been in the past?” or: “Have I not been in the past?” etc.
Everywhere, in all the forms of existence, the monk sees only an ever-changing mental and bodily process, kept going through the concatenation of causes and effects and other conditions.
No doer does he see beside the deed, no receiver of the kamma-result.
And he rightly understands that it is only by way of conventional language that the wise with regard to a deed speak of a “doer,” or with regard to the kamma-result of a “receiver” of it.
The monk considers thus: “The kamma-produced five groups of the past have become extinguished then and there, but conditioned through the past kamma other groups have arisen in this existence; yet from the past existence nothing has passed over to this existence.
Also the present groups produced through the past kamma, will become extinguished here, but conditioned through the present kamma other groups will arise in the future; yet from this existence nothing will pass over to the next existence.
“Whatever there is of corporeality… feelings… perceptions… mental formations… consciousness, whether past, present or future… one's own or external… gross or subtle… lofty or low… far or near: all these phenomena of existence are impermanent… unsatisfactory… non-self.
For whatever is non-self is unsatisfactory and unable to ward off its own impermanence or oppression due to its arising and disappearing.
How could these things ever assume the role of a feeler, an agent, an experiencer of consciousness, an abiding personality?
All these things the monk considers as conditioned, subject to dissolution and disappearance.
Also in the external world the monk may observe the three characteristics.
The shoot of the asoka tree is at first light-red, then after two or three days it becomes deep-red.
Then it gets the appearance of a young sprout, then of a ripe sprout, then of a light-green leaf, then of a blue-green leaf.
From this time, continually depending upon a similar physical continuity, it becomes after one year a yellow leaf, and detaching itself from the stalk, it drops to the ground.
Thus each time, before the next following stage has appeared, the former stage dies off.
Further, by means of the eighteen kinds of insight the monk overcomes the wrong conceptions through their opposites, namely:
Having thus, by means of the eighteen kinds of insight, understood the phenomena with regard to their three characteristics, he has penetrated the impermanence, unsatisfactoriness and egolessness of all existence.
Contemplation on arising and disappearing: Further, the monk trains himself in insight with regard to the arising and disappearing of things: “All the physical and mental phenomena, without having been previously, come to arise, and arisen they disappear again.
Through the arising of the pre-natal ignorance, craving, kamma, and nutriment, there is conditioned the arising of corporeality; and through the extinction of these four causes, the extinction of corporeality takes place.
All life is like a dew drop that dissolves as soon as the sun rises.
Life is like an empty bubble, or like a furrow drawn on the water which immediately disappears again.
Life is something unsubstantial, unreal, an illusion, a mirage, a phantom, like a fire-wreath called forth by the circular swinging of a firebrand, or like a ghost-land, or foam, or a banana-stem.
Contemplation on dissolution: Now, while knowing that all these formations of existence, once arisen, will soon again come to extinction, there arises in him the contemplation on dissolution.
As consciousness is conditioned through the physical or mental objects, he considers it as impermanent.
He turns away from it, no longer delights in it.
He detaches himself from it, no longer has greed for it.
He brings it to extinction, does not let it rise again.
He lets it go, and no longer adheres to it.
And considering it as transient, he overcomes the idea of something permanent.
Knowledge consisting in awareness of terror: Whoso knows how in the past all formations of existence have become extinguished, how the present ones are coming to extinction, and how also all the future ones will become extinguished, to him there arises on that occasion the knowledge consisting in awareness of terror.
Contemplation on misery: “The arising of existence is a terror”: such knowledge consisting in awareness of terror, is called the knowledge of misery.
“The continuity of existence… the course of rebirth… the entering into existence… old age, disease, death, sorrow… lamentation… despair are a terror”: such knowledge consisting in awareness of terror, is called the knowledge of misery.
Contemplation on turning away: While the disciple in this way understands that all formations of existence are misery, his mind turns away from all formations, is weary of them, no longer delights in them.
Knowledge of the wish for deliverance: Now, while finding no delight in the formations of existence, he wishes to get rid of them, seeks for escape from them.
Reflecting contemplation: In order to find deliverance from all the formations of existence, he reflects on them and determines their three characteristics.
All formations he understands as impermanent for their being without duration, persisting only for a short while, being limited by their arising and disappearance, perishable, transient, frail, unsteady, subject to change, without substance, unreal, conditioned, subject to death.
All formations he considers as unsatisfactory for their being again and again oppressed, their being hard to endure, and their being the root of all suffering.
All formations he considers as non-self for their being something alien, unreal, void, empty, without owner, without master, without controller: “Empty are all formations, void are they of any self and of anything pertaining to a self… I am not anything to anyone, nor does anything belong to me in any regard.” Just as a reed is hollow and without pith, so also are corporeality, feeling, perception, mental formations and consciousness empty, void, impersonal, without master, unfree, something uncontrollable, impotent and alien.
Knowledge consisting in equanimity with regard to all formations: While the monk is thus grasping all the formations by considering them as empty, and determining their three characteristics, he gives up fear and anguish and abides in equanimity with regard to all the formations, no more concerns himself about them, and no longer conceives the idea of “I” and “mine.
Whoever considers the formations of existence as impermanent, to him they appear as a passing away.
Whoever considers them as unsatisfactory, to him they appear as terror.
Whoever considers them as non-self, to him they appear as empty.
Adaptation knowledge: “Now the path will reveal itself”: thus thinking, the monk's mind reflects with equanimity on all the formations of existence as impermanent, unsatisfactory and non-self and thereupon his consciousness sinks into the subconscious stream.
Immediately thereafter arises awareness at the mind-door, taking as objects all phenomena just as before, regarding them as impermanent, unsatisfactory and non-self.
Thereafter, in following up again the interrupted continuity of consciousness, the three impulsive moments, known as the preliminary, access and adaptation moment, flash up one after the other, with the same phenomena as object.
One speaks of “adaptation” because this knowledge adapts itself to the preceding eight kinds of insight knowledge performing the same functions, and to the following elements of enlightenment immediately thereafter.
Adaptation knowledge has the same functions, because it arises through contemplation of the formations of existence together with their three characteristics of impermanence, unsatisfactoriness and egolessness.
The adaptation knowledge, however, forms the conclusion for those kinds of insight that have the formations as object, and are leading to the “ascent,” i.e.
to the path.
Maturity knowledge: immediately thereafter follows maturity knowledge, which consists in the turning of the mind to the supramundane path of “stream-entrance”.
At that moment the mind is no longer driving towards all those phenomena, no longer clinging to them, no longer captivated by them; and transcending the sphere of the worldling, it enters the sphere of the noble ones.
Just as in the cloudless sky the moon shines pure and bright, just so, as soon as the darkness of ignorance veiling the truth is dispersed, maturity knowledge beholds the purity of Nibbana.
Path knowledge: Now, following as immediate continuation upon adaptation knowledge, path consciousness arises by dispersing and demolishing, forever and all time, the three fetters of personality belief, sceptical doubt and clinging to rules and rituals.
Fruition knowledge: immediately upon this path consciousness there arise, as results, those supramundane states of consciousness known as the fruits of the path, which during the life-time may be repeated innumerable times.
The corresponding process also takes place on attaining the three higher stages of holiness, of which the highest one is identical with perfect holiness, or Arahantship.
Herewith we have arrived at the highest and final goal of the Buddha's teaching.
I should, however, like to warn you of the wrong conclusion, as if, according to the Buddha's teaching, it would be necessary, for the realization of the paths, to be ever conscious of all those intricate workings of our mind.
This is by no means the case.
Let me tell you that in many places in the investigations contained in the Visuddhimagga the point is rather to give a scientific explanation of the whole process of gradual development on the path to deliverance.
We have here mostly to do with theoretical knowledge and hypotheses gained by abstract reasoning, partly perhaps also with real knowledge gained through intuition by some extraordinary seers or mystics.
In any case, deliverance may, under favorable circumstances, sometimes be realized already after a very short time, and with no previous knowledge.
At the conclusion of our subject, therefore, I should like to summarize the more popular and more intelligible exposition of the twofold development as given in the Satipatthana Sutta and its commentary:
There is only one way to the realization of deliverance, namely, the four foundations of mindfulness, i.e.
the attentive contemplation of body, feeling, mind, and mind-objects.
For that purpose the monk retires to a solitary place; and sitting down and directing his whole attention in front of himself, he watches attentively his in-and-out breathing, and attains thereby mental concentration and the jhanas.
Or: In going, standing, sitting or lying down, he is well aware and knows that there is no living entity, no real ego, that moves about, but that it is a mere conventional mode of speaking, if one says: “I go, I stand,” etc.
He is full of attention and clearly conscious in going and coming, looking forward and backward, in bending and stretching his body, in eating, drinking, speaking and keeping silent.
Thus in all outer activities, he is clearly conscious of purpose, utility, duty and truth.
Further: He contemplates the manifold parts of the body, as hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, etc.
Further: He analyzes the body with regard to the four elements, i.e.
the solid, liquid, heat and motion.
Further: Just as if he would see a corpse thrown to the burial ground, swollen, blue-black in color, he draws the conclusion: “Also this my body has the same nature, will become so, cannot escape it.” Or: Just as if he would see a corpse, a framework of bones, stripped of flesh, bespattered with blood… bones disconnected and scattered in all directions… bones bleached and resembling shells… bones heaped together… bones weather-worn and crumbled to dust, he draws the conclusion: “Also this my body has the same nature, will become so, cannot escape it.” Thus he contemplates his own body, other bodies, and both.
He sees how these bodily phenomena are arising and passing away.
And he understands that only corporeality is there to be found, but no ego-entity.
In contemplating the feelings, he notices the agreeable feeling, the disagreeable feeling, the indifferent feeling, he sees how these feelings are arising and passing away, and does not find any ego-entity within or without the feelings.
In contemplating the mind, he notices when it is filled with greed, or hate, or delusion, or when it is free from these things; he notices when the mind is cramped or scattered, concentrated or not.
And he sees how these states of mind are arising and passing away, and knows that there is no ego-entity to be found.
In contemplating the mind-objects, he notices when one of the mental hindrances is present, or not present, how it arises, and how it is overcome.
He contemplates the six sense-organs and the corresponding objects, and the mental fetters conditioned through them; contemplates the five groups of existence, their arising and passing away, the seven links of enlightenment, and the Four Noble Truths.
Thus he contemplates all the phenomena, sees how they arise and pass away, and how nowhere any ego-entity can be found.
The Satipatthana Sutta closes with the encouraging words that one who in this way practices the four foundations of mindfulness, sometimes even for only seven days, may find deliverance from all suffering.
Ven.
Nyanatiloka Mahathera was the first Continental European in modern times to become a Buddhist monk and one of the foremost Western exponents of Theravada Buddhism in the twentieth century.
Born in Germany, he developed a keen interest in Buddhism in his youth and came to Asia intending to enter the Buddhist Order.
He received ordination in Burma in.
The greatest part of his life as a monk was spent in Sri Lanka, where he established the Island Hermitage at Dodanduwa as a monastery for Western monks.
His translations into German include the Anguttara Nikaya, the Visuddhimagga, and the Milindapañha.
Ven.
Nyanatiloka passed away in Colombo in.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
This year a large number of monks and novices came to be ordained and to live together here at Wat Asokaram for the Rains — some of them planning eventually to leave the monkhood, some of them to stay.
This being the case, I wrote down a piece explaining and analyzing our duties for their information, so that they would have something of religious value to keep and take with them for the progress of the community of monks and novices in the days to come.
After the piece was written and read aloud to the group, it seemed appropriate for use in the area of administering the Sangha at large, and so it has been printed for free distribution as a gift of Dhamma, in order that Buddhism may prosper and thrive for the well-being of us all.
The administration of the Sangha, as set out by the ecclesiastical authorities of Thailand, is divided into four departments:
Each of these departments, if its activities were in line with its aims, would cause the religion to prosper.
But I have come to see that each of them is so deficient as to be destructive — bringing about, to a great extent, the corruption of monks and novices.
This is why I would like to give the monks and novices here some sense of their duties and of the true aims of each of these departments.
Otherwise, governance will turn into “covernance” — covering up what we don't want to be seen.
Each of these departments is divided into two sections: the central office and the offices in the out-lying regions.
In the central office, the responsibility of the ecclesiastical authorities of both sects, Dhammayutika and Mahanikaya, is to co-operate in firmly carrying out the duties of each department in the area of central administration.
As for the out-lying regions, the responsibility of the ecclesiastical authorities on the regional, provincial, district, and township levels, and of the abbots of all temples, is to train the officers of each department in their respective jurisdictions to be firm in carrying out their stated duties.
Any individual who proves incompetent in a particular area should not be placed in charge of the corresponding department.
Thus I would now like to explain the duties of each department in a way that will bring about order, in line not only with the laws and regulations of the Sangha, but also with the disciplinary standards and with rectitude — because all of these laws and regulations need to be both right and up to standard if they are to lead to the well-being of the religion.
Governance is of three sorts:
A.
Governing by regulations of the Sangha is as follows: The ecclesiastical chief of each region has the right, the authority, and the responsibility to administer his jurisdiction in accordance with all of his stipulated duties, including the procedures to be followed in appointing officials on the regional, provincial, district, and township levels; in appointing the abbots of temples, preceptors, and minor officials; and in delegating responsibilities on each level.
This being the case, each of these officials should use his powers strictly in accordance with the regulations and guidelines set down by the Sangha authorities.
Anyone who sees that he is unqualified in a particular area should not accept appointment in that area.
At the same time, those who make the appointments, if they see that a particular individual is unqualified, should not appoint him to a position of responsibility.
If he is appointed, it will be damaging to that area and destructive to the religion.
B.
Governing by Vinaya: One should explain to those who come under one's authority the various procedures connected with the Vinaya so that they will understand how to follow them.
Point out how and in what sort of places a ñatti-kamma is to be performed.
Point out what sorts of acts should be performed as ñatti-dutiya-kamma, how they are to be performed, where, when, and with how large a chapter of monks.
Point out what sorts of acts should be performed as ñatti-catuttha-kamma, on what sorts of occasions, and with how large a chapter of monks so as to be correct according to procedure.
On the whole, there are still great discrepancies in following these procedures even within the individual sects.
When we compare the different sects, the differences are even greater.
This being the case, whose responsibility is it to govern the Sangha so that there is uniformity throughout?
To have standards means to weld discipline to justice — or in other words, Dhamma and Vinaya.
For example, we should have standards in the way we worship and chant — how the words are to be pronounced according to the Magadha and Sanyoga traditions, and which tradition to use on which occasions.
There should be guidelines concerning this that are consistently followed everywhere, and similar guidelines concerning the way we dress and use the necessities of life, so that we will all be orderly and in proper line with one another.
Otherwise, there will be discrepancies, high and low.
If there is order, however, even the differences of high and low will present an acceptable appearance.
Having standards is thus an important part of governance.
If the authorities were really sincere about carrying out their duties, instead of simply letting things slide, it would help lead to the growth and prosperity of the religion.
On the whole, though, there is a tendency in the area of governance not to look after things and simply to let them be.
This has led to factions and splits within the monkhood, each group taking offense at the way other groups behave.
Thus close adherence to the Vinaya and to the standards of order would lead to concord with no need for force or compulsion: concord that would come of its own from the good and noble standards of the religion.
Every official — and every monk and novice as well — should be strict in keeping his personal conduct within the bounds of the Vinaya, so as not to abolish any of the training rules by means of his behavior.
In other words, whatever has been set down by the Buddha should not be abolished through not observing it; and at the same time, whatever was not set down by the Buddha should not be established as a new observance through the example of one's behavior.
There are many kinds of standards and procedures related to the Vinaya that must be studied, practiced and observed.
Taken together, they are called vinaya-kamma.
Some vinaya-kamma are our own personal responsibility in training ourselves.
For example —
Vaci-kamma: Any words whose purpose would be incorrect in light of the Vinaya should not be spoken in any circumstances.
Speak only those words that would be classed as Right Speech.
Mano-kamma: We are bound to have thoughts that tend toward the accumulation of defilement and lead to transgressions of the training rules, such as abhijjha: greed focused on the four necessities of life; byapada: ill will and malevolence; miccha-ditthi: wrong views that would draw the mind into ways running counter to the standards of the Vinaya.
If we don't correct such mental states, we are bound to break the training rules.
For this reason, we should establish ourselves in all four of the Principles of Purity —
b.
Indriya-sanvara-sila: Keeping watch over our senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, feeling, and ideation, so as to keep them quiet and restrained, and to do away with any defilements pertaining to the training rules.
c.
Ajiva-parisuddhi-sila: Maintaining our livelihood in an honest and above-board manner, not asking for anything, by word or deed, in circumstances ruled out by the Vinaya; training ourselves to have few wants; keeping our conduct in line with the standards of the Vinaya; searching for the necessities of life with the proper attitude in each stage of the search —
Muñcaya-cetana: When going through the actions of searching, maintain purity in thought and deed.
Aparapara-cetana: Once the desired item has been obtained, use it in line with the regulations laid down in the Vinaya.
This is called —
d.
Paccavekkhana-sila: Reflecting carefully before using things.
The act of reflection gives results on many levels:
— Then we should reflect further on the fact that all things are made up of impersonal elements or properties, foul and repugnant; that they are inconstant, stressful and not-self — not beings, not individuals, not “my self” or anyone else's.
When we consider things correctly in accordance with the standards of the Vinaya, we are genuinely exercising good internal governance over ourselves.
The ultimate standards for judging clearly whether or not we are governing ourselves well are as follows:
Whatever behavior aims at the creation of suffering for oneself or for others is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior leads to the accumulation of defilement is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior aims at status and prestige is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior leads away from having few wants is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior aims at entanglement with others is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior leads to laziness and carelessness is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
Whatever behavior makes one a burden to others is neither Dhamma nor Vinaya.
To be able to conduct yourself in this manner means that you are able to govern yourself.
And when a person can govern himself, he develops authority from within, through the disciplinary standards, enabling him to govern others well.
This is what is meant by “governing by Vinaya.
Governing by Dhamma: This means to govern with one's own inner quality as a person, i.e., having rectitude constantly in the heart; keeping the mind firmly established in Right View by fostering discernment through the practice of meditation; developing Right Concentration so as to wipe out the fetters of sexual lust — which include, for example, sensual desire, a willingness to give in to sensual moods, which tends toward mental pain and stress.
When a person's mind falls under the power of such fetters, it means that there is no quality to him.
For the mind to lack quality means that it has fallen in with the mental Hindrances:
Byapada: ill will and malevolence.
Thina-middha: discouragement, apathy, laziness; not making the effort to center the mind in the factors of jhana; not developing a theme of meditation in the mind.
The mind thus surrenders to lethargy and discouragement, abandoning its duties and responsibilities.
This makes it restless and a prey to distraction, unable to put a halt to its train of thought.
This is called —
Uddhacca-kukkucca.
When this is the case, then no matter how much Dhamma one may study, the heart is still dark and blinded.
Whatever one knows or sees is unclear.
One's conduct is lax and lacking, unable to progress to anything of higher value.
For the heart to be caught on a snag like this is termed —
Vicikiccha: doubt, uncertainty, indecision, an inability to go forward or turn back.
When this is the case, the mind is classed as having no quality.
In other words, it lacks the concentration that will give rise to discernment and the skill of release.
Those, however, who can escape from the Hindrances and center the mind into jhana or concentration will give rise to discernment: the power to keep their defilements within the bounds of rectitude and to unbind their goodness so that it can govern others effortlessly, achieving their own well-being and that of others through the power of their governance.
They will awaken from the mundane world, and the supreme good — Dhamma — will appear within them.
This is what it means for the heart to have quality.
Most of us, by and large, have no constant quality in our hearts.
Instead, we go looking for quality in things outside and so can never succeed or find security.
When this is the case, we're unfit to govern ourselves — and if we're unfit to govern ourselves, then to govern others for the sake of their betterment will be extremely difficult.
This concludes our discussion of the Department of Internal Governance and the duties of those who accept responsibility in this area.
This is all there is to the Department of Internal Governance.
Whoever has responsibilities in this area must constantly bear his duties in mind if he is to contribute to the true prosperity of the religion.
Otherwise, the establishment of this department will be empty and in vain, yielding no full-fledged benefits.
The point to remember is that the governance of the Sangha in Thailand is of three sorts:
This is all it comes down to.
If we were to discuss this point in detail, there would be much more to say.
Now, however, we will go on to discuss Part II.
Education in Buddhism — of the kind that gives knowledge conducive to the prosperity of the religion — is of three sorts, as follows:
People who are learned — who have studied and memorized a great deal — fall into two groups.
The first group contains those who have studied in line with the curriculum of the Department, i.e., the official textbooks known as “Nak Dhamma” levels,, and; or the Pali courses, levels -.
Whether or not one passes the examinations is not important.
What is important is the knowledge gained.
This sort of education gives rise to one level of understanding, termed sutamaya-pañña — discernment acquired through study.
The second group contains those who study on their own — listening to sermons, reading textbooks, studying the Vinaya, Suttas, and Abhidhamma; discussing questions with one another, which can lead to understanding on a higher level, so that one may apply one's knowledge to training oneself.
Both groups are classed as being on the elementary level of education in the study of Buddhism.
The study of memorized doctrine is of three sorts —
Thus to gain an education without then conducting oneself in line with the Dhamma can be called studying like a snake.
Such a person makes himself into a cobra's head, spreading his venom into anyone who comes near.
To consort with such a person is to consort with a fool and can poison the mind, drawing it into evil and unskillful ways, such as searching for well-being with reference only to this lifetime, without looking for what is more worthwhile — one's well-being in future lifetimes — or for what is most worthwhile: the liberation of nibbana.
Studying for the sake of emancipation: When we have studied the Dhamma and Vinaya and learned what is good and evil, right and wrong, skillful and unskillful, we shouldn't do whatever we see as wrong or harmful to ourselves and others.
Instead, we should develop whatever is gracious and good, benefiting ourselves and others in any of the following three ways: Having learned the factors that promote well-being in the present life, we should give rise to them for ourselves and others.
Having learned what is necessary to bring about our well-being in future lifetimes — going to a good bourn or the heavenly realms in the next life — we should conduct ourselves accordingly.
As for the ultimate well-being — nibbana — when we have learned what sort of person it will appear in and how to behave so as to be worthy of it, we should then foster the qualities within ourselves necessary to bring it about.
The qualities leading to these sorts of benefits are four —
b.
Viriya: persistence in making the effort to relinquish the evil within ourselves; an unwillingness to lie wallowing in our evils; persistence in fostering virtue within ourselves, in maintaining and developing the virtues we already have, and in using them for the well-being of others.
This is termed viriyiddhipada — persistence as a factor leading to success.
c.
Citta: Whatever task we undertake, we should be fully intent on it and not shirk our duties.
We should try to develop our virtuous actions so that they reach the goal, the supreme well-being to which we all aspire.
Whatever happiness is appropriate to us in this life, we should bring it about through our own intentness of purpose.
Whatever happiness should arise in future lifetimes, we should set our hearts on striving to cultivate it.
As for the happiness unrelated to worldly baits, we should focus our whole attention on correctly developing the path to reach it.
We will then be able to attain our goal without a doubt.
d.
Vimansa: circumspection.
The discernment gained from our studies should be put into practice in line with the factors of the Noble Path.
Before doing anything in thought, word, or deed, we should first run things through carefully in the mind, from beginning to end, and only then go ahead and act.
We should give rise to the mental virtue termed Right Concentration.
Concentration gives rise to discernment, and when the discernment of liberating insight arises within us it leads to the happiness that lies beyond the world.
To be circumspect and thoroughly aware that whatever will not be beneficial to ourselves or others should not be done, and that whatever will lead to our own well-being and that of others — in this life, in the next, or in the ultimate sense — should be fostered within ourselves through our own circumspection and discernment: This is vimansiddhipada — circumspection as a factor leading to success.
When we do this, we will reap two sorts of results: iddhiriddhi — the power that arises from being established in these four qualities; and puññariddhi — the influence that arises from our own inner virtue.
Iddhiriddhi is authority, puññariddhi is kindness.
To have these two qualities is to be a person with two eyes, two ears, two nostrils, two arms, two legs — “puriso,” a complete human being, who can help others become complete in their hearts as well.
This is what it means to be a person who studies for the sake of emancipation.
Studying to be a treasurer: This refers to the education of a person who has already finished the training — i.e., an arahant, one who has gained release from all defilements.
Why does such a person have to study?
For the sake of the work of the religion, so as to be of assistance in helping Buddhism to prosper.
When was it ever the case that a person had to be thoroughly acquainted with all aspects of formulated Dhamma and customs before doing away with defilement?
Some people are born in lower-class families, others in upper-class families.
Some have a great deal of social sophistication, others don't.
Still they are able to free their minds from defilement by means of the practice, for in practice it isn't necessary to know a great deal of formulated Dhamma.
Even a person who knows only a fair amount can still put an end to defilement.
So when such a person sees that he can be of help to others, he must educate himself.
His study is for the sake of gaining a sense of the differences in societies, in communities, and in types of individuals; to gain a sense of time and place; to know the varieties of beliefs and customs that people adhere to.
When he becomes thoroughly and properly acquainted with all customs and conventions, he can then deal effectively with other people for their benefit.
This is why he must study and take an interest in such things.
Education of this sort is thus called studying to be a treasurer, and is an aspect of the Department of Education.
These, then, are the three forms of studying memorized Dhamma.
When we have studied — in whichever way — we mustn't stop there.
We should take all the Dhamma we have learned and chew it over with our own discernment.
To chew things over in this way — thinking and evaluating — may give rise to a flavor different from that of our previous education.
We think things through on our own, instead of simply believing what other people say or what is written in books.
We believe our own sense of reason, discovered within ourselves and termed “paccattam” — individual and personal.
This sort of education grows out of the earlier sort, in the same way that a person who has learned how to read the letters of the alphabet can then go on to use that knowledge to read textbooks and gain knowledge more valuable than the alphabet on its own.
To make a comparison with food, this second form of education has more flavor than the first.
The first sort of education is like taking food, arranging it according to type — main-course dishes in one group, desserts in another — and then finding delight simply in seeing it arranged.
The second form of education — thinking, evaluating, reasoning things through — is like taking the food and tasting it.
The person who does this gets much more use out of the food than the person who simply sits and looks at it: He can nourish his body and know whether or not the food tastes good, whether it's sour or sweet, very sweet or just a little sweet — all on his own.
This is what it means to pursue this second form of education properly.
To study in this way gives rise to the flavor of the Dhamma, which can then be used to nourish the heart.
When the heart is fed on what is truly nourishing, it gains strength in the area of the Dhamma, termed —
Viriya-bala: The quality of perseverance becomes dominant.
We become resolute and courageous in practicing what is good.
Sati-bala: Our powers of mindfulness become all-encompassing in the great frame of reference.
Samadhi-bala: The mind develops the steadiness and strength termed “heightened consciousness”, beyond the power of the Hindrances.
Pañña-bala: Right Understanding, which comes from the sense of reason fostered in the heart through circumspection.
Understanding is strength that can make the mind energetic, competent, and powerful.
Discernment acquired through reflection can give rise to the flavor of the Dhamma through the act of thinking, but for thought to be truly nourishing and energizing, we must go on to develop discernment through meditation so as to be complete in our practice.
Coming to know ourselves: We should study and investigate ourselves so as to gain knowledge exclusively within by centering the heart in concentration.
To study ourselves by ourselves means to study by means of our own inner alphabet — the various parts put together out of the four properties within the body; the five khandhas, and the six sense media.
To study on this level means to study with and within the mind, investigating the inner alphabet:
All five are things that a contemplative should study.
Usually, before we become ordained, we don't even know our own inner ABC's, much less how to spell.
So our preceptors, out of concern for us as their sons in the monkhood, teach us these five things even before we become monks and novices.
But if we neglect them after our ordination, it shows that we have no respect for education and no reverence for the teachings of the Lord Buddha.
This is the cause for degeneracy in the Department of Education.
To be able to read all of the parts in one's body, and to teach others to do the same, is to qualify as a member of the Sangha, or as a true disciple of the Lord Buddha.
We should study all four or all six of the properties within us — earth, water, wind, and fire — as a basis for tranquillity meditation, giving rise to jhana by thinking about and evaluating the parts of the body until we gain an understanding of earth, water, wind, and fire, together with space and cognizance, the overseer of the house.
Study the five khandhas — body, feelings, labels, mental constructs, and cognizance.
Keep careful restraint over the six sense media — eye and visual objects, ear and sounds, nose and smells, tongue and tastes, body and tactile sensations, intellect and thoughts.
The mind will then enter the first level of jhana, composed of thinking, evaluating, rapture, ease, and singleness of preoccupation.
Such a person thus goes on to a higher level of education, comparable to high school or secondary education.
When the heart becomes quiet, a cool and refreshing sense of pleasure called “rasa,” the flavor and nourishment of the Dhamma, will appear in it.
Attha: We will realize the aims of the Dhamma and our own aspirations as well.
Studying on this level will give rise to a higher level of knowledge termed liberating insight — clear comprehension in terms of the four Noble Truths — enabling us to go beyond suffering and stress.
This is termed the awareness of release.
We will gain a special knowledge that is apart from all of the mundane things we may have learned: This is transcendent knowledge that, beginning with liberating insight, enables us to escape one after another the fortress walls of the citadel of Death.
The citadel of Death has ten walls —
Doubt: uncertainty about the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana.
Attachment to precepts and practices: groping about, i.e., undependability in our behavior, which leads us to clutch at various beliefs, searching for absolute standards of good outside of the acts of our own heart and mind.
Sensual passion: desire caused by the power of defilement.
Irritation: annoyance coming from the mind's sense of being “struck” or disturbed.
Passion for form: attachment to certain kinds of physical phenomena.
Passion for formless phenomena: attachment to mental phenomena, such as feelings of pleasure.
Conceit: construing ourselves to be this or that.
Restlessness: distraction, the mind's tendency to get engrossed or carried away.
Unawareness: delusion; ignorance; being unacquainted with cause and effect, and out of touch with what is true.
All ten of these factors are walls in the citadel of Death.
No one who lacks discernment will be able to destroy them, which is why the Buddha was especially insistent on this level of education, teaching his followers to study it from the very day of their ordination so that their education would be complete.
To summarize, there are three aspects to this third level of education —
Learning to spell: Taking the consonants — such as the four properties of earth, water, wind, and fire — and then adding the vowels — feelings, labels, mental constructs, and cognizance — so that there is awareness of the six sense media, enabling us to know that there are good sights, good sounds, good smells, good tastes, good tactile sensations, and good ideas in the world, and that sometimes things that are not so good can also come in through the six sense media.
The awareness that enters in and interacts in this way can be called patisandhi-viññana — cognizance connected with physical phenomena, interacting with physical phenomena, enabling us to know all levels of good and bad.
When we are able to evaluate and choose what is good and bad within ourselves, we qualify as being able to “read,” knowing thoroughly all the ways our inner alphabet works in practice.
Learning to make sense of it all: The word “sense” here has two meanings:
b.
Comprehending all the various parts into which we are analyzed — the parts of the body, the properties, the khandhas, and the six sense media — or, what it all comes down to, the body and mind, plus the activity of thought, word, and deed.
To put it briefly, all things are achieved through the heart.
The heart comes before all else.
All things are excelled by the heart and made from the heart.
A trained heart is the most superlative thing there is.
When we have tasted within ourselves the flavor and nourishment of all dhammas — mundane and transcendent — then,
We have performed the entirety of the holy life.
Our training in the holy life is perfect and pure.
This is what it means to graduate, to finish our higher education in the Buddha's teachings.
Whoever has duties in the area of education, then, should attend to them.
Otherwise, Buddhism is sure to degenerate because of our own lack of education.
If this happens, the Department of Education established by the Sangha authorities will be futile and worthless, due to our own misunderstanding of its meaning and aims.
This department is another important area, in that it works for the convenience of the Sangha through improving, repairing, and maintaining the physical surroundings in which we live.
To be specific, its duties are to build and repair, inspect and maintain our dwellings or monasteries so that they will qualify as senasana-sappaya — comfortable, amenable places for contemplatives to stay.
Meditating monks by and large tend to have fixed notions about this area, believing that to sponsor or do construction work for the sake of Buddhists at large is to devote oneself to merely material concerns, and that such work thus shouldn't be done.
Some even believe that work of this sort closes off the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana.
Nevertheless, these people have not gone beyond the material benefits they criticize.
For this reason, we should examine the area of building and development to see whether or not it is appropriate and accords with the Vinaya.
I would like to divide the duties in this area into two sorts, in line with the two major duties of those who are ordained —
A.
The duty of study: Those monks who are gamavasi, or village dwellers, are responsible for improving, repairing, and developing the places in which they live, for the sake of the common good of Buddhists at large.
When building, they should have a sense of scale, order, and beauty so that their buildings will fit in with their physical surroundings.
For example, monks' quarters, restrooms, meeting halls, and ordination halls should be arranged, in so far as possible, in an orderly way, in keeping with their functions.
Once built, they should be kept clean and in repair so as to contribute to the beauty of their surroundings.
If anything is lacking, and one is in a position to search for it by proper means, then obtain and maintain it in a righteous manner for the sake of one's own convenience and that of the group.
All of these activities form a part of the duty of study: improving and developing the place in which we live.
B.
The duty of meditation: This refers to those monks termed araññavasi, or forest dwellers, who search for secluded areas appropriate for meditation, such as those mentioned in the Pali: under the shade of a tree; in a secluded dwelling; under a lean-to, far from settled areas; in a quiet tower; under an over-hanging rock; in a cave; in a forest; in a cemetery; or in a deserted building.
One should learn how to select such a place and how to keep it clean and neat for the sake of one's convenience as a meditator while living there.
This is “building and development” in the forest: Observing one's duties in caring for one's dwelling, improving and maintaining order in one's surroundings, and improving oneself while living there.
This is building and development on the external level, one sign of a person who knows how to maintain himself in physical seclusion.
As for internal building and development, one should build a shelter for the mind: vihara-dhamma, a home for the heart.
One should foster magga, the path to one's home; and phala, the goodness that arises in the heart as a result.
The shelter along the way is Right Concentration: the four levels of jhana.
This is the true shelter for those who are ordained.
Once we have been ordained as contemplatives, we should realize that we come under this particular department and so should perform our duties properly.
But by and large we don't understand the true aims of the various departments and so grope around in external matters, without building or developing any internal qualities that can give the heart shelter.
When the heart has no internal quality as its shelter, it will go living outside, building and helping only other people.
If the heart is entangled with external matters, then after death it will be reborn attached to physical objects and possessions.
Those who are attached to their monasteries will be reborn there as guardian spirits.
Those who are attached to their quarters, their ordination halls, their meeting halls, their bodies, will be reborn right there.
This is called sensual clinging: Whatever object we cling to, there we will be reborn.
For example, there is a story told in the Dhammapada Commentary of a monk who received a robe that gave him great satisfaction and of which he became very possessive.
When he died he was reborn as a louse right there in the robe, all because he had no inner quality as a dwelling for the heart.
So for our building and development to go beyond physical objects, we should build and repair a shelter for the heart.
Only then will we be qualified to take on external duties — and in performing our duties, we should be careful not to let our inner home become overgrown with the weeds of defilement, or to let the termites of the Hindrances eat into it.
Don't let vermin, lizards, or lice — character flaws — take up residence inside.
Roof the home of the heart — jhana — with restraint of the senses so that the fires of passion, aversion, and delusion don't burn it down.
To purify the principles of our conduct is to clear and grade our property.
To give rise to jhana is to build a home for ourselves.
To develop discernment within the mind is to light our home.
We will then be safe both while we stay and when we go.
When we are able to do this, it will lead to the true prosperity of the religion.
This is what it means to observe our duties in the area of building and development.
Ways of spreading the Dhamma fall into three categories:
This refers to the appointment of monks in the various divisions to teach and train the populace at large.
In addition, the establishment of syllabi such as the Nak Dhamma courses, and the appointment of teachers to instruct in accordance with them, can also be classed as a means of spreading the Dhamma.
Spreading the Dhamma can give rise to many sorts of benefits — welfare in this life, welfare in lives to come, and acquaintance with the ultimate welfare — nibbana.
These are the aims of spreading the Dhamma by means of the written and spoken word, which is one aspect of the good that Buddhism has to offer.
b.
Maintenance: We should take good care of the possessions we have earned, and take good care of ourselves — which we have also worked hard to earn — so as not to fall into ways that are evil or wrong.
c.
Having admirable friends: We should associate with good people and avoid associating with immoral people who would lead us astray and cause our possessions to be squandered away.
d.
An appropriate life style: We should spend our earnings wisely and provide for our needs in a proper way.
We should avoid spending our earnings in wrong ways that would soil how we live.
These four principles form the way to well-being in this lifetime, but we shouldn't be short-sighted or unrealistic.
The truth of the matter is that each and every human being born will have to die and be parted from the happiness found in this world.
This being the case, we must provide for our welfare in the lives to come.
The way to happiness in the lives to come, as taught by the religion, is as follows —
b.
Virtue: We should be true to our moral principles and train ourselves to be full-fledged human beings in thought, word, and deed.
Whatever we do should be done with honesty and rectitude.
c.
Generosity: We should be mature in our generosity, making donations to others, for instance, as we are able.
To be giving in this way, the Buddha teaches, is a Noble Treasure, bearing dividends both in this life and in lives to come.
If we are not giving of our possessions, they will bear us fruit only in this lifetime.
At death, they will vanish.
We won't be able to transfer them for use in the next life, just as Thai currency can't be used outside the boundaries of our country.
When a person travels abroad, he won't be able to use his native currency at all unless he is sensible enough to exchange his money beforehand and deposit it in an appropriate bank.
Only then will it be of use to him when he goes abroad.
In the same way, sensible people deposit their possessions in the bank called the field of merit: When they sacrifice their wealth in this way, it becomes a Noble Treasure, bearing dividends on the road ahead.
And this doesn't apply only to possessions: When a person crosses the border from one country into another, even his native language won't be of any use.
The Buddha thus taught us a foreign language — chanting and the meditative practice of developing good will and loving-kindness — to serve us as language in the world to come.
d.
Discernment: We should be circumspect and judicious in all our actions.
Otherwise, we will act under the influence of such forms of delusion as chandagati — being prejudiced by affection, with no reasonable thought for right or wrong; bhayagati — being prejudiced by fear, with no thought for what is reasonable; dosagati — being prejudiced by anger and dislike, with no thought for right or wrong; and mohagati — being prejudiced by delusion, mistaking right for wrong, and wrong for right.
To act in any of these ways means that we have no discernment.
For this reason, whatever we may do in the area of making merit, we should first weigh things carefully and properly before acting.
Only then will we qualify as being mature in our discernment.
These four practices open the way to a good bourn in the next life, i.e., in heaven, but even then we will still have to go whirling along the cycle of death and rebirth.
If we have strong conviction, we will be able to develop ourselves so as to go beyond this to the level of the ultimate welfare, attaining the levels of transcendent virtue.
This sort of virtue is something that all Buddhists should aim for.
The prerequisites are two:
When we possess these qualities, they will serve as our tools — regardless of whether we are sharp-witted or dull, men or women, people with many defilements or with only a few.
Once we have set our sights, we should then develop two practices that form the path to nibbana —
b.
insight meditation: developing discernment in the mind; gaining internal insight, seeing through to the natural condition of the Dhamma that lies within us.
The natural condition of the Dhamma is this: birth, momentary existence, disbanding — like a wave on the sea.
When the wind blows, great waves rise on the ocean.
The same holds true with human life: The natural condition of the khandhas within us behaves like a wave.
This is called the natural condition of the Dhamma.
Another condition, though, stays as it is, whether or not there are waves — just as the water of the sea, when there is no wind, is smooth, level, and clear.
This natural condition in the heart — a condition that does not take birth, does not change, is not annihilated, and does not die, but simply stays as it is — lies within each and every one of us.
These two practices — tranquillity and insight meditation — lead to the ultimate welfare, nibbana.
The two natural conditions lie within each of us.
Those who know how to spread the Dhamma into themselves, teaching and counseling themselves, will attain well-being without a doubt.
Spreading the Dhamma by practicing it, without having to use words, simply behaving well so as to be an example to others through one's behavior: This is an important factor in spreading the Dhamma.
Our Lord Buddha, for example, was once staying in a forest with a following of monks.
As twilight fell, he rested, inclining on his right side, while the monks all did walking or sitting meditation.
No one was talking.
Everything was perfectly still.
Just then, a group of wandering ascetics came into the forest and, seeing this, were completely won over.
They felt so inspired by the virtues of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha that they were willing to become disciples.
Later, they were of great help in spreading the religion.
This shows that good and proper practice is an extremely important force in spreading the Dhamma.
Not only human beings, but even animals are able to follow the example of others' behavior, as when a man with a crippled leg leads a horse with sound legs around on a tether: In no time at all, the horse will learn to walk with a limp.
As the leader goes, so go his followers; as the mould is shaped, so are the items moulded.
Good behavior is thus a way of spreading the religion that has a deep and telling influence on the hearts of those who come after.
This is one of our true duties within the religion.
Even if our defilements may be heavy and thick, we can still be of service to others in this way.
Thus in spreading the Buddha's teachings, it's not enough simply to get up and deliver a sermon.
A person with discretion in teaching the Dhamma can convince others of its value in a variety of ways: by his manners, as already mentioned; or by adesana-patihariya — the marvel of knowing another person's thoughts; or by anusasani-patihariya — the marvel of teaching that, when put into practice, gives the promised results.
All of these are means of spreading the Buddha's teachings.
In some areas of religious work, spreading the Dhamma is done via the mind — as, for example, when the Venerable Culapanthaka performed a psychic marvel that astounded those who saw, inspiring conviction, reverence, and awe in their hearts.
Those who had never before felt inspired by the Buddha's teachings suddenly became inspired because of those events.
Other instances were performed by the Buddha himself, as when he went to break the pride of the three Kassapa brothers.
He went out in the rain without getting wet, did walking meditation in the flood without getting wet, which led the elder Kassapa to abandon his stiff-necked pride — and when he had abandoned his pride, the Buddha was able to teach him the Dhamma.
Kassapa and his followers saw the Dhamma appear within themselves, experienced the paths, fruitions, and nibbana, and proclaimed themselves followers of the Buddha.
They were then of great help in spreading the religion.
Another example is when the Buddha subdued the bandit, Angulimala.
As Angulimala ran chasing after him, the Buddha radiated good will through the power of jhana, causing the earth between them to rise and fall in great waves until Angulimala, tired from his running, called out in surrender.
The Buddha then instructed him to the point where he was so impressed and convinced that he was eventually able to make his heart attain the Dhamma.
There are many other examples of this sort by which the Buddha was able to proclaim the religion so that it has lasted into the present day.
If we take spreading the Dhamma to be simply a matter of words, it wouldn't have been — and won't be — enough.
Thus, spreading the Dhamma is done in three ways:
B.
By word — teaching and explaining the Dhamma out loud, giving rise to understanding and inspiration in those who hear.
By thought.
When one has seen with the power of intuitive understanding that a person is ready to receive the Dhamma, one should spread thoughts of good will, dedicating the fruits of one's merit to that person.
This way of spreading the Dhamma can be done both in public and in private, with those who are near and those who are far away.
It can help certain human and divine beings, and inspire conviction in those whose dispositions lie within the net of the Dhamma, all without having to say a word.
This has been termed “anointing with the waters of benevolence.” The good will that lies in the heart is like a cooling current.
Wherever this current is directed through the power of a radiant heart, it can draw other beings, both human and divine, to become inspired to develop the qualities of their hearts in line with their varying dispositions.
Even if we have yet to meet them, and have simply heard news, we can still cause their hearts to become cool and refreshed, contributing to their welfare and happiness.
Spreading the Dhamma in this way is beneficial both to us and to others.
To be able to do this, though, we must first give rise to sufficient quality in our own hearts.
If the quality isn't yet there, then build it and dedicate it first of all to those to whom you owe “kamma debts.” Spread this goodness to fill the body.
Spread this goodness to fill the mind.
This sense of fullness is what is meant by rapture — i.e., full of what is skillful.
Goodness fills the heart, refreshing it with what is skillful.
When goodness fills the body and mind, it is like water filling a tank or saturating the earth.
Wherever the earth is saturated with water, there the trees and vegetation flourish.
But if we don't have enough goodness within, we're like a tank without any water: No matter how far the faucet is opened, only wind will come out.
The coolness of wind and the coolness of water are two very different things.
The coolness of wind can cause trees to wither and can send dust clouds flying, but the coolness of water is useful in many ways: It can be used to wash clothes, to bathe the body, to drink, or to sprinkle on the ground, nourishing plants and softening the earth.
Not only that, it can also give a deep sense of refreshment.
In the same way, people who practice the Dhamma, even if they don't speak a word but simply spread thoughts of good will, can be of great benefit to people at large.
This is termed “metta-parami” — the perfection of benevolence.
So when goodness arises within us, we can work for the welfare of others even when we sit with our eyes closed, perfectly still.
But it's the nature of ignorant people to believe that such a person is simply saving his own skin.
They haven't looked deep inside.
The teachers of the past thus made a comparison with thunder and rain.
Some people can teach others, but they themselves have no inner goodness.
Such people are called thunder without rain.
They can cause others to feel awe and respect, but can give no sense of cooling refreshment.
Some people are like rain without thunder.
They rarely speak, but spread thoughts of good will, dedicating their merit to others.
They have received their own full measure of inner goodness and so can give goodness and inspire conviction in the hearts of others even when simply sitting still.
Those who find peace and calm in the shelter of such an influence will, in turn, feel the highest form of respect.
Some people are like rain with thunder, and others, rain with thunder and wind to boot: This, for those who are able, is the best of all.
Such people, after having developed their own inner goodness, are able to teach others, spreading the Dhamma by thought, word, and deed, giving results in many ways: People who are stubborn and fixed in their opinions will be able to soften in an instant, just as giant trees bend before the wind.
At the same time, teachers of this sort can be an example to others through their behavior and the kindness of their hearts, feeling no envy for the goodness of others, but only compassion, providing the shelter of mental peace to all sorts of people.
This is the way to spread the Dhamma fully and completely, causing the religion to prosper in the true and proper way.
The field of spreading the Dhamma is extremely important.
Those who practice it will get results in two ways:
By knowing how to use authority — the power of the mind — so as to be of benefit.
By knowing how to use compassion — the goodness of the heart — so as to benefit their fellow human beings, with no need for power of any sort whatsoever.
Only those who can act in this manner are qualified for the Department of Spreading the Dhamma.
When the duties of all these departments are fully observed by a community, a group, or an individual, they will help the religion to prosper and thrive.
But as long as we are unable to fulfill these duties, the establishment of directives for each of the various departments is meaningless and can lead, I'm afraid, only to the disappearance of the Buddha's teachings, as happened in India.
This is why I have asked to explain our organization and duties so that we will all be thoroughly acquainted with them.
It will be ideal if each individual can observe the duties of all four departments; and, to be true to the Dhamma, each of us should regard all of these duties as his own personal responsibility.
If we pay attention only to the directives and rules, we will be deficient in our duties, and the establishment of the various departments will be a waste of time.
All the thought and consideration devoted to our welfare will be fruitless.
Thus we should use our authority and inner virtues in observing our duties firmly and properly for the sake of the good order of the religion.
If I were to explain things at length, there would be much more to say; but I will stop for the time being with this condensed discussion of the main points at issue, which should be enough to serve us as an adequate guide.
If there is anything in any way wrong or defective in what I have written here, I ask the reader's forgiveness.
Apalokana-kamma: A procedure to use in conducting communal business of the Sangha, in which certain non-controversial issues are settled simply with an informal announcement.
The following terms — ñatti-kamma, ñatti-dutiya-kamma, and ñatti-catuttha-kamma — refer to procedures where the issue must be settled by a formal motion stated once, twice, or four times, giving all the monks present the opportunity to object to the motion before it is carried.
Attha: Meaning, sense, aim, result.
Avijja: Unawareness; counterfeit knowledge.
Ayatana: Sense medium.
The six inner sense media are the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body and intellect.
The six outer sense media are their respective objects.
Bhagavant: An epithet for the Buddha, commonly translated as “Blessed One” or “Exalted One.” Some commentators, though, have traced the word etymologically to the Pali root meaning “to divide” and, by extension, “to analyze,” and so translate it as “Analyst.
Dhamma: Event; phenomenon; the way things are in and of themselves; their inherent qualities; the basic principles underlying their behavior.
Also, principles of behavior that human beings should follow so as to fit in with the right natural order of things; qualities of mind they should develop so as to realize the inherent quality of the mind in and of itself.
By extension, “dhamma” is used also to refer to any doctrine that teaches such things.
Thus the Dhamma of the Buddha refers both to his teachings and to the direct experience of the quality of nibbana at which those teachings are aimed.
Dhatu: Element; property; the elementary properties that make up the inner sense of the body and mind: earth, water, fire, wind, space and cognizance.
Jhana: Meditative absorption in a single object, notion or sensation.
Kamma: Acts of intention that result in states of being and birth.
“Kamma debts” are the moral debts one has to others either through having been a burden to them or from having wronged them.
Khandha: Component parts of sensory perception: rupa; vedana; sañña; sankhara; and viññana.
Magga: The path to the cessation of suffering and stress.
The four transcendent paths — or rather, one path with four levels of refinement — are the path to stream-entry, the path to once-returning, the path to non-returning and the path to arahantship.
Phala — fruition — refers to the mental state immediately following the attainment of any of these paths.
Mala: Stains on the character, traditionally listed as nine: anger, hypocrisy, envy, stinginess, deceit, treachery, lying, evil desires and wrong views.
Nibbana: Liberation; the unbinding of the mind from greed, anger and delusion, from physical sensations and mental acts.
As this term is used to refer also to the extinguishing of fire, it carries connotations of stilling, cooling and peace.

Patimokkha: The basic monastic code, composed of training rules.
Puñña: Inner worth; merit; the inner sense of well-being that comes from having acted rightly or well, and that enables one to continue acting well.
Puññakkhetta: Field of merit — an epithet for the Sangha.
Sangha: The community of the Buddha's disciples.
On the ideal level, this refers to all those, whether lay or ordained, who have reached at least the path to stream-entry.
On the conventional level, it refers to the Buddhist monkhood.
In Thai, it also refers to the central administration of the Thai monkhood and to any individual monk.
Traditionally, Sangha does NOT refer to all Buddhists.
The traditional term for the entire “assembly” of the Buddha's followers — ordained or not, awakened or not — is buddha-parisa.
The reason for this distinction is that Sangha is one of a Buddhist's three refuges, and not all members of the buddha-parisa can be taken as refuge.
Sankhara: Fashioning — the forces that fashion things, the process of fashioning, and the fashioned things — mental or physical — that result.
In some contexts this term refers specifically to the fashioning of thoughts in the mind.
In others, it refers to all five khandhas.
Vinaya: The monastic discipline.
The Buddha's own name for the religion he founded was “this Dhamma-Vinaya,” this doctrine and discipline.
If anything in this translation is inaccurate or misleading, I ask forgiveness of the author and reader for having unwittingly stood in their way.
As for whatever may be accurate, I hope the reader will make the best use of it, translating it a few steps further, into the heart, so as to attain the truth at which it points.
— The translator
People all over the world who are interested in Buddhism and keep in touch with its news and activities must have heard of the Buddha Jayanti celebrations held a few years ago in all Buddhist countries, including India and Japan.
It was in or, according to the reckoning of some Buddhist countries, in, that Buddhism, as founded by Gotama the Buddha, had completed its,th year of existence.
The Buddhist tradition, especially of the Theravada or Southern School such as now prevails in Burma, Ceylon, Cambodia, Laos and Thailand, has it that on the completion of, years from its foundation, Buddhism would undergo a great revival, resulting in its all-round progress, in both the fields of study and practice.
Buddhists throughout the world, therefore, commemorated the occasion in - by various kinds of activities such as meetings, symposia, exhibitions and the publication of Buddhist texts and literature.
As to whether or not the tradition mentioned above has any truth behind it, the future alone will testify.
However, judging from news received from all corners of the globe, it is no exaggeration to say that mankind is taking an ever-increasing interest in Buddhism.
As a matter of fact, since the end of the Second World War interest in Buddhism as evinced by people in Europe, America, and Australia has reached a scale unheard of before.
Any casual perusal of journals on Buddhism in any of these continents will convince the readers of this statement.
It is a matter worth noticing that after the end of the First World War also, Buddhism made great headway in Europe and elsewhere.
This phenomenon can perhaps be best explained by the fact that mankind's spiritual thirst is more sharpened by calamities like war, and that in times of distress mankind realizes Truth better.
Thailand is perhaps the only country in the world where the king is constitutionally stipulated to be a Buddhist and the upholder of the Faith.
For centuries Buddhism has established itself in Thailand and has enriched the lives of the Thais in all their aspects.
Indeed, without Buddhism, Thailand would not be what it is today.
Owing to the tremendous influence Buddhism exerts on the lives of its people, Thailand is called by many foreigners “The Land of Yellow Robes,” for yellow robes are the garments of Buddhist monks.
In view of the increasing interest the world is taking in Buddhism and in view of the fact that Thailand is one of the countries where Buddhism still exists as a living force it will not, perhaps, be out of place to know something of the story of how this great faith reached that country.
Different opinions exist about when, exactly, Buddhism reached that part of the world now officially known as Thailand.
Some scholars say that Buddhism was introduced to Thailand during the reign of Asoka, the great Indian emperor who sent Buddhist missionaries to various parts of the then known world.
Others are of the view that Thailand received Buddhism much later.
Judging from archaeological finds and other historical evidence, however, it is safe to say that Buddhism first reached Thailand when the country was inhabited by a racial stock of people known as the Mon-Khmer who then had their capital, Dvaravati, at a city now known as Nakon Pathom, about kilometers to the west of Bangkok.
The great pagoda at Nakon Pathom, Phra Pathom Chedi, and other historical findings in other parts of the country testify to this fact as well as to the fact that Buddhism, in its varied forms, reached Thailand at four different periods, namely:
We shall now proceed to study each of these periods in detail.
That the first form of Buddhism introduced to Thailand was that of Theravada School is proved by various archaeological remains unearthed in the excavations at Nakon Pathom, such as the Dharma Chakra, the Buddha footprints and seats, and the inscriptions in the Pali language, all of which are in rocks.
Such objects of Buddhistic veneration existed in India before the introduction of the Buddha image, which appeared later as a result of Greek influence.
Buddhism, therefore, must have reached Thailand during the rd century B.C., and it must have been more or less the same form of Buddhism as was propagated by the great Buddhist Emperor Asoka.
This form of Buddhism was known as Theravada or Hinayana in contradistinction to the term Mahayana; the two schools having sprung up soon after the passing away of the Buddha.
When worship of the Buddha image became popular in India, it also spread to other countries where Buddhism had already been introduced.
This is borne out by the fact that many Buddha images, especially those of the Gupta style, had been found in the ruins of Nakon Pathom and the neighboring cities.
Judging from the style of the Buddha images found, it can also be assumed that the early Buddhist missionaries to Thailand went from Magadha.
To support the view that the first form of Buddhism introduced to Thailand was that of the Theravada School as propagated by Emperor Asoka, we have evidence from the Mahavamsa, the ancient chronicle of Ceylon.
In one of its passages dealing with the propagation of the Dhamma, the Mahavamsa records that Asoka sent missionaries headed by Buddhist elders to as many as nine territories.
One of these territories was known as Suvarnabhumi where two Theras, Sona and Uttara, were said to have proceeded.
Now opinions differ as to where exactly this land of Suvarnabhumi is.
Thai scholars express the opinion that it is in Thailand and that its capital was at Nakon Pathom, while scholars of Burma say that Suvarnabhumi is in Burma, the capital being at Thaton, a Mon town in eastern Burma near the Gulf of Martaban.
Still other scholars of Laos and Cambodia claim that the territory of Suvarnabhumi is in their lands.
Historical records in this connection being meager as they are, it would perhaps be of no avail to argue as to the exact demarcation of Suvarnabhumi.
Taking all points into consideration, one thing, however, seems clear beyond dispute.
That is Suvarnabhumi was a term broadly used in ancient times to denote that part of Southeast Asia which now includes Southern Burma, Thailand, Laos, Cambodia and Malaya.
The term Suvarnabhumi is a combination of the words suvarna and bhumi.
Both are Sanskrit words; the former means gold and the latter stands for land.
Suvarnabhumi therefore literally means Golden Land or Land of Gold.
Keeping in view the abundance of nature in that part of Asia just referred to, the term seems but appropriate.
The reason why scholars of Thailand express the view that the capital of Suvarnabhumi was at Nakon Pathom was because of the archaeological finds unearthed in the area surrounding that town.
Nowhere in any of the countries mentioned above, not even at Thaton in Burma, could one find such a large and varied number of ancient relics as were found at Nakon Pathom.
By age and style these archaeological objects belong to the times of Emperor Asoka and the later Guptas.
Even the Great Stupa at Nakon Pathom itself is basically identical with the famous Sañchi Stupa in India, built by Asoka, especially if one were to remove the shikhara or upper portion.
Many Thai archaeologists are of the opinion that the shikhara was a later addition to the pagoda, a result, so to say, of the blending of the Thai aesthetic sense with Indian architectural art.
Moreover, the name Pathom Chedi means “First Pagoda” which, in all probability, signifies that it was the first pagoda built in Suvarnabhumi.
This would easily fit in with the record of the Mahavamsa — that Theras Sona and Uttara went and established Buddhism in the territory of Suvarnabhumi at the injunction of Emperor Asoka.
Taking cognizance of the fact that Asoka reigned from to B.C., we can reasonably conclude that Buddhism first spread to Thailand during the rd century B.It is interesting to note in this connection that the history of the penetration of Indian culture to Southeast Asia also started more or less during the same period.
With the growth of Mahayana Buddhism in India, especially during the reign of King Kanishka who ruled over Northern India during the second half of the first century A.D., the sect also spread to the neighboring countries, such as Sumatra, Java, and Kambuja.
It is probable that Mahayana Buddhism was introduced to Burma, Pegu and Dvaravati from Magadha at the same time as it went to the Malay Archipelago.
But probably it did not have any stronghold there at that time; hence no spectacular trace was left of it.
Starting from the beginning of the fifth century A.D.
Mahayana Buddhist missionaries from Kashmir in Northern India began to go to Sumatra in succession.
From Sumatra the faith spread to Java and Cambodia.
By about A.D.
the Srivijaya king with his capital in Sumatra rose in power and his empire spread throughout the Malay Peninsula and Archipelago.
Part of South Thailand came under the rule of the Srivijaya king.
Being Mahayanists, the rulers of Srivijaya gave much encouragement and support to the propagation of Mahayana Buddhism.
In South Thailand today we have much evidence to substantiate that Mahayana Buddhism was once prevalent there.
This evidence is in the form of stupas or chetiyas and images, including votive tablets of the Buddhas and Bodhisattas, which were found in large number, all of the same type as those discovered in Java and Sumatra.
The chetiyas in Chaiya and Nakon Sri Thammarath, both in South Thailand, clearly indicate Mahayana influence.
From to A.D.
kings belonging to the Suryavarman dynasty ruled supreme in Cambodia.
Their empire extended over the whole of present-day Thailand.
Being adherents of Mahayana Buddhism with a strong mixture of Brahmanism, the Suryavarman rulers did much to propagate and establish the tenets of the Northern School.
There is an interesting stone inscription, now preserved in the National Museum at Bangkok, which tells us that in about A.D.
there ruled in Lopburi, in central Thailand and once a capital city, a king from Nakon Sri Thammarath who traced his ancestry to Srivijaya rulers.
The king had a son who later became the ruler of Kambuja and who, more or less, kept Thailand under the suzerainty of Cambodia for a long time.
During this period there was much amalgamation of the two countries' religions and cultures.
The stone inscription under consideration probably refers to one of the Suryavarman kings who had blood relationship with the Srivijaya rulers.
From the inscription just referred to we also learn that at that period the form of Buddhism prevalent in Lopburi was that of Theravada, and that Mahayana Buddhism, already established in Cambodia, became popularized in Thailand only after Thailand had come under the sway of Cambodia.
There are no indications, however, that the Mahayana School superseded the Theravada in any way.
This was due to the fact that Theravada Buddhism was already on a firm basis in Thailand when the Mahayana School was introduced there.
That there were monks of both schools, Theravada and Mahayana, in Lopburi during those days, is indicated in a stone inscription in the Cambodian language, found in a Brahmanic Temple within the vicinity of Lopburi city itself.
Much of the Brahmanic culture which survives in Thailand till today could be traced to its origin from Cambodia during this period.
Many of the Cambodian kings themselves were zealous adherents of Brahmanism and its ways of life.
This period, therefore, can be termed Mahayana Period.
Sanskrit, the sacred language of the Hindus, took its root deep in Thailand during these times.
In A.D.
King Anuruddha became powerful in the whole of Burma, having his capital at Pagan.
Anuruddha extended his kingdom right up to Thailand, especially the Northern and Central parts, covering areas now known as Chiengmai, Lopburi, and Nakon Pathom.
Being a Theravada Buddhist, Anuruddha ardently supported the cause of Theravada which Burma, like Thailand, at first received directly from India through missionaries sent by Emperor Asoka.
However, at the time under consideration, Buddhism in India was already in a state of decline, and as contact between Burma and India was then faint, Theravada Buddhism, as prevalent in Burma at that time, underwent some changes and assumed a form somewhat different from the original doctrine.
This, at a later stage, became what is known in Thailand as Burma Buddhism.
During the period of King Anuruddha's suzerainty over Thailand, Burmese Buddhism exercised great influence over the country, especially in the North where, owing to proximity, the impact from Burma was more felt.
It is significant that Buddhist relics found in North Thailand bear a striking Theravada influence, whereas those found in the South clearly show their Mahayana connections dating back from Srivijaya days.
To a great extent this is due to the fact that, in their heyday of suzerainty over Thailand, the Burmese under Anuruddha were content with Upper Thailand only, while leaving the South practically to be ruled by their Khmer vassals whose capital was at Lopburi.
From the beginning of the nd century B.the Thai people, whose original homeland was in the valleys between the Huang Ho and the Yangtze Kiang in China, began to migrate southwards as a result of constant friction with the neighboring tribes.
In the course of their migration which lasted for several centuries, they became separated into two main groups.
One group went and settled in the plains of the Salween River, Shan States, and other areas and spread on as far as Assam.
This group of Thais is called Thai Yai.
The other main group moved further South and finally settled in what is today termed Thailand.
The latter group of Thais is called Thai Noi.
The Thais in present-day Thailand are actually the descendants of these migrant Thais.
Of course, in the course of their migration which, as said above, continued off and on for a long time, there had been a great deal of mixture of blood through intermarriage which was only natural.
We should always bear in mind that there are several ethnic groups scattered through the length and breadth of Southeast Asia from times immemorial.
But even today we can trace the language affinity of the Thais living in widely scattered areas such as Assam, Upper Burma, Southern China, Shan States, Laos, North Vietnam, and Thailand.
After struggling hard for a long time the Thais were able to establish their independent state at Sukhothai in North Thailand.
This was probably about A.D..
It was during the period of their movement southwards that the Thais came into contact with the form of Buddhism as practiced in Burma and propagated under the royal patronage of King Anuruddha.
Some scholars are of the opinion that as Mahayana Buddhism had spread to China as early as the beginning of the Christian Era, the Thais, while still in their original home in China, must have already been acquainted with some general features of Buddhism.
As the Thai migrants grew in strength their territory extended and finally they became the masters of the land in succession to Anuruddha, whose kingdom declined after his death.
During the succeeding period, the Thais were able to exert themselves even more prominently in their southward drive.
Thus they came into close contact with the Khmers, the erstwhile power, and became acquainted with both Mahayana Buddhism and Brahmanism as adopted and practiced in Kambuja.
Much of the Brahmanic influence, such as religious and cultural rites, especially in the court circles, passed on from Cambodia to the Thais during this period, for Hinduism was already firmly established in Cambodia at that time.
Even the Thai scripts, based on Cambodian scripts which, in turn, derived their origin from India, were invented by King Ram Kamhaeng of Sukhothai during the period under consideration.
Of the period under discussion it may be observed in passing that Northern Thailand, from Sukhothai District upwards, came much under the influence of Burma Buddhism, while in the central and southern parts of the country many Mahayana beliefs and practices, inherited from the days of the Suryavarmans and the Srivijayas, still persisted.
This is the most important period in the history of the spread of Buddhism to Thailand, for it witnessed the introduction to that country of that form of Buddhism which remains dominant there until today.
About A.D.
Parakramabahu the Great became king of Ceylon, known in ancient days as Lanka.
A powerful monarch and a great supporter of Theravada Buddhism, Parakramabahu did much to spread and consolidate the Dhamma of the Lord in his island kingdom.
He it was who caused the Seventh Buddhist Council to be held under the chairmanship of Kassapa Thera, of Dimbulagala in order to revise and strengthen the Doctrine and the Discipline.
As a result of the efforts of King Parakramabahu the Great, Buddhism was much consolidated in Ceylon and the news spread to neighboring lands.
Buddhist monks from various countries, such as Burma, Pegu, Kambuja, Lanna and Lanchang flocked to Ceylon in order to acquaint themselves with the pure form of the Dhamma.
Thailand also sent her Bhikkhus to Ceylon and thereby obtained the upasampada vidhi from Ceylon, which later became known in Thailand as Lankavamsa.
This was about A.D..
Apparently the early batches of Bhikkhus, who returned from Ceylon after studies, often accompanied by Ceylonese monks, established themselves first in Nakon Sri Thammarath, for many of the Buddhist relics bearing definitely Ceylonese influence, such as stupas and Buddha images, were found there.
Some of these relics are still in existence today.
News of the meritorious activities of these monks soon spread to Sukhothai, then the capital of Thailand, and King Ram Kamhaeng who was ruling at the time, invited those monks to his capital and gave them his royal support in propagating the Doctrine.
This fact is recorded in one of the King's rock inscriptions, dated about A.D.
Since then Ceylon Buddhism became very popular and was widely practiced in Thailand.
Some of the Thai kings, such as King Maha Dharmaraja Lithai of Sukhothai dynasty and King Borom Trai Lokanath of the early Ayudhya Period, even entered the Holy Order or Bhikkhu Sangha according to the ordination rite of Lankavamsa Buddhism by inviting a patriarch from Ceylon, Maha Sami Sangharaja Sumana by name, to be the presiding monk over his upasampada ceremony.
Many monasteries, stupas, Buddha images and even Buddha footprints, such as the well-known one at Sraburi in central Thailand, were built in accordance with the usage popular in Ceylon.
The study of Pali, the language of Theravada or Southern Buddhism, also made great progress, and in all matters dealing with the Dhamma the impact of Ceylon was perceptibly felt.
However, there had been no antagonism between the different forms of Buddhism already in existence in Thailand and the Lankavamsa which had been introduced later from Ceylon.
On the contrary they seemed to have amalgamated peacefully, and all had adjusted themselves to one another's benefit.
This is evident in all religious rites and ceremonies of Thailand.
Indeed, somewhat characteristic of the Buddhists, there had been a spirit of forbearance in all matters.
For instance, even today Brahmanic rites thrive side by side with Buddhistic ceremonies in Thailand and Cambodia, especially in the royal courts.
History repeats itself.
Years after, when in Ceylon under King Kirtisri the upasampada ordination was lost due to a decline of Buddhism and upheavals in the country, Thailand was able to repay the debt by sending a batch of Buddhist monks, under the leadership of Upali and Ariyamuni Theras, who in the course of time established in Ceylon what is known as the Siyamopali Vamsa or Siyam Nikaya, or Siamese Sect, which still is a major sect in that country.
Upali worked and died in Sri Lanka, the country he loved no less than his own.
Today, for all purposes, Thailand can be termed a Theravada Buddhist country.
There are, of course, a few Mahayana monks and monasteries, but they are mostly confined to foreign communities, chiefly the Chinese.
All, however, live at peace and cooperate with one another.
So much for the past of Buddhism in Thailand.
According to the census taken in the population of Thailand numbers,,.
Of this number % are Buddhists.
This fact itself demonstrates more than anything else how influential Buddhism is in Thailand.
In their long history of existence the Thais seem to have been predominantly Buddhists, at least ever since they came into contact with the tenets of Buddhism.
All the Thai kings in the recorded history of present-day Thailand have been adherents of Buddhism.
The country's constitution specifies that the King of Thailand must be a Buddhist and the Upholder of Buddhism.
The term “The Land of Yellow Robes” has not been inappropriately applied to Thailand, for two things strike most foreigners as soon as they set foot in that country.
One is the Buddhist temple with its characteristic architecture, and the other is the sight of yellow-clad Buddhist monks and novices who are to be seen everywhere, especially in the early hours of dawn when they go out in great numbers for alms.
The two sights inevitably remind the foreigners that here is a country where Buddhism is a dominant force in the people's life.
Indeed, to the Thai nation as a whole, Buddhism has been the main spring from which flow its culture and philosophy, its art and literature, its ethics and morality, and many of its folkways and festivals.
For clarity and convenience we shall divide the study of the present state of Buddhism in Thailand into two parts, namely the Bhikkhu Sangha or the Holy Order, and the Laity.
The Bhikkhu Sangha or the Holy Order of Buddhist monks has been in existence in Thailand ever since Buddhism was introduced there.
According to the census there were in the whole kingdom of Thailand, monks;, novices; and, monasteries or temples.
These are scattered throughout the country, particularly more numerous in the thickly populated areas.
The Bhikkhu Sangha of Thailand, being of Theravada or Southern School, observes the same set of discipline as the Bhikkhu Sanghas in other Theravada countries such as Ceylon, Burma, Laos, and Cambodia.
In spite of the fact that the government allots a yearly budget for the maintenance and repair of important temples and as stipends for high ranking monks, almost the entire burden for the support of the Sangha and the upkeep of the temples rests with the public.
A survey entitled “Thailand Economic Farm Survey” made in by the Ministry of Agriculture of the Government of Thailand gives the religious cash expenses of the average Thai rural family per year as ranging from to per cent of its total annual cash income.
It may be added here that the report concerns the average Thai rural family, and not the urban dwellers, the majority of whom, in Thailand as elsewhere, are less inclined to religion than the country folks.
There are two sects or Nikayas of the Buddhist Order in Thailand.
One is the Mahanikaya, and the other is the Dhammayuttika Nikaya.
The Mahanikaya is the older and by far the more numerous one, the ratio in the number of monks of the two sects being to.
The Dhammayuttika Nikaya was founded in A.D.
by King Mongkut, the fourth ruler of the present Chakri Dynasty who ruled Thailand from to A.D.
Having himself spent years as a Bhikkhu, the King was well versed in the Dhamma, besides many other branches of knowledge, including Pali, the canonical language of Theravada Buddhism.
The express desire of the King in founding the Dhammayuttika sect was to enable monks to lead a more disciplined and scholarly life in accordance with the pristine teachings of the Buddha.
The differences between the two Nikayas are, however, not great; at most they concern only matters of discipline, and never of the Doctrine.
Monks of both sects follow the same Vinaya rules as laid down in the Patimokkha of the Vinaya Pitaka, and both receive the same esteem from the public.
In their general appearance and daily routine of life too, except for the slight difference in the manners of putting on the yellow robes, monks of the two Nikayas differ very little from one another.
Formerly, and in accordance with the Administration of the Bhikkhu Sangha Act, the organization of the Sangha in Thailand was on a line similar to that of the State.
The Sangharaja or the Supreme Patriarch is the highest Buddhist dignitary of the Kingdom.
He is chosen by the King, in consultation with the Government, from among the most senior and qualified members of the Sangha.
The Sangharaja appoints a council of Ecclesiastical Ministers headed by the Sangha Nayaka, whose position is analogous to that of the Prime Minister of the State.
Under the Sangha Nayaka there function four ecclesiastical boards, namely the Board of Ecclesiastical Administration, the Board of Education, the Board of Propagation and the Board of Public Works.
Each of the boards has a Sangha Mantri with his assistants.
The four boards or ministries are supposed to look after the affairs of the entire Sangha.
The Ecclesiastical Ministerial Council which, by the way, corresponds to the Cabinet, consists of ten members, all senior monks of the Sangha.
In addition to this, there is a Consultative Assembly, equivalent to the National Assembly, the members of which number, selected from various important monasteries.
The Sangha Sabha acts as an Advisory Body to the Ecclesiastical Ministerial Council.
Below the Sangha Sabha the administration of the Sangha continues to correspond to the secular administration of the country.
All monks and novices have to live in monasteries which are scattered throughout the country.
Each monastery has its abbot appointed by the Ecclesiastical Ministerial Council in consultation with local people.
It may be pointed out here that all religious appointments in Thailand are based on scholarly achievements, seniority, personal conduct and popularity, and contacts with monks further up in the Sangha.
There is a Department of Religious Affairs in the Ministry of Education which acts as a liaison office between the Government and the Sangha.
In general the Department of Religious Affairs works in cooperation with the Ecclesiastical Ministerial Council on all matters affecting the Sangha.
For instance, it issues all legal directives concerning the entire community of monks; it keeps record of the Sangha's property, such as lands etc.; it maintains facts and figures with respect to monks and monasteries.
The Religious Affairs Department also prepares the annual budget for the upkeep of the Sangha functionaries and the maintenance and repair of temples etc.
It may be added here that all temples and monasteries are State property.
In, the Administration of the Bhikkhu Sangha Act of was abolished; a new one was enacted instead.
By virtue of the new act, the posts of Sangha Nayaka, Sangha Mantris, and Sangha Sabha were abolished.
In place of these there is a Mahathera Samagama headed by the Sangharaja himself and consisting of not less than four and not more than eight senior monks of the two sects.
The Mahathera Samagama, in collaboration with the Department of Religious Affairs, directly governs the entire Sangha.
As is well known, the original idea of men's entering monkhood during the Buddha's time or shortly later, was to attain liberation from worldly existence in accordance with the teaching of the Master.
Such an idea, of course, springs from man's feeling of aversion to things mundane.
In other words, in those far-off days, men entered monkhood with the sole intention of ridding themselves of life's miseries and of obtaining spiritual freedom or Nirvana.
Instances of such self-renunciation are found in the holy books of the Buddhists.
With the passage of time, as is only natural, many of the ideals and practices of the early followers of the Buddha underwent modifications.
Today, over, years after the passing away of the Buddha, though the ideal of becoming a Bhikkhu still remains very lofty among Buddhists of all lands, in practice it must be admitted that there have been many deviations from the Master's original admonitions with regard to the whys and wherefores of man's entering monkhood.
Generalization of any subject matter is often dangerous but it will not be far from truth to say that today, in Thailand as in other Buddhist countries, the practice of Buddhist males entering monkhood is to a considerable extent prompted rather by the dictation of custom, the wish for education and other external considerations than by the desire to attain emancipation.
Yet there are also many who join the Sangha through genuine love for a religious life and religious studies, or out of the wish to be of service to Buddhism and their country.
Finally, in the Thai Sangha also those are not entirely lacking whose life is vigorously devoted to the aim of ultimate emancipation and to the guidance of others towards that goal.
There have been, and still are, saintly and able meditation masters in Thailand, with a fair number of devoted disciples in Sangha and laity.
There are also still monks — the so-called thudong bhikkhus — who follow the ancient way of austere living embodied in the “strict observances” or dhutangas.
In view of the above facts, there are two categories of Buddhist monks in Thailand.
One comprises those who become monks for long periods, sometimes for life, and the other those who enter the Order temporarily.
To serve in the monkhood even for a short period is considered a great merit-earning attainment by the Thai Buddhists.
Even kings follow this age-old custom.
For instance, the present ruler, H.M.
King Bhumibol Adulyadej, also observed the custom for a period of half a month some time ago.
Government officials are allowed leave with full pay for a period of four months in order to serve in monkhood.
The idea is to enable young men to gain knowledge of Buddhism and thereby to become good citizens.
Life as a monk gives them practical experience of how an ideal Buddhist life should be.
In rural districts the general tendency is still to give more deference to those who have already served in monkhood.
Such people are supposed to be more “mature” than those who have not undergone the monk's life.
Moreover, in Thailand wats used to be and are still regarded as seats of learning where all men, irrespective of life's position, could go and avail themselves of education benefits.
This is especially so in the case of economically handicapped males of the countryside.
Instances are not lacking in which people have climbed high up on life's status ladder after obtaining education while in monkhood.
There are neither religious restrictions nor social disapproval against monks' returning to lay life if and when they find themselves unable to discharge their duties as monks.
Cases exist in which, for some reason or the other, men have entered monkhood more than once, although such practice cannot be said to be in the esteem of the public.
Looked at from this viewpoint, the institution of entering monkhood in Thailand, apart from being a way of gaining moral and spiritual enlightenment, is a social uplift method by which those not so fortunately placed in life could benefit.
Judged from the ideal of adopting a monk's life as enunciated by the Buddha, whether or not such practice is commendable, is a different story.
The fact is that even today when modernism has penetrated deep into Thailand, about one half of the primary schools of the country are still situated in wats.
With sex and crimes on the increase in the country, the cry for living a better Buddhist life is being heard more and more distinctly in Thailand today.
The traditional education of monks and novices in Thailand centers mainly on the studies of the Buddhist Doctrine and Pali, the language in which the Theravada scriptures are written.
Of the former, the study of the Doctrine, there are three grades with examinations open to both monks and laymen.
Those passing such examinations are termed Nak Dhamm, literally meaning one who knows the Dhamma.
The latter, i.e., the study of Pali, has seven grades, starting with the third and ending with the ninth grade.
Students passing Pali examinations are called parian; in the Thai language the word parinna is used to mean academic degree.
For example, monks and novices passing the first Pali examination are entitled to write “P.
“ after their names.
Generally the Dhamma and the Pali studies go hand in hand and take at least seven years to complete.
The stiffness of the two courses, especially that of the Pali language, can be guessed from the fact that very few students are able to pass the highest grade, the Parian, in any annual examination.
In the good old days when living was less competitive than now, passing of even the lower Dhamma and Pali examinations used to be of much value in securing good government posts.
But now things are quite different; even those successful in the highest Pali examination, the th Grade, find it difficult to get suitable employment.
Of late there has developed a new outlook in the education of monks in Thailand.
With the rapid progress of science and with the shrinking of the world, Buddhist leaders of Thailand, monks as well as laymen, are awakened to the necessity of imparting broader education to members of the Sangha, if the Sangha is to serve the cause of Buddhism well, “for the gain of the many, for the welfare of the many.” As a result of the new outlook there now function in Bangkok two higher institutes of learning exclusively for monks and novices.
One is the Mahachulalongkorn Rajvidyalaya, and the other is the Mahamongkut Rajvidyalaya.
Both are organized on a modern university footing and both seem to be making satisfactory progress towards that direction.
Inclusion in the curriculum of some secular subjects not incompatible with monks' discipline is among the notable features of these two institutes; the aim is to give an all-round education to monks in order to enable them to be of better service to the cause of Buddhism amidst modern conditions.
So much for the education of 'long-term' monks.
As for those who enter the Order temporarily, mostly for a period of three rainy months during the Vassa, or Buddhist Lent, the education is brief and devoted to the main tenets and features of Buddhism only.
As pointed out above, such people enter monkhood either by their own genuine desire for knowledge of the Dhamma, by the dictum of custom or, as generally is the case, by the two reasons combined.
Monks of this category return to lay life again as soon as the Lent is over.
This is the reason why accommodations in monasteries are usually full during the Lenten period.
Nowadays, owing to the pressure of modern life, the custom of temporarily entering monkhood is not so rigorously observed by people living in urban areas as by those in the countryside.
The custom has its parallel in Burma, Cambodia, and Laos where Theravada Buddhism prevails.
The word “wat” means monastery and temple combined.
It is the residence of monks and novices.
There are about, wats in the whole of Thailand.
In Bangkok alone there are nearly two hundred wats.
Some big wats in Bangkok have as many as resident monks and novices.
Wats are centers of Thai art and architecture.
Thai culture, to a considerable extent, flows from wats.
Wat-lands and constructions thereon are donated by royalty, wealthy people and the public in general.
The wat is the most important institution in Thai rural life.
The social life of the rural community revolves around the wat.
Besides carrying out the obvious religious activities, a wat serves the community as a recreation center, dispensary, school, community center, home for the aged and destitute, social work and welfare agency, village clock, rest-house, news agency, and information center.
A wat is headed by a Chao Avas who is responsible for the maintenance of the wat discipline, the proper performance of religious services and rituals, and the general welfare of the inmates.
Besides monks and novices, there are also the “temple boys” in wats, who assist monks and novices in various ways, such as bringing and arranging food, cleaning dormitories, washing yellow robes, etc.
Usually these boys are related to resident monks in one way or another, and their stay is free of charge.
Most of them are students whose homes are far away and who would, otherwise, find it impracticable to get education.
This is especially so in Bangkok where accommodation is difficult to get and where all higher seats of learning of the country are situated.
The census taken in reveals that there are as many as, temple boys in Thailand, which indeed is not a small figure.
The institution of the wat, in itself a gift of Buddhism, therefore contributes in no small measure to the social welfare and progress of the Thai Buddhists.
The benefits in this respect, of course, are more apparent among the lower strata of society than in the case of the fortunate few on the top.
Apart from engaging themselves in doctrinal studies and observing disciplinary rules in general, monks are expected to be “friends, philosophers, and guides” of the people.
Preaching to masses face to face or over the radio is one of the commonest ways by which monks help the promotion of moral stability among various members of the society.
It may not be out of place to reiterate the fact that Buddhism lays great stress on the necessity of leading a morally good life in order to obtain happiness in life here and hereafter.
In most of the ceremonies and rituals, whether private or public, monks' cooperation and benediction are indispensable.
Indeed, in the life of the average Thai Buddhists, from the cradle to the grave, monks are persons to whom they constantly turn for moral support.
The role of monks in rural districts is even more important, for there the local wat is not only the religious but also the social center of the community.
It is at the wat that people come together and experience a sense of comradeship.
Religious rituals and ceremonies held at wats are always accompanied by social activities: they are occasions for people, especially the young, to enjoy themselves in feast, fun and festivities.
This aspect of the religious service helps the common folks to relax and satisfies their needs for recreation.
Not a few matrimonial alliances started from contacts at wat premises.
Acting as a moral and ethical example, monks are the most venerated persons in the countryside Thai society, remaining very close to the hearts of the people.
In times of crisis, it is to monks that people bring their problems for counsel and encouragement.
With few exceptions, the Sangha has well justified this attitude of respect and honor shown to it on the part of the laity and, on the whole, has lived up to the dignity of the Faith.
Throughout its over, years of existence Buddhism has been closely connected with the lay community.
In Pali the word for a male lay devotee is upasaka; upasika is its female equivalent.
In the history of Buddhism, right from the time of its founder, there had been numerous upasakas and upasikas whose faith in the Teachings of the Master had contributed largely to the dissemination of the Doctrine.
Names of the Buddha's munificent followers like Anathapindika, Visakha, Asoka, Kanishka, etc., are on the lips of Buddhists even today.
Without the patronage of Emperor Asoka, Buddhism probably could not have spread so far and the course of its history might have been different.
In India, the land of its birth, as well as in most of the countries where its Message has been accepted, Buddhism has received unstinted support from people of all classes, especially the ruling class.
History of the movements of Buddhism in China, Japan, Burma, Ceylon, Tibet, etc., amply justifies this statement.
In the case of Thailand too, ever since its introduction to that country, Buddhism has been warmly received and patronized by kings and commoners alike.
It is well-known that many of the Thai rulers, not satisfied with being mere lay-devotees, got themselves ordained into monkhood and became famous for their erudition in the Dhamma.
King Mongkut, Rama IV, probably stands out as most distinguished among this class of royal devotees.
The custom of Thai males entering the Sangha also contributes much to the better understanding and cooperation between the lay community and the monkhood.
After all, personal experience is better than mere theoretical knowledge.
The Buddha himself, in one of his discourses, exhorted his followers to discharge their duties well so as to enable the Dhamma to endure long in the world.
One of the duties of the lay followers, as taught by the Master, is to look after the needs of monks.
Hence it is the traditional practice with lay followers in all Buddhist countries, especially those following Theravada Buddhism, to see that monks do not suffer from lack of the four requisites, namely food, clothing, shelter, and medicine.
Although in the present age of competitive economy, when life in any field is not so easy, nobody can say in fairness that monk-life in Thailand suffers greatly from shortage of the above four requisites.
As Bhikkhus are not allowed to follow any occupational activities, it is clear that they entirely depend on the laity for their existence.
In return for this spontaneous support offered them by the public, monks are expected to live exemplary lives for the benefit of themselves as well as of those who look to them as teachers and guides.
We have already seen what moral influence monks have upon the people.
Cooperation between the laity and the Bhikkhu Sangha in Thailand is close and spontaneous.
To a very great extent this is due to the fact that in an average Thai family some of its members are certain to be found who have for some time served in the Sangha.
To the masses yellow robes are symbol of the Master, and Bhikkhus are upholders of the Dhamma, to be deferred to in all circumstances.
It is interesting to note that Bhikkhus or Samaneras found guilty of committing crimes are formally divested of their yellow robes before legal action is taken against them by the State, and this is done invariably under permission of the chief monk or the abbot.
“To do good” is a cardinal point in the teachings of Buddhism.
Consequently the idea of performing meritorious deeds is very deeply ingrained in the minds of Buddhists.
Ways of doing good or making merit among the Thai Buddhists are numerous.
A man gains merit each time he gives alms to monks or contributes to any religious rituals.
To get ordination into monkhood even for a short period, of course, brings much merit.
Besides, there are other ways of merit-earning, such as releasing caged birds or freeing caught fishes, plastering gold leaf on Buddha statues or religious monuments, contributing to the construction of a new temple or the repair of an old one, etc.
“The Law of Karma” that each action has its corresponding result and the belief in rebirth are two important factors in molding such attitude towards life among the Buddhists.
Though Nibbana, the highest bliss in Buddhism, is aspired to by all good Buddhists, the vast majority of them still think it is not so easy to reach and that they will be reborn again in this world, in heaven or some other world, or — at the very worst — in hell.
Hence, as long as they live they must try to do good in order to ensure good results in this very life as well as in the life to come.
“Be a light unto yourself.
Each man must strive for his own salvation” — these were the Master's words.
In view of this, Theravada Buddhism is often said to have individualistic temper.
Nevertheless, it is very tolerant, as the long history of its existence will prove.
Indeed, the characteristic tolerance of Buddhism, for instance in Thailand, has always permitted the absorption of many beliefs and practices from other sources which have often served to supplement or expand its concepts or to fill gaps.
Animism and Brahmanism may be cited in this connection; the two being important supplements of popular Buddhism in Thailand.
A foreign writer has rightly observed that the attitude of the Thai masses towards their religion is of an easy-going nature.
They do not bother to distinguish among the various components of their religion; for them it is all of a piece.
Only the sophisticated few are concerned with doctrinal logic and purity.
Of course, they too know much about its legends, its festivals, its ideals, and its general message that “good will render good.” On the whole it can be said that the Thais enjoy their religion.
Religious observances are to them as social and recreational as sacred occasions.
And for the vast majority, Buddhism suffices in that it enables them to feel and believe and enjoy.
Organizations among the lay Buddhists of Thailand are recent establishments.
Prominent and oldest among them is perhaps the Buddhist Association of Thailand, under Royal Patronage, which now is about years old, having been established in.
Having its head office in Bangkok, it maintains branch organizations in almost all major districts of Thailand.
Its membership is open to both sexes, irrespective of class, creed, and color.
The aim and object of the Buddhist Association of Thailand is to promote the study and practice of Buddhism and to propagate its message in and outside Thailand.
Besides arranging regular lectures and discussions on topics concerning the Dhamma, the Association also publishes a monthly journal in the Thai language on the teachings of the Buddha.
Another organization is the Young Buddhists Association which came into being at the close of the Second World War.
As its name implies, the Young Buddhists Association takes care of the interest of the young in matters concerning Buddhism.
Its primary object is to encourage the young to imbibe the tenets of Buddhism and to live a virtuous life.
Chief among its activities are arranging regular lectures and discussions on the Dhamma, issuing publications on subjects dealing with Buddhism in general, and sponsoring meetings of the young on the platform of Buddhism.
The Young Buddhists Association also has branches in the districts.
As said earlier the end of the Second World War saw a great revival of interest in Buddhism throughout the world.
Even in countries like Thailand where the Doctrine of the Awakened One has been traditionally accepted for generations, people seem to be increasingly eager to know more about the Dhamma.
Strange as it may seem, this is partly due to the interest the Occidental World has taken in Buddhism.
In times past religion has been more or less regarded in Thailand as “solace of the old.” But with the impact of the West in most matters and with the general interest shown towards Buddhism by Western intelligentsia, the Buddhists of Thailand, especially the younger generations who came into contact with the West, began to evince an inquisitive attitude towards their religion — a heritage which they have all along accepted as their own but which they have cared little to know about its true value.
This is no attempt to belittle the exceedingly great importance the Thais attach to their religion.
But human nature being what it is, the saying “Familiarity breeds contempt” is in most cases not very far wrong.
In the Thai language also we have a proverb “klai kleua kin dang” which may be rendered in English as “to have the folly to resort to alkali when one is in possession of salt.
Having taken root on the soil of Thailand for centuries Buddhism has naturally attracted many appendages to its fold, some of which are not quite in conformity with the teachings of the Master as contained in the Canon.
Many leaders of Buddhistic thought in Thailand have, therefore, come forward to try to purify the Dhamma of the many impurities that have crept into it.
Notable among the reformatory groups are the Dhammadana Association in Jaiya, South Thailand, under the leadership of Buddhadasa Bhikkhu, and the Buddha Nigama of Chiengmai started by Paññananda Bhikkhu.
The two organizations are showing good efforts in the field of awakening the Buddhists of Thailand to the pristine teachings of the Buddha as treasured in the Pali Tipitaka.
The mission is admittedly a difficult one but already a promising start has been made in this direction.
Much will also no doubt depend on how things transpire in other spheres of human activities, chiefly economic, social and political.
The present is an age of conflict — conflict between mind and body, between spirit and matter.
Man must find harmony between the two if peace be his aim in life.
And to this task of finding harmony within man Buddhism could contribute in no small measure.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
This is the third, further revised version of the original Sangha Guide on Buddhism and Sex published by the English Sangha Trust, Dhammpadipa, London NW.
The greater part of it also appeared in the journal Sangha.
As one of the older generation, I have felt very conscious of my temerity in trying to write something on this subject which younger people might be willing to read.
In this connection, I am very grateful to Alan and Jacqui James for giving me the benefit of their criticism, a task for which they are doubly qualified, being both wise in the Dhamma and at the same time much closer in age to the younger generation who may read this.
But the opinions expressed here are, of course, my own.
This is an age in which sexual matters are discussed with great openness.
There are many who are puzzled to know what the Buddhist attitude towards sex is, and it is therefore to be hoped that the following guidelines may be found helpful towards an understanding.
It is, of course, true to say that Buddhism, in keeping with the principle of the Middle Way, would advocate neither extreme puritanism nor extreme permissiveness, but this, as a guiding principle without further specification, may not seem sufficiently helpful for most people.
In the first place, we must distinguish between the rules undertaken by Buddhist monks for their own conduct, and any guiding principles for lay people.
A bhikkhu, or fully-ordained monk in the Theravada tradition, has taken upon himself a set of rules of conduct.
The aim of all of these is to enable him to conduct himself in such a way as is most conducive to the attaining of Enlightenment.
The rules are voluntarily undertaken, and if a monk feels unable to live up to them, he is free to leave the Order, which is considered much more honorable than hypocritically remaining in the robe while knowingly infringing the rule.
There are four basic rules, infringement of which is termed Parajika or “Defeat,” and involves irrevocable expulsion from the Order.
The only one we are concerned with here is the first, which deals with sexual intercourse.
Complete sexual continence is considered an essential feature of the monastic life.
Intercourse of a heterosexual or homosexual character is automatically a Parajika offense.
A monk who performs such an act is considered to have expelled himself from the Order, and is no longer in communion with the other monks.
Any acts of a sexually unbecoming nature falling short of intercourse result in suspension and require expiation.
Samaneras, or novice monks, who break their training in this respect are disrobed.
The same principle applies to the Mahayana schools and of course, to nuns in those schools where they exist.
There is no such thing as a “married monk,” though in certain schools, especially in Japan, a form of “quasi-monasticism” with married teachers who retain a form of ordination is permitted under certain conditions.
But all this has no relevance to the Theravada Sangha.
Before turning to our main theme, it is as well to have some idea of the sexual mores of ancient India in the Buddha's time.
Gotama himself, as a prince, was brought up surrounded by concubines and dancing-girls as a matter of course.
Polygamy was common.
Ambapali, the courtesan from whom the Buddha accepted gifts, was a person of some consequence.
It was not expected that young men would lead a life of much restraint, and the Buddha with his profound understanding of human nature knew well what demands to make of people in this respect.
Thus we find the following formulation of what a man should avoid:
He avoids unlawful sexual intercourse, abstains from it.
He has no intercourse with girls who are still under the protection of father or mother, brother, sister, or relative; nor with married women, nor female convicts; nor lastly with betrothed girls.
If a man could observe greater restraint than this, so much the better.
The Buddha's outlook on this question was, then, realistic for his age, and we should endeavor to view the subject as realistically as possible in the light of modern conditions.
The third of the Five Precepts undertaken by lay Buddhists runs: Kamesu micchacara veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami, “I undertake the course of training in refraining from wrong-doing in respect of sensuality.” Some lay people who, usually for a specified period, undertake more than the usual five precepts, take this one in the stricter form: Abrahmacariya veramani…, which commits them, for the duration of the undertaking, to observe the same restraint as the monks.
With these, too, we are not further concerned, as their position is now obvious.
For the average lay person, the Third Precept is on exactly the same footing as the other four.
There is, in the Buddhist view, nothing uniquely wicked about sexual offenses or failings.
Those inclined to develop a guilt-complex about their sex-life should realize that failure in this respect is neither more, nor, on the other hand, less serious than failure to live up to any other precept.
In point of fact, the most difficult precept of all for nearly everybody to live up to is the fourth — to refrain from all forms of wrong speech.
What precisely, then, does the Third Precept imply for the ordinary lay Buddhist?
Firstly, in common with all the other precepts, it is a rule of training.
It is not a “commandment” from God, the Buddha, or anyone else saying: “Thou shalt not…” There are no such commandments in Buddhism.
It is an undertaking by you to yourself, to do your best to observe a certain type of restraint, because you understand that it is a good thing to do.
This must be clearly understood.
If you don't think it is a good thing to do, you should not undertake it.
If you do think it is a good thing to do, but doubt your ability to keep it, you should do your best, and probably, you can get some help and instruction to make it easier.
If you feel it is a good thing to attempt to tread the Buddhist path, you may undertake this and the other precepts, with sincerity, in this spirit.
Secondly, what is the scope and purpose of this precept?
The word kama means in Pali “sensual desire,” which is not exclusively sexual.
It is here used in a plural form which comes close to what is meant by the Biblical expression “the lusts of the flesh.” Greed for food and other sensual pleasure is also included.
Most people who are strongly addicted to sexual indulgence are also much drawn to other sense-pleasures.
Though we are here only concerned with the sexual aspect, this point should be noted.
For those with any grasp at all of Buddhist principles, the basic reason for such an injunction should be immediately obvious.
Our dukkha — our feeling, of frustration and dissatisfaction with life — is rooted in our desires and cravings.
The more these can be brought under control, the less dukkha we shall experience.
It is as simple as that.
But of course, that which is simple is not necessarily easy.
Thus while there is, so to speak, a considerable overlap in the content of the Third Precept with the Jewish and Christian commandment, “Thou shalt not commit adultery,” there is a big difference in the spirit and approach.
Since most people in the West have some Christian conditioning — even if only indirectly — it is as well to be clear about this.
The traditional Christian view is that sexual intercourse is permissible solely within the marriage-bond.
Even then the implication is that, except as a necessary means for the procreation of children, it is really rather a bad thing, and should be restricted as far as possible — hence the debate about “the pill” and the like.
Certain things such as contraception, homosexual activity, and so on are often looked on with horror and declared “unnatural”.
Some of these prohibitions may today be more honored in the breach than the observance, but there is no doubt that rigid views of this sort are still widely held and officially propagated.
The inevitable reaction, encouraged by some real or alleged psychological experts, is towards an attitude of total permissiveness, in which “anything goes.” As was said earlier, rigid puritanism and total permissiveness are extreme views, to neither of which the Buddhist teaching subscribes.
The one is merely an inadequate reaction against the other.
What we have to do — what Buddhism in fact teaches us to do — is to map out a sane course between the two.
Reduced to essentials, the great debate about sex revolves, for many people, around the concept of sin.
To the puritan, indulgence in sexual activity for the sake of pleasure is evil, wicked, or, as he tends to say, “sinful”.
To the permissivist, this is nonsense.
He probably rejects the term “sin” as meaningless, and not only sees nothing evil in sexual pleasure but regards it as, highly legitimate, perhaps as the highest pleasure there is and certainly as something to which, in principle at least, everybody has a right.
Many people, coming from a more or less Christian background with at least some puritanical overtones, find the true Buddhist attitude to this problem rather difficult to see.
Perhaps they have never even been given a clear explanation of it or, if they have, it may have seemed too technical for them, and they have not grasped the point.
The point, in fact, is of considerable importance, so it is worthwhile attempting to make it clear.
It involves a proper elementary grasp of what is meant by kamma — something which many people, who may have been “Buddhists” for years, have never had.
We may, however, perhaps begin more profitably by considering the word “sin.” “Sin” to a Christian is primarily thought of as a breach of God's commandments.
This explanation is of course not wrong in terms of Christian theology, but is not applicable in Buddhism, where there are no such commandments that one can infringe.
As already indicated, the so-called precepts are in fact undertakings to oneself, which is something different.
They are more on a par with the instruction “Look both ways before you cross the road.” Still there is much agreement between the content of the Five Precepts and some of the Ten Commandments, so it may be wise in many cases to behave accordingly, whichever formulation one follows.
However, there is another rendering of the word sin itself which in fact comes much closer to the Buddhist view of things.
In the Bible, “sin” actually renders Hebrew and Greek words which literally mean “missing the mark,” i.e., behaving inadequately or unskillfully.
The sinner, then, is like an unskillful archer who misses his aim.
But this comes, surely, very close to the idea of akusala kamma or “unskilled action” in Buddhism.
The Pali word kamma literally means “action”, which can be either skilled or unskilled.
The results of action accrue to the doer as vipaka, which is pleasant when the action was skilled, unpleasant when it was unskilled.
The feelings we experience are in fact of the nature of vipaka — they are dependent on past kamma.
And of course we are continually creating fresh kamma for a good part of our time.
It should therefore be noted that the feeling of pleasure is not an action, but a result.
There is, therefore, nothing either “skillful” or “unskillful” about experiencing such a feeling.
We should therefore not regard it as either “virtuous” or “sinful.” So far, so good.
Such pleasant feelings can be enjoyed with a clear conscience and no guilt feeling.
If this were all, there would be no problem.
The puritans would be routed and the permissivists justified.
Unfortunately, there is another side to the matter.
We may recall that a few years ago there was a song “Money is the Root of all Evil” Some people pointed out that not money, but the love for money is the root of all evil.
And here is the snag.
Sexual pleasure is not “evil”, but attachment to sexual pleasure is.
If we can experience the pleasure without attachment we are all right; if we become attached to it, we are not “hitting the mark.” Now of course it is rather difficult to experience pleasure of any sort without feeling attached to it.
But attachment is kamma, and unskilled kamma at that.
And the results of that will inevitably, according to Buddhism, be something unpleasant in the future.
Many people will find this explanation novel.
Some will find it puzzling.
Some will undoubtedly reject it — with or without investigation — with the excuse that it is overly subtle, or arbitrary, or something of the sort.
What they mean is, of course, that they find it inconvenient.
But it will repay a lot of consideration and mindful investigation.
Careful study, in fact, should show that it is the key to the whole problem.
The matter can also be considered in terms of the law of Dependent Origination: “Contact is the basis for the arising of feeling; feeling… of craving; craving… of clinging;” etc., the ultimate outcome being of course the continued process of becoming, with all the sufferings entailed.
Thus, if we wish to adjudicate between the puritans and the permissivists, we cannot say that either side is entirely right.
We might, however, suggest that the puritans are partly right for the wrong reasons.
Sexual indulgence is not wicked, but it may be in some degree inadvisable.
Most people will not feel able to refrain altogether, but there is merit in moderation.
Setting aside all ideas derived from other sources, other religions and philosophies of life, what is the Buddhist attitude towards marriage?
For many Buddhists, in the East or the West, there is no great problem.
They live a reasonably normal married life just as do many Christians, humanists, and others.
We may say they are lucky, or enjoy the results of favorable kamma in this respect.
For others, of all creeds or none, serious problems arise and must be somehow faced.
In the Christian tradition, marriage is usually termed a “sacrament.” In some branches of Christianity it is treated as an indissoluble bond, though usually there are a few loopholes.
Other branches of Christianity permit divorce in certain rather narrowly defined circumstances, and of course in most countries the state permits divorce and the remarriage of divorced persons, with or without the approval of the Church.
In Buddhism, marriage is not a “sacrament,” as such a concept does not exist.
And it is not any part of the functions of Buddhist monks to join lay people together in holy wedlock.
If it is occasionally done today in Japan, this is just a modern idea in conformity with a general tendency among Japanese Buddhists to imitate Christian institutions.
In the Buddhist tradition it is often the custom for bhikkhus to give their “blessing” after the civil wedding-ceremony has been performed.
But even this is really more of a concession to the laity than anything else.
And if the marriage does not turn out a success, no bhikkhu has any authority to say that that marriage shall not be dissolved.
Divorce, like marriage, is a civil affair.
Likewise, if a married couple decide to practice contraception, that is entirely their business.
The Sangha will not feel called upon to interfere or object.
It must be admitted that certain bhikkhus have been heard to declare that contraception is wrong and should be banned — but that is their private opinion.
It is no part of the Buddhist teaching.
Abortion is of course a different matter.
Since this involves the taking of life, it contravenes the First Precept.
It can only be condoned in cases of serious health hazards, where it may represent the lesser evil.
In getting married, people obviously take on a responsibility, both towards each other and towards whatever children they have.
Any form of irresponsible behavior is clearly reprehensible by any reasonable standards, whether we call ourselves Buddhists or anything else.
If we bear in mind, and try to observe, all the five precepts, the chances of a successful marriage are obviously increased.
Excessive drinking, for instance, is a potent source of unhappy marriages.
What, it may be asked, of “adultery,” i.e., extra-marital sexual relations?
The short answer is that, quite obviously, this is something to be avoided.
But the point should be made that Buddhism does not regard this, or any other sexual irregularities and deviations, as somehow uniquely wicked.
In countries nominally Christian the special kind of horror with which such things are, or recently were, regarded can be pushed to grotesque extremes.
Not many years ago a certain politician was solemnly declared by some to be unfit to become Prime Minister because he had been the innocent partner in a divorce case!
More recently still, another politician was hounded from office because of acts of adultery of which his wife forgave him!
Yet many politicians in all countries have got away with far worse things of a non-sexual character without a word being said.
Buddhists should try to behave themselves sexually, as in other respects, to the best of their ability — but they should learn to exercise the maximum of charity towards the lapses of others.
If a marriage has irretrievably broken down, even though it may continue in name, the situation is of course quite different.
In such circumstances one may well feel that complete abstinence is a burden greater than one can reasonably be expected to bear.
The things that can go wrong with a marriage are legion.
A partner can be impotent, ill, irresponsible, jealous, drunken, a compulsive gambler, deranged, promiscuous, miserly, unemployable, or several of these things.
Or both partners can be perfectly charming people and yet utterly unsuited to each other.
It may be that only the children — poor wretches — hold the “marriage” together.
At the same time, there may be many reasons which make a dissolution impossible or impracticable.
An extra-marital relationship in such circumstances may serve to make the situation tolerable.
Those who find themselves in such a situation must make the best job of it they can.
It is not for others, more fortunate or more timid, to be excessively censorious.
Here again, we should try to look at things calmly and clearly, and, above all, responsibly.
Nowadays there is pretty frank acceptance of what has always been the case, that a lot of people in fact have sexual intercourse without going through the formality of getting married.
No doubt there is more of it now than there used to be because, for one thing, contraception is a lot more efficient than formerly, and also because religious prejudices are fast breaking down.
This is a simple statement of fact, not of what ought or ought not to be the case.
In the case of engaged couples, it is probably by now the usual thing, and is not very heavily frowned upon by most people.
But it cannot be termed exactly rare among couples who have not the slightest intention of getting engaged.
In the past, it was widely considered that pre-marital sex was a good thing for young men, but a bad thing for girls.
Now sex-equality has caught up on this, as on so many other things.
In any case, we may as well accept the fact that, whatever we may think about it, preaching by the older generation will, by and large, have precious little effect on the young.
This is probably one thing most parents are worried about.
The young people of today are not, usually, notably impressed by the wisdom of their elders.
They may quite often be perfectly right in this skepticism, but of course it does not follow that they themselves are really any wiser.
It may be that their folly merely takes on a different form.
Let us remember that basically, if Buddhism teaches us anything at all, it is that almost all human beings are pretty dim-witted, on the whole.
That after all is why we are here at all.
But still, if those who are parents can succeed in inculcating a sense of responsibility into their young, that in all probability is about all they can do.
There are no easy answers.
Queen Victoria reigned for sixty glorious years, and even despite the pioneering efforts of her son and successor Edward VII, it still took England a further sixty years to cast off the last shreds of Victorian respectability.
Now at last the deed has been done, and naked young men can stand on the stage and utter naughty words without a Lord Chamberlain to say them nay.
Is this progress, or was Victorian prudery preferable to modern rudery?
We are back with the two extremes once again.
We must seek the middle way.
Of course, if the young would only listen, there is no doubt we older ones could give them all sorts of quite genuinely good advice.
And there is just one chance that they will listen: if we can somehow avoid being patronizing.
But the heavy father act is now definitely out, and the establishment line cuts no ice.
If we tell the youth of today they stink, they will simply turn round and tell us our ideas stink.
However, if we can succeed in getting across to them at all, we may be able, humbly to suggest certain things for their consideration.
Sex is something the younger generation of today are intensely aware of.
In fact, they would have to be born blind and deaf not to be.
It is exploited commercially today in every conceivable way.
Our entire commercial civilization is founded on the principle of stimulating bigger and better desires in all of us, all the time.
And at a conservative estimate, about % of all advertising at the present time includes an element of sexual titillation.
It has been found, quite clearly, that sex stimulates the sales of anything and everything from typewriters to weed-killers.
That it is the mainstay of virtually every conceivable kind of “entertainment” to which we are voluntarily or involuntarily subjected, goes without saying.
In other words, our desires in general, and our sexual desires in particular, are being consistently and grossly over-stimulated the whole time of set purpose, and the bland assumption is that if it all suddenly stopped, the country's entire economy would be in ruins.
We all, young and old, have to live with this situation and, to put it mildly, it doesn't make self-restraint any easier.
So before we start lecturing the young, we should realize this fact.
In this game, the dice are loaded against us.
Still, we may manage to get through to them.
After all, many young people are themselves against the establishment, and among other things they rebel against the sheer tawdriness of our lives.
Their ideas may quite frequently be all wrong, and badly mixed up, but at least they sincerely yearn for something better, and in fact they are desperately even if often incoherently trying to bring about a better state of affairs.
They are by no means lacking in idealism, and they have a keen eye for those who seek to exploit their idealism for dubious ends.
We can latch on to them if we can only convince them that we are at least sincere.
Let us just take a cold, hard look at this question of premarital intercourse among the young.
In the first place, it happens.
And there are just two ways, in principle, by which it can cease to happen.
Either young people can exercise self-restraint, or they can get married.
A few do the former, and quite a lot do the latter.
Now of course, very early marriages can turn out well.
But the fact is that they quite often don't for obvious reasons.
It is therefore not an entirely self-evident fact that early marriage, as such, is preferable to a little “experimentation.
It is, of course, very hard for parents to stand back and silently watch their own children embarking on a course which may seem to them, and indeed may actually be unwise.
Some young people today are only prepared, and able, to learn by trial and error.
They are unwilling to ask for advice, or even to accept it if given unasked.
They should, however, be aware that there are serious dangers in experimentation, if too rashly undertaken, and the trouble is that, while parents may hold back with advice on restraint, there are others who are only too ready to offer “permissive” advice without drawing attention to the risks.
It is the duty of somebody, whether parents or teachers, to ensure that young people are aware of some of the less comfortable “facts of life” as well as those they want to know about.
Venereal disease is rampant today, and on the increase.
And it is by no means always the “minor inconvenience” it is made out to be in some quarters.
It can still cause sterility, serious illness, or even death.
That “the pill” is not, and is not meant to be, any protection against V.D.
would seem obvious, but many girls seem unaware of this — till it is too late.
Nor is “the pill” itself as harmless as all that.
It can have unpleasant and sometimes quite serious side-effects, and one recent estimate is that % of the women who use it ought not to do so, on medical grounds.
Even common sense might suggest that prolonged chemical interference with hormone functioning could cause trouble.
These are just some of the more obvious physical dangers.
There are plenty of emotional problems and dangers, too.
To take just one example: genuine misunderstandings can arise because teen-age lads want, and expect, to go “all the way” whereas often the girls only want to flirt.
This situation is by no means uncommon: at best it is embarrassing, and at worst it can lead to very ugly incidents.
The way of self-restraint is not necessarily an easy one for all to follow and, under present conditions especially, it is almost more than we can reasonably expect.
And it too can be undertaken for the wrong reasons, and in the wrong way.
The English public school system was based on the segregation of the sexes and an ideal of sexual restraint, and to a certain extent it worked.
It produced the predictable crop of homosexuals as well as quite a few inhibited young men, but it inculcated a genuine respect for women, which was not always quite as ludicrous as some would have us believe.
On balance, it may have done more good than harm, from the sexual point of view, to the majority of those who were subjected to it.
But it was based on an over-simplified idea.
Life is more subtle than Arnold of Rugby allowed for.
And yet, the best products of this system of education are in many respects admirable.
They have a deep sense of self-discipline and responsibility, qualities in rather short supply today.
Of course, many of the young people of today actually have such a sense, quite strongly in some ways.
They do feel responsible — they feel deeply “committed” — about apartheid or other social questions.
And even the hairiest types quite often endure surprising hardships in the way of sleeping rough and the like, with a kind of self-discipline which may appear strangely ill-directed but is nevertheless there.
The present age has been justly called the Post-Christian Age.
Traditional Christian teachings are crumbling everywhere.
It is not, perhaps, very difficult to find arguments in support of the view that this is a good thing, or that it is a bad thing.
It largely depends on what we want to put in place of the dear departed.
But in any case, one can scarcely avoid feeling a pang of sympathy for the Christians, especially perhaps the Christian clergy.
Most Christian ministers of all denominations are, after all, decent, upright, hard-working and conscientious men who are desperately striving to do a good job and at least save something worth-while from the wreckage.
They are usually desperately under-paid, they preach to their dwindling flock to the best of their ability, and they are stuck with an impossible situation.
They may often be ignorant and sometimes bigoted, but they find themselves mocked by those who are often enough equally ignorant and bigoted, and whose sole aim is frequently to replace their creed, however inadequate, by something ever more negative and destructive.
If the Church, even in its present enfeebled state, were to disappear totally from the scene, the loss, despite all doctrinal inadequacies and absurdities, would certainly be greater than any conceivable gain.
It is not quite true that any religion is better than no religion, for some forms of religion are unbelievably awful.
But the best, or even the second-best, of Christianity is assuredly a lot better than most of the purely secular substitutes for it.
This, as Buddhists, we should be freely prepared to admit, without thereby in the least falling into the trap of saying, “Well, it's all the same thing really,” when it quite obviously isn't.
The basic Christian attitude to sex is well enough known, and has been briefly outlined above.
It can assume thoroughly unhealthy forms, but in its more moderate aspects it can perhaps still serve as a fairly useful basis for decent behavior.
At least it does provide some reasons which a good many people can accept as a basis for morality.
Now of course one can have morals without religion.
It is not too difficult to produce purely social reasons for a lot of moral conduct, sexual or otherwise, and the best of the anti-religious propagandists today are at pains to do this.
But some others do not.
Their policy is simply to controvert anything and everything the Churches teach and stand it on its head.
Sensuality and aggression, it is argued, are basic drives in man which it is dangerous to dam up and which should, accordingly, be allowed free play.
In the case of aggression, the fallacy is so obvious that there are few who would literally subscribe to this, though some societies in practice seem to allow it plenty of scope.
But in the case of sex, complete permissiveness really is openly preached in some quarters, and in fact a Swedish doctor has even announced that he wants to organize a corps of volunteers to provide everybody with sexual intercourse.
This would apparently make everybody happy and the millennium would have arrived.
The sexual drive is, in most circumstances, just about the strongest urge there is in man and in the other animals.
This is so whether we think that it was implanted in us by God or by the devil.
It can be denied all direct expression, quite obviously, and whether this is or is not a good thing to do depends very much indeed on how — and why — this is done.
When we come to consider sex and religion, we find that in fact this is often done, in the Buddhist Sangha and the Roman Catholic Church, to take the two most obvious examples.
The ostensible reasons for such a course in these two bodies may be quite different, but it is surely not without significance that they both — and some others — consider it important to even attempt such a seemingly unnatural exercise.
But there is no doubt that a good deal of the enormous respect shown to members of both communities stems directly from the knowledge of their celibate way of life.
In some parts or the world, indeed, such men are regarded as either supermen or hypocrites, since no normal man could be expected to endure such a life.
And of course both communities do include quite a few hypocrites and, probably, a few supermen.
For the vast majority or people, of course, there is no question of their attempting such a thing except perhaps, for relatively short periods.
The lady who once asked in a class, “If everybody became a bhikkhu, what would happen to the world?” could safely be told not to worry.
The biological function of sex is obvious and requires no discussion here.
But the interesting thing for us to note is how sex — like everything else — is a purely impersonal force.
We tend to think of it in intensely personal terms, but in actual fact it is a force that just flows through us and uses our most wonderful and inspiring emotions for its own ends, which are totally concerned with the continuance of the race as a whole.
The idea that it is just a private and wonderful thing between you and me is merely a part of our general illusion.
Altogether, it is a prolific breeder of illusions.
It can lead a man to think he has found the most wonderful woman in the whole world while everybody else is thinking, “What on earth can he possibly see in her?
To the Buddhist, of course, sex is an expression — perhaps the chief expression — of that tanha or craving which brings dukkha in its train.
It is therefore quite logical that we should seek to bring it under control.
In a sense, that is all there is to the whole question.
The aim of the true Buddhist is to bring about the cessation of craving, and from the individual point of view there is no other reason for sexual restraint than this.
But from the broader ethical point of view there are, of course, other reasons which are no less important: if we behave recklessly and irresponsibly in sexual matters, we can cause untold harm to others; we can trifle with other people's emotions in a quite devilish way, bring unwanted children into the world, and so on and so forth.
But none of these things would, of course, happen if we were able to control “our own” sexuality: “our own” in quotes because it is, as we have to remember, an impersonal force working through us, which is precisely why it is so difficult to control.
Total sexual control in the sense of perfect abstinence is quite obviously only for the few.
It is perhaps one mistake of the Roman Catholic Church that it seeks to impose this discipline on too many people and too absolutely, as some Catholics now recognize.
But in fact there will always be more than sufficient people willing and even determined to keep the human race going.
Society's problem is rather to prevent the population explosion from getting completely out of hand — hence all the rather dreary arguments about “the pill.
Now there are various possible ways of controlling the sex-urge, some bad, some good.
One is through fear: fear of hell fire, fear of venereal diseases, and so on.
This is of course not a particularly good way, though it can certainly work, and is perhaps not always wholly harmful.
After all, there can be various unfortunate consequences of intercourse and we should be aware of them.
Even rebirth in some very unpleasant “hell-state” is not necessarily a complete fantasy.
But of course an exaggerated fear of dreadful penalties for minor transgressions is not psychologically very helpful.
Another way is the way of repression.
This is of course not a conscious process.
It is a form of successful self deception, as a result of which we are not consciously aware of a thing.
Repression, as ought to be better known than in fact seems to be the case, is by no means the same thing as voluntary “suppression.” Very few people in actual fact have really “transcended sex” — though quite a lot of people seem to think they have.
They never connect their resultant psychological troubles with the root-cause — repressed sex.
But it should be firmly stated that, if we can do it, suppression with awareness does little or no harm.
A great deal of sexual energy can, of course, be canalized or “sublimated” into other things: art, music, intense religious faith, and so on.
People — especially but by no means only women — are well known in all religious groups who have done this with more or less success.
And those who have attained the meditative absorptions known as the jhanas may find therein an emotional outlet which is superior to that of sex.
All this is fine, and very much to the good.
But even these things do not in themselves entirely solve the problem, at least in the ultimate sense.
As long as there remains even a latent craving, according to the Buddhist teaching rebirth will inevitably continue to take place.
For we are reborn, not merely because of the sexual drive which brought about the union of our parents, but also because of that same sexual drive in “ourselves,” i.e., in that stream of consciousness which produces the changing series of patterns of our own particular individuality.
And this is in fact the deeper significance of the Oedipus complex and other such matters unearthed by Freud.
According to the “Tibetan Book of the Dead” those whose karmic predispositions destine them for rebirth in human form see couples in sexual union and experience desire for an attractive member of the opposite sex among those couples.
By this desire they thereupon find themselves drawn into the womb and reborn — which was not at all what they wanted!
The Theravada scriptures do not specifically describe the process, and it may be rather symbolic than literal, but psychologically at least something like this is what happens.
Quite obviously, the average Buddhist lay person has no present intention of living a celibate life — nor is this being urged here.
But some knowledge of the nature of sexuality and of how it can be transcended can help him to solve his sexual problems, if only by helping him to avoid self-deception.
According to the Buddhist teaching, the path to Full Enlightenment is marked by the successive attainment of four stages.
The first of these is that of the stream-winner, who has broken three of the ten fetters and “glimpsed Nibbana.” The essential factor here is the clear realization of impersonality.
This realization at the same time eliminates skeptical doubt and belief in rites and rituals.
In our present connection the important point to note is this: in the moment when anatta is realized — when, that is, the spurious nature of “self “ is clearly seen — there can, obviously, be no desire of any sort for that “self” and its gratification.
True, this moment of deep insight passes, but its profound effects remain.
Desires return, but their root has been irreparably broken, so that they must eventually die away.
In fact at this stage — and this should be realized — sexual desire, and aggression, may still be quite strong in some types of character.
But of course they will never result in the grosser forms of misconduct.
However, craving in its more latent form may still be powerful enough to lead to repeated rebirths — up to seven times, it is said.
The second stage, that of the once-returner, when “Nibbana has been glimpsed” a second time, results in a dramatic reduction of both these urges.
Henceforth, they have at most only “nuisance-value,” and rebirth in the world of sensuality cannot, it is said, take place more than once.
Only at the third stage, that of the non-returner, are they quite eliminated.
Such a person has no more ties with this world, and so will not be reborn here, though he may be reborn in another sphere before attaining Full Enlightenment.
From all this the conclusion may be drawn that, while it is indeed possible to “transcend sexuality” in this life, it is not by any means as simple as some suppose, and many who think they have done it are deceiving themselves.
Nevertheless there are many in the robe and out of it who, without having reached this stage, have in practice gained complete control of the sex impulse.
How, then, can control of sexuality be achieved?
A large measure of control can certainly be gained by concentrative meditation practice, which stills the mind and can lead to the jhana states.
In non-Buddhist systems this is probably the best that can be hoped for, and it is not to be despised.
Indeed, many people, especially in the West, are so disturbed that some such calming practice is almost essential, perhaps for a very long time.
But the other way, and the truly Buddhist way, which can lead right to the goal, is the way of Insight.
The main scriptural basis for this is the Satipatthana Sutta.
The four foundations of mindfulness as set forth there are: mindfulness as to body, feelings, states of mind, and mind-contents.
With reference to “states of mind,” it is said: “He knows lustful mind and the mind that is free from lust.
He knows how lust arises and how it ceases.” This is not a manual of meditation, and it must suffice here just to indicate how by mindfulness one comes to discover how mental and physical phenomena arise and cease, and therefore, ultimately, how to bring about their cessation.
In this method, there is no forcing.
Rigid suppression by an act of will is not required — and will not anyway lead to the goal.
When even quite intractable-seeming personal problems are fully seen in their true nature, they will dissolve.
It may take time and much perseverance, but it is a way of gentleness, which does no violence to one's nature.
Eventually, if steadfastly pursued, it can lead to the solution of all our problems, not only those connected with sex.
Slowly and patiently, we can disentangle by mindfulness all the guilt feelings and other complications which may have developed.
And we come to realize, probably to our surprise, that the seeing is the cure, when the seeing is deep enough.
Sex is a powerful force in us all.
In itself it is neither “good” nor “bad.” But it can certainly create problems.
And modern Western man is particularly prone to such problems, partly because of the sheer hectic pace and pressure of modern life, which exaggerates all our troubles, and more specifically because of his background.
A puritanical Church tradition has now been vigorously challenged by a secular spirit of permissiveness.
For many people it is not at all easy to find the middle way between these two extremes.
There is nothing “sinful” about sex.
If we make mistakes, we should recognize them and try to avoid repeating them, but we should not develop guilt-complexes about them.
Sexual lapses are not uniquely wicked, and in fact all but the grosser forms of sexual misconduct are probably on the whole less harmful socially than a lot of other things many people do.
But it should be borne in mind that sex does usually involve at least one other person, and potentially the next generation.
In this respect it is strictly incumbent on us at all times to act responsibly which means compassionately.
Otherwise, the physical and emotional consequences for somebody may be very serious.
The ideal of sex only within monogamous marriage should be just as valid for Buddhists as for Christians.
It should, at least, not be lightly departed from.
The way of mindfulness has been recommended above.
Admittedly, not everybody is prepared to practice intensive mindfulness, whatever benefits may be urged for it.
But even a moderate degree of habitual mindfulness can produce surprising results.
If we learn, with detachment, to watch our desires at play, it is often quite astonishing how they seem to “drop away,” almost of their own accord.
To take as an example a related problem: many people, when they first come to Buddhism, are worried about the Fifth Precept, which deals with intoxication.
“Can't I have a drink occasionally?” they ask, often rather anxiously.
The answer is, of course: “It's up to you.” But in this case, too, having tried a little mindfulness, they are frequently surprised to find that they want a drink less and less.
As a matter of fact, the same principle applies here too.
Having discovered the principle, applied it and found that it works, we can decide for ourselves how far we wish to take it.
It will take us as far as we are prepared to go.
Some readers may wonder that there has been no mention of the word “love” in the foregoing.
To have discussed this question would have led too far.
So I will merely quote the following two phrases from a newspaper advice-column:
“I am in love” means “I want me to be happy”; “I love” means “I want to make you happy.
Buddhists might reflect, and even meditate, on these two statements — at various levels.
Golden Rule: Never let Passion override Compassion
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
“All beings subsist on nutriment” — this, according to the Buddha, is the one single fact about life that, above all, deserves to be remembered, contemplated and understood.
If understood widely and deeply enough, this saying of the Buddha reveals indeed a truth that leads to the root of all existence and also to its uprooting.
Here, too, the Buddha proved to be one who “saw to the root of things”.
Hence, it was thought useful to collect his utterances on the subject of nutriment, together with the instructive explanations by the teachers of old, the commentators of the Paali scriptures.
The laws of nutriment govern both biological and mental life, and this fact was expressed by the Buddha when speaking of four kinds of nutriment: edible food, sense-impressions, volitions, and consciousness.
It is hunger that stands behind the entire process of nutrition, wielding its whip relentlessly.
The body, from birth to death, craves ceaselessly for material food; and mind hungers as eagerly for its own kind of nourishment, for ever new sense-impressions and for an ever expanding universe of ideas.
Craving is the principal condition of any “in-take” or “up-take”, that is, of nutriment in its widest sense.
This is the first factor common to all types of nutriment, be they physical or mental.
The second common factor is the process of the assimilation of food.
In the process of eating and digesting, what was external becomes absorbed in the internal; what was foreign matter becomes “one's own” and is identified with one's personality.
A German proverb says: “Der Mensch ist, was er isst” — “Man is what he eats.” And this applies as well to mental nourishment.
Our mind also feeds on “external” material: on sense-impressions and variegated experiences; on the contents of the store-house of knowledge accumulated by the race; and on the precipitate derived from all these sources.
Also our memories, when they become objects of mind, are as “external” to the present thought-moment as the ideas read in a book.
What cannot be absorbed by the system is discarded, and thus, in the body as well as in the mind, there is a constant process of grasping and rejecting, assimilating and dissimilating, identifying with oneself and alienating.
When we look closely at this process of nutrition, physical and mental, we shall notice that it is not only the eater who consumes the food, but, in the course of assimilation, also the food devours the eater.
There is thus mutual absorption between them.
We know how much people can be changed by ideas they have absorbed and which finally have absorbed and consumed them.
These laws governing nutriment are indeed sufficient to convince a thoughtful observer how illusory the conception of an abiding self or substance is.
This alone should be enough to vindicate the Anattaa doctrine, the Buddha's deeply revolutionizing teaching of not-self.
Individualized life is, as Paul Dahlke says, “neither a metaphysical 'I'-identity nor a mere physical process, but a nutrimental process and as such it is neither something which is in and by itself, nor something caused by another, but something that is maintaining itself: and all these so-called higher faculties of thinking and feeling are different forms of eating, of maintaining oneself.
But in addition to the vindication of the Anattaa doctrine, nutriment is likewise a convincing teacher of the two other characteristics of life, Impermanence and Suffering.
Change, or Impermanence, is at the very root of the nutritive process which cries for constant replenishment of the food consumed.
The bottomless gaping hole has to be filled again and again as long as the being lives.
And it is no different with our mental hunger that craves for change and variety.
This repetitive monotony of the process of nutrition kept going by the urge to preserve life — this is enough to reveal the dukkha-nature of life, the tiresomeness of the tedious round of eating and being hungry again.
Hence a medieval Jewish sage was moved to say, “I am fed up with being hungry again and again, and I hunger after final satiety.
This is the suffering inherent in the very function of eating, though mostly hidden by the habituation to this most elementary feature of routine life.
The concrete suffering and pain involved in the search for food and its acquisition, is obvious enough to all and this misery was, is and will be life's constant companion.
There is the mute suffering in the animal world where “devouring each other is the law”; we also know of primitive man's fight for pasture land; we also know of the pangs of hunger among the poor, and of starving children the world over.
And though the resources for feeding humanity have grown considerably in our days, man still has not controlled famine, even where it would be in his power to do so; and all progress in the field of food-production threatens to be dwarfed by the rapid growth of world population.
This problem looms large on the horizon of present-day humanity and may well become desperate if the disparity between available food and increasing population reaches a critical point.
Should that critical point be reached, we do not know what dire consequences may follow from that situation, unless a united mankind can solve the problem by concerted action and peaceful means.
Hence, also for mankind's future, what the Dhamma teachers of old said remains true: that the search for food is an ever-present source of suffering and as such it can stir man's sense of urgency when he considers, in the light of “nutriment,” man's own nature, his incessant needs and his situation in the world.
This contemplation of the dukkha-aspect of nutriment leads us to a formulation of the Four Noble Truths in terms of nutriment, as given in the last text of this anthology.
The four nutriments of life stand for the first truth of Ill; the craving for the four nutriments is the origin of Ill, the second Truth; the stopping of that craving is the cessation of the continued process of grasping for material and mental food, which is the end of Ill, the third Truth; and the Noble Eightfold Path is the way to that cessation.
It is because the process of nutrition demonstrates the conditioned nature of all existence that we have found it to cover those salient features of the Dhamma — the three signata and the Four Truths.
We shall now consider each of the four kinds of nutriments singly.
Just like the husband and wife in the Buddha's simile, mankind ever since it emerged on this planet, has traversed the desert of life where food is the most urgent concern.
And again, as in that story, the stilling of man's hunger has often been a heart-rending business — if not for the sometimes quite callous “eater,” then for his prey and for a sensitive observer.
Often, in his search for food, man has destroyed what is commonly dearest to him, be it relatives and friends or the ideals of his youth.
True, this is only one aspect of life: life is not “desert” entire; it has a goodly number of oases where travelers can rest and enjoy themselves to such an extent that they are prone to forget the surrounding desert, which often encroaches on the tiny oasis and buries it.
The couple in the Buddha's story, coming near starvation, eat their own beloved child.
It is a gruesome and seemingly fantastic story indeed.
But knowing from the records of history that, at times of famine, war or shipwreck, men did resort to cannibalism, we have to admit that what our story tells may have substantially happened ever so often, in one way or another.
In his incessant search for food, or for better food or for control of food resources, how often has man killed, cruelly crushed or exploited his fellow creatures, even those who are close to him by common blood or common race!
And is there not close kinship between all that lives?
These last words are not merely a sentimental phrase; but they are also a hard and cruel fact.
Are we not akin to the voracious greed, the cruel rage and the destructive stupidity, which we encounter in life and of which we become victim or perpetrator in the struggle for food or power?
If we were not akin to it, could we encounter it, in one way or another?
For an unfathomable time, caught in the ever-turning Wheel of Life, we have been everything: the prey and the devourer of all, parent and child of all.
This we should consider when contemplating the nutriment of edible food and the Buddha's simile for it.
If we wish to eat and live, we have to kill or tacitly accept that others do the killing for us.
When speaking of the latter, we do not refer merely to the butcher or the fisherman.
Also for the strict vegetarian's sake, living beings have to die under the farmer's plowshare, and his lettuce and other vegetables have to be kept free of snails and other “pests,” at the expense of these living beings who, like ourselves, are in search of food.
A growing population's need for more arable land deprives animals of their living space and, in the course of history, has eliminated many a species.
It is a world of killing in which we live and have a part.
We should face this horrible fact and remain aware of it in our Reflection on Edible Food.
It will stir us to effort for getting out of this murderous world by the ending of craving for the four nutriments.
In one short lifetime, how many trainloads of food have passed in and out of our puny body!
How many people have had to labor in the production, preparation, and distribution of that food, for keeping unbroken the “traffic line” that runs straight through our body!
It is a grotesque picture if we visualize it.
There is yet another aspect of that “life-giving” function of eating.
To illustrate it, let us think of a silo, or a storehouse or food bag: after it has been emptied, a few grains or other tiny morsels of food will mostly remain in it.
Similarly there will always be left some tiny remnants of food in our body that are neither assimilated nor expelled but remain and putrefy.
Some physiologists say that it is this putrefaction of residual food that ultimately brings about the aging and death of the organism if there are no other causes.
If they are right, then food is not only life-giving but also death-bestowing, and it appears that we have in this life of ours the choice between death by starvation or by putrefaction.
“The food devours the eater!” This close connection between nutriment and death is very poignantly expressed in Greek myth, according to which Demeter is the Goddess of corn and of death as well.
Bachofen, that great explorer and interpreter of classic myth, has expressed the significance of it very succinctly: “She feeds man as a prey to herself.
People, as far as they give any thought to the humdrum act of eating, have taken very different attitudes towards food.
Some who became tired of the dull routine of eating dull food, have made a “fine art” of it and became gourmands.
To them the Buddha says: “All nutriment is miserable, even divine food.” Others, keenly aware of the importance of food for good health, have devised various ideas about “pure food”: we have here the dietetic rules of several religions, and the belief of ancient and modern sects in man's “purification by nutriment”, of which already the Buddha made mention, down to our own days with their ersatz religions of numerous food-reformers.
Others, again, have tried to solve the problem of the body's dependence on food by reducing nourishment below sustenance level and by long periods of fasting.
This harsh and futile method of self-mortification the Buddha, too, had tried out and rejected before his Enlightenment, and had vividly described his experience in the Discourse on the Noble Quest.
Also later on, the Buddha never recommended periods of fasting beyond the abstention from solid food after noon enjoined upon bhikkhus, and in the periodic observance of the Eight or Ten Precepts.
What the Buddha, as a teacher of the Middle Way, advised was moderation in eating, non-attachment to the taste of food, and wise reflection on nutriment.
Like a skinned cow, man is helplessly exposed to the constant excitation and irritation of the sense-impressions, crowding upon him from all sides, through all six senses.
The Paali word phassa, rendered here by sense-impression, means literally “touch” or “contact.” But it is not a physical impact that is meant here, but a mental contact with the objects of all six senses, including the mind.
Sense-impression, together with attention, is the mind's first and simplest response to the stimulus exercised by the world of material objects and ideas.
According to Buddhist psychology, sense-impression is a constituent factor in each and every state of mind, the lowest and the highest, occurring also in dream and in subliminal states of consciousness.
Sense-impression is a basic nutriment, that is a sustaining condition of life, and what is nourished or conditioned by it are feelings or sensations which are living on that multitude of constantly occurring sense-impressions and assimilating them as pleasant, unpleasant, or indifferent.
This relationship has also a place in the formula of Dependent Origination: “Conditioned by sense-impression is feeling.” As long as there is craving for sense-impressions which arises from unguarded feelings, there will be an unlimited supply of that foodstuff to be digested by feeling.
In an unending stream and in rapid alternation, forms, sounds, smells, flavors, bodily impacts, and ideas impinge upon us as long as we live.
It is the poignant awareness of that constant bombardment by sense-impressions that induced the Buddha to choose for the sense-impressions the simile of a skinned cow whose raw flesh is the target of swarms of insects that cause intensely painful feelings to the animal.
According to the Buddha, any type of feeling is bound to cause suffering and conflict in him who has not yet freed himself from attachment.
Painful feeling is suffering in itself; pleasant feeling brings suffering through its transience and its unsatisfying and unsatisfactory nature; worldly indifferent feeling produces suffering through the dullness and boredom involved in it.
It is sense-impression that is the constant feeder of these feelings.
A monk of old, yearning to see still more vividly the burning and irritating nature of sense-impressions, was moved to exclaim:
Theragatha v.

Though man is amply aware of the host of impressions that cause painful sensations in him, yet he is quite willing to pay that price for his pleasurable experiences, nay, for almost any sort of “experiencing” which he prefers to no sensation at all, unless the pain it causes comes too close to tolerance level.
What is at the psychological root of this situation is man's hunger for ever new experiences.
If that hunger is not temporarily but regularly satisfied, it leaves him empty, starved and helpless.
From that comes man's wish for change and novelty, and his longing for a close contact with life that for its own sake becomes a habituation and makes solitude unbearable for most men.
The nutriment sense-impression feeds the “World as Enjoyment” or the “World as Enjoyment of Experience.” It feeds the craving for existence.
This habitual craving can be broken only if one ceases to identify oneself with the stream of impressions and learns to stand back as an observer wherever one can dispense with active response.
Then feeling that is nourished by sense-impression will cease to turn into craving, and the Dependent Origination of suffering has been severed at this point.
Volitional thought here means chiefly kamma — i.e., rebirth-producing and life-affirming action — and the Buddha has compared it with a man dragged by two others towards and into a pit of glowing embers.
The two dragging forces are man's kammic actions, good and evil.
It is our kammic proclivities, our life-affirming volitions, our plans and ambitions, that drag us irresistibly to that deep pit of sa.msaara with its glowing embers of intense suffering.
Hence it was said that volitional thought, in the sense of kamma, is the nutriment for rebirth on the three planes of existence.
The nutriment volitional thought manifests itself in man's incessant urge to plan and to aspire, to struggle and conquer, to build and to destroy, to do and to undo, to invent and to discover, to form and to transform, to organize and to create.
This urge has sent man into the depth of the ocean and into the vastness of space.
It has made him the most vicious of predatory animals and also enabled him to reach the lofty heights of a genius of creative art and thought.
The restlessness that is at the root of all that lust for activity and of the creative urge, is the constant hunger for all four nutriments of life and for a variety of them on different levels of coarseness and sublimity.
It is volitional thought that has to go foraging to provide man with the other kinds of nutriment he craves for.
It is an incessant task, yielding a conquest of but short duration, and one that again and again ends in defeat.
In volitional thought, the world appears as will and power, and as creative force.
Nourished by this powerful nutriment, the process of world-building and world-destruction will go on until sa.msaara is seen in its true nature as a pit of glowing embers, the bottomless depth of which cannot be filled by our plunging into it again and again in whatever guise we assume in our migrations.
The nutriment consciousness has been compared with the punishment of a criminal who thrice daily is pierced with three hundred spears.
The sharp shafts of conscious awareness, the punitive results of past cravings and delusions, inflicted on us at all times of the day, pierce our protective skin and lay us open to the impact of the world of objects.
This shockingly harsh image of consciousness as a punishment reminds us of one of Franz Kafka's main motifs so often appearing in his work — the hidden, unknown, intangible, and seemingly quite amoral guilt of man inherent in his very existence, for which he is inscrutably punished and which punishment, in the depth of his being, he accepts as just.
The desire for conscious awareness has the same character as that for sense impressions: the craving to be alive, to feel alive in the constant encounter with the world of objects present to consciousness.
But there is still more meaning than that to be derived from the description of consciousness as a nutriment if we consider that it is explained primarily as rebirth consciousness.
This rebirth consciousness, which is a single moment's occurrence, feeds the mind-body process of the present existence; and it is the arising of such moments of rebirth consciousness at the beginning of each successive life that continues the interminable chain of future births, deaths and sufferings.
Growth or proliferation is a characteristic feature of all consciousness.
Each rebirth consciousness, though its direct link is with the life immediately preceding it, has behind it the inexhaustible store-house of the beginningless past, a vast granary of potential seeds of life.
Fed from the dark unfathomable recesses of the past, lurks consciousness, an octopus with not eight but a thousand arms, ready to grasp and take hold wherever it finds a chance, and there to procreate a fresh breed of beings, each with its own set of grasping tentacles.
The writer once visited large subterranean caverns which had long passages and high-roofed temple-like halls with huge stalactites and stalagmites resembling the lofty columns of a cathedral.
For the convenience of the numerous visitors to the caverns, electric light was installed, and where the bulbs were low enough one could see around them a small spread of lichen, the only trace of organic life amidst the barren rocks.
Life springs up wherever it gets the slightest chance through favoring conditions like warmth, moisture, and light.
In the spectator's mind this little harmless proliferation of primitive plant life assumed the menacing features of a beast of prey that, having lurked long under the cover of darkness, at last got the chance for its hungry leap.
Life is always in readiness to spring up, and its most prolific manifestation is consciousness.
Seen from our limited viewpoint, it is consciousness that contributes most to the “expanding universe” of sa.msaara.
Hence the Enlightened One warned: “Do not be an augmenter of worlds!”.
It is by our insatiable and greedy feeding on consciousness and the other nutriments that the world “grows”; and the potentialities for its growth are endless.
Also the end of the world of consciousness cannot be reached by walking.
Seen from that world-wide perspective, consciousness appears as the feeder and procreator of innumerable beings all of whom undergo that daily ordeal of life's piercing spears.
Such a visualization of the reach of consciousness will increasingly lead to revulsion, to turning-away and dispassion, undeceived by the magician's enchanting illusions with which the aggregate consciousness was compared by the Buddha.
Looking back to the Buddha's similes for the four nutriments, we are struck by the fact that all four evoke pictures of extreme suffering and danger.
They depict quite unusual situations of greatest agony.
Considering the fact that the daily process of nutrition, physical and mental, is such a very humdrum function in life, those extraordinary similes are very surprising and even deeply disturbing.
And they obviously were meant to be disquieting.
They are meant to break through the unthinking complacency in which these so common functions of life are performed and viewed: eating, perceiving, willing, and cognizing.
The contemplations on the four nutriments, as presented in these pages, cut at the very roots of the attachment to life.
To pursue these contemplations radically and methodically will be a grave step, advisable only for those who are determined to strive for the final cessation of craving and, therefore, are willing to face all consequences which that path of practice may bring for the direction of their present life and thought.
But apart from such full commitment, also a less radical pursuit but serious and repeated thought given to this teaching of the four nutriments will be beneficial to any earnest follower of the Buddha.
To those who feel it premature for themselves to aim straight at the cessation of craving, the Dhamma has enough teachings that will soothe the wounds received in the battle of life, and will encourage and help a steady progress on the Path.
Though gentle guidance will often be welcome amidst the harshness of life, yet when there is only such gentleness and when, for a while, the winds of fate blow softly and pleasantly, there will be the danger that man settles to a comfortable routine and forgets his precarious situation in this world, which the Buddha so often described.
Hence there is the need that man, and especially a Buddhist, should face now and again such stern teachings as those on the nutriments, which will keep him alert and will strengthen his mental fiber so that he can fearlessly meet the unveiled truth about the world in which he lives.
The contemplation on the four nutriments of life can do this for him.
From that contemplation, man can learn “not to recoil from the real and not to be carried away by the unreal.” He will learn from it that it is suffering which is nourished and pampered by the four nutriments.
He will more deeply understand that
Only suffering arises where anything arises and only suffering ceases where anything ceases.
And another word of the Master will gain fresh significance and increasing weight:
This only do I teach: suffering and its end.
Monks, when a monk becomes entirely dispassionate towards one thing, when his lust for it entirely fades away, when he is entirely liberated from it, when he sees the complete ending of it, then he is one who, after fully comprehending the Goal, makes an end of suffering here and now.
What one thing?
“All beings subsist by nutriment.” When a monk becomes entirely dispassionate towards this one thing, when his lust for it entirely fades away, when he is entirely liberated from it, and when he sees the complete ending of it, then, O monks, he is one who, after fully comprehending the Goal, makes an end of suffering here and now.
At Saavatthii.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; secondly, sense-impression; thirdly, volitional thought; fourthly, consciousness.
“How, O monks, should the nutriment edible food be considered?
Suppose a couple, husband and wife, have set out on a journey through the desert, carrying only limited provisions.
They have with them their only son, dearly beloved by them.
Now, while these two traveled through the desert, their limited stock of provisions ran out and came to an end, but there was still a stretch of desert not yet crossed.
Then the two thought: 'Our small stock of provisions has run out, it has come to an end; and there is still a stretch of desert that is not yet crossed.
Should we not kill our only son, so dearly beloved, prepare dried and roasted meat, and eating our son's flesh, we may cross in that way the remaining part of the desert, lest all three of us perish?'
“And these two, husband and wife, killed their only son, so dearly beloved by them, prepared dried and roasted meat, and, eating their son's flesh, crossed in that way the remaining part of the desert.
And while eating their son's flesh, they were beating their breast and crying: 'Where are you, our only and beloved son?
Where are you, our only and beloved son?'
“What do you think, O monks?
Will they eat the food for the pleasure of it, for enjoyment, for comeliness' sake, for embellishment?
“Certainly not, O Lord.
“Will they not rather eat the food merely for the sake of crossing the desert?
“So it is, O Lord.
“In the same manner, I say, O monks, should edible food be considered.
If, O monks, the nutriment edible food is comprehended, the lust for the five sense-objects is comprehended.
And if lust for the five sense-objects is comprehended, there is no fetter enchained by which a noble disciple might come to this world again.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment sense-impression be considered?
Suppose, O monks, there is a skinned cow that stands close to a wall, then the creatures living in the wall will nibble at the cow; and if the skinned cow stands near a tree, then the creatures living in the tree will nibble at it; if it stands in the water, the creatures living in the water will nibble at it; if it stands in the open air, the creatures living in the air will nibble at it.
Wherever that skinned cow stands, the creatures living there will nibble at it.
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment sense-impression be considered.
If the nutriment sense-impression is comprehended, the three kinds of feeling are thereby comprehended.
And if the three kinds of feeling are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment volitional thought be considered?
Suppose, O monks, there is a pit of glowing embers, filled to cover a man's height, with embers glowing without flames and smoke.
Now a man comes that way, who loves life and does not wish to die, who wishes for happiness and detests suffering.
Then two strong men would seize both his arms and drag him to the pit of glowing embers.
Then, O monks, far away from it would recoil that man's will, far away from it his longing, far away his inclination.
And why?
Because the man knows: 'If I fall into that pit of glowing embers, I shall meet death or deadly pain.'
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment volitional thought be considered.
If the nutriment volitional thought is comprehended, the three kinds of craving are thereby comprehended.
And if the three kinds of craving are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment consciousness be considered?
Suppose, O monks, people have seized a criminal, a robber, and brought him before the king saying: 'This is a criminal, a robber, O Majesty!
Mete out to him the punishment you think fit!' Then the king would tell them: 'Go, and in the morning strike this man with a hundred spears!' And they strike him in the morning with a hundred spears.
At noon the king would ask his men: 'How is that man?' — 'He is still alive, Your Majesty.' — 'Then go and strike him again at noontime with a hundred spears!' So they did, and in the evening the king asks them again: 'How is that man?' — 'He is still alive.' — 'Then go and in the evening strike him again with a hundred spears!' And so they did.
“What do you think, O monks?
Will that man, struck with three hundred spears during a day, suffer pain and torment owing to that?
“Even if he were to be struck only by a single spear, he would suffer pain and torment owing to that.
How much more if he is being struck by three hundred spears!
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment consciousness be considered.
If the nutriment consciousness is comprehended, mind-and-matter are thereby comprehended.
And if mind and body are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
In explaining the “need arisen”, i.e., the particular reason for the Buddha giving this discourse, the commentator says that, at that time, the community of monks received abundant support by way of alms food and other requisites.
Considering this, the Master asked himself:
“Will the bhikkhus be able, or will they not be able, to eat the alms food and still keep to that mindfulness and clear comprehension which lays hold of nutriment?
Will they be detached, and free of desire and greediness?” And he saw that there were some sons of good families, recently ordained, who ate the alms food without due reflection.
Seeing this, he thought: “When I practiced the perfections for four incalculable periods and a hundred thousand kalpas, I did not do so for the sake of the requisites, such as robes, alms food, etc., but for the sake of the highest fruition, of sainthood, did I practice them.
Also these bhikkhus who went forth under me, did not go forth for the sake of these requisites, but for the sake of attaining sainthood did they go forth.
And now they take the unessential for the essential, the worthless for what is worthy!” Such concern arose in him, and he thought further: “If it were possible to declare a fifth grave offense, the monks, partaking of food without due reflection should be made a fifth grave offense.
It is, however, not possible to do so, because food is constantly used by beings.
But I shall speak to them in such a way that they will consider as if it were a fifth grave offense.
I shall place before them a mirror of the Dhamma for their self-control and restraint, so that, contemplating on it again and again, the bhikkhus of times to come will make use of the four requisites only after due reflection.
Nutriment has the meaning of “condition”; because conditions carry their own results.
…Here an objection may be raised: “If the meaning of nutriment is that of condition, why are only four of them mentioned here, though living beings are conditioned also in other ways?” In reply it is said: “Because these four are prominent conditions for the individual life-continuity.
For beings living on material food, “edible food” is an important condition for their physical organism.
As to their mental organism, sense-impression is an important condition of feeling, volitional thought of consciousness, and consciousness of mind-and-body.
Accordingly it was said: “Just as this body subsists on nutriment, subsists because of nutriment, does not subsist without nutriment; in the same way, O monks, are feelings conditioned by sense-impression, is consciousness conditioned by kamma-formations, is mind-and-body conditioned by consciousness.
What is it, now, that is fed by each of the four nutriments?
Edible food feeds and conditions the set of corporeal qualities that have nutritive essence as their eighth factor.
The nutriment sense-impression feeds and conditions the three kinds of feeling.
The nutriment volitional thought feeds and conditions the three states of existence.
The nutriment consciousness feeds and conditions mind-and-body at rebirth.
In which way does this take place?
Edible food, immediately when it is placed in the mouth, produces the eight corporeal qualities.
And each morsel that is chewed and swallowed produces again a set of the same eight qualities.
Thus it is that edible food feeds and conditions the eight corporeal qualities that have nutritive essence as their eighth factor.
The nutriment sense-impression that is liable to be felt as pleasant, immediately on its arising feeds and conditions a pleasant feeling.
And it is similar with sense-impressions liable to be felt as unpleasant or neutral.
So does the nutriment sense-impression in all its types feed and condition the three kinds of feeling.
The nutriment volitional thought when occurring as kamma leading to rebirth on the sensuous plane, feeds and conditions sensuous existence.
When occurring as kamma leading to rebirth on the fine-material or immaterial plane, it feeds and conditions the corresponding existence.
So does the nutriment volitional thought in all cases feed and condition the three states of existence.
The nutriment consciousness, at the moment of rebirth, feeds and conditions the three other mental groups, conjoined with it; and by way of conascence-condition, etc., it feeds and conditions the thirty corporeal processes that arise in a triple continuity.
So does the nutriment consciousness feed and condition mind-and-body at rebirth.
When saying that “volitional thought feeds and conditions the three states of existence,” only karmically wholesome and unwholesome volition, subject to the taints is spoken of; and when saying that “consciousness feeds and conditions mind-and-body at rebirth,” only rebirth-consciousness is meant.
But in general application these four are called “nutriments” because they carry or feed the mental processes associated with these nutriments, and the corporeal processes produced by them.
Among these four nutriments, edible food fulfills the function of nourishing, by way of sustaining; sense-impression, by touching; volitional thought, by accumulating; consciousness, by cognizing.
In which way?
The nutriment edible food sustaining the body by fortifying it, serves for the stability of beings.
Though this body is produced by kamma, it is through being sustained by edible food that it lasts for years or years, until the end of a being's normal life span.
This may be compared, firstly, to a child that, though brought forth by the mother, is nourished by the wet-nurse at the breast, and is nurtured in other ways; and reared thus it lives long.
Secondly it is like a house propped up by supports.
As it was said: “Just as a house that is about to fall, will not fall when supported by timber, so, O great king, is this body sustained by nutriment and persists because of nutriment”.
Similarly it is by sustaining that the nutriment edible food fulfills its function of nourishing.
In fulfilling that function, it is a condition to two kinds of corporeal continuity: that produced by nutriment and that karmically acquired.
For kamma-born corporeal processes, edible food is a condition by way of being their preserver; and for those produced by nutriment, by way of being their originator.
The nutriment sense-impression, by establishing contact with an object that is the basis of pleasure, etc., makes for the sustenance of beings by causing the occurrence of pleasant feelings, etc.
The nutriment volitional thought, in accumulating wholesome and unwholesome kamma makes for the sustenance of beings by generating the root of existence.
The nutriment consciousness, in its cognizing function, serves the sustenance of beings by causing the occurrence of mind-and-body.
In these four nutriments, thus fulfilling their respective functions of sustaining, etc., there are four kinds of danger which should be known.
In the nutriment edible food, desire is the danger; in sense-impression, approaching is the danger; in volitional thought, accumulation is a danger; in consciousness, manifestation is the danger.
For what reasons are they danger?
Having desire for the nutriment edible food, people, taking up various crafts for the sake of food, undergo many hardships, like enduring cold, etc.
Others, having become monks in this dispensation, seeking food in a way wrong for a monk, engage themselves in a physician's work, etc., and thereby incur blame in this very life; and hereafter they become hungry monk-ghosts as described in the Lakkha.na-sa.myutta: “with his robe burning and ablaze.” For these reasons, it should be understood that desire is an element of danger in edible food.
Those who are fond of sense-impressions, may, in their approach to sense-impression, offend against others' property which is under their guard and protection, or they may offend against the wives of others, etc.
Then the owners of that property will seize the offenders and the goods, cut those thieves into pieces and throw them on the rubbish heap; or the owners will hand them over to the king who will punish them, inflicting various tortures on them.
And after the break-up of the body, a bad destiny awaits the offenders.
Thus all kinds of danger occur here and hereafter, which are rooted in fondness for sense impressions.
For this reason, approach is the danger in sense-impression.
All danger that occurs in the three states of existence, is rooted in the accumulation of wholesome and unwholesome kamma.
Hence the danger in the nutriment volitional thought is the accumulation of kamma.
In whatever place rebirth-consciousness becomes manifest, there it arises along with the mind-and-body existing at the moment of rebirth.
And with the arising of that mind-and-body, all dangers have arisen because they have their roots in it.
It is for this reason that manifestation is the danger in the nutriment consciousness.
Thus it should be understood.
Based on the bare factual account, the meaning of the simile may in brief be explained as follows:
Once, it seems, a couple, husband and wife, together with their little son, set out for a journey through a desert of yojanas extent, taking with them only few provisions.
Having traversed yojanas, their provisions came to an end.
Feeble from hunger and thirst, they sat down in a sparse patch of shade, and the man spoke to his wife: “My dear, for yojanas from here, in any direction, there is not a single village or hamlet.
Therefore I cannot do now what is a man's work, like tilling a field or raising cattle,.
Hence, you had better kill me, eat half of the flesh, and taking the other half with you as provision, you can safely cross the desert, together with our child.” But she said: “My lord, I too cannot do now a wife's duty towards you, like weaving and other work.
So please kill me, eat half of the flesh, and with the other half as provision you can safely get through the desert, together with our boy.” He replied: “My dear, if the mother dies, it means death of two.
This delicate little boy cannot live without his mother.
But if we two remain alive, we may get another child.
Hence let us kill the child, take the flesh and thus escape from the desert.” Thereupon the wife told the child: “Go, my dear, to your father!” And the child went.
But the father said: “To bring up this child, I took up on me the great suffering and fatigue of a farmer's work.
I cannot kill the child.
You may kill it!” And he sent it back to the mother.
But she said: “Longing for a son I went through much hardship by offering prayers and undertaking severe vows; to say nothing about the pains I suffered when bearing it in my womb.
I cannot kill my son.” And she told the child: “Go to your father, dear!” While thus being sent to and fro, the feeble child died.
Seeing it dead, the parents took the flesh, ate of it and continued their trek through the desert.
This food of their son's flesh, being loathsome for nine reasons, was not eaten by them for pleasure and enjoyment, nor for comeliness' sake and for the body's embellishment, but solely to enable them to cross the desert.
What are the nine reasons of its loathsomeness?
Its being flesh of the same — i.e., human — species; the flesh of a relative, their own son; the flesh of a beloved son; its being tender, raw, tasteless, unsalted, unsmoked.
When partaking of their son's flesh, so loathsome for those nine reasons, they did not eat it with gusto and full of greed for it, but ate it in a detached way, without lust and desire.
When eating they did not leave aside what was attached to bone, sinew and skin, selecting only the choice, substantial pieces; but they ate just what came to their hands.
They did not take their fill, gorging themselves, but they took only very little of it, just sufficient to sustain them for a day.
They did not grudge or envy each other the food, but free from the stain of selfishness they ate it with a pure heart.
They did not eat it with the illusion that it was deer's meat or peacock's meat, but they were well aware that it was the flesh of their beloved son.
They did not eat it with longing, “Oh, may we again eat such flesh of our son!”; but they ate it without any such longing.
They did not hoard a portion of it, thinking: “That much we shall eat in the desert, and the remainder we shall eat when we are out of the desert, adding to it salt and spices.” But having reached the end of the desert and fearing that the town people would see it, they would have buried any remainder in the ground or burned it.
They did not harbor any such pride and conceit as: “There is none like us who has the chance of eating such meat!”; but they rather ate it with quite the opposite of such pride.
They did not eat it with disdain, “Oh that saltless, tasteless and evil-smelling thing!”; but they ate it without such disdain.
They did not quarrel with each other, “This is your share, that is my share!
It is your son!
It is my son!”; but they ate in concord and harmony.
Now, the Master, considering in such food its aspect of being taken without greed and attachment, wanted also the community of monks to appreciate that aspect, and said: “What do you think, monks, will they eat the food for the pleasure of it…?
“In the same manner,” that is, similar to the flesh of a beloved son, should edible food be considered by way of its nine loathsome aspects.
What nine?
A monk takes edible food reflecting on the repulsiveness of having to go out, of having to search and of the partaking of it; the repulsiveness of the bodily secretion, of the food's bodily receptacle, of its digested and undigested condition, of smearing and evacuation.
These nine are explained in detail in The Path of Purification, in the section on “The Perception of the Repulsiveness in Nutriment.
Hence food should be taken, after applying the Simile of the Son's Flesh by way of those nine reasons of loathsomeness.
Here follows a lengthy section in which the statements about the couple not eating their son's flesh with gusto and greed, etc., are applied to a monk's attitude towards his alms-food.
This is treated in full up to the last item on “not quarreling.
Comprehension.
“If the nutriment edible food is comprehended…” — i.e., if comprehended by the three kinds of comprehension: comprehension as the known, as investigating, and abandoning.
In which way?
Herein a monk understands: What is called the “nutriment edible food” is the material group with nutritive essence as the eighth factor, with its material basis.
This material octad, where does it impinge?
At the tongue-sensitivity.
On what is the tongue-sensitivity based?
On the four great primaries of matter.
Hence, the material octad with nutritive essence as its eighth factor, tongue-sensitivity, and the conditions of it, the four great primaries — these things constitute the aggregate of corporeality.
The group of mental factors having contact as the fifth factor, which takes it up, these are the four mental aggregates.
All these five aggregates are just “mind-and-matter”.
Thus he understands.
Having defined these phenomena according to their individual functions and characteristics, he searches for their conditionality and finds it in the dependent origination, in its ascending and descending order.
By such correct understanding of mind-and-matter with its conditions, in the instance of the nutriment edible food, the latter has in so far been comprehended “as known”.
To that very mind-and-matter with its conditions, he now applies the three signata — impermanence, suffering and not-self — and discerns it by way of the seven contemplations.
Hereby the nutriment edible food has been comprehended by way of the investigating comprehension consisting in the full penetration of the three signata and the knowledge of discernment.
By discarding attachment and desire in regard to that very mind-and-matter, and comprehending it through the attainment of the path of non-returning, the nutriment edible food has been comprehended by comprehension as abandoning.
For explaining the same statement in the discourse, that is, “If the nutriment edible food is comprehended, the lust for the five sense-objects is thereby comprehended,” there is another set of three kinds of comprehension, namely: single comprehension, total comprehension and root-comprehension.
What is single comprehension?
If a monk fully understands the single craving for taste occurring at the sense-door of the tongue, thereby lust for the five sense-objects is comprehended.
Why?
Because that craving arises at the five sense doors.
This very craving when arising at the eye door, is called “lust for visual objects”; when arising at the door of the ear, etc., it is called “lust for sounds,” etc.
It is as with a robber who does his misdeeds on five roads; if he is caught on one of these roads and subsequently beheaded, then all five roads will be safe.
Similarly, if the craving for taste is comprehended at the tongue sense-door, the entire lust for the five sense-objects is thereby comprehended.
This is the single comprehension.
What is total comprehension?
In a single food morsel that has been placed into the monk's almsbowl, all fivefold sense-desire obtains.
How?
By first looking at the food's clean, bright appearance, there is lust for visual objects.
When hot ghee is poured over it, there is a sizzling sound; or when chewing hard food, there is also a sound; and when enjoying such sounds, there is lust for sounds.
When enjoying the food's smell, there is lust for odors.
Through its pleasant taste there is lust for taste objects.
When enjoying the softness of the food, there is lust for touch objects.
When in such a way the food is considered with mindfulness and clear comprehension, and is being eaten without greed and attachment, then there is a total comprehension of it.
What is root comprehension?
The nutriment edible food is the root or basis of the lust for the five sense-objects.
Why?
Because when the former exists, the latter arises.
It is told that during the famine at the time of the brahman Tissa's rebellion, for twelve years husband and wife did not even look at each other with sensuous thoughts.
And why?
Because of the scarcity of food.
But when the famine had subsided, the whole isle of Ceylon was like a single large festival of children's birth celebrations.
If nutriment is thus comprehended as being the root, also the lust for the five sense-objects is hereby comprehended.
This is root comprehension.
Just as the skinned cow, exposed to the danger of being attacked by the creatures living in various places, has no wish for honor and attention paid to her, nor for bodily care given to her by cleaning her back and massaging — similarly the monk, considering that he is exposed to the danger coming from those devouring creatures, the mental defilements, that are rooted in the nutriment sense-impression, has no desire for the sense-impressions of the three planes of existence.
Here, too, there are three comprehensions:
In this case, sense-impression represents the formation aggregate; the feeling conjoined with it is the feeling aggregate; perception is the perception aggregate; consciousness is the consciousness aggregate; the organ base and its objects are the corporeality aggregate.
Such correct understanding of mind-and-matter with its condition is “comprehension as the known.
The application to it of the three signata and the examining of it as impermanent, etc., by way of the seven contemplations — this is “comprehension as investigating.
The path of sainthood that discards attachment and desire for that very mind-and-body — this is “comprehension as abandoning.
If the nutriment sense-impression is thus comprehended in a threefold way, the three kinds of feeling are likewise comprehended thereby, because they have their root in sense-impression and are conjoined with it.
In such a way, the exposition of the nutriment sense-impression has been led up to the attainment of sainthood.
The application of the simile of the pit of glowing embers is as follows:
The pit of glowing embers is the round of existence in its three spheres.
The man desirous to live, is a foolish worldling attaching himself to the round of existence.
The two strong men are the wholesome and unwholesome kamma.
Their dragging the man to the pit is the accumulation of kamma, because if kamma is accumulated it drags into rebirth.
The pain inflicted by the pit of embers is the sa.msaaric suffering inflicted by kamma.
The connection with the threefold comprehension is the same as in the case of sense-impression.
”…If the nutriment volitional thought is comprehended, the three kinds of craving are thereby comprehended,” i.e., the sensual craving, the craving for existence and the craving for self-annihilation.
Why is this so?
Because volitional thought has its root in craving, and if the cause is not abandoned, the result cannot be abandoned.
In such a way, the exposition of the nutriment volitional thought has been led up to the attainment of sainthood.
In the application of the simile of the criminal pierced by spears, the king should be understood as kamma.
The criminal is the foolish worldling attaching himself to the round of existence.
The spears are the rebirth-consciousness.
The order of the king to pierce the criminal with spears, corresponds to the King of Kamma seizing the foolish worldling attached to sa.msaara, and flinging him into rebirth.
Though, herein, the spears have been compared to rebirth consciousness, there is no pain in the spears themselves, but the pain that originates from the wound caused by the spears' piercing.
Similarly, there is no suffering in rebirth itself; but there is kamma-resultant suffering arising during the life-process in a given rebirth, as corresponding to the painful wound caused by the spears.
Here, too, the threefold comprehension should be understood as in the case of the nutriment sense-impression.
”…Mind-and-body are thereby comprehended”: mind-and-body as conditioned by consciousness.
If consciousness is comprehended, also mind-and-body are comprehended, being rooted in consciousness and arising together with it.
In such a way, also the exposition of the nutriment consciousness has been led up to the attainment of sainthood.
At Saavatthii.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; secondly, sense-impression; thirdly, volitional thought; fourthly, consciousness.
“Of these four nutriments, O monks, what is their source, what is their origin, from what are they born, what gives them existence?
“These four nutriments, O monks, have craving as their cause, have craving as their origin, are born of craving, and craving gives them existence.
“And this craving, O monks, what is its source, what its origin, from what is it born, what gives it existence?
Craving has feeling as its source and origin, it is born of feeling, and feeling gives existence to it.
“And this feeling, O monks, what is its source and origin, from what is it born and what gives existence to it?
Feeling has sense-impression as its source and origin…
“And this sense-impression, O monks, what is its source…?
sense-impression has the six sense-bases as its source and origin…
“And these six sense-bases, O monks, what is their source…?
The six sense-bases have mind-and-body as their source and origin…
“And this mind-and-body, O monks, what is its source…?
Mind-and-body has consciousness as its source and origin…
“And this consciousness, O monks, what is its source…?
Consciousness has kamma-formations as its source and origin…
“And these kamma-formations, O monks, what is their source and origin, from what are they born, what gives existence to them?
Kamma-formations have ignorance as their source and origin, they are born of ignorance and ignorance gives existence to them.
“Thus, O monks, through ignorance conditioned are kamma-formations; through the kamma-formations conditioned is consciousness; through consciousness conditioned is mind-and-body; through mind-and-body conditioned are the six sense-bases; through the six sense-bases conditioned is sense-impression; through sense-impression conditioned is feeling, through feeling conditioned is craving; through craving conditioned is clinging; through clinging conditioned is becoming; through becoming conditioned is birth; through birth conditioned are decay and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
Thus arises this whole mass of suffering.
In this discourse, the origin of the four nutriments is traced to craving, and the conditioned arising is pursued further back, in terms of the dependent origination.
But while, in the usual formula of the dependent origination, it is clinging that is conditioned by craving, here, in this text, nutriment takes the place of clinging.
So it also does in the Mahaa-Ta.nhaasankhaya Sutta, while the Cuula-Sihanaada Sutta has here the fourfold division of clinging, with, otherwise, the same wording as our present text.
Both Paali words, aahaara and upaadaana have originally the same meaning of “taking up,” “seizing,” and both are also used to signify the fuel of a fire or a lamp.
Here the statement in the discourse that the four nutriments have craving as their source, should be understood to mean that cravings in a former life are the source of the nutriments; or, in other words, of the individual, from rebirth onwards.
How?
At the moment of rebirth, there is present “nutritive essence” that has originated within the corporeality arisen by way of seven units of corporeal continua, in the case of beings with complete sense faculties; or in the case of other beings, with the appropriate reduction of the continua.
This “nutritive essence” constitutes the karmically acquired nutriment “edible food” that has craving as its source.
The sense-impression and volition associated with the rebirth-consciousness, as well as that consciousness itself — these are the karmically acquired nutriments sense-impression, volitional thought, and consciousness which have craving as their source.
This so far refers to the nutriments arising at rebirth and having as their source the craving in a former life.
The same applies also to the nutriments arising later, at the first moment of bhavanga, and so forth.
But because the Exalted One not only knows the source of the nutriments which is craving, but also the latter's source which is feeling, and so forth; therefore the discourse continues “And this craving, O monks, what is its source…?” showing by this method the sa.msaaric cycle and the stopping of that cycle.
Here, however, the exposition is given under the aspect of the past, and accordingly the cycle of kamma and kamma result has been described in terms of past.
How?
This individual is conceived the four nutriments.
, craving is the generative kamma for this individual.
“Feeling, sense-impression, sixfold sense-base, mind-and-body, and consciousness” are the factors present in the individual that performs that kamma; they have been mentioned here for indicating.
Thus the individual has been indicated here in two places; and in two places the generative kamma of that has been indicated,.
In such a way, two things have been shown here in brief, kamma and kamma result; and in doing so, the exposition has been given under the aspect of the past, and accordingly the sa.msaaric cycle has been described here in terms of past.
But one should not think that this exposition of the dependent origination is incomplete because it does not extend to its future part.
it is implied by indicating the method, and therefore it should be understood that this exposition is quite complete.
This is a simile for it: Suppose a clear-sighted man sees a crocodile lying on the water's surface.
At the foremost part of it he sees the throat, further on the back and at the end the root of the tail.
But when looking at the belly, he does not see the rest of the tail nor the four legs which are submerged in the water.
Yet, for that reason, he does not think that the crocodile is incomplete; but by methodical inference he takes it to be complete.
The application of this simile is as follows.
The crocodile lying on the surface of the water is like the sa.msaaric cycle on its three levels.
The clear-sighted man standing on the shore, is the meditator.
The time when the man sees the crocodile on the surface of the water, corresponds to the time when the meditator understands this individual existence by way of the nutriments.
Seeing the throat as the foremost part is like seeing craving as the generative force for this individual.
Seeing the crocodile's back, is like the seeing of feeling, etc., in that existence where the kamma called craving has been performed.
Seeing the root of the tail is like seeing ignorance and kamma-formations being the generative factors of this individual's existence.
Looking at the belly below, and, though not seeing the end of the tail and the legs, yet not assuming that the crocodile is incomplete, but taking it as complete, by methodical inference — this is like accepting the exposition to be complete and not believing it to be incomplete, if in a canonical passage this or that section of the cycle of conditions is not mentioned.
There is here one link between nutriment and craving; one link between craving and feeling; and one link between consciousness and kamma-formations.
Thus the cycle has been shown in three links and four sections.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments….
After these words, the venerable Mo.liya-Phagguna addressed the Exalted One as follows:
“Who, O Lord, consumes the nutriment consciousness?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he consumes.' If I had said so, then the question 'Who consumes?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be: 'For what is the nutriment consciousness?' And to that the correct reply is: 'The nutriment consciousness is a condition for the future arising of a renewed existence; when that has come into being, there is the sixfold sense-base; and conditioned by the sixfold sense-base is sense-impression.' “Who, O Lord, has a sense-impression?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he has a sense-impression.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who has a sense-impression?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of sense-impression?' And to that the correct reply is: 'The sixfold sense-base is a condition of sense-impression, and sense-impression is the condition of feeling.' “Who, O Lord, feels?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he feels.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who feels?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of feeling?' And to that the correct reply is: 'sense-impression is the condition of feeling; and feeling is the condition of craving.' “Who, O Lord, craves?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he craves.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who craves?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of craving?' And to that the correct reply is: 'Feeling is the condition of craving, and craving is the condition of clinging.' “Who, O Lord, clings?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One, “I do not say that 'he clings.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who clings?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of clinging?' And to that the correct reply is: 'Craving is the condition of clinging; and clinging is the condition of the process of becoming.' Such is the origin of this entire mass of suffering.
“Through the complete fading away and cessation of even these six bases of sense-impression, sense-impression ceases; through the cessation of sense-impression, feeling ceases; through the cessation of feeling, craving ceases; through the cessation of craving, clinging ceases; through the cessation of clinging, the process of becoming ceases; through the cessation of the process of becoming, birth ceases; through the cessation of birth, old age, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering.
At Saavatthii.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; sense-impression is the second; volitional thought, the third; and consciousness, the fourth.
“If, O monks, there is lust for the nutriment edible food, if there is pleasure in it and craving for it, then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there will be occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“If, O monks, there is lust for the nutriment sense-impression… volitional thought… consciousness, if there is pleasure in it and craving for it, then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there will be occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“Suppose there is a dyer or a painter.
Having some dye or lac, turmeric, indigo or crimson, he would depict, on a well-smoothed wooden tablet, on a wall or a piece of cloth, the figure of a woman or a man, with all the major and minor features.
Similarly, O monks, if there is lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness… then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there is occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“But if, O monks, there is no lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness, if there is no pleasure in them and no craving for them, then consciousness does not take a hold therein and does not grow.
Where consciousness does not take a hold nor grow, there will be no occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is no occurrence of mind-and-body, there is no growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is no growth of kamma-formations, there is no future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is no future arising of renewed existence, there is no future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is free of sorrow, of anguish and despair.
“Suppose, O monks, there is a gabled house or a gabled hall, with windows at the northern, southern, and eastern sides.
Now, when at sunrise, a ray of the sun enters through a window, where would it find hold?” — “On the western wall, O Lord.” — “But if there were no western wall, O monks, where would it find a hold?” — “On the earth, O Lord.” — “And if there were no earth, where would it find a hold?” — “On the water, O Lord.” — “And if there were no water, where would it find a hold?” — “It would not find any hold whatsoever, O Lord.
“Similarly, O monks, if there is no lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness, if there is no pleasure in them and no craving for them, then consciousness does not take hold therein and does not grow.
Where consciousness does not take a hold nor grow, there will be no occurrence of mind-and-body, there is no growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is no growth of kamma-formations there is no future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is no future arising of renewed existence, there is no future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is free of sorrow of anguish and despair.
“'This has come to be' — do you see that, Saariputta?
“'This has come to be' — that, O Lord, one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has come to be,' one is on the way towards revulsion from what has come to be, towards dispassion and cessation.
“'Produced by such nutriment' — that one sees, with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen, with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has been produced by such nutriment,' one is on the way towards revulsion from its production by nutriment, towards dispassion and cessation.
“'By the cessation of nutriment, that what has come to be is bound to cease' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen, with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'By the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is bound to cease,' one is on the way towards revulsion from what is liable to cease, towards dispassion and cessation.
Thus, O Lord, is one in higher training.
“And how, O Lord, is one a comprehender of Dhamma?
'This has come to be' — that, O Lord, one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has come to be,' then, through revulsion from what has come to be, through dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
“'Produced by such nutriment' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has been produced by such nutriment,' then, through revulsion from its production by nutriment, through dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
“'By the cessation of nutriment, that what has come to be is bound to cease' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'by the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is bound to cease,' then, through revulsion from what is liable to cease, from dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
Thus, O Lord, is one a comprehender of Dhamma… “Well spoken, Saariputta, well spoken,” said the Exalted One.
…Then the monks put another question to the venerable Saariputta: “Friend, could there be another way in which a noble disciple can be said to be one of Right Understanding, whose view is upright, who is possessed of steadfast confidence in the Dhamma, who has attained to this good teaching?
“There could be, friends.
If, friends, a noble disciple knows nutriment, knows the origin of nutriment, knows the ceasing of nutriment, and knows the way leading to the ceasing of nutriment, then he is, in so far, one of Right Understanding, whose view is upright, who is possessed of steadfast confidence in the Dhamma, who has attained to this good teaching.
“And what is nutriment?
There are four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
Edible food, coarse and fine; sense-impression is the second; volitional thought, the third; and consciousness, the fourth.
“Through the origin of craving, there is origin of nutriment.
Through the ceasing of craving, there is ceasing of nutriment.
The way leading to the ceasing of nutriment is the Noble Eightfold Path, namely, right understanding, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness and right concentration.
“Friends, if a noble disciple thus knows nutriment, knows the origin of nutriment, the ceasing of nutriment and the way leading to the ceasing of nutriment, he entirely abandons the inner tendency to lust, he casts off the inner tendency to ill-will, eliminates the inner tendency to the opinion-and-conceit of 'I am,' he discards ignorance, produces knowledge, and becomes an ender of suffering here and now.
“In this discourse, there is one link between consciousness and mind-and-body; one link between feeling and craving, and one link between the process of becoming and birth.
Sub-Comy: “Since, in the words of the discourse, 'The nutriment consciousness is a condition for the future arising of a renewed existence,' as being a condition in a former existence for a future existence, and as being a principal cause, therefore the Commentary says that 'there is a link between consciousness and mind-and-body.' Hence it should be understood that by the term consciousness, also the 'kamma-forming consciousness' is implied”.
“Here, taking nutriment together with consciousness, there is one link between nutriment and mind-and-body.
Including mind-and-body in the section of the resultants there is one link between mind-and-body and kamma-formations.
Finally, there is one link between kamma-formations and the future existence.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
I have written this book, The Divine Mantra, as a means of drawing to purity those who practice the Dhamma, because the chant given here brings benefits to those who memorize and recite it, inasmuch as it deals directly with matters that exist in each of us.
Normally, once we are born, we all dwell in the six elements.
These elements are brought together by our own actions, both good and evil.
This being the case, these elements can give a great deal of trouble to those who dwell in them, like a child who can be a constant nuisance to its parents.
Repeating this chant, then, is like nourishing and training a child to be healthy and mature; when the child is healthy and mature, its parents can rest and relax.
Repeating this chant is like feeding a child and lulling it to sleep with a beautiful song: the Buddhaguna, the recitation of the Buddha's virtues.
The power of the Buddhaguna can exert influence on the elements in each individual, purifying them and investing them with power, just as all material elements exert gravitational pull on one another every second.
Or you might make a comparison with an electric wire: This chant is like an electric current, extending to wherever you direct it.
It can even improve the environment, because it also includes the chant of the Kapila hermit, whose story runs as follows:
There was once a hermit who repeated this chant in a teak forest in India.
As a result, the forest became a paradise.
The trees took turns producing flowers and fruit throughout the year.
The waters were crystal clean.
Any diseased animal that happened to pass into the forest and drink the water would be completely cured of its illness.
The grasses and vines were always fresh and green.
Fierce animals that normally attacked and ate one another would, when entering the forest, live together in peace, as friends.
Life was joyous for animals in this forest.
The smell of dead animals never appeared because whenever an animal was about to die, it would have to go and die elsewhere.
This forest is where the Buddha's ancestors, the Sakyan clan, later established their capital, Kapilavatthu, which still stands today within the borders of Nepal.
All of this was due to the sacred power of the chant repeated by the Kapila hermit.
And this is how he did it: First, he faced the east and repeated the chant day and night for seven days; the second week, he faced north; the third week, south; and the fourth week, west.
The fifth week, he looked down toward the earth; the sixth week, he raised his hands and lifted his face to the sky, made his heart clear, and focused on the stars as the object of his meditation.
The seventh week, he practiced breath meditation, keeping his breath in mind and letting it spread out in every direction through the power of a mind infused with the four Sublime Attitudes: good will, compassion, appreciation, and equanimity.
Thus the chant was named the Divine Mantra.
When all of this was related to me while I was in India, I couldn't help thinking of the Buddha, who was pure by virtue of the peerless quality of his heart to the point where he was able to invest the elements in his body with power, making them more pure than any other elements in the world.
His relics, for example, have appeared to those devoted to him and, I have heard, come and go on their own, which is very strange indeed.
All of these things are accomplished through the power of a pure heart.
When the heart is pure, the elements also become pure as a result.
When these elements exist in the world, they can have a refreshing influence on the environment — because all elements are interrelated.
If we Buddhists set our minds on training ourselves in this direction, we can be a powerful influence to the good in proportion to our numbers.
But if we don't train ourselves and instead run about filling ourselves with evil, our hearts are bound to become hot and disturbed.
The flames in our hearts are bound to set the elements in our bodies on fire, and the heat from these inner fires is certain to spread in all directions throughout the world.
As this heat gathers and becomes greater, it will raise temperatures in the atmosphere around the world.
The heat from the sun will become fiercer.
Weather will become abnormal.
The seasons, for example, will deviate from their normal course.
And when this happens, human life will become more and more of a hardship.
The ultimate stage of this evil will be the destruction of the world by the fires at the end of the aeon, which will consume the earth.
All this from our own thoughtlessness, letting nature by and large go ahead and follow this course — which shows that we're not very rational, because everything has a reason, everything comes from a cause.
The world we live in has the heart as its cause.
If the heart is good, the world is sure to be good.
If the heart is corrupt, the world is sure to be corrupt.
Thus, in this book I have written down the way to train the heart so as to lead to our happiness and well-being in the coming future.
To pay respect to, and ask forgiveness of, the Buddha's relics, relics of the Noble Disciples, Buddha images, stupas, the Bodhi tree — all of which are objects that all Buddhists should respect, both inwardly and outwardly:
Arahaṃ sammā-sambuddho bhagavā.
The Blessed One is Worthy & Rightly Self-awakened.
Buddhaṃ bhagavantaṃ abhivādemi.
I bow down before the Awakened, Blessed One.
Svākkhāto bhagavatā dhammo.
The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One.
Dhammaṃ namassāmi.
I pay homage to the Dhamma.
Supaṭipanno bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho.
The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples has practiced well.
Saṅghaṃ namāmi.
I pay respect to the Sangha.
Namo tassa bhagavato arahato sammā-sambuddhassa.

Homage to the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One.
Ukāsa, dvāra-tayena kataṃ, sabbaṃ apāradhaṃ khamatu no bhante.
We ask your leave.
We ask you to forgive us for whatever wrong we have done with the three doors.
Vandāmi bhante cetiyaṃ, sabbaṃ sabbattha ṭhāne, supatiṭṭhitaṃ sārīraṅka-dhātuṃ, mahā-bodhiṃ buddha-rūpaṃ, sakkāratthaṃ.
I revere every stupa established in every place, every Relic of the Buddha's body, every Great Bodhi tree, every Buddha image that is an object of veneration.
Ahaṃ vandāmi dhātuyo, ahaṃ vandāmi sabbaso, iccetaṃ ratana-tayaṃ, ahaṃ vandāmi sabbadā.
I revere the relics.
I revere them everywhere.
I always revere the Triple Gem.
Buddha-pūjā mahā-tejavanto, Dhamma-pūjā mahappañño, Saṅgha-pūjā mahā-bhogāvaho.
Homage to the Buddha brings great glory.
Homage to the Dhamma, great discernment.
Homage to the Saṅgha, great wealth.
Buddhaṃ Dhammaṃ Saṅghaṃ, jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
I go to the Buddha, Dhamma, & Saṅgha as my life & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Parisuddho ahaṃ bhante, parisuddhoti maṃ, Buddho Dhammo Saṅgho dhāretu.
I am morally pure.
May the Buddha, Dhamma, & Saṅgha recognize me as morally pure.
Sabbe sattā sadā hontu, averā sukha-jīvino.
May all living beings always live happily, free from enmity.
Kataṃ puñña-phalaṃ mayhaṃ, sabbe bhāgī bhavantu te.
May all share in the blessings springing from the good I have done.
Namo tassa bhagavato arahato sammā-sambuddhassa.

Homage to the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One.
Buddhaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
I go to the Buddha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Dhammaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
I go to the Dhamma as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Saṅghaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
I go to the Sangha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Dutiyampi buddhaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A second time, I go to the Buddha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Dutiyampi dhammaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A second time, I go to the Dhamma as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Dutiyampi saṅghaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A second time, I go to the Sangha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Tatiyampi buddhaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A third time, I go to the Buddha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Tatiyampi dhammaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A third time, I go to the Dhamma as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Tatiyampi saṅghaṃ āyu-vaḍḍhanaṃ jīvitaṃ yāva-nibbānaṃ saraṇaṃ gacchāmi.
A third time, I go to the Sangha as my life, vitality, & refuge until reaching Liberation.
Vāyo ca buddha-guṇaṃ arahaṃ buddho itipi so bhagavā namāmi'haṃ.
Wind has the virtue of the Buddha.
The Awakened One is worthy & so he is Blessed: I pay him homage.
Arahaṃ sammā-sambuddho,
Worthy is the Rightly Self-awakened One,
Vijjā-caraṇa-sampanno sugato lokavidū,
consummate in knowledge & conduct, one who has gone the good way, knower of the cosmos,
Anuttaro purisa-damma-sārathi satthā deva-manussānaṃ buddho bhagavāti.
unexcelled trainer of those who can be taught, teacher of human & divine beings; awakened; blessed.
Vāyo ca dhammetaṃ arahaṃ buddho itipi so bhagavā namāmi'haṃ.
Wind is that quality.
The Awakened One is worthy & so he is Blessed: I pay him homage.
Svākkhāto bhagavatā dhammo,
The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One,
Sandiṭṭhiko akāliko ehipassiko,
to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting all to come & see,
Opanayiko paccattaṃ veditabbo viññūhīti.
pertinent, to be seen by the wise for themselves.
Vāyo ca saṅghānaṃ arahaṃ buddho itipi so bhagavā namāmi'haṃ.
Wind is given over to the Sanghas.
The Awakened One is worthy & so he is Blessed: I pay him homage.
Supaṭipanno bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho,
The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well,
Uju-paṭipanno bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho,
the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced straightforwardly,
Ñāya-paṭipanno bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho,
the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced methodically,
Sāmīci-paṭipanno bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho,
the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced masterfully,
Yadidaṃ cattāri purisa-yugāni aṭṭha purisa-puggalā:
i.e., the four pairs — the eight types — of Noble Ones:
Esa bhagavato sāvaka-saṅgho —
That is the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples —
Āhuneyyo pāhuneyyo dakkhiṇeyyo añjali-karaṇīyo,
worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect,
Anuttaraṃ puññakkhettaṃ lokassāti.
the incomparable field of merit for the world.
Dhātu-parisuddhānubhāvena, sabba-dukkhā sabba-bhayā sabba-rogā vimuccanti.
Through the power of the purity of the element, they are released from all pain, all danger, all disease.
Iti uddham-adho tiriyaṃ sabbadhi sabbattatāya sabbāvantaṃ lokaṃ, mettā karuṇā muditā upekkhā sahagatena cetasā, catuddisaṃ pharitvā viharati,
When one dwells spreading an awareness imbued with good will, compassion, appreciation, & equanimity in this way to the four directions, above, below, around, in every way throughout the entire cosmos,
Sukhaṃ supati sukhaṃ paṭibujjhati, na pāpakaṃ supinaṃ passati,
one sleeps with ease, wakes with ease, dreams no evil dreams.
Manussānaṃ piyo hoti, amanussānaṃ piyo hoti, devatā rakkhanti,
Nāssa aggi vā visaṃ vā satthaṃ vā kamati,
One is dear to human beings, dear to non-human beings, guarded by divine beings, and untouched by fire, poison, or weapons.
Tuvaṭaṃ cittaṃ samādhiyati, mukha-vaṇṇo vippasīdati,
One's mind is quickly concentrated & one's complexion bright.
Asammuḷho kālaṃ karoti,
Uttariṃ appaṭivijjhanto brahma-lokūpago hoti.
One dies unconfused and — if penetrating no higher — is reborn in the Brahma worlds.
Iti uddham-adho tiriyaṃ averaṃ averā sukha-jīvino.
Thus feeling no enmity above, below, & all around, free from enmity, one lives happily.
Kataṃ puñña-phalaṃ mayhaṃ sabbe bhāgī bhavantu te.
May all share in the blessings springing from the good I have done.
Bhavantu sabba-maṅgalaṃ rakkhantu sabba-devatā.
May there be every blessing, may divine beings keep guard.
Sabba-buddhānubhāvena sabba-dhammānubhāvena sabba-saṅghānubhāvena sotthi hontu nirantaraṃ,
Through the power of all the Buddhas, Dhammas, & Sanghas may there be well-being without end.
Arahaṃ buddho itipi so bhagavā namāmi'haṃ.
The Awakened One is worthy & so he is Blessed: I pay him homage.
The chant for each of the remaining elements is identical with the chant for the wind element, i.e., the passage on the Buddha's virtues, the passage on the Dhamma's virtues, the passage on the Sangha's virtues, followed by the passage beginning, 'Dhātu-parisuddhānubhāvena…' Only the name of the element is changed:
Tejo ca buddha-guṇaṃ…
Tejo ca dhammetaṃ…
Tejo ca saṅghānaṃ…
Āpo ca buddha-guṇaṃ…
Āpo ca dhammetaṃ…
Āpo ca saṅghānaṃ…
Paṭhavī ca buddha-guṇaṃ…
Paṭhavī ca dhammetaṃ…
Paṭhavī ca saṅghānaṃ…
Ākāsā ca buddha-guṇaṃ…
Ākāsā ca dhammetaṃ…
Ākāsā ca saṅghānaṃ…
Viññāṇañca buddha-guṇaṃ…
Viññāṇañca dhammetaṃ…
Viññāṇañca saṅghānaṃ…
Once you have memorized Section, the remaining sections will be no problem, because they are virtually the same, differing only in the name of the element.
These six elements exist within each of us, so when you repeat the chant you should also think about the element you are chanting about: Wind — feelings of movement, such as the in-and-out breath; Fire — feelings of warmth; Water — liquid or cool feelings; Earth — feelings of heaviness or solidity; Space — feelings of emptiness; Consciousness — awareness of objects.  If you think about these elements while you chant, the chant will be very beneficial.
The same chant can be used for the five aggregates, the twelve sense media, and the parts of the body.
The method of chanting is the same as with the six elements, simply substituting the names of the various aggregates, sense media, and parts of the body, as follows:
Rūpañca — form, sense data
Vedanā ca feelings of pleasure, pain, and indifference
Saññā ca names, labels, acts of perceiving and identifying
Saṅkhārā ca — mental forces and processes
Viññāṇañca — consciousness of the six senses
Cakkhu ca — eyes
Sotañca — ears
Ghānañca — nose
Jivhā ca — tongue
Kāyo ca — body
Mano ca — mind
Rūpañca — forms
Saddo ca — sounds
Gandho ca — smells
Raso ca — flavors
Poṭṭhabbā ca — tactile sensations
Dhammārammaṇañca  — ideas
Kesā ca — Hair of the head
Lomā ca — Hair of the body
Nakhā ca — Nails
Dantā ca — Teeth
Taco ca — Skin
Maṃsañca — Flesh
Nhārū ca — Tendons
Aṭṭhī ca — Bones
Aṭṭhimiñjañca — Bone marrow
Vakkañca — Spleen
Hadayañca — Heart
Yakanañca — Liver
Kilomakañca — Membranes
Pihakañca — Kidneys
Papphāsañca — Lungs
Antañca — Large intestines
Antaguṇañca — Small intestines
Udariyañca — Gorge
Karīsañca — Feces
Matthaluṅgañca — Brain
Pittañca — Gall
Semhañca — Phlegm
Pubbo ca — Lymph
Lohitañca — Blood
Sedo ca — Sweat
Medo ca — Fat
Assu ca — Tears
Vasā ca — Oil
Kheḷo ca — Saliva
Siṅghāṇikā ca — Mucus
Lasikā ca — Oil in the joints
Muttañca — Urine
There are seven basic steps:
Start out with three or seven long in-and-out breaths, thinking bud- with the in-breath, and dho with the out.  Keep the meditation syllable as long as the breath.
Be clearly aware of each in-and-out breath.
Observe the breath as it goes in and out, noticing whether it's comfortable or uncomfortable, broad or narrow, obstructed or free-flowing, fast or slow, short or long, warm or cool.  If the breath doesn't feel comfortable, change it until it does.  For instance, if breathing in long and out long is uncomfortable, try breathing in short and out short.  As soon as you find that your breathing feels comfortable, let this comfortable breath sensation spread to the different parts of the body.
To begin with, inhale the breath sensation at the base of the skull and let it flow all the way down the spine.  Then, if you are male, let it spread down your right leg to the sole of your foot, to the ends of your toes, and out into the air.
Inhale the breath sensation at the base of the skull again and let it spread down your spine, down your left leg to the ends of your toes, and out into the air.  
Then let the breath from the base of the skull spread down over both shoulders, past your elbows and wrists, to the tips of your fingers, and out into the air.
Let the breath at the base of the throat spread down the central nerve at the front of the body, past the lungs and liver, all the way down to the bladder and colon.
Inhale the breath right at the middle of the chest and let it go all the way down to your intestines.
Let all these breath sensations spread so that they connect and flow together, and you'll feel a greatly improved sense of well-being.
Learn four ways of adjusting the breath:
Breathe whichever way is most comfortable for you.  Or, better yet, learn to breathe comfortably all four ways, because your physical condition and your breath are always changing.
Become acquainted with the bases or focal points for the mind — the resting spots of the breath — and center your awareness on whichever one seems most comfortable.  A few of these bases are:
If you suffer from frequent headaches or nervous problems, don't focus on any spot above the base of the throat.  And don't try to force the breath or put yourself into a trance.  Breathe freely and naturally.  Let the mind be at ease with the breath — but not to the point where it slips away.
Spread your awareness — your sense of conscious feeling — throughout the entire body.
Unite the breath sensations throughout the body, letting them flow together comfortably, keeping your awareness as broad as possible.  Once you are fully aware of the aspects of the breath you already know in your body, you'll come to know all sorts of other aspects as well.  The breath, by its nature, has many facets: breath sensations flowing in the nerves, those flowing around and about the nerves, those spreading from the nerves to every pore.  Beneficial breath sensations and harmful ones are mixed together by their very nature.
To summarize: for the sake of improving the energy already existing in every part of your body, so that you can contend with such things as disease and pain; and for the sake of clarifying the knowledge already within you, so that it can become a basis for the skills leading to release and purity of heart — you should always bear these seven steps in mind, because they are absolutely basic to every aspect of breath meditation.
Worship, chanting, and meditation have to go hand-in-hand before they can truly purify the mind, in line with the basic principles of the Buddha's teachings:
Sabba-pāpassa akaraṇaṃ
Kusalassūpasampadā
Develop skill in all of your actions.
What this means is that in worship we have acted skillfully with our deeds, in chanting we have acted skillfully with our words, and in meditation we have acted skillfully with our thoughts.  Once this is the case, we will be able to reach the heart of the Buddha's teachings:
Sacitta-pariyodapanaṃ
Attain purity of heart.
Everything in the world comes about solely through the power of the heart.  A corrupt heart will abuse this power.  A well-trained heart can use this power to uplift others and to gain blessings beyond price.
To people looking at Buddhism through the medium of English, the practice of compassion and detachment can appear incompatible, especially for those who consider themselves to be socially and politically engaged.
In contemporary usage, compassion brings to mind outward-moving concern for others, while detachment suggests aloofness and withdrawal from the world.
Yet Buddhism recommends both as admirable and necessary qualities to be cultivated.
This raises questions such as the following:
It is certainly possible to draw sentences from Buddhist writers which seem to support a rejection of outward concern for others.
For example, Edward Conze has written, “The Yogin can only come into contact with the unconditioned when he brushes aside anything which is conditioned.” Similarly, G.S.P.
Misra writes, “In the final analysis, all actions are to be put to cessation… The Buddha speaks of happiness involved in non-action which he further says is an integral part of the Right Way.
Taken in isolation and out of context, these remarks can give the impression that the path to Nibbaana implies developing a lack of concern towards everything in sa.msaara.
But is this inference sound?
I would argue that it is not.
This is an issue which touches on the whole question of transferring concepts across linguistic barriers, in this case Paali and English.
It calls not only for an understanding of how the concepts are used within the framework of the Paali Buddhist texts, but also for an awareness of how the English terms used in translation function and whether they are adequate.
Inevitably, a dialogical approach between two linguistic frameworks is necessary.
Viveka and viraaga are the two Paali words which have been translated as “detachment.” The two, however, are not synonymous.
The primary meaning of viveka is separation, aloofness, seclusion.
Often physical withdrawal is implied.
The later commentarial tradition, however, identifies three forms of viveka: kaaya-viveka, citta-viveka, and upadhi-viveka.
Kaaya-viveka, as a chosen way of life, was not uncommon during the time of the Buddha.
To withdraw from the household life, renounce possessions, and adopt a solitary mendicancy was a recognized path.
The formation of the Buddhist monastic Sangha was grounded in the belief that going out from home to homelessness could aid concentrated spiritual effort.
Yet to equate the renunciation which the Buddha encouraged with a physical withdrawal which either punished the body or completely rejected human contact would be a mistake.
The Buddha made it clear that the detachment of a noble disciple — the detachment connected with the path — was not essentially a physical act of withdrawal, let alone austerity.
Kaaya-viveka was valuable only if seen as a means to the inner purging and mental transformation connected with the destruction of craving.
This is illustrated in the Udumbarika Siihanaada Sutta in which the Buddha claims that the asceticism of a recluse who clings to solitude could lead to pride, carelessness, attention-seeking, and hypocrisy, if not linked to the cultivation of moral virtues and the effort to gain insight through meditation.
A further insight is given in the Nivaapa Sutta, which weaves a lengthy story around the relationship of four herds of deer with a certain crop, representing sensual pleasure, sown by the hunter for the deers' ensnaring.
Both the ascetics who crave for pleasure, and those who deny themselves any enjoyment in an extreme way, are destroyed.
Referring to the latter, the Buddha says:
Because their bodies were extremely emaciated, their strength and energy diminished, freedom of mind diminished; because freedom of mind diminished, they went back to the very crop sown by Maara — the material things of this world.
The message of the sutta is that ascetic withdrawal can reduce the mind's ability to discern.
It can also lead to the repression of mental tendencies rather than to their rooting out and destruction.
The detachment of which Buddhism speaks, therefore, is not an extreme turning away from that which normally nourishes the human body.
Neither is it a closing of the eyes to all beauty, as is clear from the following:
Delightful, reverend AAnanda, is the Gosinga sal-wood.
It is a clear moonlit night; the sal-trees are in full blossom.
Methinks deva-like scents are being wafted around…
This is an expression of delight uttered by Saariputta, an arahant, on meeting some fellow monks one night.
One must look away from external acts and towards the area of inner attitudes and motivation for a true understanding of the role of detachment in Buddhism.
Physical withdrawal is only justified if it is linked to inner moral purification and meditation.
In this light, citta-viveka and upadhi-viveka become necessary subdivisions to bring out the full implications of detachment within Buddhist spiritual practice.
Upadhi-viveka, as withdrawal from the roots of suffering, links up with viraaga, the second word used within Buddhism to denote detachment.
Viraaga literally means the absence of raaga: the absence of lust, desire, and craving for existence.
Hence, it denotes indifference or non-attachment to the usual objects of raaga, such as material goods or sense pleasures.
Non-attachment is an important term here if the Paali is to be meaningful to speakers of English.
It is far more appropriate than “detachment” because of the negative connotations “detachment” possesses in English.
Raaga is a close relation of upaadaana which, within the causal chain binding human beings to repeated births, grows from ta.nhaa and results in bhava — continued sa.msaaric existence.
The English word “non-attachment” suggests a way of looking at both of them.
The Buddhist texts refer to four strands of grasping: grasping of sense pleasures, of views, of rule and custom, of doctrines of self.
All of these can also be described as forms of raaga or desire.
To destroy their power over the human psyche, attachment to them must be transformed into non-attachment.
Non-attachment or non-grasping would therefore flow from the awareness that no possession, no relationship, no achievement is permanent or able to give lasting satisfaction; from the discovery that there is no self which needs to be protected, promoted, or defended; and from the realization that searching for selfish sensual gratification is pointless, since it leads only to craving and obsession.
Phrases which overlap with attachment in this context and which can help to clarify its meaning are: possessiveness in relationships, defensiveness, jealousy, covetousness, acquisitiveness, and competitiveness.
Through non-attachment, these are attenuated and overcome.
There is nothing yet in this description which points to a lack of concern for humanity or the world.
The emphasis is rather on inner transformation so that destructive and divisive traits can be destroyed, making way for their opposites to flourish.
To take attachment to sense pleasures as an example, many suttas mention the peril involved.
The person attached to sense pleasures is likened to a “wet, sappy stick” placed in water.
As such a stick cannot be used to light a fire, so the one addicted to sense pleasures cannot attain the “incomparable self-awakening”.
He is one with whom Maara can do what he likes.
He is like one holding a blazing torch, which must be dropped if burning and pain is to be avoided.
In fact, it is stressed that attachment to sense pleasures destroys the mind's ability to think clearly and objectively.
Viraaga, on the other hand, is linked to the practice of mindfulness and to seeing into the truth of things.
For Buddhists, therefore, non-attachment or detachment does not mean a withdrawal from striving for truth but a movement towards seeing the true nature of things more clearly.
In contrast, saraaga leads to biased and false perceptions, since objects are sensed through a net of predispositions towards attraction and aversion.
Seeing the truth through non-attachment can operate both at a mundane and a higher level.
At a mundane level, for instance, if greed always arises when an opportunity for gaining quick wealth is glimpsed, wealth will never be seen objectively as it really is — as transient, subject to change, and no answer to the search for happiness.
Because of raaga, neither the consequences nor the alternatives will be appreciated.
In fact, if any decision has to be made, the alternatives will not be seen clearly as long as the mind is clouded by raaga.
Dishonesty and the manipulation of others in order to gain what is craved might result.
With reference to the higher stages of insight, satipa.t.thaana, viveka, and viraaga are intertwined.
Found in many suttas are words such as the following:
He chooses some lonely spot to rest on his way — in the woods, at the foot of tree, on a hillside… and returning there after alms round, he seats himself, when his meal is done, cross-legged… 
Putting away the hankering after the world, he remains with a heart that hankers not, and purifies his mind of lusts.
Aloof from the pleasures of the senses, aloof from unskilled states of mind, he enters and abides in the first jhaana….
The ultimate results of such practices are the four jhaanas or absorptions; the verification, by direct vision, of the doctrine of karma; insight into the Four Noble Truths; and eventually, the knowledge that release from rebirth has been gained.
Viraaga is, in fact, a prerequisite for attaining nibbaana and the treatment of the word in the texts implies that the two are almost synonymous.
At this point, it is worth looking at how the word “detachment” has been used in the Western tradition.
In colloquial usage, to say that a person is detached can be derogatory, implying that the person is not willing to become involved with others or that he or she is neither approachable nor sympathetic.
This current usage must be borne in mind.
Three strands of meaning, however, emerge from most dictionary definitions.
Primarily, detachment refers to the action and process of separating.
Flowing from this has come the military usage to describe the dispatch of a body of troops.
More relevant to this study, however, is the third body of meanings connected with detachment as an attitude of mind.
“Aloofness” and “indifference to worldly concerns” are phrases used to describe this attitude.
Although these might appear to conform to the above-mentioned contemporary connotations, we find linked with this “freedom from bias and prejudice.” Thus, in both the Western tradition and the Eastern, “detachment” is linked with clarity of perception, nonpartiality, and fair judgment.
Voices supporting this come from the Christian mystical tradition and the contemporary scientific world.
Classical Christian mysticism saw indifference to worldly and material concerns as an essential component of the movement towards God.
Fulfilling God's will with total love and obedience was accompanied by detachment from the worldly.
In modern scientific research a similar quality is emphasized.
A commitment to truth is recognized but so is the necessity for a mind detached from the results of research, detached from the wish for a particular outcome.
For it is known that if the scientist is searching for one particular scientific result, he might unconsciously manipulate the experiments or observations in order to obtain that result.
Therefore, when looking at the implications of “detachment,” it is worth taking into account Western usage as well.
The socially active person can be quick to look down on those who appear either distanced from or untouched by the social, economic, and political crises facing the world.
But they should remember that detachment can have a positive fruit even in relation to social activism: the ability to see the truth more clearly and to judge more impartially.
To return to the Buddhist tradition: The Buddha was once faced with the remark that the most worthy person is the one who speaks neither in dispraise of the unworthy nor in praise of the praiseworthy.
The Buddha disagreed with this.
He replied that, because of his ability to discriminate, the person who speaks in dispraise of the unworthy and in praise of worthy is best.
The Buddha rejects the self-distancing which refuses to take sides or to speak out against what should be condemned.
He criticizes the desire to keep the truth inviolate and unspoken through a wish not to become involved with society.
Viveka and viraaga therefore do not imply the kind of withdrawal which is unconcerned with what is good or bad for human welfare.
The fruits of non-attachment are not only linked with the gaining of knowledge, the “incomparable self-awakening,” but are also related to creating a just and harmonious society.
The Mahaadukkhakkhandha Sutta makes a direct connection between attachment to sense pleasures and the movement towards chaos in society.
Greed for the possessions of another leads to disputes and contentions at the level of both the family and nation, until “having taken sword and shield, having girded bow and quiver, both sides mass for battle and arrows are hurled and swords are flashing.” In the same sutta, theft, adultery, and vicious corporal punishment are likewise attributed to sense pleasures and attachment to them.
In other texts, attachment to views is spoken about as a cause of disputes, especially in the religious community.
Yet the point drawn is relevant to the whole of society.
The result of a person asserting, “This is the very truth, all else is falsehood,” is dispute.
And: “If there is dispute, there is contention; if there is contention, there is trouble; if there is trouble, there is vexation.
Therefore, far from implying lack of concern for the welfare of others, detachment from such things as sensual desires and the urge to assert dogmatic views is seen as essential to it.
We are back to the four strands of grasping and the need to root these out.
Karu.naa is the Paali word translated as compassion.
Contemporary writers have spoken of it thus:
It is defined as that which makes the heart of the good quiver when others are subject to suffering, or that which dissipates the suffering of others.
Compassion is a virtue which uproots the wish to harm others.
It makes people so sensitive to the sufferings of others and causes them to make these sufferings so much their own that they do not want to further increase them.
This isn't self-pity or pity for others.
It's really feeling one's own pain and recognizing the pain of others… Seeing the web of suffering we're all entangled in, we become kind and compassionate to one another.
The above definitions vary.
Yet central to all is the claim that karu.naa concerns our attitude to the suffering of others.
In the Buddhist texts the term often refers to an attitude of mind to be radiated in meditation.
This is usually considered its primary usage.
Nevertheless, the definitions of Buddhist writers past and present, as well as the texts themselves, stress that it is also more than this.
Anukampaa and dayaa, often translated as “sympathy,” are closely allied to it.
In fact, at least three strands of meaning in the term “compassion” can be detected in the texts: a prerequisite for a just and harmonious society; an essential attitude for progress along the path towards wisdom; and the liberative action within society of those who have become enlightened or who are sincerely following the path towards it.
All these strands need to be looked at if the term is to be understood and if those who accuse Buddhist compassion of being too passive are to be answered correctly.
The foundation for any spiritual progress within Buddhism is the Five Precepts.
Rites, rituals, ascetic practices, and devotional offerings are all subservient to the morality they stress.
Compassion for the life, feelings, and security of others is inseparably linked with the first, second, and fourth precepts.
For instance, the ideal of ahi.msaa of the first must flow from compassion if it is to be effective.
The Vasala Sutta makes this relationship explicit, although the word dayaa, usually translated as sympathy or compassion, is used and not karu.naa:
Whoever in this world harms living beings, once-born or twice-born, in whom there is no compassion for living beings — know him as an outcast.

Important to the exercising of this kind of compassion is the realization that life is dear to all, as shown in the following Dhammapada verse:
Here, non-harming and compassion flow both from a sensitivity to our own hopes and fears and the ability to place ourselves in the shoes of others.
Compassion towards self and compassion towards others are inseparable.
The Buddha's teachings about statecraft and government also embody compassion as a guiding principle.
The Cakkavatti Siihanaada Sutta describes a state in which the king ignores his religious advisers and does not give wealth to the poor.
Poverty becomes widespread and, in its wake, follow theft, murder, immorality in various forms, and communal breakdown.
The culmination is a “sword period” in which men and women look upon one another as animals and cut one another with swords.
In this sutta, lack of compassion for the poor leads to the disintegration of society.
Lack of social and economic justice leads to disaster.
In contrast, the ideal Buddhist model for society, as deduced from the texts, would be one in which exploitation in any part of its structure is not tolerated.
Such a society would be rooted in compassion.
Compassion is its prerequisite.
To move to the second strand, I have already stated that the word “karu.naa” was most often mentioned in the texts in the specialized context of meditation to denote an important form of mind training.
Here the emphasis is on each person's pilgrimage towards Nibbaana rather than on interaction with other beings.
For example, the Kandaraka Sutta describes the path of a person who “does not torment himself or others.” Moral uprightness is stressed initially but the final stages of the path are seen purely in terms of meditation and mind-training.
At this point, no mention is made of outgoing action:
By getting rid of the taint of ill-will, he lives benevolent in mind; and compassionate for the welfare of all creatures and beings, he purifies the mind of the taint of ill-will.
In this context, the development of karu.naa plays an essential part in the meditation practice that leads towards wisdom and the destruction of craving.
The importance of this must not be underestimated.
The development of a compassionate mind is a direct preparation for right concentration and a prerequisite of Nibbaana:
If from a brahman's family… if from a merchant's family… if from a worker's family… and if from whatever family he has gone forth from home into homelessness and has come into this dhamma and discipline taught by the Tathaagata, having thus developed friendliness, compassion, sympathetic joy, and equanimity, he attains inward calm — I say it is by inward calm that he is following the practices suitable for recluses.
Karu.naa is one of the four “brahma-vihaaras” or sublime states, along with mettaa, muditaa, and upekkhaa.
The higher stages are seen to rest on them because they have the power to weaken the defilements of lust, ill-will, and delusion and to bring the mind to a state of peace.
Rarely is meditation mentioned without reference to them.
Yet a distinction must be made between mettaa and karu.naa.
The two are linked together at one level through the brahma-vihaaras.
Yet, in the texts, mettaa constantly remains a disposition, an interior attitude.
Karu.naa is more than this.
Significant here is Buddhaghosa's treatment of the word in the Visuddhimagga.
When referring to the brahma-vihaaras, he treats karu.naa in a similar way to mettaa.
Yet, in a later definition, his words can be translated as:
When there is suffering in others it causes good people's hearts to be moved, thus it is compassion.
Or, alternatively, it combats others' suffering and demolishes it, thus it is compassion.
Or, alternatively, it is scattered upon those who suffer, or extended to them by pervasion, thus it is compassion.
Bhikkhu ~Naa.namoli, in the notes to his translation, stresses that ki.naati here does not come under the usual meaning of “to buy” but is linked with the Sanskrit kr.naati, to injure or kill.
Therefore he chooses to translate it as “combat,” unmistakably connecting Buddhaghosa's definition of karu.naa with action.
In a later paragraph, Buddhaghosa adds that compassion succeeds “when it makes cruelty subside and it fails when it produces sorrow.” To Buddhaghosa, karu.naa was both a deliverance of the mind and liberative action or, more exactly, a quality compelling people towards such action.
This emphasis on liberative action is seen supremely in AAcariya Dhammapaala's words about the great compassion and wisdom of the Buddha.
The passage is structured in a series of parallel sentences, each one contrasting and comparing the fruits of the two qualities.
The following are selected from the longer whole:
It is through understanding that he fully understood others' suffering and through compassion that he undertook to counteract it… It was through understanding that he himself crossed over and through compassion that he brought others across…
Likewise it was through compassion that he became the world's helper and through understanding that he became his own helper.
In the above passage, pa~n~naa or wisdom is connected with knowledge and insight, and karu.naa or compassion with liberative action.
The two are held in corrective balance, counteracting the view that karu.naa is linked only with the passivity of meditation.
For the Enlightened One, karu.naa was what impelled him to remain in society as teacher and liberator.
He saw the need of the murderer, Angulimaala, and a destructive life was put on another course.
For forty-five years, he preached in the face of criticism, opposition, and misunderstanding, in the knowledge that the Dhamma would be understood only by a few.
He did not hide the fact that suffering is universal, but made compassion the reverse side of this truth, as is shown in the traditional stories of his encounters with Pa.taacaaraa, Kisaagotamii, and the slave girl Rajjumaalaa.
He was not slow either to admonish monks who were unwilling to tend the sick among them or to do the tending himself, however distressing the illness was: “Whoever would attend on me should attend on the sick” has come down the centuries as words he said on one such occasion.
This ideal was placed before the whole monastic Sangha.
Although many members of the Sangha may have failed to reach it, it is certain that some attained a stage where compassionate, loving action had replaced selfishness.
In the final stage of the path, there is a sense in which action ceases.
Yet it is the kind of action which is dictated by attraction or aversion which must stop, action which has kammic results, not that which flows from a purified mind filled with compassion.
The mission he set for himself and for the Sangha was one of compassionate, liberative action.
The first sixty arahants were sent out with the words:
Go forth, bhikkhus, for the good of the many, for the happiness of the many, out of compassion for the world, for the good, benefit, and happiness of gods and men.
Let not two go by the same way.
Mahaakassapa is praised because “he teaches the doctrine to others out of pity, out of caring for them, because of his compassion for them.
For the above disciples, all that had to be done for their release had been done.
They now embodied compassion.
Compassion was their nature — Mahaa-karu.naa, great compassion, rather than the elementary compassion which the novice on the path attempts to radiate and practice.
For these disciples, all desire for self-promotion and self-achievement had been replaced with outward-moving energy.
Therefore, any statement which describes the enlightened Buddhist disciple as distant from society would be false, or, more exactly, would be using inappropriate categories.
The strength of the concept of compassion within Buddhism is that it is both a powerful form of mental purification and a form of liberative action.
This paper began with questions raised by observers about the Buddhist notions of detachment and compassion.
They center around two main points: that the two concepts seem to represent contradictory forces, the one moving away from society and the other towards it; that the Buddhist concept of compassion is not active enough, being more connected with personal spiritual growth than the altruistic reformation of society.
Part of the problem is the linguistic framework and the modern connotations surrounding such concepts as “detachment.” The question would not arise in the same form for those thinking exclusively in Paali and using the terms viraaga and karu.naa.
It would be evident to them that viraaga does not imply apathy and indifference but a freedom from passion and attachment that is necessary if actions are not to become biased or partial.
For what passes as compassion can cloak emotions of a very different kind, such as anger, attachment, or the wish to interfere.
With reference to the second point, a distinction in terms must be made.
There is a form of concern for self which is compatible with and even essential to altruism.
The care for oneself which enables one to feel empathy with others can be termed “autism.” Autism is necessary for altruism, since it is necessary to be able to accept and even love oneself before one can show true empathy and compassion for others, before one can feel what they feel.
Autism is not egoism.
Egoism is the enemy of both autism and altruism.
Egoism seeks to use others for the material welfare and gain of self.
Its “love” is possessive and manipulative.
Egoism has to be destroyed if karu.naa is to develop.
Viraaga, viveka, karu.naa and anukampaa are inter-related terms within Buddhism.
Compassion needs the clear insight that viragaa can bring.
The challenge for Buddhists and non-Buddhists alike is to realize this in our lives.
All societies need the active, liberative compassion which seeks to relieve the suffering of others, establish greater justice, and assert the dignity and equality of human beings.
Karu.naa should certainly be seen in its concentrated meditative form as a powerful and peace-giving discipline of the mind and an important part of any spiritual path.
But it should never be confined to this framework.
It breaks the framework as liberative action to relieve suffering and oppression.
Elizabeth J.
Harris studied Buddhism in Sri Lanka from to and obtained a Ph.D.
degree from the Postgraduate Institute of Pali and Buddhist Studies, University of Kelaniya.
She is now Secretary for Inter-faith Relations in The Methodist Church in London.
Her previous BPS publications include Violence and Disruption in Society and Journey into Buddhism.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
It is sometimes said that Death today has replaced Sex as “The Great Unmentionable,” and certainly it is, for most people, an uncomfortable subject which they do not care to think about overmuch.
Yet if there is one thing that is certain in life it is that we shall all die, sooner or later.
There was once a creed which declared: “Millions Now Living Will Never Die,” and it had great appeal — but all those who first heard it proclaimed are now dead.
So we all have to face death, whether we like it or not.
And we all know it, however we may try to forget the fact.
Let us, then, at least for a while, stop trying to forget it and look death straight in the face.
It is, of course, perfectly true that we can be too preoccupied with death.
There are those who are eaten up with fear of death so that they hardly have any energy or zest for living, and there are some for whom mortality and all its accompaniments and trappings have a peculiar fascination.
Facing death realistically does not mean being obsessed by it.
Here, as in other respects, Buddhism teaches a Middle Way.
For those who have an unhealthy preoccupation with the subject, it can teach a saner and more balanced concern; for those who seek at all costs to avoid thinking about it, it can likewise show a reasonable approach.
Fear of death is an unwholesome state of mind, and for this, as for other unwholesome states of mind, Buddhism can show a remedy.
In the West today, there are many different attitudes to death and a large number of people are probably quite bewildered by it, not knowing what to believe.
But two main ones predominate: the Traditional Christian view and the Modern Secular view.
The Traditional Christian view asserts the reality of an after-life, which the Modern Secular view denies or at the very least calls strongly into question.
This asserts that man has an immortal soul, created by God.
After death a man will, in some shape or form, receive the reward or punishment for his deeds on earth.
In short, the good will go to heaven and the wicked to hell.
Heaven and hell are everlasting.
Of course, many Christians — even fairly “traditional” ones — are more or less uneasy about this, especially about the eternity of hell, but this doctrine is still taught by many Churches in some form, with whatever loopholes or reservations.
It should also be noted that on this view only man has an “immortal soul,” and that “animals” simply perish at death.
A few Christians, especially in England, dislike this and hope to be reunited with their pets in another world.
Inquiry would probably show that this is a genuine stumbling-block for more people than might have been supposed.
According to this view, which usually claims to be “scientific,” man is just another animal and, like the animals in the Christian view, simply perishes totally at physical death.
This could actually be in part an unrecognized heritage from Christian thinking.
The Christian says: “Animals have no souls.” The Secularist caps this by saying: “Man is an animal, therefore he has no soul.” Modern biology, medical science, psychology and so on tend markedly to take this view for granted.
As has been stated and will be shown, the “scientific” basis for this attitude is at the very least, highly questionable.
But its exponents are often people enjoying considerable prestige and are widely listened to by those who do not feel able to form an independent opinion on this subject.
The Buddhist attitude to both of these types of view is that they are extremes, neither of which is in fact true.
The first type of view is called in Buddhism “the heresy of eternalism”, while the second is called “the heresy of annihilationism”.
They both in fact miss the point.
What actually happens according to Buddhism can only be clearly understood if we have some acquaintance with the Buddhist view of the general nature of man.
But before considering this, it may be as well to observe how the Buddhist view can be misinterpreted.
If we say, for instance, that in the Buddhist view man is not distinguished from animals by the possession of an “immortal soul,” then this looks very like the Modern Secular position.
If, on the other hand, it is pointed out that according to Buddhism we reap the rewards and penalties, after death, for our actions in this life, then this looks rather like the Traditional Christian view.
If both propositions are stated to be correct, the result looks like a contradiction, though in fact it is not.
These misapprehensions about Buddhism result from failure to realize the kind of “optical illusion” which occurs when a middle position is viewed from one of the extremes.
If an island is exactly in the middle of a river then from either bank it looks closer to the opposite bank than to the observer.
Only an observer on the island can see that it is equidistant.
Viewed from the extreme left, any middle position looks much further to the right than it is, and vice versa.
The same phenomenon is commonly observable in politics and other walks of life.
In this case, the true Buddhist view is that the impersonal stream of consciousness flows on — impelled by ignorance and craving — from life to life.
Though the process is impersonal, the illusion of personality continues as it does in this life.
In terms of Absolute Truth, there is no “immortal soul” that manifests in a succession of bodies, but in terms of the relative truth by which we are normally guided, there is a “being” that is reborn.
In order to gain Enlightenment, it is necessary to come to a realization of the situation as it is according to absolute truth; in order to face and begin to understand the problem of death we can, in the first instance, view it in terms of that “relative truth” which normally rules our lives and which has its validity in its own sphere.
We need merely, for the present, to remind ourselves that this is but a “provisional” view of things.
In this connection, too, we have to observe that we are dealing only with the question of death as it affects the ordinary person, not one who has attained Enlightenment.
We may therefore say that Buddhism, rejecting Annihilationism outright, partly agrees with the Eternalists, to the extent of accepting a form of Survival, without, for the moment, considering the differences further.
It makes a considerable difference to our outlook on life, whether we believe in any form of survival or not.
Those who entirely reject the idea of survival inevitably concentrate all their ambitions and hopes, for themselves and others, on this single life on earth.
This life, they feel, is all they have and for them the only reasonable goal can be the achievement of some kind of mundane satisfaction or contentment in this world — all else being meaningless.
The precise implications of such an attitude will depend greatly on a person's character.
The idealist may devote himself to all kinds of plans for bettering the human condition.
It is claimed, and not without some justice, that this view of things has led to a great many social improvements.
Nevertheless, if we look at the whole picture, it may be doubted whether all the social consequences of a purely “this-worldly” view have been beneficial.
And even the idealist must admit that his hopes are strictly limited, not only for himself but for the race itself which will inevitably die out one day, possibly hastened to its end by man's own wicked folly or even his incompetent attempts to “control nature.” Furthermore, those who are less idealistically inclined may tend to regard this “one-life-only” theory as an excuse for enjoying themselves as selfishly as they like while they have the chance, with no fear of any post-mortem retribution.
In addition, there are very many people who are more or less tormented by the fear of utter extinction at death.
To point out that this is illogical is useless.
For many such, fear of cancer or other fatal diseases, or war and other disasters, is not made any easier to bear because they see no future for themselves beyond the grave.
Those who preach the “we have only one life” gospel too enthusiastically may forget in their zeal for good causes the serious psychological harm such talk can do.
Fear of death is not, of course, confined to those who do not believe in an after-life.
It is in fact universal.
“In that sleep of death what dreams may come” is a thought that has given pause to many besides Hamlet, and in the past many have gone terrified of hell-fire — and some still do.
Probably, however, most believers or would-be believers in survival today settle in fact for something vaguely comforting, a trifle wishful, and with few clearly envisaged details.
It should be noted that lack of belief in survival is not entirely incompatible with a religious attitude, though probably most sincere believers in all religions have some such faith, however vague.
The Jewish religion, for instance, has little to say on an after-life, and probably many orthodox Jews have little or no faith in one.
This is partly due to the reticence of most of the Hebrew Bible on the subject, and in this connection the well-known concern of Jews with their race and its continuance is significant — as in the case of the secularists noted above.
The relation, of course, is an inverse one: the Jew, concerned with racial survival, thinks little about personal survival.
The secularist, rejecting personal survival, pins his hopes on that of the race.
The concern of many Christian churchmen with social problems today often goes together with a marked reticence on the subject of survival, and occasionally even with a degree of open skepticism.
In some cases this looks like a scarcely-veiled capitulation to the dominant materialistic outlook of the present age.
Of course there are many who believe — rightly or wrongly — that they can get in touch with the departed.
Mediums who claim to be able to do this are numerous, and while some are fraudulent, and some others are self-deluded, it would be unwise in the extreme to suppose that this is always the case.
Genuine clairvoyants, spiritual healers and other such specially gifted people unquestionably exist, as anyone who is prepared to undertake an impartial investigation can readily discover.
But in the public mind such people tend still to be dismissed en masse as fraudulent or at best cranky.
Those who consult them often do so surreptitiously, guarding the fact from their friends as a guilty secret they would be ashamed to divulge.
While excessive concern with such matters is not necessarily a good thing, the loudly voiced scornful skepticism of many materialistic-minded people is simply an inadequate response to something of which they are woefully — sometimes even culpably — ignorant.
Since in fact a fear of death is deep-rooted in everybody, the propagation of an attitude of total skepticism can do much harm.
Even a great psychologist like the late Dr.
Ernest Jones, the biographer of Freud, considered it necessary to declare that it was important to eliminate from one's mind all belief in an after-life.
Now if, in fact, it could somehow be finally proved that there is no such thing, and if further it were possible through psycho-analysis or some such methods to get rid of all fear of extinction, this might be a good thing.
But since these premises cannot be substantiated, the claim falls to the ground.
The fact is that orthodox psycho-analysis was able to find out a great deal about the problem of sex, with which it was largely able to cope.
But it had not and has not the equipment to adequately deal with the problem of death.
What Dr.
Jones failed to see is that the only result of such an attempt can be repression!
Repression may be briefly defined as “the active process of keeping out and ejecting, banishing from consciousness, the ideas and impulses that are unacceptable to it.” We can call it successful self-deception.
Its deleterious effects on the psyche are well-known, thanks above all to the work of Sigmund Freud and his followers.
In this case it means that we deceive ourselves into believing that we are not afraid of death — and in fact very many people do this.
Buddhism is actually an even better and more radical method of dealing with one's repressions than psycho-analysis, and it is often a hard task to convince people that they have in fact not “transcended,” but merely repressed their fear of death!
The reader is earnestly advised at this point to consider seriously the possibility that he or she has done just this, bearing in mind that in the nature of things an immediate negative reaction proves nothing!
If in fact there is any instinctive tendency to shy away from the whole subject, the answer is actually obvious, though it may be hard to accept.
This is due not only to the fear itself but to conceit — the belief that one is “advanced.
The consequences of a definite denial of the possibility of survival are the persistence of the fear of death, in either an overt or repressed form.
Either way there is a distortion of the psyche with resultant suffering, whatever the exact form it may take.
Since such an attitude of denial is very widespread in many parts of the world today, these deleterious effects, on a very wide scale, are quite inevitable.
In passing, in may be presumed that if in fact there were no survival, we would not have this built-in fear of death.
In present circumstances, the man who thinks, or wants to think otherwise, is in something of a dilemma.
Assuming that he is not a psychic or drawn to spiritualism or the like, nor on the other hand an orthodox believer in one of the traditional faiths, he is probably plagued by doubts and has at best only a hazy notion of what it is he “believes.” He may indulge in many fanciful speculations.
It is not at all clear to him on what basis he can judge of the possibly validity of these ideas.
Under the impact of his surroundings, his belief, vague though it may be but perhaps based on some genuine intuition, is liable to be weak and fail him in times of crisis.
In such a case, a resolute dismissal of all such ideas as “wishful thinking” may for the time being even bring a sense of relief.
All this must be admitted, and it is presumably for just such reasons that thinkers like Dr.
Jones advocate the course they do.
In fact, of course, it does not solve the real problem.
The social and personal drawbacks of the “Jonesian solution” do not end there.
This negative attitude is the outcome of a materialistic view of the world which — though it is still held by many scientists — is in fact outmoded.
Being in essence materialistic, it tends also to reduce our respect for human life.
The traditional Christian view that “animals have no souls” is in fact semi-materialistic in this sense.
Those who think that man is a special case tend all too easily to take the view that animals are totally subservient to him and can be treated as of no account — hence factory-farming and many other such horrors.
The true materialist goes a step further and regards man himself as an “animal” in this sense.
The extreme consequences of a radical application of this idea can be witnessed in many places at this day, and are often utterly appalling.
But even when tempered with “liberal humanism” they can be pretty bad.
Power over life and death is given to the medical profession and others to a degree which is sometimes quite irresponsible.
Transplant surgery, to take an example, is based on a view of death which is entirely unethical by traditional standards, apart altogether from any “religious” considerations, and similar objections apply to demands for virtually indiscriminate abortion.
What, then, should be a truly Buddhist attitude towards death?
Let us first note that in traditional Christianity, as for instance in the Roman Catholic Church, great attention is paid to the dying.
Special rites are performed, and every effort is made to help the dying person to pass on in what is considered to be a right frame of mind.
To those with no belief in a hereafter, all such things are meaningless.
To Buddhists and other non-Catholic “survivalists,” they may be open to certain criticisms, but the principle is wholly admirable.
In Tibetan Buddhism especially, there are observances of a very similar nature, while in Theravada countries it is part of the duties of a vipassanaa bhikkhu to assist the dying.
Of course, the frame of mind in which a Buddhist should die is not quite the same as that expected of an adherent of a theistic religion.
But at least it is better to try to give the dying such understanding as one can, than to drug them into unconsciousness as an almost routine measure.
That way they will pass on to another existence in much the same state of blindness and confusion with which they have gone through this life.
Let us note once again that such considerations can only be rejected as quite valueless if we are perfectly certain that there is no form of after-life — and even on that basis it might be very cruel to deprive many of the dying people of such comfort.
Therefore the suggestion made in the humanist circles that hospital chaplains should be abolished can only be characterized as downright wicked.
Some such chaplains may be pretty useless, but the majority can give the sick and dying at least some comfort.
Ideally, of course, they should all be highly-trained bhikkhus!
However, when one is actually dying it is a bit late to begin thinking seriously about death.
We should familiarize ourselves with the thought long before we hope it will happen!
And besides, even for the young and strong, it can still come with unexpected suddenness.
Mors certa — hora incerta, “Death is certain — the hour is uncertain.” To bear this in mind is for the Buddhist an important aspect of Right Understanding.
And therefore the Buddhist practice of Meditation on Death — not very popular in the West — should be encouraged.
Death for the Buddhist is not indeed the absolute end — but it does mean the breaking of all ties that bind us to our present existence, and therefore, the more detached we are from this world and its enticements, the more ready we shall be to die, and, incidentally, the further we shall get along the path that leads to the Deathless — for this is one of the names of Nibbaana: amata.m “the Deathless State.” Meanwhile, for those who have not got so far along the Path, death is inseverable from birth.
Existence in the phenomenal world is continual birth-and-death.
The one cannot be understood without the other, and cannot exist without the other.
We all fear death, but actually we should also fear the rebirth that follows.
In practice, this does not always happen.
Fear of rebirth is less strong than death.
This is part of our usual short-sighted view, and the fact must be faced.
Full Enlightenment will only be achieved when there is the will to transcend all forms of “rebirth” — even the pleasantest.
Though as a first step then, acceptance of the fact of rebirth may help to overcome the fear of death, the attachment to rebirth itself must then also be gradually overcome.
Though there is a strong fear of death, there is, strangely enough, also a desire for it.
Psycho-analysis has a good deal to say about this, though it is perhaps not very illuminating.
But the fact remains that many people show suicidal tendencies, or even actually commit suicide, whatever be the explanation.
The Buddha in fact included this “death-wish” as the third of three kinds of craving: besides desire for sense-pleasures we find in the formula of the Second Noble Truth the desire for becoming and the desire for cessation.
Since life is by its very nature frustrating, we can never get it on our own terms, and therefore there is an urge to be quit of the whole thing.
The fallacy, of course, lies in the fact that one cannot just “step out” so easily, since death by suicide, like any other death, is followed immediately by rebirth in some plane or other — quite possibly worse than that which one had left.
The traditional Christian view indeed is that suicide is a mortal sin — with the implication that it would be a case of “out of the frying-pan and into the fire.” Some psycho-analysts speak — ignorantly — of the “Nirvana-principle” in connection with the death-wish.
But what we are here dealing with is not in fact the urge to true liberation, but merely an escape-reaction.
Only if by insight more profound than that of the Freudians, this revulsion is followed by complete equanimity can it be turned towards the Supramundane which alone is the goal of Buddhism.
This will not happen spontaneously.
It should be noted that the “death-wish” here referred to is associated in Buddhism with the “heresy of annihilationism” already mentioned.
In a somewhat aggressive form it can even serve to mask repressed death-fear.
This would seem to explain the vehemence with which people like Dr.
Ernest Jones assert the desirability of their anti-survivalist views.
By way of curiosity, it may be mentioned that a distinguished biologist has gone on record as declaring that whether or not we believe in survival is entirely determined by our genes.
This would seem to be pushing determinism pretty far!
It is, of course, easy to suggest that those who believe in some form of survival are victims of wishful thinking, fantasy, and the like.
And in many cases there is a good deal of truth in the allegation.
But what is less often realized is the fact that the opposite situation also exists.
As has been indicated, quite a number of cases can be found of a curiously fanatical and intolerant belief in “death as the end.” That this attitude masks a repressed death-fear has been suggested above.
It also betrays a measure of conceit: by adopting it one appears “scientific,” “realistic,” “tough,” and so on.
It may even to some extent be an assertion of one's masculinity.
The fact that more women than men are churchgoers may be partly due to the fact that women in general feel less urge than men to put on this particular “act”.
Apart from these factors, this attitude also, curiously enough, gives a certain sense of “security.” One has made up one's mind on that particular question and can now dismiss it, and turn to other things.
This enables the scientist — and the politician — to make “realistic” decisions without reference to traditional objections.
Also, by excluding one whole branch of phenomena from the need for investigation, it helps to make our scientific knowledge more “neat and tidy.” Unfortunately for this type of view, however, there is a whole field of knowledge which runs directly counter to any smug mechanistic-materialistic view of the world.
A wide variety of paranormal phenomena — some with direct relevance to the question of survival — are so well attested that to brush them aside is a trifle difficult.
Some scientists contrive to ignore the whole lot and just go on behaving as if there were “nothing there.” A few — but a growing minority — investigate, and as a result are convinced that there is at least something “there,” however you may explain it.
Others can do neither of these things, that is, they can neither ignore the whole lot nor investigate with genuine objectivity.
They therefore set themselves up as “debunkers.” They set out to “expose” or “disprove” whatever they disapprove of.
The assumption is in effect that since, admittedly and obviously, there are some fraudulent mediums and so on, therefore all such people are fraudulent or at any rate deluded.
Quite a number of books and articles have appeared in recent years, assiduously “debunking” various classical cases of paranormal phenomena.
But genuinely impartial investigation frequently shows that, whatever may have the been the weaknesses in the reporting of these cases, the debunkers have in fact gone widely beyond all reasonable criticism and have sometimes themselves been — unconsciously no doubt — quite unscrupulous.
The well-known case of “Bridey Murphey” a few years ago illustrates this.
Some very confident “debunking” of this story turned out on further investigation to be quite wide of the mark.
One book on hypnotism, too, pours scorn on attempts to recall past lives by this method.
The author calls these “a hunk of junk”, and clearly implies deliberate fraudulent suggestion by the hypnotist — a suggestion which is not only ridiculous but libelous.
And the present writer once a heard a very intelligent lady psychologist say: “I'd rather believe anything than accept precognition: it would upset my entire scientific conception of the universe!” Perhaps one can even sympathize a little with this lady; nevertheless since precognition, however mysterious, is a well-attested fact, it is up to her to revise her conception of the universe.
She did, however, neatly phrase the dilemma in which a lot of scientifically trained people find themselves today.
In view of all this, it is important to be aware of the psychological motives which may underlie different attitudes to this whole problem — not only in others but in oneself.
While excessive credulity and uncritical dabbling in the occult is to be deplored, the opposite extreme of total rejection should also be treated with more suspicion and reserve than it often gets.
While Buddhism certainly does not encourage too much preoccupation with these matters, it does not of course deny the existence of various classes of “discarnate” beings.
They dwell in various realms and on various planes, some higher and happier than this world, others, such as the so-called “hungry ghosts”, more miserable.
They are relatively real — i.e., no less “real” than we ourselves in this world.
They all, without exception, belong to the realm of sa.msaara or “birth-and-death,” and their stay in any of the realms they inhabit is therefore temporary, though in some cases it may be fantastically long-lasting by human standards.
There is no contradiction here with the idea of rebirth on earth, since the realm one is born in depends on one's kamma, the human condition being only one of the various possibilities.
Therefore, human rebirth is considered to be as desirable as it is rare — a precious opportunity which it is a folly to waste.
It is also stated in the scriptures that man has a “mind-made body, complete in all its parts,” which would seem to correspond to the “astral” or “etheric” body referred to by occultists.
Responsible occultists — of whom there are many — are themselves, of course, thoroughly well aware of the dangers of incautious involvement with these matters, which they often stress.
The inhabitants of the various realms are not enlightened beings, and while some are undoubtedly much wiser and more advanced than the average human, others are not, and can even exert a definitely malevolent power.
It is not in the province of Buddhist monks to practice any of the occult arts — it is in fact forbidden them in terms — although it is not infrequently done in the East.
Western Buddhists should actually also not concern themselves with such matters.
If they nevertheless do so, they should at least be extremely careful to consult only responsible and conscientious practitioners, with a high moral standard.
Such people are not hard to find, and are often very fine characters.
But it should always be borne in mind that even quite genuine messages from the departed can be misleading, since they are still, in varying degrees, ignorant.
For this reason, too, the well-known triviality of so many “spirit” messages proves nothing about their genuineness.
The beings of higher worlds are known in Buddhism as devas, and it seems certain that many of them are truly concerned to help mankind as far as lies in their power.
It might even be suggested that there is perhaps no essential difference between the higher devas and the bodhisattvas of the Mahaayaana tradition.
Some people are naturally psychic, and some even develop psychic powers as a result, or by-product, of meditation.
Such powers are perfectly real, but should not be sought after or clung to, if attained.
If they are gained without sufficient insight or moral purification, they can be disastrous.
It is another of the many illusions of the modern liberal humanist that such things as “witchcraft” do not exist.
Righteous indignation at the cruel treatment of real or alleged witches in the past should not lead us to imagine that the whole thing was completely mythical.
So we should be very wary of seeking contact with the psychic planes, not because they do not exist, but because they do.
We now come to the Buddhist definition of death.
According to the Ven.
Nyanatiloka, it is ordinarily called “the disappearance of the vital faculty confined to a single life-time, and therewith of the psycho-physical life-process conventionally called 'Man, Animal, Personality, Ego' etc.
Strictly speaking, however, death is the continually repeated dissolution and vanishing of each momentary physical-mental combination, and thus it takes place every moment.
This definition is very important.
Each moment “I” die and “I” am reborn, in other words, a new “I” takes over from the old which has vanished forever.
At the end of “my” physical life there is at the same time a severing of the link between this mental process and the body, which quickly decays in consequence.
But rebirth in exactly the same way is instantaneous in some sphere, whether as conception in a fresh womb or elsewhere.
Death, then, except in the case of the arahant, is in the Buddhist view inseparable from rebirth.
But two kinds of rebirth are distinguished: rebirth from life to life, and rebirth from moment to moment, as indicated in the above definition.
Some people today maintain that the Buddha taught only the latter.
This is nonsense.
There are many hundreds of references to rebirth throughout the Buddhist scriptures of all schools, and they cannot be simply explained away as either “symbolic” or as “concessions to popular beliefs”.
Nor is there any need for such explanations, since there is plenty of convincing evidence for the reality of the process.
Though “rebirth from moment to moment” is very important to understand and should not be overlooked what we are really concerned with here is “rebirth from life to life.” In this connection, two general, somewhat minor points should be made.
The term “birth” here is not confined to extrusion from a womb, it includes other processes such as the spontaneous appearance of beings in certain states.
Birth of the human type is thus simply a particular case.
There is also the question of “intermediate states” between births.
Some Buddhists, and others, speak of such states.
This is really just a question of semantics: in the Theravada view, at least, any such so-called intermediate state between existences of a certain type is itself a “rebirth.
The reason why rebirth, of whatever kind, takes place is because of the unexpended force of ta.nhaa or craving, conditioned by ignorance.
This force of ignorance and craving is comparable to a powerful electric current.
To suppose that it just ceases at physical death is actually quite unreasonable, and contradicts the law of conservation of energy.
As to the question of the identity of the being that is reborn with the one that died, the best answer is that given by the Venerable Naagasena to King Milinda: “It is neither the same nor different”.
The whole process is really quite impersonal, but seemingly a being exists and is reborn.
We can thus make a clear distinction between the terms “Reincarnation” and “Rebirth.
“Reincarnation” is the term used by those who hold that a real entity exists and passes on from life to life, occupying successive bodies.
Literally, this should only apply to manifestation in “fleshy” bodies, though it is commonly applied to discarnate states as well.
“Rebirth” denotes the Buddhist view that while this is indeed what seems to happen, the true process is entirely impersonal.
What, therefore, in terms of relative truth appears as Reincarnation, is in terms of absolute truth Rebirth.
The formulation of Dependent Origination describes the process as follows: ignorance conditions sankhaaras, the sankhaaras condition consciousness, consciousness conditions mind-and-body, and so on.
This means that the pattern or “shape” of a person's character is based on ignorance; this pattern is impressed, like a seal on wax, on the new consciousness arising in the womb, on which the development of a new being depends.
The Western assumption that character and mental traits are genetically inherited is not accepted in Buddhism; true, there may be some genetic element, apart from the purely physical side, but essential inheritance here is karmic.
The apparent inheritance of mental traits can be explained in many other ways.
In part, it is mere assumption.
If a child turns out to be musical, people will recall that his uncle George used to play the clarinet, a fact which would have been forgotten had the child been tone-deaf.
Parental and other environmental influences can undoubtedly account for much, especially when we allow for unconscious influence.
Sir Alister Hardy has even suggested that genes may be capable of being influenced telepathically.
Further, the “choice” of one's parents is bound to be influenced by some affinity, and even by karmic links from the past.
By the same token, suggestions that it would be possible to breed a race of “clones” with identical reactions belongs, no doubt very fortunately, strictly to realm of science fiction.
Such people even if bred would not be karmically identical, any more than identical twins are.
Life is not as mechanical as all that.
For one who has attained full Enlightenment in this life, the death of the body brings with it the end of all individual existence: this at least is the Theravada teaching.
This is called anupaadisesa-nibbaana, “Nibbaana without the groups remaining.” While the final attainment of Nibbaana should not be understood as mere annihilation in the materialistic sense, nothing positive can be predicated of it.
It is not the extinction of self, for that self never was real in the first place, nor is it “entering into Nibbaana,” for there is no being who enters.
It is the final cessation, however, of the five aggregates which were the product of greed, hatred and delusion.
We may think of it as a state of utter peace, and perhaps we can leave it at that.
It is the Deathless State.
In his elaborate survey of Buddhist meditation methods, the Ven.
Dr.
Vajira~naa.na says this of the meditation on mindfulness of death: “It virtually belongs to the Vipassanaa meditation, for the disciple should develop it while holding the perception of anicca, dukkha, and anattaa.
When the Ven.
Somdet Phra Vanarata, the then Vice-Patriarch of Thailand, visited Wat Dhammapadiipa, Hampstead, London, on rd October, he spoke on the subject of death.
He said that we are fortunate to be born in the human condition, in full possession of all our faculties, as this gives us the possibility of hearing the Dhamma and practicing it.
This is an advantage we should not neglect, because birth in the human state is a rare thing.
If people are born blind or deaf, or without other faculties, this is the result of kamma.
They may have to wait for another opportunity.
We should always remember the inevitability of death.
The awareness of this should make us cease from clinging too much to worldly things.
If we constantly keep the thought of death before our minds, this will be an instigation to work hard on ourselves and make good progress.
The standard Meditation on Death is given by Buddhaghosa in Chapter VIII of the Visuddhimagga.
It may be summarized as follows: Buddhaghosa begins by stating the kinds of death he is not considering: the final passing of the Arahant; “momentary death”; or metaphorical uses of the term “death.” He refers to timely death which comes with exhaustion of merit, or the life-span, or both, and to untimely death produced by kamma that interrupts other kamma.
One should go into solitary retreat and exercise attention wisely thus: “Death will take place, the life faculty will be interrupted,” or “Death, death.” Unwise attention may arise in the form of sorrow, joy, indifference, or fear.
There should always be mindfulness, a sense of urgency, and knowledge.
Then “access-concentration” may be gained — and this is the basis for the arising of Insight.
“But,” says Buddhaghosa, “one who finds that it does not get so far should do his recollecting of death in eight ways, that is to say: as having the appearance of a murderer, as the ruin of success, by comparison, as to sharing the body with many, as to the frailty of life, as signless, as to the limitedness of the extent, as to the shortness of the moment.” Some of these terms are not quite self-explanatory: thus means by comparing oneself with others — even the great and famous, even Buddhas, have to die; means that the body is inhabited by all sorts of strange beings, “the eighty families of worms.” They live in dependence on, and feed on, the outer skin, the inner skin, the flesh, the sinews, the bones, the marrow, “and there they are born, grow old and die, evacuate, and make water, and the body is their maternity home, their hospital, their charnel ground, their privy and their urinal.” means that death is unpredictable, refers to the shortness of the human life-span.
Buddhaghosa concludes: “A bhikkhu devoted to mindfulness of death is constantly diligent.
He acquires perception of disenchantment with all kinds of becoming.
He conquers attachment to life.
He condemns evil.
He avoids much storing.
He has not stain of avarice about requisites.
Perception of impermanence grows in him, following upon which there appear the perceptions of pain and not-self.
But while beings who have not developed mindfulness of death fall victims to fear, horror and confusion at the time of death as though suddenly seized by wild beasts, spirits, snakes, robbers, or murderers, he dies undeluded and fearless without falling into any such state.
And if he does not attain the deathless here and now, he is at least headed for a happy destiny on the break up of the body.
There are still those who suppose that it is somehow “unscientific” to believe in any form of survival.
There is actually no justification for this view, and certainly today not all scientists would endorse it.
As has been pointed out earlier, there are psychological reasons why some scientists almost willfully shut their eyes to all evidence for the paranormal; this enables them to continue operating on the assumption that all manifestations of “mind” are simply by-products of the body, determined by it and perishing with it.
In this way, mental activities are reduced to “mere” functions of the brain, and so on.
In fact, however, it should be stressed that the brain does not think.
The human brain is a very remarkable organ, which has still been only very superficially explored, owing to obvious practical difficulties in addition to its own quite extraordinary complexity.
But quite certainly not all mental activities can be related to it.
The various forms of ESP phenomena are facts, and nothing in the physical brain has been found to account for them, even by officially materialist Soviet-bloc scientists who have a vested interest in establishing such a connection.
Telepathy, for instance, is not a form of “mental radio”: as the late G.N.M.
Tyrrell, who was both a distinguished psychic researcher and a radio expert, long ago pointed out, it does not obey the law governing all forms of physical radiation, the inverse square law connecting intensity with distance.
Now while the existence of telepathy does not in itself prove survival or rebirth — indeed it is often rather freely invoked to “explain” evidence pointing to survival — it does prove that something mental can “jump” through space with no physical link.
And this is of the very essence of rebirth in the Buddhist view.
And since telepathy is certainly a fact, and widely accepted as such, all arguments against the possibility of rebirth fall to the ground on this point alone.
The shrinking band of hardened skeptics who still doubt the fact of telepathy have quite clearly not faced up to the overwhelming evidence for it; indeed they have not even observed it in themselves, though it probably occurs to some extent with everybody, even if unrecognized as such.
There is, of course, a wealth of positive evidence for survival in general and for rebirth in particular.
The material collected by the Society for Physical Research over nearly a century is highly impressive, and every single item in these records has been subjected before acceptance to the most stringent tests — far more stringent in fact than for many modern scientific “discoveries.” On rebirth in particular, reference can now be made to Rebirth as Doctrine and Experience: Essays and Case Studies by Francis Story, which incorporates the same writer's Wheel publication The Case for Rebirth.
Dr.
Ian Stevenson, Carlson Professor of Psychiatry and Director of the Division of Parapsychology in the University of Virginia School of Medicine, who collaborated with Francis Story, is the author of a number of important works on the subject, including Twenty Cases Suggestive of Reincarnation, and three volumes of Cases of the Reincarnation Type.
A Penguin book probably still obtainable which gives an admirable survey of the general field of psychic phenomena is G.N.M.
Tyrrell's The Personality of Man; some further fascinating material can also be found in The Cathars and Reincarnation by a distinguished English psychiatrist, Dr.
Arthur Guirdham.
The extraordinary career of Edgar Cayce, who has now become something of a cult-figure in the U.S.A, is well worth studying; one of the best books on him is Many Mansions by Dr.
Gina Cerminara, first published in and often reprinted.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
One day not too long ago I picked up on my shortwave radio an interview with an American futurist whose name I didn't catch.
A futurist, as the word implies, is one whose job it is to predict the future.
By collating a vast amount of information about developments presently taking place in various fields, he discovers the most prominent trends at work beneath the surface of events, and by projecting from these trends he constructs a picture of the future over increasingly longer time frames — over the coming decade, century, and millennium.
Naturally, as temporal distance from the present increases, the picture he paints becomes proportionally more liable to error; but though an element of conjecture is unavoidable in all long-range forecasts, what the futurist holds is that his projections are based squarely on the trajectory we are traveling along today.
The questions the interviewer posed drew out from the futurist an astonishing picture of things to come.
In his cheery view, the great perennial springs of human suffering are about to yield to the insistent pressure of our ingenuity and determination to create a better world.
The next century will usher in an era of unprecedented progress, prosperity, and justice, with radical changes taking place even on the most primordial frontiers of biology.
Couples who want children will no longer be dependent on natural processes vulnerable to chance and tragedy: they will be able to specify the precise features they would like their children to have and they'll get exactly what they want.
Medical science will find cures for cancer, AIDS, and other dreaded illnesses, while virtually every vital organ will be replaceable by a synthetic counterpart.
Biologists will discover how to halt the process of aging, enabling us to preserve our youthfulness and vitality well into our twilight years.
By the end of the next century our life span itself will be extended to years.
And before the next millennium draws to a close, science will have found the key to immortality: “That's a hundred percent certain,” he assured us.
While I listened to this intelligent, articulate man ramble on with such optimistic verve, I felt a sense of uneasiness gnawing away in my gut.
“What's wrong with this picture?” I kept on asking myself, “What's missing?
What's so troubling?” Here he was, depicting a world in which humanity would triumph over every ancient nemesis, perhaps even over death itself; and yet I felt that I just couldn't buy it, that I would prefer this wretched, fragile, vulnerable, existence nature has conferred on us by birth.
Why?
For one thing, it seemed to me that his glowing picture of the future depended on some pretty big assumptions — assumptions which could only work by conveniently turning a blind eye to other present trends which are very far from comforting.
He was presupposing that advances in technology will bring only benefits without entailing new problems just as formidable as those that taunt us today; that by sheer cleverness we will be able to rectify old blunders without having to curb the greed that caused those blunders in the first place; that people will spontaneously place the common good above the promptings of naked avarice; that the spread of material affluence will suffice to eliminate the suspicion, hatred, and cruelty that have bred so much misery throughout history.
But, as I continue to reflect, I realized that this was not all that was troubling me about the futurist's picture; I felt there was something still deeper scratching at the back of my mind.
At its root, I came to see, my disquietude revolved around the issue of orientation.
The picture he presented showed a future in which human beings are completely immersed in temporal concerns, absorbed in the battle against natural limitations, oriented entirely to the conditioned world.
What was conspicuously absent from his picture was what might be called “the dimension of transcendence.” There was no hint that human existence is not a self-enclosed circle from which it gains its meaning, that the quest for true fulfillment requires reference to a domain beyond everything finite and temporal.
By deleting all mention of a “dimension of transcendence” the futurist could portray a humanity pledged to the idea that the ultimate good is to be realized by gaining mastery over the external world rather than mastery over ourselves.
Given that life involves suffering, and that suffering arises from the clash between our desires and the nature of the world, we can deal with suffering either by changing the world so that it conforms to our desires or by changing ourselves so that our desires harmonize with the world.
The picture drawn by the futurist showed a future in which the first alternative prevailed; but the Buddha, and all humanity's other great spiritual teachers as well, unanimously recommend the second route.
For them our task is not so much to manipulate the outer conditions responsible for our discontent as it is to overcome the subjective roots of discontent, to vanquish our own selfishness, craving, and ignorance.
In preferring the more ancient approach I don't mean to suggest that we must passively submit to all the frailties to which human life is prone.
Stoic resignation is certainly not the answer.
We must strive to eliminate debilitating diseases, to promote economic and social justice, to fashion a world in which the basic amenities of health and happiness are as widely distributed as possible.
But when the driving engine of civilization becomes sheer innovation in techniques we risk venturing into dangerous areas.
To struggle with Promethean audacity to bend nature to our will so that all the objective causes of our suffering will be obliterated seems an exercise in hubris — in arrogance and presumption — and, as we know from Greek tragedy, hubris inevitably provokes the wrath of the gods.
Even if our reckless tinkering with the natural order does not unleash a cosmic cataclysm, we still risk a gradual descent into the trivialization and mechanization of human life.
For by making technological ingenuity the criterion of progress we lose sight of the moral depth and elevation of character which have always been the classical hallmarks of human greatness.
We flatten out the vertical dimensions of our being, reducing ourselves to a purely horizontal plane in which all that matters is technical expertise and organizational efficiency.
Thereby we veer closer to the situation described by T.S.
Eliot, “The world ends not with a bang but a whimper.
While I reflected on the futurist's predictions, there came to mind a series of verses from the Dhammapada which offer a strikingly different picture of the challenge facing us in our lives.
The verses occur in the “Chapter of the Thousands,” vv.-.
The first four stanzas tell us that it is not how long we live that really counts, but how we live, the qualities we embody in our innermost being: “Better than to live a hundred years immoral and unconcentrated is it to live a single day virtuous and meditative.
Better than to live a hundred years foolish and unconcentrated is it to live a single day wise and meditative.
Better than to live a hundred years lazy and dissipated is it to live a single day with energy firmly aroused.
Better than to live a hundred years without seeing the rise and fall of things is it to live a single day seeing the rise and fall of things.
In these verses the Buddha tells us that our primary task, the task to which all others should be subordinate, is to master ourselves.
The challenge he throws at us is not to remove all the thorns strewn over the earth, but to put on sandals, to vanquish the desires responsible for our suffering in the very place where they arise: in our own minds.
As long as our lives are ruled by desire, there will never be an end to discontent, for the elimination of one obstacle will only give rise to a new one in a self-replicating cycle.
What is essential is not to prolong life by readjusting biological processes so that they fulfill our wildest dreams, but to ennoble life by sober mental training within the humble limits of our natural condition.
And this is achieved, as the Buddha repeatedly stresses, by the triple discipline of moral restraint, meditation, and deep insight into the impermanence of all conditioned things.
The last two verses in this series introduce the end toward which this training points, which is also the goal toward which our lives should be steered: “Better than to live a hundred years without seeing the Deathless is it to live a single day seeing the Deathless.
Better than to live a hundred years without seeing the Supreme Truth is it to live a single day seeing the Supreme Truth.” If human progress is not to be reduced to a mere pageant of technological stunts aimed at pushing back our natural limits, we require some polestar toward which to steer our lives, something which enables us to transcend the boundaries of both life and death.
For Buddhism that is Nibbana, the Deathless, the Supreme Truth, the state beyond all limiting conditions.
Without this transcendent element we might explore the distant galaxies and play cards with the genetic code, but our lives will remain vain and hollow.
Fullness of meaning can come only from the source of meaning, from that which is transcendent and unconditioned.
To strive for this goal is to find a depth of value and a peak of excellence that can never be equaled by brazen technological audacity.
To realize this goal is to reach the end of suffering: to find deathlessness here and now, even in the midst of this imperfect world still subject, as always, to old age, illness, and death.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The discourse of the Buddha on the Snake Simile that is presented here, together with explanatory notes taken mostly from the commentarial literature, is the nd text in the “Collection of Discourses of Medium Length”.
It is a text rich of contents and graced by many similes.
At the very beginning there is a sequence of ten pithy similes on the perils of sense desires; then follows the simile on correctly or wrongly getting hold of a snake; further, and still better known, the parable of the raft; and finally the simile of the vegetation of the Jeta Grove.
The evocative power of these similes will strengthen the impact of the sutta's message, in him who ponders on them deeply and repeatedly.
The main concern of this discourse is to warn against misconceptions, misrepresentations and dilution of the Teaching.
While the Buddha repeatedly stressed that his Teaching should be accepted only after due investigation, and uninfluenced by tradition or external authority; while he also advised his monks to make light of praise and blame of the Teaching uttered by outsiders; the Master was quite firm, and even stern, when misrepresentations of the Teaching occurred on the part of his monks — that is, by those who had accepted the Teaching and had chosen a life devoted to its realization.
Our discourse is not the only one where the Buddha had voiced a stern rebuke of monks who misinterpreted essential parts of the Teaching.
What moved the Buddha to do so was his deep concern that the efficacy of his unique Path of Deliverance should not be impaired, his Teaching not be undermined from within, and the purity of conduct and wisdom not be tarnished.
If that were to be, the raft of the Teaching of which the discourse speaks, would be rendered incapable of carrying those across who have placed their confidence in it.
The raft would forever be chained to the Hither Shore by those very fetters from which it is intended to bring release.
Our discourse deals with two chief obstacles which will impede the raft's progress: the affirmation of sense-gratification and the affirmation of ego-belief.
If, by misrepresenting the Teaching, these are admitted entrance in it, in whatever guise and whatever degree of dilution, they will necessarily nullify the effort for final liberation.
It should be noted that it is the affirmation, the approval, of those two tendencies that constitutes misrepresentation of the Teaching.
These two tendencies themselves — i.e., sensuality and ego-belief — are deeply ingrained in human nature as we find it.
They are, in fact, the two tap-roots from which existence and, with it, suffering spring: craving and ignorance.
To weaken them first and finally eradicate them is the difficult task before us which, however, we can face courageously if guided by the methods of the Dhamma which are realistic as well as radical.
But if what ought to be overcome is actually affirmed and approved; if hidden or open reservations with regard to either of these two tendencies are maintained, there is obviously no chance for achieving mind's final deliverance from that bondage to craving and ignorance.
The attitude towards dispassion and towards the doctrine of egolessness is, in fact, a crucial test how far the core of the Teaching has been preserved or impaired or entirely abandoned in those presentations of the Dhamma that appeared after the Master passed away; and some of these developments obviously do not stand the test.
Considering all this, we shall understand and appreciate the grave warning and the firm repudiation expressed in our discourse by the Master wishing for the welfare and progress of those who had confidence in his guidance.
The first section of the discourse deals with the rejection of the views held by the monk Ari.t.tha.
His views are not merely a misconception of the Teaching but a direct challenge of some of the Buddha's statements.
Ari.t.tha expressly denies that what the Buddha taught as obstructive is an obstruction by necessity.
He does not specify the obstructions he means, but from the monks' reply, referring to sense-desires, it is evident that they were well aware of Ari.t.tha's intention: the condoning of sex indulgence for a monk.
It need hardly be stressed that the Buddha's firm rejection of such condonation was meant for monks only.
Of his lay followers he did not expect sexual abstinence.
To them he advised restraint and mindfulness, and avoidance of giving excessive nourishment to sex desire.
Here, if anywhere, a middle path between unrestrained indulgence and enforced repression was apt.
But the Buddha made it clear that full deliverance required full detachment from desire.
The gradual progress towards it, however, was left to the degree of insight and self-control possessed and developed by the individual lay follower.
For the monk, however, it was expected that the ardor of his quest for the final goal, the serenity of mind and emotional satisfaction derived from meditation, and his relative freedom from external sense titillation — that all these and other factors should enable him to keep the sex urge well in check and his mind tranquil enough for allowing further progress on the road to radical detachment.
He who could not attain to that degree of self-mastery, was free to leave the Order, and no stigma was attached; and he was also free to return whenever he wanted.
But inside the Sangha no compromise could be admitted unless the Buddha was to invite disintegration from within and disrepute from without.
The instance of Ari.t.tha's wrong view is now used by the Buddha as an opportunity to warn against any other wrong approach to the Teaching, and the misuse of it.
He gives here the simile of the wrong grasp of a snake to illustrate the harm and the danger of misconceiving the Dhamma.
The harm done is to the individual's character and his progress on the Path; and the danger is the likelihood of his falling into lower forms of existence, or at the least a rebirth unfavorable to the understanding and practicing of the Dhamma.
That such results may follow, can be easily understood in the case of Ari.t.tha's views which are an outright reversal and corruption of the Teaching.
It may, however, at first sight be surprising to the reader that, in the section now under consideration, the misuse of the Teaching for the verbal wrangles of disputation is likewise regarded as a dangerously wrong grasp of the Dhamma.
Here the danger and harm have more subtle, but no less real, roots.
The danger in contentiousness is chiefly twofold.
It provides one of the many evasions by which the mind shirks from devoting itself earnestly to the actual practice of the Dhamma.
Secondly, under the respectable guise of the advocacy of the Dhamma, the attachment to “I” and “Mine” finds an easy outlet.
In disputations the ego gets the chance to indulge in self-assertion, superiority feeling, self-righteousness and opinionatedness.
Furthermore, the ego may attach itself to the Dhamma in an attitude of possessiveness which sometimes may even resemble the behavior of a dog jealously and angrily defending a morsel of food without having himself the inclination to eat it.
We see here the danger that an excessive concern with an argumentative advocacy of the Dhamma may strengthen subconsciously the deeply engrained egotistic impulses.
It may even become one of the “grounds for false views” as describe by the Buddha.
Finally, from indulging in wordy warfare will also spring feelings of partisanship, intolerance, fanaticism and hostility.
Truly, we have here a formidable catalogue of detrimental qualities of mind, and from this we can now better understand why the Buddha applied here, too, the metaphor of the dangerously wrong way of grasping a snake.
He who is so much preoccupied with doctrinal controversy, furnishes, indeed, a fitting illustration of one who carries the raft of the Dhamma on his head or shoulders; and, in his case, this will be not after the crossing but before he has done, or even seriously tried, the fording of the stream.
In fact, this famous parable of the raft will in most cases apply to those who, in the words of the Dhammapada, “run up and down the river's bank” on this side of the stream, without daring or wishing to cross.
We find them using the raft for a variety of purposes: they will adorn it and adore it, discuss it, compare it — indeed anything else than use it.
There are, on the other hand, those who wrongly believe that this parable justifies them in jettisoning the raft before they have used it, and that it invites them to let go the good teachings along with the false ones, even before they have benefited by the former and fully discarded the latter.
As we see, there are, indeed, many more ways of “grasping wrongly” than of grasping rightly; hence the strong emphasis laid on examining wisely the true meaning and purpose of the Dhamma.
And there should be frequent re-examination — lest we forget.
This section on the “grounds for false views” connects with the mention of “false teachings” in the preceding paragraph.
Here, and in almost all the following sections, up to §, it is the gravest of all wrong views — the belief in a Self, in an abiding ego-entity — that is dealt with from different angles.
Our discourse is one of the most important texts concerned with the Anattaa-doctrine, the teaching on Not-self.
This teaching is the core of the Buddhist doctrine and a singular feature of it.
It is of a truly revolutionary nature, and hence it is not easily absorbed by the human mind which, since an unfathomable past, has been habituated to think, and to induce action, in terms of “I” and “Mine.” But this bias towards egocentricity has to be broken on the intellectual, emotional, and ethical level, if deliverance from suffering is ever to be won.
In this task, the repeated and careful contemplation of our discourse can become a valuable aid.
In § the Buddha speaks of the sources from which the notion of a self is derived and formed.
It is, in the first instance, the identification with any or all of the five aggregates constituting what is conventionally called the personality.
Identification with the body is the “ground” or standpoint for materialism.
Feeling is seen as the core of Being, in the hedonist's attitude to life, or when, in mystical teachings, the soul is regarded as pure Divine Bliss or Divine Love.
The self is identified with perception when being is equated with perceiving, when the personality is regarded as “nothing but” a bundle of sensations.
The mental formations contribute to ego-belief when, e.g., the will is regarded as the ultimate essence of self and world; or when any other function of the mind receives an excessive emotional or intellectual emphasis.
The aggregate of consciousness is circumscribed, in the discourses, by terms denoting the content of consciousness, indicating hereby that the self is here believed to be the totality of mind or consciousness.
Included in this view are the conceptions of a Super- or Cosmic Consciousness, or any notion of an “Over-self”, imagined to exist “beyond the five aggregates.
The view that the self is the unity of all five aggregates is found, for instance, in those religions which believe in a final resurrection of a body or in other forms of survival of the whole personality, body and mind, be it in an eternal heaven or an eternal hell.
The first five “grounds for false views” can be summarized by the following succinct statement of the Buddha: “Those ascetics and brahmans, O monks, who conceive a self in many ways, all those conceive it as the five aggregates or as one of them”.
As to the sixth “ground for false views,” it should be noted that it does not consist in the eternalist view itself, but in the strong attachment to that view, up to the degree of full identification with it, as part and parcel of one's individuality: “This is mine, this I am, this is my self.” Such a tenacious clinging to the soul-belief has its roots firstly in the deep urge for self-assertion and self-perpetuation; and secondly in the “conditioning” forces of education, environment and tradition.
Like the other more common types of “self-defense,” this identification with the belief in a self can assume quite a passionate character, with hostility or contempt for those who do not share it.
The persistence of the soul-belief is demonstrated by the fact that from the earliest time of the Teaching up to the present day there have been not only individuals, but also groups and sects within the Buddhist fold who believed in a self though they usually relegate it to a realm beyond the five aggregates.
In the next section, it is shown that the belief in “I” and “Mine,” instead of giving a feeling of security, is, in fact, a cause of anxiety, fear and worry.
And even when the faith in an immortal soul breaks down, its after-effect is still so strong that the assumption of a self that can be destroyed still persists, and, through the fear of annihilation, becomes a source of despair.
This belief in “I” and “Mine,” and the passionate attachment to it, is at the root of the existentialist philosopher's “anguish” as well as of the anxiety neuroses that haunt modern man.
The belief in unrealities, even if a temporary solace, must ultimately end in disappointment and despair.
Hence the Buddha took great care to question and re-question his monks on this crucial point of soul and self, in order to remove any doubt in this respect.
The thorough manner of his inquiry is exemplified in §§- which leave no room for ambiguity on this issue.
In §§- all the possible constituents of an alleged self are examined and found to be evanescent, liable to suffering and without a self or any other underlying substance.
It should be noted that the statement of the text extends also to the most sublime manifestations of consciousness, be they conceived as internal or external.
Though the analysis of “the individual and its property” as given in the preceding sections is placed here in the context of refuting wrong views, this is in no way its intrinsic value and purpose, which rather consists in opening the gateway to liberation.
To indicate this, §§- speak of the attainment of final deliverance in sainthood, brought about by insight that leads to alienation and detachment from all that is transient and void of substance.
In the following there is an impressive metaphorical description of the saint, concluding with the solemn declaration of the “untraceable” nature of one who has uprooted all craving and ignorance.
With express reference to that solemn utterance, the Buddha now rejects emphatically the imputation that a denial of self and soul makes him a nihilist and he summarizes his teaching in those words of wide renown:
“What I teach now as before, O monks, is suffering and the cessation of suffering.
In the section on “Praise and Blame”, we have a practical application of the Anattaa-doctrine: it frees the mind from elation and pride in the case of praise, and from dejection and anger in the case of blame.
The Buddha asks his disciples to emulate him in this respect.
To be unshaken in the serene detachment of one's mind by any approval or disapproval by others, this is another benefit bestowed by the deep realization of the truth of Anattaa.
Pointing out this additional benefit the Master makes another earnest appeal to the monks to give up attachment to “what is not yours”: the five aggregates constituting the so-called personality.
Indeed, if viewed in the single-minded and passion-free detachment of insight-meditation, these physical and mental processes, so long regarded as “I” and “Mine,” will be seen to be as alien as the vegetation of the Jeta Grove to which the Buddha's finger may have pointed while he spoke.
The symphonic rhythm of this great discourse approaches now its finale.
It is the majestic voice of uncompromising truth that speaks here in grave tones of crystal-clear penetrative power, without any gentler softening and soothing notes.
The teaching as here conveyed, “plain and open, explicit and consistent,” was and is a bold challenge of “public opinion.” It goes counter to the two mighty currents of sense desire and self-affirmation which make up the “common stream” of mankind.
In this discourse, the Buddha rejects repeatedly and excludes carefully any attempt at compromise in these two respects.
Furthermore the Buddha voices here a grave warning that a wrong grasp and misuse of the Dhamma may bring much harm and suffering.
All escape routes for circumventing the true purpose and for avoiding the salient truths of the Doctrine were thus envisaged and carefully closed.
In this brief recapitulation, our discourse appears indeed as a rather formidable assemblage of stern messages.
Yet, for one who is familiar with the Buddha Word, this will be softened by the fact that in numerous discourses the Buddha spoke of his Teaching as one that offers “gradual training, gradual progress.” It is here that the Buddha's gentleness and compassion appears, his forbearance with human frailties, and his wise and patient guidance of men.
Our discourse, too, ends on an encouraging note of assurance.
Having earlier evoked the inspiring image of the saint, the Master now speaks of the fruits and highest summit, the final deliverance in saintship, preceded by the three Noble Paths leading to it, to the access stage of mind's growing maturity for enlightenment, down to those aspirants who, in the indubitable confrontation with the Truth by way of insight-meditation, have won deep faith in the Master and sublime love for him.
Of them our discourse says that they are assured of those superhuman realms which are usually called “heaven.” But it may well be as the ancients explain, that it is “the heaven on earth” which is meant here: the superhuman bliss experienced when for the first time, and still imperfect, the insight dawns on the meditator that phenomena, being evanescent and coreless throughout, do not and cannot enforce bondage unless we ourselves forge the chains of craving and delusion.
— Dhammapada, vv.
-
— Nyanaponika Thera
Thus have I heard.
Once the Blessed One lived at Saavatthii, in Jeta's Grove, in Anaathapi.n.dika's monastery.
Now on that occasion a monk called Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, had conceived this pernicious view: “There are things called 'obstructions' by the Blessed One.
As I understand his teaching, those things are not necessarily obstructive for one who pursues them.
Several monks, hearing about it, went to the monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, and asked him: “Is it true, friend Ari.t.tha, that you have conceived this pernicious view: “There are things called by the Blessed One.
As I understand his teaching, those things are not necessarily obstructive for one who pursues them'?
“Yes, indeed, friends,.
Then those monks, wishing to dissuade Ari.t.tha from that pernicious view, urged, admonished, questioned and exhorted him thus: “Do not say so, friend Ari.t.tha, do not say so!
Do not misrepresent the Blessed One!
It is not right to misrepresent him.
Never would the Blessed One speak like that.
For in many ways, indeed, has the Blessed One said of those obstructive things that they are obstructions, indeed, and that they necessarily obstruct him who pursues them.
Sense desires, so he has said, bring little enjoyment and much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
Sense desires are like bare bones, has the Blessed One said; they are like a lump of flesh, like a torch of straw, like a pit of burning coals, like a dream, like borrowed goods, like a fruit-bearing tree, like a slaughter house, like a stake of swords, like a snake's head, are sense desires, has the Blessed One said.
They bring little enjoyment, and much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
Yet, though the monk Ari.t.tha was thus urged, admonished, questioned and exhorted by those monks, he still clung tenaciously and obstinately to his pernicious view, saying: “There are things called 'obstructions' by the Blessed One.
As I understand his teaching, those things are not necessarily obstructive for one who pursues them.
When those monks could not dissuade the monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, from his pernicious view, they went to the Blessed One, and after respectfully saluting him, they sat down at one side.
Being seated they told the Blessed One, and they said: “Since, O Lord, we could not dissuade the monk Ari.t.tha from his pernicious view, we have now reported this matter to the Blessed One.
Then the Blessed One addressed a certain monk thus: “Go, O monk, and tell the monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, that the Master calls him.” — “Yes, Lord,” replied the monk.
He went to the monk Ari.t.tha and spoke to him: “The Master calls you, friend Ari.t.tha.” — “Yes, friend,” replied Ari.t.tha and he went to meet the Blessed One.
Having arrived, he saluted the Blessed One respectfully and sat down at one side.
When he was seated the Blessed One addressed him thus:
“Is it true, Ari.t.tha, that you have conceived this pernicious view: 'There are things called “obstructions” by the Blessed One.
As I understand his teaching those things are not necessarily obstructive for him who pursues them'?” — “Yes, indeed, Lord, I understand the teaching of the Blessed One in this way that those things called 'obstructions' by the Blessed One, are not necessarily obstructive for him who pursues them.
“Of whom do you know, foolish man, that I have taught to him the teaching in that manner?
Did I not, foolish man, speak in many ways of those obstructive things that they are obstructions indeed, and that they necessarily obstruct him who pursues them?
Sense desires, so I have said, bring little enjoyment, and much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
Sense desires are like bare bones, have I said; they are like a lump of flesh… they are like a snake's head, have I said.
They bring much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
But you, O foolish man, have misrepresented us by what you personally have wrongly grasped.
You have undermined your own and have created much demerit.
This, foolish man, will bring you much harm and suffering for a long time.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks thus: “What do you think, O monks: has that monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, produced any spark in this teaching and discipline?” — “How should that be, Lord?
Certainly not, O Lord.
After these words the monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, sat silent, confused, with his shoulders drooping and his head bent, brooding and incapable of making a rejoinder.
Then the Blessed One, knowing, spoke to him: “You will be known, foolish man, by what is your own pernicious view, I shall now question the monks about this.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Do you, O monks, also understand the teaching proclaimed by me, in the same manner as this monk Ari.t.tha does, who misrepresents us by what he personally has wrongly grasped; who has undermined his own and created much demerit?
“Certainly not, Lord.
For in many ways has the Blessed One told us of those obstructive things that they are obstructions indeed, and that they necessarily obstruct him who pursues them… “Good, monks.
It is good that you thus understand the teaching proclaimed by me.
For in many ways have I spoken of those obstructive things that they are obstructions, indeed, and that they necessarily obstruct him who pursues them.
Sense desires, so have I said, bring little enjoyment, and much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
Sense desires are like bare bones, have I said; they are like a lump of flesh, like a torch of straw, like a pit of burning coals, like a dream, like borrowed goods, like a fruit-bearing tree, like a slaughter-house, like a stake of swords; like a snake's head are sense desires, have I said.
They bring much suffering and disappointment.
The perils in them are greater.
But this monk Ari.t.tha, formerly of the vulture killers, misrepresents us by what he personally has wrongly grasped; he undermines his own and creates much demerit.
This will bring to this foolish man much harm and suffering for a long time.
“Monks, it is impossible indeed, that one can pursue sense gratification without sensual desire, without perceptions of sensual desire, without thoughts of sensual desire.
“There are here, O monks, some foolish men who study the Teaching; having studied it, they do not wisely examine the purpose of those teachings.
To those who do not wisely examine the purpose, these teachings will not yield insight.
They study the Teaching only to use it for criticizing or for refuting others in disputation.
They do not experience the purpose for which they study the Teaching.
To them these teachings wrongly grasped, will bring harm and suffering for a long time.
And why?
Because of their wrong grasp of the teachings.
“Suppose, monks, a man wants a snake, looks for a snake, goes in search of a snake.
He then sees a large snake, and when he is grasping its body or its tail, the snake turns back on him and bites his hand or arm or some other limb of his.
And because of that he suffers death or deadly pain.
And why?
Because of his wrong grasp of the snake.
“Similarly, O monks, there are here some foolish men who study the Teaching; having studied it, they do not wisely examine the purpose of those teachings.
To those who do not wisely examine the purpose, these teachings will not yield insight.
They study the Teaching only to use it for criticizing or for refuting others in disputation.
They do not experience the purpose for which they study the Teaching.
To them these teachings wrongly grasped, will bring harm and suffering for a long time.
And why?
Because of their wrong grasp of the teachings.
“But there are here, O monks, some noble sons who study the Teaching; and having studied it, they examine wisely the purpose of those teachings.
To those who wisely examine the purpose, these teachings will yield insight.
They do not study the Teaching for the sake of criticizing nor for refuting others in disputation.
They experience the purpose for which they study the Teaching; and to them these teachings being rightly grasped, will bring welfare and happiness for a long time.
And why?
Because of their right grasp of the teachings.
“Suppose, monks, a man wants a snake, looks for a snake, goes in search of a snake.
He then sees a large snake, and with a forked stick he holds it firmly down.
Having done so he catches it firmly by the neck.
Then although the snake might entwine with its body that man's hand or arm or some other limb of his, still he does not on that account suffer death or deadly pain.
And why not?
Because of his right grasp of the snake.
“Similarly, O monks, there are here some noble sons who study the Teaching; and having learned it, they examine wisely the purpose of those teachings.
To those who wisely examine the purpose, these teachings will yield insight.
They do not study the Teaching for the sake of criticizing nor for refuting others in disputation.
They experience the purpose for which they study the Teaching; and to them these teachings being rightly grasped, will bring welfare and happiness for a long time.
And why?
Because of their right grasp of the teachings.
“Therefore, O monks, if you know the purpose of what I have said, you should keep it in mind accordingly.
But if you do not know the purpose of what I have said, you should question me about it, or else those monks who are wise.
“I shall show you, monks, the Teaching's similitude to a raft: as having the purpose of crossing over, not the purpose of being clung to.
Listen, monks, and heed well what I shall say” — “Yes, Lord,” replied the monks.
and the Blessed One spoke thus:
“Suppose, monks, there is a man journeying on a road and he sees a vast expanse of water of which this shore is perilous and fearful, while the other shore is safe and free from danger.
But there is no boat for crossing nor is there a bridge for going over from this side to the other.
So the man thinks: 'This is a vast expanse of water; and this shore is perilous and fearful, but the other shore is safe and free from danger.
There is, however, no boat here for crossing, nor a bridge for going over from this side to the other.
Suppose I gather reeds, sticks, branches and foliage, and bind them into a raft.' Now that man collects reeds, sticks, branches and foliage, and binds them into a raft.
Carried by that raft, laboring with hands and feet, he safely crosses over to the other shore.
Having crossed and arrived at the other shore, he thinks: 'This raft, indeed, has been very helpful to me.
Carried by it, laboring with hands and feet, I got safely across to the other shore.
Should I not lift this raft on my head or put it on my shoulders, and go where I like?'
“What do you think about it, O monks?
Will this man by acting thus, do what should be done with a raft?” — “No, Lord” — “How then, monks, would he be doing what ought to be done with a raft?
Here, monks, having got across and arrived at the other shore, the man thinks: 'This raft, indeed, has been very helpful to me.
Carried by it, and laboring with hands and feet, I got safely across to the other shore.
Should I not pull it up now to the dry land or let it float in the water, and then go as I please?' By acting thus, monks, would that man do what should be done with a raft.
“In the same way, monks, have I shown to you the Teaching's similitude to a raft: as having the purpose of crossing over, not the purpose of being clung to.
“You, O monks, who understand the Teaching's similitude to a raft, you should let go even teachings, how much more false ones!
“There are, monks, these six grounds for false views.
What are the six?
There is here, monks, an uninstructed worldling who has no regard for Noble Ones, who is ignorant of their teaching and untrained in it; who has no regard for men of worth, who is ignorant of their teaching and untrained in it: he considers corporeality thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; he considers feeling… perception… mental formations thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; and what is seen, heard, sensed, and thought; what is encountered, sought, pursued in mind, this also he considers thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; and also this ground for views: 'The universe is the Self.
That I shall be after death; permanent, stable, eternal, immutable; eternally the same, shall I abide in that very condition' — that, too, he considers thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self.'
“But, monks, there is here a well-instructed noble disciple who has regard for Noble Ones, who knows their teaching and is well trained in it; who has regard for men of worth, who knows their teaching and is well trained in it: he does not consider corporeality in this way: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; he does not consider feeling… perception… mental formations in this way: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; and what is seen, heard, sensed, and thought; what is encountered, sought, pursued in mind, this also he does not consider in this way: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'; and also this ground for views: 'The universe is the Self.
That I shall be after death; permanent, stable, eternal, immutable, eternally the same shall I abide in that very condition' — that, too, he does not consider thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self.'
“Considering thus, he is not anxious about unrealities.
When this was said, a certain monk asked the Blessed One:
“Lord, can there be anxiety about unrealities, in the external?
“There can be, O monk,” said the Blessed One.
“In that case, monk, someone thinks: 'Oh, I had it!
That, alas, I have no longer!
Oh, may I have it again!
But alas, I do not get it!' Hence he grieves, is depressed and laments; beating his breast, he weeps and dejection befalls him.
Thus, monk, is there anxiety about unrealities, in the external.
“But, Lord, can there be absence of anxiety about unrealities, in the external?
“There can be, O monk,” said the Blessed One.
“In that case, monk, someone does not think thus: 'Oh, I had it!
That, alas, I have no longer!
Oh, may I have it again!
But, alas, I do not get it!' Hence he does not grieve, is not depressed, does not lament; he does not beat his breast nor does he weep, and no dejection befalls him.
Thus, monk, is there absence of anxiety about unrealities, in the external.
“Lord, can there be anxiety about unrealities, in the internal?
“There can be, monk,” said the Blessed One.
“In that case, monk, someone has this view: 'The universe is the Self.
That I shall be after death; permanent, stable, eternal, immutable; eternally the same shall I abide in that very condition.' He then hears a Perfect One expounding the Teaching for the removal of all grounds for views, of all prejudices, obsessions, dogmas and biases; for the stilling of all processes, for the relinquishment of all substrata, for the extirpation of craving, for dispassion, cessation, Nibbaana.
He then thinks: 'I shall be annihilated, I shall be destroyed!
No longer shall I exist!' Hence he grieves, is depressed and laments; beating his breast, he weeps, and dejection befalls him.
Thus, monk, is there anxiety about unrealities, in the internal.
“But, Lord, can there be absence of anxiety about unrealities, in the internal?
“There can be, monk,” said the Blessed One.
“In that case, monk, someone does not have this view: 'The universe is the Self… eternally the same shall I abide in that very condition.' He then hears a Perfect One expounding the Teaching for the removal of all grounds for views, of all prejudices, obsessions, dogmas and biases; for the stilling of all processes, for the relinquishing of all substrata, for the extirpation of craving, for dispassion, cessation, Nibbaana.
He then does not think: 'I shall be annihilated, I shall be destroyed!
No longer shall I exist!' Hence he does not grieve, is not depressed, does not lament; he does not beat his breast nor does he weep, and no dejection befalls him.
Thus, monk, is there absence of anxiety about unrealities, in the internal.
“You may well take hold of a possession, O monks, that is permanent, stable, eternal, immutable, that abides eternally the same in its very condition.
do you see, monks, any such possession?” — “No, Lord.” — “Well, monks, I, too, do not see any such possession that is permanent, stable, eternal, immutable, that abides eternally the same in its very condition.
“You may well accept, monks, the assumption of a self-theory from the acceptance of which there would not arise sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief, and despair.
do you see, monks, any such assumption of a self-theory?” — “No, Lord.” — “Well, monks, I, too, do not see any such assumption of a self-theory from the acceptance of which there would not arise sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
“You may well rely, monks, on any supporting for views from the reliance on which there would not arise sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
do you see, monks, any such supporting for views?” — “No, Lord.” — “Well, monks, I, too, do not see any such supporting for views from the reliance on which there would not arise sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
“If there were a self, monks, would there be my self's property?” — “So it is, Lord.” — “Or if there is a self's property, would there by my self?” — “So it is, Lord.” — “Since in truth and in fact, self and self's property do not obtain, O monks, then this ground for views, 'The universe is the Self.
That I shall be after death; permanent, stable, eternal, immutable; eternally the same shall I abide, in that very condition' — is it not, monks, an entirely and perfectly foolish idea?” — “What else should it be, Lord?
It is an entirely and perfectly foolish idea.
“What do you think, monks: is corporeality permanent or impermanent?” — “Impermanent, Lord.” — “And what is impermanent, is it painful or pleasant?” — “Painful, Lord.” — “What is impermanent, painful, subject to change, is it fit to be considered thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?” — “Certainly not, Lord.” — “What do you think, monks: Is feeling… is perception… are mental formations… is consciousness… permanent or impermanent?” — “Impermanent, Lord.” — “And what is impermanent, is it painful or pleasant?” — “Painful, Lord.” — “And what is impermanent, painful, subject to change, is it fit to be considered thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self?” — “Certainly not, Lord.
“Therefore, monks, whatever corporeality, whether past, future, or present, in oneself or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near — all corporeality should with right wisdom, thus be seen as it is: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Whatever feeling… whatever perception… whatever mental formations… whatever consciousness, whether past, future or present, in oneself or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near — all… consciousness should, with right wisdom, thus be seen as it is: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Seeing this, monks, the well-instructed noble disciple becomes disgusted with corporeality, becomes disgusted with feeling, with perception, with mental formations, with consciousness.
“Through his being disgusted, his passion fades away.
His passion having faded, he is freed.
In him who is freed there is the knowledge of freedom: “Ceased has rebirth, fulfilled is the holy life, the task is done, there is no more of this to come,” thus he knows.
“This monk is called one who has removed the crossbar, has filled the moat, has broken the pillar, has unbolted; a Noble One who has taken down the flag, put down the burden, become unfettered.
“And how, monks, is that monk one who has removed the cross-bar?
Herein the monk has abandoned ignorance, has cut it off at the root, removed it from its soil like a palmyra tree, brought it to utter extinction, incapable of arising again.
Thus has he removed the cross-bar.
“And how, monks, is that monk one who has filled the moat?
Herein the monk has abandoned the round of rebirths, leading to renewed existence; he has cut it off at the root, removed it from its soil like a palmyra tree, brought it to utter extinction, incapable of arising again.
“And how has he broken the pillar?
He has abandoned craving, has cut it off at the root, removed it from its soil like a palmyra tree, brought it to utter extinction, incapable of arising again.
“And how has he unbolted?
He has abandoned the five lower fetters, has cut them off at the root, removed them from their soil like a palmyra tree, brought them to utter extinction, incapable of arising again.
“And how is the monk a Noble One who has taken down the flag, put down the burden, become unfettered?
He has abandoned the conceit of self, has cut it off at the root, removed it from is soil like a palmyra tree, brought it to utter extinction, incapable of arising again.
Thus is the monk a Noble One who has taken down the flag, put down the burden, become unfettered.
“When a monk's mind is thus freed, O monks, neither the gods with Indra, nor the gods with Brahma, nor the gods with the Lord of Creatures, when searching will find on what the consciousness of one thus gone is based.
Why is that?
One who has thus gone is no longer traceable here and now, so I say.
“So teaching, so proclaiming, O monks, I have been baselessly, vainly, falsely and wrongly accused by some ascetics and brahmans: 'A nihilist is the ascetic Gotama; He teaches the annihilation, the destruction, the non-being of an existing individual.'
“As I am not as I do not teach, so have I been baselessly, vainly, falsely and wrongly accused by some ascetics and brahmans thus: 'A nihilist is the ascetic Gotama; He teaches the annihilation, the destruction, the non-being of an existing individual.'
“What I teach now as before, O monks, is suffering and the cessation of suffering.
“If for that others revile, abuse, scold and insult the Perfect One, on that account, O monks, the Perfect One will not feel annoyance, nor dejection, nor displeasure in his heart.
And if for that others respect, revere, honor and venerate the Perfect One, on that account the Perfect One will not feel delight, nor joy, nor elation in his heart.
If for that others respect, revere, honor and venerate the Perfect One, He will think: 'It is towards this which was formerly fully comprehended, that they perform such acts.'
“Therefore, O monks, if you, too, are reviled, abused, scolded and insulted by others, you should on that account not entertain annoyance, nor dejection, nor displeasure in your hearts.
And if others respect, revere, honor and venerate you, on that account you should not entertain delight nor joy nor elation in your hearts.
If others respect, revere, honor and venerate you, you should think: 'It is towards this which was formerly comprehended, that they perform such acts.'
“Therefore, monks, give up whatever is not yours.
Your giving it up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
What is it that is not yours?
Corporeality is not yours.
Give it up!
Your giving it up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
Feeling is not yours.
Give it up!
Your giving it up will for a long bring you welfare and happiness.
Perception is not yours.
Give it up!
Your giving it up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
Mental formations are not yours.
Give them up!
Your giving them up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
Consciousness is not yours.
Give it up!
Your giving it up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
“What do you think, monks: if people were to carry away the grass, sticks, branches and leaves in this Jeta Grove, or burnt them or did with them what they pleased, would you think: These people carry us away, or burn us, or do with us as they please?” — “No, Lord.” — “Why not?” Because, Lord, that is neither our self nor the property of our self.” — “So, too, monks, give up what is not yours!
Your giving it up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
What is it that is not yours?
Corporeality… feeling… perception… mental formations… consciousness are not yours.
Give them up!
Your giving them up will for a long time bring you welfare and happiness.
“Monks, this Teaching so well proclaimed by me, is plain, open, explicit, free of patchwork.
In this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit and free of patchwork; for those who are arahants, free of taints, who have accomplished and completed their task, have laid down the burden, achieved their aim, severed the fetters binding to existence, who are liberated by full knowledge, there is no round of existence that can be ascribed to them.
“Monks, in this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit and free of patchwork, those monks who have abandoned the five lower fetters will all be reborn spontaneously and there they will pass away finally, no more returning from that world.
“Monks, in this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit and free of patchwork, those monks who have abandoned three fetters and have reduced greed, hatred and delusion, are all once-returners, and, returning only once to this world, will then make an end of suffering.
“Monks, in this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit and free of patchwork, those monks who have abandoned three fetters, are all stream-enterers, no more liable to downfall, assured, and headed for full Enlightenment.
“Monks, in this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit, and free of patchwork, those monks who are mature in Dhamma, mature in faith, are all headed for full Enlightenment.
“Monks, in this Teaching that is so well proclaimed by me and is plain, open, explicit and free of patchwork, those who have simply faith in me, simply love for me, are all destined for heaven.
This said the Blessed One.
Satisfied, the monks rejoiced in the words of the Blessed One.
The similes about sense-desires, given in the following section of the discourse, seem to support the commentarial reference to sexual intercourse.
Bare bones, fleshless, blood-smeared, are thrown to a starving dog but cannot satisfy the animal's hunger.
Similarly, sense-desires give no lasting satisfaction.
A lump of flesh for which birds of prey fight each other; if the bird that has seized the lump of flesh, does not yield it, it may meet death or deadly pain from the beaks and claws of the other birds.
Similarly, the sense-desires are common to many, i.e., the same sense objects may be claimed by many and may become the cause of deadly conflict.
A torch of straw carried against the wind may cause severe burns to the careless man if not quickly discarded.
Similarly, sense-desires will severely burn i.e., greatly harm him who thoughtlessly, and unaware of the great danger, partakes of them in the belief that they will bring light and joy to his life.
A pit of burning coals towards which a man is dragged by others; if he cannot free himself from the grip, he will be thrown into the fire and consumed by it.
Similarly, sense-desires are like a vast conflagration into which the victim is dragged by bad company, or by his own deeds, causing his rebirth in miserable states of woe.
A dream of a beautiful landscape that vanishes on awakening.
Similarly, sense-desires are a brief illusion like a dream, and disappointing after one awakens from infatuation to reality.
Borrowed goods on which the borrower foolishly prides himself in public; but which are withdrawn by the owners when they see the boastful man.
Similarly, sense-desires are temporary and not a true and lasting possession of him who enjoys them, filled with vain glory.
A fruit tree climbed by one who craves for the fruits; but another man, likewise greedy for them but unable to climb, chooses another method and fells the tree; and unless the first man quickly descends, he will break his limbs.
Similarly, in the blind pursuit of sense pleasures one may “break all one's limbs”, may suffer severe injury of body and mind.
The Sub-Comy refers also to punishment and torture incurred by reckless deeds to which people are driven by sense infatuation.
A slaughter house: because sense-desires are like a butcher's block.
This may mean that sense-desires kill much that is noble in man and cut off his higher development.
A stake of swords: sense-desires are piercing penetrating deep within, causing wounds where there had been none.
Unfulfilled or frustrated desire, or the pains of jealousy, are, indeed, like that ancient torture of the state of swords.
A snake's head: sense-desires are a grave risk and peril for the present and future welfare, if one walks unwarily.
Nijjhaana has here the meaning of “insight” or “comprehension”.
This phrase appears with the same meaning and in the same context, in the Kii.taagiri Sutta and the Cankii Sutta, that is, likewise preceded by an “examination of purpose.” Also SN.
confirms our rendering: Yassa khobhikkhave imedhammaa evam paññaaya mattaso nijjhaana.m khamanti aya.m vuccati dhammaanusaarii.
He who studies the Buddha's word for getting robes and other requisites, or for becoming widely known; that is, he who learns for the sake of fame and gain, his study is that of the Snake-simile; but better than such a study would be for him to sleep and not to study at all.
But there is one who studies the Buddha's word, and when morality is the subject, he fulfills morality; when concentration is the subject, he lets it take deep root; when insight is the subject, he establishes himself well in insight; when the paths and fruitions are the subject, he studies with the intention, “I shall develop the path, I shall realize the fruition.” Only the studying of such a one is “studying for the sake of crossing over”.
But the studying by one who has extinguished the taints, is “studying in the Treasurer's position.” For him, indeed, there remains nothing unpenetrated, nothing unrelinquished, nothing undeveloped, and nothing unrealized.
He is one who has penetrated the aggregates of existence, who has relinquished the defilements, developed the path and realized the fruition.
Hence, in studying the Buddha's Word, he studies it as a keeper of the scriptures, as a guardian of the tradition, as a preserver of the continuity.
Thus his study is like a treasurer.
“Now, when those proficient in the books cannot live at one place, being afraid of starvation, etc., if there is one who, while himself going the alms round with very great fatigue, as an unliberated worlding takes up studies with the thought: 'Lest the exceedingly sweet Buddha-word may perish, I shall keep the scriptures, shall preserve the continuity and guard the tradition,' in that case, is his study of the Treasurer's type or is it not?
— It is not.
And why not?
Because his study is not applied to his own situation cross over.
An unliberated worldling's study will either be of the type of the Snake-simile, or for the sake of crossing over; while for the seven who have entered the higher training, the study is only for the sake of crossing over; for the saint it is only of the Treasurer's type.
Comy and Sub-Comy: False views themselves are “grounds” for subsequently arising false views, like personality belief, eternalism, etc..
Further, the “grounds” are the subject-matter of the views, i.e., the five aggregates, the visual objects, etc.
Finally, they are also the conditioning factors of the false views, e.g., ignorance, sense-impression, perceptions and thoughts, unwisely directed attention, bad company, others' speech, etc.
[These, with the aggregates as the first, are the eight “grounds for false views,” as mentioned in the Pa.tisambhidaa Magga.
The term di.t.thi-.t.thaana also occurs in the Brahmajaala Sutta and in the commentary to it.
The terms “thought,” “encountered,” etc., refer to the fifth aggregate, i.e., consciousness, which was not mentioned in the first part of §.
In the Commentary specific to our text, this eternalistic view is rendered and classified in the terminology of the Dhamma.
The Commentary says:
“This statement refers to the view 'He considers corporeality, etc., as the self.' The canonical quotation, included here in the Commentary, has two implications which are of importance for understanding the reason why it was cited in this context:
As very often in the commentaries, the term “world” is explained as truly referring to the five aggregates, singly or in toto.
This quotation is the formula for the first of the twenty types of personality-belief.
In the first five of these twenty, the self is said to be identical with each of the five aggregates.
Hence the application of this quote to our textual passage signifies that the theorist conceives the “world” as identical with the self.
The double “So so “ in our text, should therefore, be taken as standing for “yo so,” lit.: what is the world that is the self.
In the Comy to MN we find a similar phrase: “Someone considers corporeality as self: what is corporeality that is 'I'; what is 'I' that is corporeality.
Thus he considers corporeality and self as non-dual'.” According to this interpretation the phrase has been translated here by “This universe is the Self.
Mostly, the first five types of personality-belief are explained as referring to the wrong view of annihilationism.

But their being quoted in our context, shows that they may also apply to eternalism.
We have come to this conclusion since it is improbable that, in our textual passage two mutually exclusive views should have been combined in a single statement formulating the sixth “ground for false views”; that is, in the first part of that statement, annihilationism, and in the second, eternalism.
This entire statement of the sixth 'ground for views' may well have been the original creed of an eternalistic doctrine.
The phrasing appears rather vague in the first part, and in general it is rather loosely worded.
To contemporaries, however, the meaning may have been quite clear since it was perhaps the stock formula for teachings that were well known.
Hence, in this translation, we have left the first part of the statement in its rather cryptic and ambiguous original form, while giving the interpretations in the notes only.
Comy: “By showing herewith the taint-free saint who has no anxiety at the destruction of his own aggregates, the Blessed One concludes his exposition.
Quoting this passage of our text, the Ven.
Dr.
Walpola Rahula remarks: “If there had been any soul-theory which the Buddha had accepted, he would certainly have explained it here, because he asked the monks to accept that soul-theory which did not produce suffering.
But in the Buddha's view, there is no such soul-theory…”.
See Satipa.t.thaana Sutta where, in explanation of anissito the Comy mentions ta.nhaanissaya and di.t.thi-nissaya, “dependence on craving and views.
Comy: Here a “two-fold voidness” is shown, that of self and of property belonging to a self.
“There are two cities: one is a city of brigands, the other a city of peace.
Now to a great warrior of the city of peace the following thought occurs: 'As long as this city of brigands exists, we shall never be free from danger.' So he dons his armor and goes to the city of brigands.
With his sword he breaks the gate pillar together with the door wings, he removes the bolt, lifts the cross-bar, fills in the moat, and lowers the flag.
Such a saint has put down for good the burden of the five aggregates, of kamma-producing volitions and of the defilements; has fully liberated himself from the round of existence.
Sub-Comy: “There is no teaching of the Master that is unrelated to the Four Truths.
By saying, 'What I teach now as before, is suffering and the cessation of suffering,' the Blessed One indicates this: 'Never do I teach a self that is annihilated or destroyed, nor do I teach that there is any kind of self'.
This phrase chinna-pilotika seems, however, to point to the inner consistency of the Teaching which, like a new cloth, is of one piece and is not in need of patching up contradictions, by artificial attempts of reconciling inconsistencies.
Hence the term may freely be rendered by the single word “consistent.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Publisher's Note: This booklet contains chapter of The Questions of King Milinda: An Abridgement of the Milindapañha, edited by N.K.G.
Mendis.
This work is based on existing translations of the Pali original, primarily upon the rendition by I.B.
Horner, published in the Sacred Books of the Buddhists series by the Pali Text Society.
Ms.
Horner's translation was used as the basis for the BPS's abridged edition with the kind permission of the Pali Text Society.
Then King Milinda approached the Venerable Nagasena, greeted him and sat down at a respectful distance.
King Milinda, anxious to know, anxious to hear, anxious to remember, anxious to see the light of knowledge, anxious to break down the lack of knowledge, anxious to find the light of knowledge, anxious to expel the darkness of ignorance, aroused extreme steadfastness and zeal and mindfulness and clear consciousness, and spoke thus to the Venerable Nagasena: “Revered Nagasena, have you ever seen the Buddha?
“No, sire.
“But have your teachers ever seen the Buddha?
“No, sire.
“Revered Nagasena, if you have never seen the Buddha, and if your teachers have never seen the Buddha, well then, revered Nagasena, there is no Buddha; the Buddha is not manifested here.
“But, sire, did those former noble warriors exist who were the forerunners of your noble warrior dynasty?
“Yes, revered sir; what doubt is there?
“Have you, sire, ever seen the former noble warriors?
“No, revered sir.
“But have those who have instructed you, sire — priests, generals, judges, chief councilors — have these ever seen the former noble warriors?
“No, revered sir.
“But if you, sire, have not seen the former noble warriors and if your instructors have not seen the former noble warriors, where are the former noble warriors?
“Revered Nagasena, articles of use enjoyed by the former noble warriors are to be seen, that is to say, the white sunshade, the turban, the shoes, the yak-tail fan, the treasure of the sword of state, and the couches of great price.
By these we can know and can believe that the former noble warriors existed.
“Even so, sire, we may also know and believe in this Blessed One.
There is this reason according to which we may know and believe that there was this Blessed One.
What is the reason?
There are, sire, articles of use enjoyed by that Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five spiritual faculties, the five powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, the Noble Eightfold Path.
By these the world with the devas knows and believes that there was this Blessed One.
For this reason, sire, for this cause, because of this method, because of this inference it should be known that there was this Blessed One.
“Revered Nagasena, make a simile.
“As sire, a city-architect, when he wants to build a city, first looks about for a district that is level, not elevated, not low-lying, free from gravel and stone, secure, irreproachable and delightful, and then when he has made level there what was not level and has had it cleared of stumps of trees and thorns, he might build a city there.
It would be fine and regular, well planned, the moats and encircling walls dug deep, the city gates, the watch-towers and the ramparts strong, the crossroads, squares, junctions and the places where three or four roads meet numerous, the main-roads clean, level and even, the bazar shops well laid out, the city full of parks, pleasances, lakes, lotus pools and wells, adorned with a wide variety of shrines to devas, the whole free from defects.
When that city was fully developed, he might go away to another district.
Then after a time that city might become rich and prosperous, well stocked with food, secure, successful, happy, without adversity, without accident, crowded with all kinds of people.
When these people had seen the city, new, well laid out, without a defect, irreproachable, delightful, they would know by inference: 'Clever indeed is that city-architect who was the builder of the city.'
“Even so, sire, that Blessed One is without an equal, equal to the unequaled, equal to the matchless ones, unique, incomparable, boundless, immeasurable, of unmeasured special qualities, attained to perfection in special qualities, of infinite steadfastness, infinite incandescence, infinite energy, infinite power, gone to perfection in the powers of a Buddha; having overthrown Mara and his army, burst asunder the net of false views, made ignorance to be cast out and knowledge arise, borne aloft the torch of Dhamma; and having attained omniscience, unvanquished and victorious in the battle, he built the City of Dhamma.
“In the Blessed One's City of Dhamma the encircling walls are morality, the moats are conscience, the ramparts over the city gates are knowledge, the watch-towers are energy, the pillars are faith, the door-keepers are mindfulness, the cross roads are the Suttantas, the places where three or four roads meet is the Abhidhamma, the law-court is the Vinaya, the streetway is the foundations of mindfulness.
And in that streetway of the foundations of mindfulness such shops as these are offering goods for sale, that is to say, a flower shop, a perfume shop, a fruit shop, an antidote shop, a medicine shop, a nectar shop, a jewel shop and a general shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the flower shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“There are, sire, certain kinds of objective supports for meditation that have been pointed out by that Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, that is to say, the perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of the foul, the perception of peril, the perception of abandonment, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation, the perception of not delighting in anything in the world, the perception of the impermanence of all formations, mindfulness of breathing; the perception of a swollen corpse, the perception of a discolored corpse, the perception of a decomposing corpse, the perception of a fissured corpse, the perception of a corpse gnawed by animals, the perception of a corpse with bones scattered, the perception of a corpse hacked up and scattered, the perception of a corpse still bleeding, the perception of a worm-infested corpse, the perception of a skeleton; the perception of loving-kindness, the perception of compassion, the perception of sympathetic joy, the perception of equanimity; mindfulness of death; mindfulness occupied with the body.
“Whoever is anxious to get free from old age and death chooses one of these objective supports for meditation and, with this objective support for meditation, he is freed from lust, freed from hatred, freed from delusion, freed from pride, freed from false views; he crosses over samsara, stems the stream of craving, cleanses away the threefold stain; and when he has slain all the defilements and has entered the City of Nibbana that is stainless, dustless, pure, fair, birthless, ageless, deathless, blissful, cooled, and without fear, he sets free his mind in arahantship.
This sire, is called the Blessed One's flower shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the perfume shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“There are, sire, certain kinds of morality that have been pointed out by that Blessed One.
Anointed with the perfume of this morality, the Blessed One's sons make fragrant and pervade the world with the devas with the perfume of morality, and they breathe it forth and fill the quarters and the intermediate points and the following winds and the head-winds with it, and when they have suffused the world, they stand firm.
And what, sire, are these various kinds of morality?
The morality of going for refuge, the five precepts, the eight precepts and the ten precepts, the morality of restraint by the Patimokkha as included in the five recitations.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's perfume shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the fruit shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Fruits, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One, that is to say, the fruit of stream-entry, the fruit of once-return, the fruit of non-return, the fruit of arahantship, the attainment of the fruit of emptiness, the attainment of the fruit of the signless, the attainment of the fruit of the undirected.
Whatever fruit anyone wishes for, he, giving the price of the transaction, buys the fruit he prefers.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the antidote shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Antidotes, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One.
By means of these antidotes the Blessed One sets free the world with the devas from the poison of the defilements.
And what are these antidotes?
These Four Noble Truths have been pointed out by the Blessed One, sire, that is to say, the noble truth of suffering, the noble truth of the arising of suffering, the noble truth of the cessation of suffering, the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
Those who therein are longing for profound knowledge and hear the Dhamma of the Four Truths, they are set free from birth, aging and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
This sire, is called the Blessed One's antidote shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the medicine shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Medicines, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One.
By means of these medicines the Blessed One cures devas and humans, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five spiritual faculties, the five powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, and the Noble Eightfold Path.
By means of these medicines the Blessed One purges people of wrong views, of wrong aspiration, of wrong speech, of wrong action, of wrong mode of livelihood, of wrong endeavor, of wrong mindfulness, and of wrong concentration; he has an emetic given for the vomiting up of lust, hatred, delusion, pride, false view, doubt, agitation, lethargy and drowsiness, shamelessness and lack of fear of wrongdoing; he has an emetic for the vomiting up of all the defilements.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's medicine shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the nectar shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Nectar, sire, has been pointed out by the Blessed One.
With this nectar the Blessed One sprinkles the world with the devas; when the devas and the humans have been sprinkled with this nectar, they are set free from birth, aging, disease, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
What is this nectar?
It is mindfulness occupied with the body.
And this too, sire, was said by the Blessed One: 'Monks, they partake of nectar who partake of mindfulness that is occupied with the body.' This, sire, is called the Blessed One's nectar shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the jewel shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Jewels have been pointed out by the Blessed One, sire, adorned with which the Blessed One's sons shine forth, they illuminate and irradiate the world, burn and blaze up, and display light above, below, across.
What are these jewels?
The jewel of morality, the jewel of concentration, the jewel of wisdom, the jewel of emancipation, the jewel of the knowledge and vision of emancipation, the jewel of the analytical knowledges, the jewel of the factors of enlightenment.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of morality?
It is the morality of restraint by the Patimokkha, the morality of restraint of the sense faculties, the morality of purity of livelihood, the morality of reflection on the requisites of the monk's life, the minor code of morality, the middle code of morality, the major code of morality, the morality of those who are on the paths, the morality of those who have attained the fruits.
The world with the devas, the creatures with the Maras, with the Brahmas, with recluses and Brahmans, long for and desire the person who is adorned with the jewel of morality.
The monk who has bedecked himself with the jewel of morality, sire, shines forth, shines mightily in the quarters, in the intermediate points and above and below and across, surpassing, excelling and overwhelming all the jewels from Avici Hell below to the acme of becoming above, and in between.
Such, sire, are the Blessed One's jewels of morality that are offered for sale in the Blessed One's jewel shop.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of morality.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of concentration?
It is concentration with applied thought and sustained thought, concentration without applied thought but with sustained thought, concentration without applied thought and without sustained thought, concentration on emptiness, concentration on the signless, concentration on the undirected.
And when a monk is bedecked with the jewel of concentration, sire, then thoughts of sense pleasures, thoughts of malevolence, thoughts of harming which are based on pride, agitation, false views, doubts and the defilements, and are varieties of wrong thoughts — all these, on coming in contact with concentration, disperse, dissolve and scatter, they do not remain, they do not adhere.
It is, sire, as water on a lotus-leaf disperses, dissolves, scatters, does not remain, does not adhere.
What is the cause of that?
The complete purity of the lotus.
Even so, sire, it is with the monk bedecked with concentration; those evil thoughts disperse, dissolve and scatter, they do not remain, they do not adhere.
What is the cause of that?
The utter purity of concentration.
Such are the jewels of concentration, sire, that are offered for sale in the Blessed One's jewel shop.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of wisdom?
The wisdom by which a noble disciple comprehends as it really is: 'This is wholesome, this is unwholesome, this is blamable, this is blameless, this is to be followed, this is not to be followed, this is low, this is excellent, this is dark, this is bright, this is dark and bright in an even mixture, this is suffering, this is the arising of suffering, this is the cessation of suffering, this is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.' This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of wisdom.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of emancipation?
The jewel of emancipation is called arahantship, sire, and the monk who has attained arahantship is called bedecked with the jewel of emancipation.
As, sire, a man who is adorned with garlands, perfumes and jewels shines forth, surpassing all other men, even so, sire, he who has attained arahantship, his cankers destroyed, bedecked with the jewel of emancipation, shines forth, surpassing all other monks who are only partly emancipated.
What is the cause of this?
Of all the bedeckings, sire, this is the highest bedecking, that is to say, the bedecking with emancipation.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of emancipation.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of knowledge and vision of emancipation?
This is called the knowledge of reviewing, sire, by which knowledge the noble disciple reviews the paths, the fruits, and Nibbana, and the defilements that have been got rid of and the remaining defilements.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of the analytical knowledges?
Four, sire, are the analytical knowledges: of meanings, of Dhamma, of language, and of perspicuity in expression and knowledge.
Sire, whatever the company a monk approaches who is adorned with these four analytical knowledges, whether it be a company of nobles, a company of brahmans, a company of householders or a company of recluses, he approaches it with confidence, untroubled, without fear, undismayed, without nervousness.
As, sire, a warrior, a hero in battle, when he is armed with his five weapons, enters the battle undaunted and thinks: 'If the enemy are far off I shall destroy them with arrows, if they are nearer than that I shall strike them with my sword, if they are nearer than that I shall strike them with my spear, if they come right up I shall hew them in two with my saber, if they come against my body I shall pierce them through and through with my knife' — even so, sire, the monk who is embellished with the jewel of the four analytical knowledges approaches a company fearlessly, thinking: 'Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of meaning, to him I shall speak comparing meaning with meaning, reason with reason, cause with cause, method with method.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of Dhamma, to him I shall speak comparing doctrine with doctrine, the deathless with the deathless, the unconditioned with the unconditioned, Nibbana with Nibbana, emptiness with emptiness, the signless with the signless, the undirected with the undirected, the imperturbable with the imperturbable.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of language, to him I shall speak comparing word with word, the next following word with the next following word, syllable with syllable, liaison with liaison, consonant with consonant, the next following expression with the next following expression, sound with sound, vowel with vowel, concept with concept, common usage with common usage.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of perspicuity, to him I shall speak comparing perspicuity with perspicuity, simile with simile, characteristic mark with characteristic mark, essence with essence.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of analytical knowledge.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of the factors of enlightenment?
These are the seven factors, sire: mindfulness, investigation of states, energy, rapture, tranquility, concentration and equanimity.
When a monk is adorned with these seven factors, sire, vanquishing all darkness, he illumines and irradiates the world and generates light.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of the factors of enlightenment.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the Blessed One's general shop?
“The Blessed One's general shop, sire, is the nine-limbed Word of the Buddha, the shrines of his bodily relics and the things he used, and it is the jewel of the Order.
And in the Blessed One's general shop, sire, the bliss of high birth is put on sale, the bliss of wealth, of long life, of good health, of beauty, of wisdom, human bliss, deva-like bliss, is put on sale, the bliss of Nibbana is put on sale.
Whichever bliss they want, then, having given the price of the transaction, they buy the bliss desired.
Some buy through undertaking morality, some buy through observing the formal acts of the Observance, and, in respect of this and that, they acquire the blisses from the smallest price of the transaction onwards.
“Such people as these, sire, dwell in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma: those versed in the discourses, those versed in the discipline, those versed in the Abhidhamma, speakers on Dhamma, Jataka-repeaters, Digha-repeaters, Majjhima-repeaters, Samyutta-repeaters, Anguttara-repeaters, Khudaka-repeaters; those possessed of morality, those possessed of concentration, those possessed of wisdom; those who delight in the factors of enlightenment, those with insight, those intent on their own goal; forest-dwellers, those living at the roots of trees, in the open air, on a heap of straw, in cemeteries, those who maintain a sitting posture; those who are practicing rightly, those enjoying fruition, stream-enterers, once-returners, non-returners, arahants; those with the threefold knowledge, those with the six super-knowledges, those of psychic power, those gone to the perfection of wisdom; those skilled in the foundations of mindfulness, the right efforts, the bases of psychic power, the spiritual faculties, the powers, the factors of enlightenment, the excellent path; meditation, the liberations, form and formlessness, and the attainments that are peaceful and happy.
The City of Dhamma is peopled and packed, crowded and teeming with these arahants like a grove of reeds.
“Those monks, sire, who are experts in the unlimited noble knowledge, who are without attachment, whose special qualities are unequaled, whose fame, strength and incandescence are beyond measure, who are turners of the Wheel of Dhamma, gone to the perfection of wisdom — monks such as these, sire, are called Generals of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are of psychic power, masters of the analytical knowledges, attained to confidence, movers through the sky, difficult to equal, difficult to overcome, movers without a support, able to shake the earth with its seas and mountains, able to touch the moon and the sun, skilled in assuming different forms and making volitional determinations and resolves — monks such as these, sire, are called royal priests in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks who conform to the ascetic practices, who are of few wants, contented, detesters of not seeking alms according to the disciplinary code, who go on uninterrupted rounds for almsfood like bees that, having drunk in successive scents, enter secluded groves, who are reckless of body and life, having attained to arahantship, are proclaimed eminent in a special quality of ascetic practice — monks such as these, sire, are called judges in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are completely purified, stainless, without defilements and, won to perfection in deva-vision, are skilled in the knowledge of the deceasing here and arising elsewhere of beings — monks such as these, sire, are called lighters of the city in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have heard much, to whom the tradition has been handed down, experts in Dhamma, experts in the Vinaya, experts in the Summaries, skilled in the exact determination of the syllables into those which have mutes and sonants, longs and shorts, and as to their heaviness and lightness, skilled in the nine limbs of the Teaching — monks such as these, sire, are called guardians of the Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are knowledgeable in the Vinaya, learned in the Vinaya, skilled in the provenances of the rules and readings, skilled in what are offenses, what are not offenses, in what can be corrected, what cannot be corrected, in the removal of offenses, the confession of offenses, repudiation of offenses, making amends for offenses, in restoration to the Order, in being sent away from the Order, in acts of protection, who have won perfection in the Vinaya — monks such as these, sire, are called able money-lenders in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have bound on the garland of flowers of noble emancipation, have attained to the noble, distinguished, very valuable and best state, who are desired and longed for by the manyfolk — monks such as these, sire, are called flower-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have penetrated to the understanding of the Four Noble Truths, seen the truths, understood the Teaching, who have crossed over perplexity in regard to the four fruits of recluseship and, having obtained the bliss of the fruits, share these fruits with others who are practicing rightly — monks such as these, sire, are called fruit-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are anointed with the sweet scent of the noble morality, bearers of many and varied special qualities, dispellers of the evil smell of the stains of the defilements — monks such as these, sire, are called perfume-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who delight in Dhamma, to whom the utterance of it is dear, who rejoice exceedingly in the Abhidhamma and Vinaya, who are forest-gone and gone to the roots of trees and empty places, who drink the juice of the noble Dhamma and plunge into it in body, speech and thought, who, most powerful in perspicuity, are practicing the quest of Dhamma in various doctrines, and whenever there is talk on wanting little, on contentment, aloofness, ungregariousness, stirring up energy, morality, concentration, wisdom, emancipation, and the knowledge and vision of emancipation, these monks, going there from wherever they may be, drink in the juice of that talk — monks such as these, sire, are called addicted drunkards in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who always pass the days and nights intent on the practice of watchfulness whether they be lying down, standing, or pacing up and down, who are intent on the practice of mental development, who are pursuing their own goal by warding off the defilements — monks such as these, sire, are called city watchmen in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who teach and recite, speak and repeat the nine-limbed Word of the Buddha in its literal senses and developed meanings, with its methods, reasons, causes and examples — monks such as these, sire, are called sellers of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are wealthy and rich in the wealth and jewels of Dhamma, in the wealth of tradition, the scriptures and what they have heard, who have comprehension of the expressions, vowels and consonants and the characteristics of the speech of the Buddha, who are full of intelligence — monks such as these, sire, are called merchants of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have penetration of the glorious Teaching, attended by the classifications and exegeses of objective supports for meditation, who have won perfection in the special qualities of the training — monks such as these, sire, are called famous Dhamma-men in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“Thus well planned, sire, is the Blessed One's City of Dhamma, it is well constructed thus, well appointed thus, well filled thus, well guarded thus, well watched thus, and thus difficult for adversaries and enemies to subdue.
According to this reason, sire, you may know that there was this Blessed One.
“With a hundred reasons such as these, sire, with a thousand reasons, with a hundred causes, a thousand causes, with a hundred methods, a thousand methods, with a hundred similes, a thousand similes, it is possible to point to the power of the Buddha.
As, sire, a clever garland-maker, from a heap of different flowers and by following the instruction of his teachers and as a man acting on his own initiative, may make a heap of variegated clusters of flowers and garlands — even so, sire, that Blessed One, like the heap of variegated flowers, is of infinite special qualities, immeasurable special qualities, and I, at this time, am like a garland-maker in the Conqueror's Dispensation, a stringer of flowers, who by following the way of the teachers of old and by my own power of discernment and with an incalculable number of reasons, could show forth by inference the power of the Buddha.
But, as to this, you must generate the desire to hear.
“It is difficult for others, revered Nagasena, to point to the power of the Buddha by inference through reasons such as these.
I am satisfied, revered Nagasena, by your extremely variegated exposition of the question.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In his Dictionary of Paali Proper Names Professor G.P.
Malalasekera introduces Maara as “the personification of Death, the Evil One, the Tempter.” He continues: “The legends concerning Maara are, in the books, very involved and defy any attempts at unraveling them.
Analyzing a series of allusions to Maara in the commentarial literature, he further elaborates on his definition with the following observations:
Malalasekera proceeds to attempt “a theory of Maara in Buddhism,” which he formulates in the following manner:
“The commonest use of the word was evidently in the sense of Death.
From this it was extended to mean 'the world under the sway of death' and the beings therein.
Thence, the kilesas also came to be called Maara in that they were instruments of Death, the causes enabling Death to hold sway over the world.
All temptations brought about by the kilesas were likewise regarded as the work of Death.
There was also evidently a legend of a devaputta of the Vasavatti world called Maara, who considered himself the head of the Kaamaavacara-world and who recognized any attempt to curb the enjoyment of sensual pleasures as a direct challenge to himself and to his authority.
As time went on these different conceptions of the word became confused one with the other, but this confusion is not always difficult to unravel.
What follows from this statement, even though Malalasekera did not elucidate enough, is that the term Maara, when it occurs in Buddhist literature, could signify any one of the following four:
In this paper, where the Buddha's encounters with Maara are analyzed as they are presented in literature and art, the main concern will be with Maara as a personification of temptation above), but we will also briefly examine how the other concepts are sometimes subsumed under this, and how the literary description or the artistic representation of Maara is conditioned by the merger of three separate concepts as well as by the general body of Indian mythology.
It has to be noted that Maara is another name for the Indian God of Love, known also as Kaama or Kaamadeva, Manmatha, Ananga, Kusumaayudha, Pañcabaa.na, and Makaradhvaja.
The Paali Canon includes several accounts attributed to the Buddha himself on his quest for deliverance and these have obviously provided the raw material for the reconstruction of his biography.
Among them, the most comprehensive as regards the details of the discipline and training which the Buddha followed is the Mahaasaccaka Sutta of the Majjhima Nikaaya.
It elaborates the circumstances leading to the renunciation, the Great Departure, as the term Abhinikkhamana is usually translated; the period of studentship under AA.laara Kaalaama and Uddaka Raamaputta; the austerities he practiced for six years; the process of meditation and contemplation and the progressive spiritual attainments; and the final achievement of Enlightenment.
The entire statement has a ring of authenticity — a purposeful recollection of the highlights of his life and career.
But, as E.J.
Thomas has pointed out, “the most remarkable feature in this recital is the entire absence of any temptation by Maara.
The same comment would also apply to the Bhayabherava Sutta, where the Buddha recounts the doubts and fears which he encountered in the days of his austerities in the forest.
Nor does the Dvedhaavitakka Sutta of the same Nikaaya, which analyzes the Buddha's thought process prior to the Enlightenment and how it led to his Enlightenment, digress from the philosophical treatment of the theme to refer to temptations by Maara.
Thomas's explanation is “that later authorities put additional events in different places.” But a more reasonable explanation, to my mind, is that poetical imagery or allegorization is more the domain of poetry and hence not to be expected in prose sermons.
That is precisely why almost all the accounts of Maara's temptations in the Paali Canon are in verse, fully or partially, and the conversations with Maara invariably are recorded in verse.
The most important among them is the Padhaana Sutta in the Sutta-nipaata of the Khuddaka Nikaaya.
Here, Maara is presented as Namuci and described as a person who approached the striving Bodhisatta speaking kind words.
The words attributed to him are as follows:
The reply which the Buddha gave Maara has the makings of the entire concept of the allegorization or personification of temptation and psychological conflict.
We find here all the ingredients which, in course of time, fired the imagination of countless writers, poets, painters, and sculptors all over Asia for over two millennia.
The Buddha recognizes the speaker of these “kind” words and is conscious of Maara's hidden agenda.
So he rebukes him as Pamattabandhu, Paapimaa, and Ka.nha.
The hosts of Maara are also identified:
Although the numbering of the “hosts” stops at eight, two more sets are identifiable.
Thus the concept of ten “hosts” has also been established.
Similarly conceived is Maara riding an elephant, which could, of course, mean any ride — elephant, horse, or chariot — and arrayed for war with an army all around.
The Buddha himself announces his readiness to give battle:
The Buddha's squadrons, however, are not named; but earlier, in listing the psychological defenses he possessed against Maara's “kind” persuasive words, the Buddha had said:
Further to underline the psychological dimension of the battle, as conceived in this context, the Buddha proceeds to tell Maara:
One element, however, is still not evident: Maara does not claim the seat on which the Bodhisatta is seated, and hence the need to call as witness the earth has not arisen.
It may, nevertheless, be noted that the Buddha's reply assumes an effort on the part of Maara and his hosts to dislodge him from his position:
On the other hand, a further reason is given for the Buddha's determination to fight:
This implies a further element in the legends of Maara's temptations, which are found in canonical texts as well as elsewhere relating to the obstacles he had tried to place on the Buddha's advent into his mission as a teacher.
Another pointer in the Padhaana Sutta to other legends is contained in the last three verses, which speak of a later encounter of Maara with the Buddha.
Though Chalmers interprets this passage as a statement addressed to the Buddha, the accusative case Gotama.m in verse indicates that it need not be so construed.
Here, Maara says:
The final verse of the sutta, which tradition assigns to the Buddha but which appears from the contents to be of much later origin than verses -, shows the degree to which the personification of Maara had developed.
Here, he is called 'dummano yakkho,' a “disappointed sprite” and is said to be so frustrated that his lute drops from his armpit.
We shall return later to the implications of this reference to Maara as yakkha.
Altogether absent from the Padhaana Sutta is the episode with the daughters of Maara, who are elsewhere represented as tempting the Buddha with their charms after their father with all his hosts had failed.
This story, along with several others, occurs in the Maara-sa.myutta of the Sa.myutta Nikaaya.
The majority of these episodes do not fall within the category of temptations by Maara.
They reflect mostly the hostility which Maara had to the Buddha's mission and consist largely of disturbances he had created in different guises — making noises, breaking things, disrupting sermons.
It is Maara preventing the people from getting out of his clutches in the sense of escaping from Maaradheyya.
These, therefore, do not come in the category of temptations, the topic of this paper.
The Maara-sa.myutta, comprising twenty-five suttas, does contain a number of temptations in which the Buddha or a disciple is involved.
Sutta No.
speaks of a moment when Maara became aware of a thought of the Buddha as regards his attainment of Enlightenment and approached him saying:
In another sutta, when the Buddha was in pain on account of a foot injury, Maara addressed him in verse:
Again, Sutta No.
records an instance when the Buddha was debating in his mind whether it was possible to govern without killing and ordering execution, without confiscating and sequestrating, without sorrowing and inflicting sorrow, in other words, righteously.
Maara is said to have approached the Buddha and persuaded him to govern righteously.
Apparently, the temptation here was for the Buddha to revert to lay life and resume a royal career so as to rescue those suffering from the cruelty of rulers.
In each of these cases, the Buddha gives an apt reply, which convinces Maara that he has been recognized.
Each discovery is concluded with the statement, “Sad and disappointed, Maara vanished.
The Bhikkhu.nii-sa.myutta, in particular, gives ten similar accounts of temptations which bhikkhuniis had experienced in lonely places.
Here, too, the statements, attributed to Maara or the bhikkhunii concerned, and often both, are in verse.
For example, it was Kisaagotamii who was addressed thus by Maara:
She gives a reply.
Maara knows that he has been found out and — as in the case of all similar episodes — vanishes from the place, unhappy and despondent.

Into this same pattern falls the episode narrated in the Mahaavagga of the Vinaya Pi.taka.
When the Buddha was alone after he had sent out the first sixty disciples on missions to propagate the doctrine, Maara approached him saying:
The Buddha bluntly contradicts him and Maara disappears.
The recurring idea behind all these episodes is that doubts, anxieties, and longings which arise in the lonely mind of the Buddha or a disciple are personified as Maara.
With a firm resolve, they vanish, and that is what Maara's disappearance signifies.
Very different from all these suttas is the Maaradhiitu Sutta, which starts with the story of the Padhaana Sutta and continues to describe how the vanquished Maara “sat down cross-legged on the ground not too far from the Blessed One, silent, dismayed, with shoulders drooping and head down, glum, with nothing to say, scraping the ground with a reed.” The way the story is connected with the preceding sutta gives the impression that this incident takes place seven years after the Enlightenment, when all the efforts of Maara to discover the Buddha heedless had failed.
The daughters of Maara inquire about their father's despondency and receive the reply:
What follows is pure allegory.
The three daughters have apt names: Ta.nhaa, Arati, and Ragaa.
They conspire and, on the principle that “men's tastes vary,” assume forms ranging from those of virgins to mature women.
They display wiles by which any ordinary man's “heart would have burst or hot blood would have gushed from his mouth, or he would have gone mad or crazy or he would have shriveled, dried up, and withered like a cut green rush.” Unmoved by all their charms and wiles, the Buddha rejects them with a series of well-chosen similes:
What all these Maara legends in the canonical texts establish beyond any doubt is that the allegorization of temptations had commenced very early in Buddhist circles.
The imagery of a personified Maara accompanied by a tenfold army and supported by three daughters could even have originated with the Buddha himself.
As suggestive imagery, it must have epitomized what most of the Buddha's disciples and followers had subjectively experienced “with wavering faith” when “the sweet delights of home and love, the charms of wealth and power, began to show themselves with attractive colors.” While they were perpetuated in poetry, no one took them literally.
As Malalasekera says with reference to the Buddha's victory over Maara, “That this account of Buddha's struggle with Maara is literally true, none but the most ignorant of the Buddhists believe, even at the present day.
But that does not mean there had been no confusion.
With the four concepts of Maara, outlined in the introduction to this paper, such confusions were quite commonplace.
For example, even Buddhaghosa could not distinguish between the allegorical Maara and the Maaradevaputta.
With regard to the seven year surveillance of the Buddha by Maara in No.
of the Maara-sa.myutta, he says that Maaradevaputta, having failed to see any lapse on the part of the Buddha over this period, came to him and worshipped him.
Despite the lack of clarity, Maara was already a full-fledged concept by the time the Paali Canon was completed in its present form.
As the biography of the Buddha came to be presented systematically, temptations by Maara began to figure as a major element in relation to several decisive steps taken by the Buddha.
A number of such occasions representing critical points in the career before and immediately after the Enlightenment had been identified by the time the introduction to the Jaataka Commentary was composed.
This introduction, which contains perhaps the oldest continuous life story of the Buddha, mentions six such occasions:
It should be noted that other encounters individually described in the Maara-sa.myutta are not included in this list, possibly because they were not connected with any important event or decision in the life of the Buddha.
Also to be stressed is the fact that the list is at variance with the information given elsewhere in the Paali Canon.
Not all biographies of the Buddha agree with this list, or with the timing of the encounters, or with the words or actions attributed to Maara.
The Lalitavistara, though a later Buddhist Sanskrit work, appears to have been based either on the introduction to the Jaataka Commentary or on an earlier source.
As such, the divergences other than in regard to poetic exaggerations and greater emphasis on the supernatural aspects are minimal.
One important variation in the Lalitavistara is that “Maara, the wicked one, closely followed the Bodhisattva for six years as he was practicing austerities seeking and pursuing an entrance.” Such a long period of surveillance suggests the function of Maaradevaputta rather than an encounter explainable in allegorical terms.
Another departure is that the daughters of Maara try to tempt the Buddha under the Bodhi-tree, and their names are Rati, Arati, and Tis.naa.
Whereas the Paali sources say that the vanquished Maara drew lines on the ground with a stick or a reed, the Lalitavistara states that Maara wrote the words “the ascetic Gotama will escape from my realm.
The version which reveals some very significant departures is the life of the Buddha recorded in the Tibetan texts.
As far as Rockhill's selective translation of the relevant material in the Dulva shows, five points have to be noted:
The Chinese Abhiniskrama.na Suutra has a few more variations.
For instance, it says that Maara brought a bundle of official notices purporting to be from Saakya princes to dissuade the future Buddha from continuing with his quest for deliverance.
Whether as a conscious effort in rationalizing this diversity of information or as a result of concentrating on the most dramatic instances when the Buddha encountered temptations, three events gained in popularity: namely, the Renunciation or Great Departure; the Victory over Maara, described either as Maaravijaya or Maarayuddha; and the Temptation by Maara's daughters.
Each incident acquired embellishments at the hands of poets and creative writers until by about the first century B.a number of elements had firmly taken root:
These basic elements are observable both in literature and art.
The second and the third have, of course, become more popular as themes for graphic description in prose or verse as well as for imaginative representation in sculpture and painting.
Among the earliest poems on these themes is Asvagho.sa's Buddhacarita, which devotes two chapters to the Victory over Maara and the Temptation by Maara's daughters.
Already new elements had begun to appear.
Maara comes not only with three daughters but also with three sons — Vibrama, Harsa, and Darpa.
Of course, Maara himself is represented as an enemy of the perfect Dharma and is actually called Kaamadeva, the God of Love:
“He whom they call in the world Kaamadeva, the owner of the various weapons, the flower-arrowed, the lord of the course of desire — it is he whom they also style Maara, the enemy of liberation.
In the typical style of this Indian Cupid, the first weapons used are the five flower-arrows.
When they fail, Maara thinks: “He is not worthy of my flowershaft nor my arrow 'gladdener,' nor the sending of my daughter Rati; he deserves the alarms and rebukes and blows from all the gathered hosts of demons.” Thus he summoned his army of animal-faced and hideous monsters, which Asvagho.sa describes conjuring many a grotesque appearance.
Their collective assault on the future Buddha finds lively description in as many as twenty-three verses.
The reaction of the future Buddha is his resolute steadfastness and an admonition to Maara to desist from his futile effort:
“Give not way, then, to grief but put on calm, let not your greatness, O Maara, be mixed with pride; it is not well to be confident — fortune is unstable — why do you accept a position on a tottering base?
The description of the encounter ends with the following four verses:
Having listened to his words, and having seen the unshaken firmness of the great saint, Maara departed dispirited and broken in purpose with those very arrows by which, O world, you are smitten in your heart;
With their triumph at an end, their labor all fruitless, and all their stones, straw, and trees thrown away, that host of his fled in all directions, like some hostile army when its camp has been destroyed by the enemy.
When the flower-armed god thus fled away vanquished with his hostile forces and the passionless sage remained victorious, having conquered all the power of darkness, the heavens shone out with the moon like a maiden with a smile, and a sweet-smelling shower of flowers fell down wet with dew.
When the wicked one thus fled vanquished, the different regions of the sky grew clear, the moon shone forth, showers of flowers fell down from the sky upon the earth and the night gleamed out like a spotless maiden.
There is no reference to either the ten squadrons of Maara or the matching armies, in the form of the recollection of the Ten Perfections by the future Buddha.
Nor is the question of the right to the seat raised or the earth summoned as a witness.
As writer after writer vied with one another to present the momentous struggle of the Buddha in his endeavor to attain Enlightenment, new details were added and new imagery created.
Right down to the modern writers and poets in Buddhist countries, particularly Sri Lanka, Burma, and Thailand, the process has continued.
The license which they continue to exercise is an indication, by itself, that what is elaborated is an allegory, a symbolic representation of an inner conflict and crisis, and not an historical event.
The writers or the artists are not meddling with facts and misrepresenting history but are sharpening their own conception and appreciation of the most critical experience of a man who transcended himself.
Asvagho.sa takes up the episode of Maara's daughters in Chapter.
The Buddha has passed four weeks since the Enlightenment and Maara comes to him saying, “O holy one, be pleased to enter Nirvaa.na, your desires are accomplished.” The Buddha's response being negative, Maara becomes despondent and the daughters take upon themselves the task of luring the Buddha.
What follows, in contrast to the Victory over Maara, is a tame dialogue between the Buddha and each of the daughters.
The whole theme is disposed of in twelve verses and the girls end up by professing to be the Buddha's disciples.
This episode, too, underwent embellishment and elaboration.
Earlier Paali sources as well as the Lalitavistara had given an indication of the potential which the theme has both in descriptive poetry and graphic art.
Poets in several languages have succeeded in conjuring up scenes of singing and dancing of three damsels in seductive postures.
According to the tenets of Oriental poetry, a great poem has to evoke a range of emotions among which heroism and eroticism have been especially sought after.
The Victory over Maara and the Temptation by Maara's daughters provided the basis for many a creative effort, in rendering a more balanced character, in terms of the tenets of ornate poetry, to poems on the Buddha which could otherwise be humdrum or deeply philosophical.
Whether this was permissible had been a question which the Buddhist writers had grappled with from the days of Asvagho.sa.
But the fact that the themes have been widely, if not entirely, viewed as symbolic and allegorical have all alone ensured a very high degree of liberty in artistic expression.
This is what the far-flung representations of these themes in sculpture and painting demonstrate even more convincingly.
Even before the Buddha came to be represented in human form, the Great Departure and Victory over Maara had become popular themes depicted at both Sanchi and Amaravati.
Sculptures on the gateways of the Great Stupa at Sanchi include a scene of the Great Departure and two scenes of Maara's Assault and Defeat.
A riderless horse represents the future Buddha leaving the city in the company of countless gods in a mood of jubilation.
None of the figures can, however, be identified as Maara.
Apparently, the panel does not represent Maara's temptation.
But, as described in the Lalitavistara and Asvagho.sa's Buddhacarita, the horse is borne on the hands of yaksas or deities.
In the panels depicting the assault and defeat of Maara, the future Buddha is represented by an empty seat under the Bodhi-tree.
Maara himself is shown in one as a stately figure, a veritable god, reflecting Asvagho.sa's identification of Maara as Kaamadeva, the Indian God of Love.
This figure is characteristically handsome, whereas his hosts in both panels are grotesque in size and appearance.
In the assault scene, they make hideous faces and are apparently jeering and shouting.
In the defeat scene they are despondent and retreating in disarray.
As Maara's hosts retreat on the right-hand half of the panel, the rejoicing deities are shown approaching the Bodhi-tree from the left.
Apparently, it is Maara who, with bow in hand, rides the elephant.
In neither is there any overt depiction of the temptation by Maara's daughters, unless the two female figures at the left-hand corner of the assault scene are meant to suggest it; but this appears most unlikely.
Among the Amaravati sculptures of the second century A.are two scenes depicting the Great Departure and Maara's Assault.
In the first, a riderless horse, above whom is held the royal insignia of a parasol, is carried on the hands of squatting dwarf figures.
Here, again, the encounter with Maara is not represented.
With the characteristic phenomenon of horror vacuii in the sculptures of this period, the panel is crowded with rejoicing deities, one of them in a dancing pose.
Even in the damaged state, the panel on Maara's Assault gives the impression of the dynamism that the sculptor had intended to convey.
The hosts of Maara are depicted with various weapons raised ready to attack, while Maara himself appears to be the seated figure to the left of the empty seat under the Bodhi-tree.
Here too Maara is a handsome god in princely attire.
This panel seems to combine synoptically three events: the Assault, the Defeat of Maara, and the Temptation by Maara's daughters: note the dancing figure on the right.
It is in Gandhara art that we notice a further development of the two themes and the emergence of the scene depicting the Temptation by Maara's daughters.
A sculpture in the Lahore Museum shows the future Buddha riding a horse.
Around him are depicted two of the four sights which prompted the renunciation: namely, old age and death.
A princely figure with a halo, standing in the left corner of the panel, could be Maara, and the wheel-like object at the right upper corner could be the symbol of Universal Monarchy, of which Maara apprised the future Buddha.
The scene includes symbolically a third element, the role of the earth, represented as a female figure emerging from the ground, in enabling the future Buddha to take a last look at his city without turning back.
Not only do we see here the story of the Great Departure in all its traditional details, but also the continuing representation of Maara as a devaputta.
The halo here is particularly suggestive.
Another fragment of a Gandhara sculpture appears to be a Great Departure panel.
Here, again, the earth-goddess emerges from the ground and bears upon her shoulders the feet of the horse.
The two standing figures have been identified by Grunwedel as guards.
But there is also the likelihood that the one in front with the bow in hand is Maara.
Hence this panel, too, might be a representation of this encounter.
The representation of Maara in Gandhara sculpture has been discussed at length by Grunwedel.
He says: “Maara rarely if ever appears in Buddhist sculptures except in the representations of the temptation scene… Though different sculptors may have taken their own ways of representing Maara, still there was a fixed type also for this deva.
He appears, at a later date, in full festal attire, youthful in figure, with bow and arrow… His attributes, bow and arrow and Makara, suggest that there is some connection with Greek Eros.
He had further attempted to identify as Maara a figure, earlier considered to be Devadatta, in a sculpture depicting the Kaasyapa legend, which is now in the Lahore Museum.
This figure occurs in another sculpture in the Lahore Museum, which depicts the hosts of Maara.
An Indianized version of the figure appears in the relief from Loriyan Tangai in the Calcutta Museum.
Two Gandhara sculptures of Maara's Assault show further developments in the treatment of the subject.
In the Mardan sculpture the characteristic posture of touching the earth in summoning it to witness has already come into existence and the defeat of Maara's host is symbolized by a crouching and a wailing figure in front of the future Buddha.
The sculpture at the Boston Fine Arts Museum depicts in great detail the symbolic crouching and falling figures.
The exact composition and details of Gandhara art, with pronouncedly Indian countenances, are to be found in the later sculptures of Amaravati and Nagarjunikonda.
But the temptation scene of Maara's daughters gradually asserts a prominence in artistic representation.
The defeated hosts of Maara depicted in reduced scale crouching in front of the Buddha's seat are overshadowed by the dancing female figures in the seductive “half bent” pose.

The finest combination of the attack by the hideous hosts of Maara and the temptation by Maara's daughters is to be found in Ajanta, both in a painting in Cave and in a sculptured version in Cave.
Apart from their artistic merits the composition has demonstrated how this could be extended to massive dimensions.
Examples come from far-flung places like Tun-huang in China and Dambulla and Hindagala in Sri Lanka.
At Dambulla the entire ceiling of the largest cave is devoted to the theme of Maara's Assault, bringing together many characteristics that had been progressively incorporated in the artistic representation of this event.
A curiously interesting piece of art comes from Qyzyl in Chinese Turkistan.
A fresco depicting how the death of the Buddha was announced to King Ajaatasattu shows a painting on cloth of major events in the Buddha's life.
On the left upper corner is Maara's Assault, represented in miniature with tremendous economy of space and figures but with a telling effect.
In a tenth century fresco of Tun-huang is a highly Sinocized version of Maara's Assault, but Maara's hosts have been represented as described in literature.
The two fully dressed Chinese damsels standing by the seat of the future Buddha could be two of Maara's daughters.
If they are in the process of luring the ascetic, they seem to be doing so only by song!
The imposing figure of a Chinese warlord, standing behind them, could be Maara himself.
In Borobudur, we see the continuation of the Indian tradition of sculpture, and the panels depicting Maara's Assault and the Temptation by Maara's daughters reflect the Lalitavistara accounts most faithfully.
Of special interest is the representation of Maara with his thousand arms, wielding a bow.
The theme persists in Southeast Asia.
From Angkor Thom comes a relief which depicts not an attack on the person of the future Buddha as elsewhere, but a war between two armies: the hosts of Maara pitted against the army of paaramitaas of the Buddha.
A book cover from Nepal depicts the daughters of Maara in demure poses and a wood carving of the th century shows the future Buddha in the bhuumi-sparsa-mudraa, the earth-touching posture, surrounded by the hosts of Maara.
In a gradual process to abstract representation of Maara's Assault, the bhuumi-sparsa-mudraa becomes a short-hand way of recalling the event.
From Pagan comes an example where the additional element of the Temptation by Maara's daughters is portrayed discreetly on the pedestal with three dancing girls and two playing musical instruments.
Perhaps the same interpretation would apply to the Naalandaa sculpture in which three female figures on the pedestal have grotesque faces, possibly suggesting the association of Maara as a yaksa or demon.
But the three female figures do not appear in all cases.
The Buddha statue in the earth-touching posture ultimately becomes identified as one of the Dhyaani Buddhas of the Mahaayaana tradition with the specific name Aksobhya, meaning imperturbable — an instance where the quality of steadfastness which the temptations of Maara brought out in the Buddha becomes personified as a separate entity.
Just as the mode of presentation of the Temptation scenes underwent change over the centuries, the concept of Maara too changed in the eyes of the people.
As late as the eleventh century, Sri Lankan Buddhists — as seen from a representation of vanquished and retreating Maara in the murals of the Mahiyangana Stuupa relic chamber — seemed to have considered Maara to be a devaputta, a god.
But as time went on, he came to be depicted exactly like his hideous-looking hosts and his god-like appearance was replaced by what was traditionally ascribed to a yaksa or demon.
This change is further seen on the cover of an ola book which depicts Maara not in a temptation scene but in a Jaataka.
The prevalence of this concept is further attested by examples from Thailand where a picture of the Great Departure drawn in the eighteenth century represents Maara as a demon.
The final evolution of Maara's transformation may perhaps be seen in the Tibetan Yamaantaka, who is iconographically represented as a fierce looking demon with multiple arms.
This examination reveals that the temptations of Maara as allegorical representations of the mental torment, conflict, and crisis experienced by the Buddha as well as his disciples are as old as Buddhism itself and the imagery could have originated in the Buddha's own graphic poetical expressions.
The early compilers of the life of the Buddha did not make a conscious effort to deal systematically with individually recorded instances of such temptations.
As such, there is a fair amount of confusion as regards the nature and the timing of the related events.
Eventually, however, the Great Departure, the Victory over Maara, and the Temptation by Maara's daughters came to be singled out for detailed treatment in literature and art.
Embellishments and variations were freely allowed according to the writer's or artist's conception of the situation, as the allegorical aspect was considered the more significant.
The historical or factual aspect of the related events was secondary and the diversity of presentation made a definite contribution to the enrichment of both literary and artistic creativity.
What both literature and art show very clearly is that Maara's personality as conceived by Buddhist writers and artists underwent a marked change with the spread of Buddhist culture.
In India, in earlier times, Maara was yet a devaputta, in fact the handsome God of Love with all his traditional characteristics.
Later on, closer to modern times, in Sri Lanka, Burma, Thailand, Cambodia, and Indonesia, he becomes more and more pronouncedly demonic.
This analysis has been limited to those of Maara's encounters with the Buddha which have a predominant character of temptation, i.e.
where Maara is allegorized and personified.
Other aspects of Maara as a devaputta and a personification of death await similar analysis.
An effort made in this direction could be invaluable especially to answer the many questions which Malalasekera had raised in his article in the Dictionary of Paali Proper Names.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
— Edwin Arnold, Light of Asia
To those who live in lands where the teachings of the Lord Buddha have been long established, the sight of a bhikkhu collecting food in the early morning, is a common one.
But where the teachings are newly arrived, or where bhikkhus are few, the practice of giving food to wandering monks is known only by pictures or from written accounts.
Neither of these convey the real atmosphere of this giving and receiving to those interested in the Buddhist Way and yet live in countries where the Teaching is not the traditional form of religion.
Even many Buddhists living in Northern Buddhist lands may know little of pindapata; for the practice of alms-gathering by bhikkhus there has, for various reasons which we need not here investigate, been largely discontinued and the traditional practice now survives only in Southeast Asian countries practicing the Theravada Buddhist tradition.
Though this too is also a written account of alms-giving and collecting, it is written from experience and will try to be as evocative of the atmosphere of the pindapata as possible, and as many factors basic to the Buddhist way of life are involved in this simple act, it is hoped that this may prove useful to all those Buddhists who are far separated from these Buddhist lands.
Apart from his three robes, a bhikkhu's most prized possession is his bowl.
He takes great care of it so that it may last long: after eating he wipes it carefully each day to prevent it rusting; always places it on a stand so that it may not fall and break, and often carries it in a sling for it is heavy when full of food and may be dropped by tired hands.
In doing so he carries out the Lord Buddha's injunction to practice mindfulness with regard to his bowl, which has been given him by others and without which he may not collect food.
Practice varies in different countries and viharas.
In those viharas where meditation is practiced, the bhikkhus will have arisen early, sitting long in the cool darkness of the meditation hall.
In the country, the only sounds at this time are the night insects, a frog or two, perhaps a forward cockerel long anticipating the dawn and a cool wind in the trees which may blow away the ever-present mosquitoes.
The quietness is at last ended as the assembled monks prostrate themselves before the Buddha-image and clear rings out the homage to the Enlightened One:
Namo tassa bhagavato arahato samma sambuddhassa…
Two hours or so will have passed in this way before it is light enough to gather food.
Not only must the bhikkhus allow the laywomen time to cook food, they also have to consider the dangers of going out while it is yet dark.
In countries where snakes, centipedes and scorpions abound, it is wise to be able to see the ground under one's feet; and apart from this quite important fact there are the fears and suspicions of others to consider, as one rather amusing incident in the Majjhima Nikaya shows.
A bhikkhu wandering for food while it was still dark frightened a woman who saw him in the lightning flash.
She mistook him for a demon and cried out “How terrible!
A demon is after me!”.
Only after having robed himself correctly does the bhikkhu start upon his food-collecting round.
Both shoulders are covered at this time for he is going “among the houses” and must have his body covered from the neck down to below the knees.
He may go with a senior bhikkhu, in which case the latter walks in front and he follows, or a novice may accompany him.
Sometimes the samanera or a young boy following him may collect the liquid curries, soups, etc., in a tiffin-carrier.
So he sets out, observing good conduct in many ways.
Perhaps he remembers at this time the earnest injunction of the Dhammapada:
Sometimes one sees bhikkhus following gently and quietly after an elder monk, perhaps carrying his bowl for him until the first house is reached upon the alms-round.
The monk does not speak unless spoken to, silence being considered a part of the training during one's round.
Nor does he look here and there but keeps his eyes directed to the ground in front of him; by so doing he practices restraint of the eye.
Lastly, whether his round takes ten minutes or two hours, he does not rush along as though anxious to get over it and be done with it.
The well-trained bhikkhu walks with mindfulness, steadily and dignified.
We remember that it was the noble bearing and restraint of the Venerable Assaji, one of Lord Buddha's first five disciples, that deeply impressed Upatissa, who shortly after become known as Venerable Sariputta, the foremost among Lord Buddha's disciples.
If a bhikkhu practices meditation, he will strive to keep his subject of meditation in mind while both going and coming.
It is related that the Venerable Sariputta developed access concentration in the practice of loving-kindness while walking for food-collection.
As some bhikkhus are engaged in the practice of the study, rather than meditation, they frequently take with them a passage of the Pali scriptures written upon a small piece of paper and mentally recite this while walking.
Now that we have gathered so many facts, what is the picture of pindapata like?
Imagine the time about six in the morning.
It is still cool but there is light and bhikkhus are robing themselves in the sala.
If they practice the Vinaya strictly they will go out wearing all three of their robes — none should be left behind in the monastery lest they be stolen, so precious are the robes.
At this same time monastery boys are scuttling about on last-minute preparations which ought to have been made on the previous day.
Then when everyone is ready, they set out, in groups or singly.
If the vihara is in the country the little groups of monks can be seen like an orange ripple spreading out into the green country-side.
Soon they are lost to sight as the roads or paths they walk upon, wind between trees, over canals, through fields, around hills or among villages.
On the morning which we describe, the sun shines brightly, at first a great red ball glowing upon the horizon and all is easy going under foot.
Other days may be different, with bhikkhus slithering over muddy tracks, sinking deeply into black ooze, and huddling beneath umbrellas which sometimes keep off some of the torrential monsoon rains.
As, however, this day is bright, let us follow one of these bhikkhus and observe what happens upon his round.
He walks as we have described, holding his bowl in its sling drawn under one hem of his upper robe, and he walks until it is apparent to him that in some house which he is approaching a lay-supporter wishes to offer some food.
How does he know this?
Outside that house there may be a little table on which food, is placed; or lay-supporters may have invited him to take food from their house every day.
Or perhaps he just perceives a lay-person coming out of the house with a tray of offerings.
If he passes such a house, he may hear the word “nimon” called out to invite him to stop there.
Any of these things we may observe.
We shall also see that he stops to take food from everyone who wishes to give.
A very poor person may invite him and reverently spoon out some coarse rice into his bowl; at a wealthy house the donor may serve perhaps fifty or more monks every morning and they may receive the finest rice, curries in little plastic bags, and sweets wrapped in banana leaves — it is all the same to him and, without discriminating, it all goes into the same bowl.
Lord Buddha out of his great compassion once accepted from a poor child, who had nothing else to offer, a handful of dust; from this one learns that it is not what is given that is important but rather what is at the heart of the giving.
But before we proceed, we shall notice a very curious thing.
Here is man, without any other means of getting food, and yet he makes no effort to attract the attention of anyone.
Quite the contrary, he undertakes to train himself in a rule of conduct which forbids him to make any sound while he goes “among the houses.” If he comes to a house where a regular supporter of his lives or where he knows that food is to be offered, he just stands in silence, neither does he cough, nor stamp his feet, and unlike many other ascetic orders originating in India, he may not carry any musical instrument or sing as they do, to attract attention.
This is a time for cultivating patience, a virtue which in the Buddhist training finds its highest expression in the perfection of patience.
He may wait for many minutes before anyone sees him, or he may decide that no one is giving him anything that day and go his way.
It happens sometimes that a bhikkhu, who patiently waits, gets nothing at all.
It even happened at least once, to Lord Buddha and a little story from modern times will emphasize this.
There was a young bhikkhu newly come to Bangkok some years ago.
He knew no one, he had no supporters on the first morning.
He went out from the monastery where he was staying and walked through the streets to gather food — with hundreds of other bhikkhus from the monasteries around.
He received nothing.
He went back to his kuti and practiced meditation.
The second morning he went out again received nothing and again spent the day in meditation perhaps consoling himself with the words of the Buddha:
The third day, feeling a little weak, he passed silently through the streets and at one house he was given a banana.
And that was all.
He came back to his monastery and saw there a starving dog.
Opening his bowl he gave half the banana to the dog.
But bananas are not fare for dogs — even starving ones — and having sniffed it, it limped disdainfully away.
The young bhikkhu reached out his hand to take that rejected half back into his bowl, Then he paused remembering that when a bhikkhu has given something to someone, it must be returned into his hands by a layman — and there was no layman in sight.
The bhikkhu closed his bowl and went into his kuti where he ate his half of the banana washing it down with a good draught of water.
The next day his patience and compassion were rewarded and thereafter someone offered him food every day.
When Mara closed peoples' hearts against giving food to him, Lord Buddha spoke the following famous verse from the Dhammapada showing his power to obtain spiritual food from meditation:
The bhikkhu of whom we have spoken also practiced meditation, and later become a famous teacher and a founder of a new school of meditation in Bangkok.
He has but recently passed away.
To come back, after this little digression, to our bhikkhu on pindapata.
We shall notice perhaps with surprise that he is treated with great respect by the lay-people.
Perhaps only yesterday he was a layman himself, yet today, shorn, barefoot, in orange robes, and bowl in hand, he is reverenced by those who serve him.
People passing him may stop, crouch down, and raise their hands to their foreheads in reverence, others may walk past him the hands reverentially raised, while laymen and laywomen who wish to give him food squat down, raise their hands in worship before offering to him whatever they have prepared.
Seeing this, one might ask why they did it and why do they regard him so highly?
The skeptical man of this materialistic age might indeed ask what all this fuss is about.
He might say, “Here is this beggar, who does no work, contributes no material gain to society and yet people treat him as though he was a god walking in their midst.” In saying this, he would be right, for Buddhist monks in these countries are beggars in the sense that they depend for their sustenance on others; moreover, the word by which they are known is derived from the root “bhik” whence “bhikkhati” = to beg for food.
They would also be correct in their limited assessment of his worth to society as he does not indeed increase the society's material wealth.
Against such a materialistic approach born of conceit, an ancient verse might be quoted and then two relevant considerations regarding this charge:
The first consideration must be to stress again that a bhikkhu does not beg as do ordinary beggars but passes on silently collecting offered food; and secondly, it is a narrow system of thought indeed that assesses a man's worth by material gain alone.
The Bhikkhu is treated with reverence simply because he offers to others an example by his own pure conduct.
He shows the way to deliverance, and if all cannot follow his example completely and lay off the cares of the world, then there can be many who may profit from seeing his life and listening to his advice.
He is thus highly regarded as one who is striving for deliverance from suffering, for that supreme bliss which is Nibbana.
To attain this, it is emphasized all through the Buddhist tradition that renunciation is essential.
Thus he is worshipped as an example of renunciation: one who has given up worldly pleasures and comforts, given up family attachments, and one who tries to make the greatest renunciation — that of the craving-and-ignorance complex.
Indeed Lord Buddha's words in the Dhammapada have a deep truth in them:
Such are some of the paths which thought might take as we witness a householder give food to him.
Following the scene before us we see that the lay-supporter has raised the bowl of food to be given, to her forehead and remains thus for half-a-minute or so.
While doing this, she is making some fervent wish or vow that the good merit which accrues to her by this beneficent act shall result in some particular blessing — health, wealth, family, or those who think further, the attainment of heavenly states, or higher still, the end of rebirth — the unsurpassed peace of Nibbana.
The food is placed in the bowl by the supporter and while this is taking place, the bhikkhu does not look to see who is giving him food.
We notice that, with senses well-controlled, he keeps his eyed fixed upon the open bowl and is not inclined to speak to lay people unless they ask him something.
In this way his mind is not disturbed by the sight of the members of the opposite sex or any other desire-arousing object.
The same applies to Buddhist nuns when they go out for the collection, though very few of them do so.
The writer observed in Bangkok a few nuns who, wearing the dark cloth indicating a meditative life, walk on pindapata with great dignity and evident sincerity.
They, of course, are concerned to avoid the sight of men.
This is one practical application of the step of Buddhist training called restraint of senses.
The food having being placed in his bowl, the lay-supporter may, as the monk is turning to go on his way, reverence him again.
On his part the bhikkhu feels no elation at reverence, nor distress if such salutation is not performed, for in the Buddhist teaching reverence is a skillful act and profits him who performs it.
Further, as we are within earshot, we may be surprised by another fact: the bhikkhu utters no thanks for his food.
He goes as silently as he arrives and from what we see it appears indeed as though the lay-supporters feel more disposed to thank him for having taken the food from their hands.
As we follow our bhikkhu, this matter may give us further food for thought — until he reaches another house where we can again observe what takes place.
Why then does the bhikkhu offer no thanks for what he has received?
The answer to this lies in an understanding of the Buddhist teaching regarding merit.
Merit is acquired by the performance of skillful action.
An example of such an action which is easy for all to practice is “giving”.
Indeed, this too is not only a perfection in the highest ranges of Buddhist practice but is the first among all the ten perfections: the perfection of giving.
So deeply is giving felt to be an essential for the beginning of the holy life, that it stands first also in the triad of practices so often recommended for the Buddhist laity, and the bhikkhu practices it by giving to other bhikkhus and to lay-people the gift of Teaching, which is the highest.
“To give” opens the heart and is manifestly opposed to the worldly way “to get.” The latter is linked to attachment, while the former is generosity and close to renunciation.
Thus thanks for giving lie in the very act itself and the householder is happy that the bhikkhu has given him the opportunity to give.
The merit which one “gets” from giving is really not a “possession” which ensures a good birth in the future, etc., but a change in heart, a raising in the level of skillful consciousness so that one performs and rejoices in performing skillful acts.
This, of course, does have its effect.
A little family group stands outside the house: an old lady, a young lady, perhaps her daughter, and two small boys, one of whom is only just old enough to toddle.
They cry out joyfully and loud enough for all the neighborhood to hear, “The bhikkhu has come.” The mother of the house balances a tray on her knees as she crouches down, her daughter reverences likewise, while the small boys each have to be restrained from running towards the bhikkhu in order to give him something — so great is their desire to do so.
The bhikkhu opens his bowl, and bends down so that the elder of the little boys can give a little bowl of rice.
This having been successfully engineered into the bowl, the bhikkhu smiles.
Now the smaller boy reaches up to place curry in a plastic bag into the bowl, even this is successful and he manages this without falling over which indeed he came close to doing.
Then without prompting he raises two podgy hands in the direction of his forehead and toddles unsteadily back to the girl.
The elder one, however, is rather boisterous and has forgotten this bit of training.
Then that monk says to him for his good, “Wai phra” — “Salute the bhikkhu” — and the boy laughingly, gently, dutifully raises his hands.
The people of the house, who have invited him to take food from them every day, then inquire from him when there will be a preaching at the vihara and where the teacher is now.
Having learned such-like matters, which take but a minute for the bhikkhu to relate, they invite him, as he goes on his way, to come again on the morrow — and the little boys call out again and again, “Come again!
Come again!
The bhikkhu goes on his way, the sun rises higher and it begins to be a little warm.
His next donor is nearby and he walks slowly to give her time to come from her little house.
We see him suddenly step rather wide and not until we are up to that place do we see why he did so.
Across the road there march in milling millions, an army of ants and, quite apart from the undesirability of being bitten by this species, the bhikkhus must go barefoot for pindapata — their way of training instructs them to practice harmlessness.
That is, never to take life intentionally and to be as careful as possible so as not to kill, even without intention.
In the Dhammapada we read one of Lord Buddha's beautiful verses:
An old, old woman, bent with age and hard work totters out from her little cabin to invite him to receive.
It is true that she need not exert herself in this way for she has a younger woman living with her, but she desires, as her life grows shorter and death comes nearer, to give to a bhikkhu every day and so pile up as much merit as she may in the short time left to her.
She lives by the side of a little canal and makes a perilous living by rotting down fish in water and salt and so producing the ubiquitous “fish-water,” which is used as sauce and source of salt, by many Thais.
Leaning on a stick she brings her thin, toil-worn hands shakily upwards while her face, bronzed by the sun and wrinkled in a thousand places, reflects a serene devotion.
She carries an old and rusty tin out of which she ladles some of her fish-water.
As silently as he opened his bowl to receive her offering so silently, he closes it, as she turns, now happy, towards her door.
Lord Buddha has said:
We follow again as he goes on his way to the right of the road.
There is at this point, a low area of marshy swamp in which grow tall sedges.
It is rather surprising therefore to see the bhikkhu apparently step into this swamp and yet go forward freely.
The mystery is soon resolved as we see a single-plank gang-way in front of us which will carry the wary walker some two hundred yards across to further side.
The bhikkhu has already gone far along the planks, carefully picking his way, and so there is nothing else to do but to follow him.
Gingerly we set out, the six-inch wide plank swaying and bending with our weight; it seems very likely that at any moment we may be precipitated into the ooze beneath.
Here is indeed, a time for mindfulness!
We manage the hazard well-enough — it is perhaps more a matter of good luck than judgment — and when at last we raise our eyes from the gang-way, the bhikkhu is almost out of sight.
However, we manage to catch up with him just in time to see that he entered the courtyard gate of a big house.
Evidently he is invited to take food here each day; indeed, he has already been invited to sit down for a few minutes.
We watch the monk and his supporters through the open gate.
The compound lying inside this gate seems to be a very large one and at least three good sized houses are visible interspersed by lawns, trees, courtyards and such decorative features as some hundreds of orchids growing hung up in little pots, or great glazed blue-and-white Chinese water-jars and in them water lilies flowering.
The bhikkhu sits in a little summer-house and before him is placed a table upon which are three trays with little bowls of rice and various fruits, with unknown foods done up in banana-leaves.
Meanwhile a crowd of bhikkhus has gathered.
We did not notice them come but now they stand silently, waiting.
A young man carries a stout table and places it outside the gate where the other bhikkhus are standing and comes back shortly afterwards staggering under the weight of a huge bowl of steaming rice.
An elderly lady in the traditional dress follows him carrying a large tray stacked high with oranges and banana-leaf packets.
A bhikkhu is standing near us and so we ask him quietly whose house this is.
“Oh,” he says, “this house belongs to one of the noble families closely related to the king.
Every day they give food to about eighty monks.
We watch this general alms-giving in progress.
Each bhikkhu approaches the table when the one before has already left.
Everything is very orderly and each bhikkhu is obviously very careful to avoid jumping his turn.
Young bhikkhus and samaneras are seen to invite elder monks to take their food first; courtesy and care are observed by all.
The rice, spooned out into bowl after bowl, grows less and the numbers of waiting monks dwindle; but the lady householder seems happier and happier with every spoonful she gives.
The monks silently go — old theras of many years standing go slowly, while little samaneras, scarcely four feet high or twelve years old, make off at a good speed.
Our attention now reverts to “our” bhikkhu.
He has been seated the while and offered a glass of coffee.
A lady sits at a respectful distance upon the summer-house floor while her small daughter wanders about.
She has been asking him some problem regarding the teaching and he has briefly replied.
She gets up and invites him saying “nimon”.
As it is her daughter's birthday, the lady holds the tray of offerings while the little girl places the rice and various foods into his bowl.
Thus the small girl has earned great merit upon this day.
Indeed, it is common in Buddhist lands to give on the day of one's birth; and whatever the giving may be, the birthday is thought an excellent occasion for merit-making.
Those who cannot afford, or somehow just do not give on other days, usually make a point of offering to a monk or monks pindapata on the day of their own or their children's birth.
The elder lady having finished her giving at the gate, now comes and salutes the bhikkhu.
She provides him with food from another tray.
The young man, her gardener, offers yet another, while just as the bhikkhu is preparing to depart, a cry of “nimon” halts him as another member of this many-branched family comes up with his offering.
With a bowl now become heavy but we hope a little refreshed by the coffee, the bhikkhu goes on his way, the elder lady of the house inviting him to come again on the morrow.
The last house on his round obviously also belongs to an affluent family.
He waits, as they have promised food.
Locked gate and wide lawns separate the family from the roadside and they do not see him as easily as his other patrons.
At last someone spots him and sings out, “the monk has come.” The householders here do not come to the door but send who are possibly their son and daughter with food.
They are both near to grown-up and perhaps with less understanding of their teaching than they ought to have.
At any rate, they are rather careless: the boy while opening their big gates drops a banana or two on the ground, which they wipe before offering, while the girl, tipping rice into the bowl in a lackadaisical fashion manages to empty half of it on the ground.
They chatter while doing this and then prance off.
It seems that they do this as though it was all rather a drudge.
The bhikkhu carefully removes the rice grains from his robes and from his bowl-sling so that they do not become soiled, and starts back on his long walk to the monastery.
He passes down the whole road of rich men's houses but there is nothing.
He does not care, for he has more than enough to keep him going, enough “medicine” to allay the disease of hunger for another day.
Still we note that those who give most are, if not poor people, at least those in the middle ranges of income.
Riches, alas, do not usually lead to great generosity!
It is the poor and those moderately well-off who give generously.
Too many of the rich are too much sunk into the supposed comforts of this world to think overmuch of giving.
Lord Buddha has taught them with the following word of warning:
But those who know the sting of poverty, know also a way to rid themselves of this sting.
By giving however little it is, they may attain to greater wealth in future than they possess now — and greater happiness, too.
One of the factors which governs the lack or possession of wealth is what one had done with money, when one had it.
If one misuses it for others' pain, squanders it all upon fleeting pleasures, or only amasses a great collection of status symbols about oneself — then in a future life one is very liable to meet with poverty and misery which this entails.
The results of action are, so Buddhism teaches, very just indeed.
Those who give, however, are assured of receiving, so that all that must be decided is how and what should one give.
Besides occasional giving, there are gifts made to the Sangha.
According to a well-known passage in the Pali scriptures, the bhikkhus are “anuttaram puññakkhettam lokassa'ti” — “The supreme field of merit in the world.” All this is summed up as follows:
Now again occasionally bhikkhus require robes, dwellings or medicines, but every day they walk out for food-collecting.
Therefore, this is a great opportunity to gain merit which should not be missed; for all, whether poor or rich, can do with more merit!
There is indeed nothing like merits made in this way for ensuring a happy life, a peaceful death, and a blissful life hereafter.
Lord Buddha has said:
This is obviously one reason why people give to the bhikkhu who passes their doors — and it is a very important reason.
The skeptic might butt in, objecting that the motive for that giving is very selfish — to make oneself happy in future.
But then he must be told that it is possible in Buddhism, by means of goodwill and compassion, to make over one's merits for the good of others.
Thus a mother might make merit by giving food, etc., for her children's happiness, or recovery from sickness.
Or a king may make merit, turning this over to the welfare of his people.
And expressions of utterly selfless — indeed universal — benevolence are by no means rare among the merit-dedications of quite ordinary folk, while the unlimited compassion of the wisdom beings is expressed in many sublime engravings and writings.
With the merit which such a one piles up, he vows to lighten beings innumerable and to deliver all from the woes of continued existence.
However, few aspire so high; their reasons for giving are correspondingly less exalted, though nevertheless they may be deeply religious.
For instance, many laypeople give out of great devotion to their religion.
Sometimes, too, a particularly esteemed bhikkhu may be the object of this great devotion.
Then there are gifts to relatives who are now bhikkhus, for in the country, a bhikkhu may live in his own village temple and pass his former house and relatives often.
Naturally, they give to him.
Then there are those who give out of habit or from convention.
One sometimes comes across cases of this; such giving being no longer accompanied by the warmth of devotion tends to become mechanical.
It is quite easy to understand that in this case the merit from giving is decidedly less.
Lastly comes a category of giving which hardly applies to our present subject: grudged giving.
From this and from giving for commercial advantage — purely selfish, this — come the least amount of merit.
The attitude of “Why should I give something?” which really means — “What do I get out of it?” — is hardly found in Buddhist lands.
Where the Buddhist Teaching has distinctly taught that deliberate actions are liable to give rise to results, even those who have little knowledge of the heights of Buddhist philosophy, will readily understand that the results of giving is happiness.
The writer was once asked if people who give much and often, but nevertheless came across disasters and grief in their lives, would lose faith and thereafter cease to give.
But the Buddhist reaction is not thus.
Disasters and grief do not arise causelessly, nor yet from one cause, but they are often attributed more soundly, it would seem, to misdeeds committed in the past — if not in this life then in the individual's past existences.
Hence a Buddhist thinks that such misdeeds can only come to fruition if conditions are suitable, which is more likely to be when one has but little a storehouse of merit.
Therefore, to cure this lamentable circumstance, the answer is to give more and give more often, rather than neglecting to give.
This connection between knowledge and generosity is illumined by a verse in the Dhammapada:
And again on this subject, we find:
And so we have now followed the bhikkhu back to his monastery.
He is, perhaps, a little foot-sore and, if his bowl is full, his shoulder may ache; and his hands and arms also if he uses no sling for the bowl.
Memories arise at this point of having seen in some book a writer complaining of the size of a bhikkhus' bowl — as though to imply that they were greedy!
This is far from the truth.
Firstly a bhikkhu's bowl has to be reasonably large to accommodate all the food that people wish to give him.
We should not forget that lay-supporters wish to make their merit each day and that a very small bowl would mean that he would have to refuse their offerings.
Secondly, a bowl may be really large if the bhikkhu to whom it belongs goes wandering on foot staying in caves, mountain fastness or forest.
His bowl is then his suitcase and in it must be packed the very few items which he can easily take along with him.
Back to the monastery, the food that all have collected is shared by all, and the bhikkhu himself makes a little merit by offering something choice from his bowl to his teacher, usually an elder monk, and also by seeing that those who have collected little food that day — and such is the fate of many samaneras — have sufficient fare.
He practices thus one method of promoting loving-kindness among his fellow-monks — that is, “the sharing of the contents of even an alms bowl.
In the monasteries where meditation is practiced it is common, to undertake also the ascetic practices.
In such monasteries, therefore, the monks take only one meal, at about eight in the morning, immediately after returning from pindapata.
Their alms-food is shared with the monastery-boys and anyone else who cares to eat.
No one need starve, or be without a meal in a Buddhist country — one has only to go to a monastery, and some sort of food will be available.
As for the monks — bhikkhus or samanera — if they have undertaken the dhutangas they mix all their food together, determining just how much will be suitable for them, and then apply the meditation on the loathsomeness of food, which prevents the arising of greed.

It is eaten in silence so as to maintain this concentration.
And when fingers have scooped enough of this medicine into the mouth, monastery-boys will be happy with remaining delicacies, while the mixture still unconsumed will feed the animals which have taken refuge in the vihara grounds away from the harshness of worldlings.
Thus none of this precious food is wasted.
In all ways there are benefits to be seen for all — for the donors who give there is merit, for the bhikkhus who take there is support, and for many other beings there is good food.
This little description of pindapata and its virtues may be fittingly brought to an end with another verse expressing wherein lies the taste of truth:
May all beings, wheresoever they be, taste of this truth.
If the preceding account sounds somewhat idyllic, readers should realize that it is because the writer has happened to describe a combination of fortunate experiences: in fine weather, where houses are abundant, where more prosperous people dwell, where these donors are not too distant from the vihara, where land is flat and paths are good, and so forth.
The reverse of such conditions will make the bhikkhu's alms-round more difficult, as does the pouring rain during the monsoon season.
More hazards still would confront the bhikkhu who sets out to get his food in a non-Buddhist country.
As in Lord Buddha's days, he would experience some difficulties.
But this, although interesting, is another story.
Lord Buddha himself ignored the artificial barriers of caste distinction when he walked for pindapata.
He took — and his monks still take — food from all, regardless of their social status.
All men have the right to practice giving if they wish to do so and to reap the merits deriving therefrom.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Anicca vata sankhara — “Impermanent, alas, are all formations!” — is the phrase used in Theravada Buddhist lands to announce the death of a loved one, but I have not quoted this line here in order to begin an obituary.
I do so simply to introduce the subject of this essay, which is the word sankhara itself.
Sometimes a single Pali word has such rich implications that merely to sit down and draw them out can shed as much light on the Buddha's teaching as a long expository article.
This is indeed the case with the word sankhara.
The word stands squarely at the heart of the Dhamma, and to trace its various strands of meaning is to get a glimpse into the Buddha's own vision of reality.
The word sankhara is derived from the prefix sam, meaning “together,” joined to the noun kara, “doing, making.” Sankharas are thus “co-doings,” things that act in concert with other things, or things that are made by a combination of other things.
Translators have rendered the word in many different ways: formations, confections, activities, processes, forces, compounds, compositions, fabrications, determinations, synergies, constructions.
All are clumsy attempts to capture the meaning of a philosophical concept for which we have no exact parallel, and thus all English renderings are bound to be imprecise.
I myself use “formations” and “volitional formations,” aware this choice is as defective as any other.
However, though it is impossible to discover an exact English equivalent for sankhara, by exploring its actual usage we can still gain insight into how the word functions in the “thought world” of the Dhamma.
In the suttas the word occurs in three major doctrinal contexts.
One is in the twelvefold formula of dependent origination, where the sankharas are the second link in the series.
They are said to be conditioned by ignorance and to function as a condition for consciousness.
Putting together statements from various suttas, we can see that the sankharas are the kammically active volitions responsible for generating rebirth and thus for sustaining the onward movement of samsara, the round of birth and death.
In this context sankhara is virtually synonymous with kamma, a word to which it is etymologically akin.
The suttas distinguish the sankharas active in dependent origination into three types: bodily, verbal, and mental.
Again, the sankharas are divided into the meritorious, demeritorious, and “imperturbable,” i.e., the volitions present in the four formless meditations.
When ignorance and craving underlie our stream of consciousness, our volitional actions of body, speech, and mind become forces with the capacity to produce results, and of the results they produce the most significant is the renewal of the stream of consciousness following death.
It is the sankharas, propped up by ignorance and fueled by craving, that drive the stream of consciousness onward to a new mode of rebirth, and exactly where consciousness becomes established is determined by the kammic character of the sankharas.
If one engages in meritorious deeds, the sankharas or volitional formations will propel consciousness toward a happy sphere of rebirth.
If one engages in demeritorious deeds, the sankharas will propel consciousness toward a miserable rebirth.
And if one masters the formless meditations, these “imperturbable” sankharas will propel consciousness toward rebirth in the formless realms.
A second major domain where the word sankharas applies is among the five aggregates.
The fourth aggregate is the sankhara-khandha, the aggregate of volitional formations.
The texts define the sankhara-khandha as the six classes of volition: volition regarding forms, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile objects, and ideas.
Though these sankharas correspond closely to those in the formula of dependent origination, the two are not in all respects the same, for the sankhara-khandha has a wider range.
The aggregate of volitional formations comprises all kinds of volition.
It includes not merely those that are kammically potent, but also those that are kammic results and those that are kammically inoperative.
In the later Pali literature the sankhara-khandha becomes an umbrella category for all the factors of mind except feeling and perception, which are assigned to aggregates of their own.
Thus the sankhara-khandha comes to include such ethically variable factors as contact, attention, thought, and energy; such wholesome factors as generosity, kindness, and wisdom; and such unwholesome factors as greed, hatred, and delusion.
Since all these factors arise in conjunction with volition and participate in volitional activity, the early Buddhist teachers decided that the most fitting place to assign them is the aggregate of volitional formations.
The third major domain in which the word sankhara occurs is as a designation for all conditioned things.
In this context the word has a passive derivation, denoting whatever is formed by a combination of conditions; whatever is conditioned, constructed, or compounded.
In this sense it might be rendered simply “formations,” without the qualifying adjective.
As bare formations, sankharas include all five aggregates, not just the fourth.
The term also includes external objects and situations such as mountains, fields, and forests; towns and cities; food and drink; jewelry, cars, and computers.
The fact that sankharas can include both active forces and the things produced by them is highly significant and secures for the term its role as the cornerstone of the Buddha's philosophical vision.
For what the Buddha emphasizes is that the sankharas in the two active senses — the volitional formations operative in dependent origination, and the kammic volitions in the fourth aggregate — construct the sankharas in the passive sense: “They construct the conditioned; therefore they are called volitional formations.
And what are the conditioned things they construct?
They construct the body, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness; therefore they are called volitional formations”.
Though external inanimate things may arise from purely physical causes, the sankharas that make up our personal being — the five aggregates — are all products of the kammically active sankharas that we engaged in our previous lives.
In the present life as well the five aggregates are constantly being maintained, refurbished, and extended by the volitional activity we engage in now, which again becomes a condition for future existence.
Thus, the Buddha teaches, it was our own kammically formative sankharas that built up our present edifice of personal being, and it is our present formative sankharas that are now building up the edifices of personal being we will inhabit in our future lives.
These edifices consist of nothing other than sankharas as conditioned things, the conditioned formations comprised in the five aggregates.
The most important fact to understand about sankharas, as conditioned formations, is that they are all impermanent: “Impermanent, alas, are formations.” They are impermanent not only in the sense that in their gross manifestations they will eventually come to an end, but even more pointedly because at the subtle, subliminal level they are constantly undergoing rise and fall, forever coming into being and then, in a split second, breaking up and perishing: “Their very nature is to arise and vanish.” For this reason the Buddha declares that all sankharas are suffering — suffering, however, not because they are all actually painful and stressful, but because they are stamped with the mark of transience.
“Having arisen they then cease,” and because they all cease they cannot provide stable happiness and security.
To win complete release from suffering — not only from experiencing suffering, but from the unsatisfactoriness intrinsic to all conditioned existence — we must gain release from sankharas.
And what lies beyond the sankharas is that which is not constructed, not put together, not compounded.
This is Nibbana, accordingly called the Unconditioned — asankhata — the opposite of what is sankhata, a word which is the passive participle corresponding to sankhara.
Nibbana is called the Unconditioned precisely because it's a state that is neither itself a sankhara nor constructed by sankharas; a state described as visankhara, “devoid of formations,” and as sabbasankhara-samatha, “the stilling of all formations.
Thus, when we put the word sankhara under our microscope, we see compressed within it the entire worldview of the Dhamma.
The active sankharas consisting in kammically active volitions perpetually create the sankhara of the five aggregates that constitute our being.
As long as we continue to identify with the five aggregates and to seek enjoyment in them, we go on spewing out the volitional formations that build up future combinations of aggregates.
Just that is the nature of samsara: an unbroken procession of empty but efficient sankharas producing still other sankharas, riding up in fresh waves with each new birth, swelling to a crest, and then crashing down into old age, illness, and death.
Yet on it goes, shrouded in the delusion that we're really in control, sustained by an ever-tantalizing, ever receding hope of final satisfaction.
When, however, we take up the practice of the Dhamma, we apply a brake to this relentless generation of sankharas.
We learn to see the true nature of the sankharas, of our own five aggregates: as unstable, conditioned processes rolling on with no one in charge.
Thereby we switch off the engine driven by ignorance and craving, and the process of kammic construction, the production of active sankharas, is effectively deconstructed.
By putting an end to the constructing of conditioned reality, we open the door to what is ever-present but not constructed, not conditioned: the asankhata-dhatu, the unconditioned element.
This is Nibbana, the Deathless, the stilling of volitional activities, the final liberation from all conditioned formations and thus from impermanence and death.
Therefore our verse concludes: “The subsiding of formations is blissful!
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Ajaan Fuang Jotiko, my teacher, was born in to a small farming family in the province of Chanthaburi, near the Cambodian border of southeastern Thailand.
Orphaned at the age of eleven, he was raised in a series of monasteries and received ordination as a monk when he turned twenty.
As he began to study the monastic discipline, though, he realized that the monks of his monastery were not really serious about practicing the Buddha's teachings, and he longed to find a teacher who would give him a training more in line with what he had read.
His chance came during his second year as a monk, when Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo, a member of the forest ascetic tradition founded by Ajaan Mun Bhuridatto, came to set up a meditation monastery in an old cemetery just outside of Chanthaburi.
Taken with Ajaan Lee's teachings, Ajaan Fuang reordained in the sect to which Ajaan Lee belonged and joined him at his new monastery.
From that point onward, with few exceptions, he spent every Rains Retreat under Ajaan Lee's guidance until the latter's death in.
One of the exceptions was a five-year period he spent during World War II, meditating alone in the forests of northern Thailand.
Another was a six-year period in the early fifties when Ajaan Lee left Ajaan Fuang in charge of the Chanthaburi monastery and wandered about various parts of Thailand in preparation for finding a place to settle down near Bangkok.
When in Ajaan Lee founded Wat Asokaram, his new monastery near Bangkok, Ajaan Fuang joined him there, to help in what was to be the last major project of Ajaan Lee's life.
After Ajaan Lee's death, Ajaan Fuang was generally expected to become abbot at Wat Asokaram.
The monastery by that time, though, had grown into such a large, unwieldy community that he did not want the position.
So in, when the Supreme Patriarch of Thailand, in residence at Wat Makut Kasatriyaram in Bangkok, asked him to spend the Rains Retreat at his temple, to teach meditation to him and to any of the other monks at the temple who were interested, Ajaan Fuang jumped at the chance.
He spent a total of three Rains Retreats at Wat Makut, wandering about the countryside looking for solitude during the dry seasons.
Although he had immense respect for the Supreme Patriarch as an individual, he grew tired of the politicking he saw at the higher ecclesiastical levels and so began looking for a way out.
It came in, when a woman named Khun Nai Sombuun Ryangrit donated land to the Patriarch for a small monastery in a mountainous region near the coast of Rayong province, not far from Chanthaburi.
Ajaan Fuang volunteered to spend time at the new monastery, Wat Dhammasathit, until a permanent abbot could be found.
The monastery, though, was in a very poor area where the local people were not enthusiastic about the idea of a strict meditation monastery in their midst, so no one could be found to take on the position of abbot.
Thus, shortly before the Supreme Patriarch's death in a car accident in, Ajaan Fuang accepted the position of abbot at Wat Dhammasathit himself.
It was soon after this that I first met him, in April of.
Wat Dhammasathit had the look of a summer camp down on its luck: three monks living in three small huts, a lean-to where they would eat their meals, a kitchen with room for a couple of nuns, and a small wooden structure on top of the hill — where I stayed — which had a view of the sea off to the south.
The land had been donated shortly after a fire had stripped it of all its vegetation, and the hillsides were covered mostly with cogon grass.
Yearly fires still swept through the area, preventing trees from taking hold, although the area on the mountain above the monastery was covered with a thick, malarial forest.
In spite of the poor conditions, Ajaan Fuang seemed to have a clear-eyed, down-to-earth wisdom that allowed him to transcend his surroundings — an inner peace, happiness, and stability that I envied and admired.
After spending a few months practicing meditation under his guidance, I returned to America and then found my way back to Thailand in the fall of to be ordained as a monk and to begin training under him in earnest.
In my absence, he had begun to develop a small but devoted following of lay meditators.
In early the new abbot of Wat Makut had invited him back to teach there on a regular basis, and for the rest of his life — until his death in — he split his time evenly between Bangkok and Rayong.
Most of his students came from the professional classes of Bangkok, people who were turning to meditation for spiritual strength and solace in the face of the fast-changing pressures of modern Thai urban society.
During my first years back in Rayong, the monastery was an incredibly quiet and secluded place, with only a handful of monks and almost no visitors.
Fire lanes had begun to hold the fires in check, and a new forest was developing.
The quiet atmosphere began to change, though, in the fall of, when construction began on a chedi at the top of the hill.
Because the chedi was being built almost entirely with volunteer labor, everyone was involved — monks, laypeople from Bangkok, and local villagers.
At first I resented the disruption of the monastery's quiet routine, but I began to notice something interesting: People who never would have thought of meditating were happy to help with the weekend construction brigades; during breaks in the work, when the regulars would go practice meditation with Ajaan Fuang, the newcomers would join in and soon they too would become regular meditators as well.
In the meantime, I began learning the important lesson of how to meditate in the midst of less than ideal conditions.
Ajaan Fuang himself told me that although he personally disliked construction work, there were people he had to help, and this was the only way he could get to them.
Soon after the chedi was finished in, work began on a large Buddha image that was to have an ordination hall in its base, and again, as work progressed on the image, more and more people who came to help with the work were drawn to meditation.
Ajaan Fuang's health deteriorated steadily in his later years.
A mild skin condition he had developed during his stay at Wat Makut grew into a full-blown case of psoriasis, and no medicine — Western, Thai, or Chinese — could offer a cure.
Still, he maintained an exhausting teaching schedule, although he rarely gave sermons to large groups of people.
Instead, he preferred to teach on an individual basis.
His favorite way of getting people started in meditation was to meditate together with them, guiding them through the initial rough spots, and then have them meditate more and more on their own, making way for new beginners.
Even during his worst attacks of psoriasis, he would have time to instruct people on a personal basis.
As a result, his following — though relatively small compared to that of Ajaan Lee and other famous meditation teachers — was intensely loyal.
In May,, a few days after the Buddha image was completed, but before the ordination hall in its base was finished, Ajaan Fuang flew to Hong Kong to visit a student who had set up a meditation center there.
Suddenly, on the morning of May, while he was sitting in meditation, he suffered a heart attack.
The student called an ambulance as soon as he realized what had happened, but Ajaan Fuang was pronounced dead on arrival at the hospital.
Because he had requested a few years earlier that his body not be cremated, plans began immediately to build him a mausoleum.
I was given the task of assembling his biography and any tape-recorded talks that might be transcribed and published as a commemorative volume.
I found, to my amazement, that I knew more about his life than anyone else.
The people with whom he had lived when he was younger had either died or grown so old that their memories were failing them.
All of a sudden the anecdotes he had told me during my first years back with him — of his youth and his years with Ajaan Lee — became the substance of his biography.
How much I probably missed, given the fact that my abilities in Thai and familiarity with Thai culture were still developing, was disconcerting to think about.
Even more disconcerting was to discover how little of his teachings were left for posterity.
Ordinarily, he refused to let people tape-record his instructions, as he maintained that his teachings were intended for the people listening to put into practice right then and there, and might be wrong for other people at other stages in their practice.
The few tapes that were made came from simple, introductory talks that he gave to first-time visitors who had come to give a group donation to the monastery, or to people who were just getting started in meditation.
Nothing of a more advanced nature was on tape.
So after we printed the commemorative volume, I started a project of my own, writing down what I could remember of his teachings and interviewing his other students for similar material.
The interviewing took more than two years and involved a fair amount of editing to extract teachings that would be helpful for people in general and would work in a written format.
The result was a small book entitled, The Language of the Heart.
Then, shortly before I returned to the States to help start a monastery in California, another Ajaan Fuang tape was found, a sermon in which he was giving more advanced instructions to one of his students.
I transcribed it and arranged to have it printed as a small booklet named, Transcendent Discernment.
The book you are holding in your hand is drawn from these three books.
Most of the material comes from The Language of the Heart, although parts of that book had to be cut either because they referred to incidents peculiar to Thai culture, or because the puns and wordplay made them untranslatable.
Ajaan Fuang loved playing with language — his sense of humor was one of the first things that attracted me to him — and many of his memorable sayings were memorable for just that reason.
Unfortunately, most of these passages lose their impact on translation, and the explanations they would require might quickly become tedious, so I have omitted nearly all of them, leaving in a few — such as the “litter” story — to give a taste of his way with words.
In addition to the passages from The Language of the Heart, I have included almost all of Transcendent Discernment along with highlights from the commemorative volume.
Not everything is a straight translation from these books, for in some cases I have had to retell the anecdotes to make them more accessible to a Western reader.
I have been careful throughout, though, to translate the message of Ajaan Fuang's own words as exactly as possible.
In putting this book together, I have had the opportunity to reflect on the student/teacher relationship as it exists in Thailand, and in Ajaan Fuang's dealings with his disciples, both lay and ordained.
He provided an atmosphere of warmth and respect in which his students could discuss with him the particular problems of their lives and minds without being made to feel like patients or clients, but simply as fellow human beings to whom he was offering a solid reference point for their lives.
Since coming to the West, I find that this sort of relationship is sadly lacking among us and I hope that as Buddhism becomes established here, this sort of relationship will become established as well, for the sake of the mental and spiritual health of our society as a whole.
A group of Thai people once asked me what was the most amazing thing I had ever encountered in Ajaan Fuang, hoping that I would mention his mind-reading abilities or other supernatural powers.
Although there were those — his knowledge of my mind seemed uncanny — I told them that what I found most amazing was his kindness and humanity: In all our years together, he had never made me feel that I was a Westerner or that he was a Thai.
Our communication was always on a direct, person-to-person level that bypassed cultural differences.
I know that many of his other students, although they would not have phrased the issue quite this way, sensed the same quality in him.
I offer this book as a way of sharing some of what I learned from Ajaan Fuang, and dedicate it, with deepest respect, to his memory.
He once told me that if it hadn't been for Ajaan Lee, he would never have known the brightness of life.
I owe the same debt to him.
Note: For this new, revised edition, I have reinstated the section entitled “Merit”, most of which was omitted from the first edition in.
§ Normally, Ajaan Fuang was a man of few words who spoke in response to circumstances: If the circumstances warranted it, he could give long, detailed explanations.
If not, he'd say only a word or two — or sometimes nothing at all.
He held by Ajaan Lee's dictum: “If you're going to teach the Dhamma to people, but they're not intent on listening, or not ready for what you have to say, then no matter how fantastic the Dhamma you're trying to teach, it still counts as idle chatter, because it doesn't serve any purpose.
I was constantly amazed at his willingness — sometimes eagerness — to teach meditation even when he was ill.
He explained to me once, “If people are really intent on listening, I find that I'm intent on teaching, and no matter how much I have to say, it doesn't tire me out.
In fact, I usually end up with more energy than when I started.
But if they're not intent on listening, then I get worn out after the second or third word.
“Before you say anything, ask yourself whether it's necessary or not.
If it's not, don't say it.
This is the first step in training the mind — for if you can't have any control over your mouth, how can you expect to have any control over your mind?
Sometimes his way of being kind was to be cross — although he had his own way of doing it.
He never raised his voice or used harsh language, but still his words could burn right into the heart.
Once I commented on this fact, and asked him, “Why is it that when your words hurt, they go right to the heart?
He answered, “That's so you'll remember.
If words don't hit home with the person listening, they don't hit home with the person speaking, either.
In being cross with his students, he'd take his cue from how earnest the student was.
The more earnest, the more critical he'd be, with the thought that this sort of student would use his words to best effect.
Once a lay student of his — who didn't understand this point — was helping to look after him when he was ill in Bangkok.
Even though she tried her best to attend to his needs, he was constantly criticizing her, to the point where she was thinking of leaving him.
It so happened, though, that another lay student came to visit, and Ajaan Fuang said in a passing remark to him, “When a teacher criticizes his students, it's for one of two reasons: either to make them stay or to make them go.
The first student, on overhearing this, suddenly understood, and so decided to stay.
§ A story that Ajaan Fuang liked to tell — with his own twist — was the Jataka tale of the turtle and the swans.
Once there were two swans who liked to stop by a certain pond every day for a drink of water.
As time passed, they struck up a friendship with a turtle who lived in the pond, and they started telling him about some of the many things they saw while flying around up in the air.
The turtle was fascinated with their stories, but after a while began to feel very depressed, because he knew he'd never have a chance to see the great wide world the way the swans did.
When he mentioned this to them, they said, “Why, that's no problem at all.
We'll find a way to take you up with us.” So they got a stick.
The male swan took one end of the stick in his mouth, the female took the other end in hers, and they had the turtle hold on with its mouth to the middle.
When everything was ready, they took off.
As they flew up into the sky, the turtle got to see many, many things he had never dreamed about on the earth below, and was having the time of his life.
When they flew over a village, though, some children playing below saw them, and started shouting, “Look!
Swans carrying a turtle!
Swans carrying a turtle!” This spoiled everything for the turtle, until he thought of a smart retort: “No.
The turtle's carrying the swans!” But as soon as he opened his mouth to say it, he fell straight to his death below.
The moral of the story: “Watch out for your mouth when you enter high places.
“Litter” is Thai slang for idle chatter, and once Ajaan Fuang used the term to dramatic effect.
It happened one evening when he was teaching in Bangkok.
Three young women who were long-time friends happened to show up together at the building where he was teaching, but instead of joining the group that was already meditating, they found themselves an out-of-the-way corner to catch up on the latest gossip.
As they were busy talking, they didn't notice that Ajaan Fuang had gotten up to stretch his legs and was walking right past them, with an unlit cigarette in his mouth and a box of matches in his hand.
He stopped for a second, lit a match, and instead of lighting his cigarette, tossed the lit match into the middle of their group.
Immediately they jumped up, and one of them said, “Than Phaw!
Why did you do that?
You just barely missed me!
“I saw a pile of litter there,” he answered, “and felt I should set fire to it.
One day Ajaan Fuang overheard two students talking, one of them asking a question and the other starting his answer with, “Well, it seems to me…” Immediately Ajaan Fuang cut him off: “If you don't really know, say you don't know, and leave it at that.
Why go spreading your ignorance around?
“We each have two ears and one mouth — which shows that we should give more time to listening, and less to speaking.
“Whatever happens in the course of your meditation, don't tell it to anyone except your teacher.
If you go telling other people, it's bragging.
And isn't that a defilement?
“When people advertise how good they are, they're really advertising how stupid they are.
“If something's really good, you don't have to advertise.
Thailand has a number of monk magazines, somewhat like movie-star magazines, which print the life stories and teachings of famous and not-so-famous monks, nuns, and lay meditation teachers.
The life stories tend to be so heavily embellished with supernatural and miraculous events, though, that they are hard to take seriously.
From the occasional contact he had with the editors and reporters responsible for these magazines, Ajaan Fuang felt that, by and large, their primary aims were mercenary.
As he put it, “The great meditation teachers went into the wilds and put their lives on the line in order to find the Dhamma.
When they found it, they offered it free of charge on their return.
But these people sit in their air-conditioned offices, write down whatever comes into their heads, and then put it up for sale.” As a result, he never cooperated with them when they tried to put him in their magazines.
Once a group of reporters from a magazine named People Beyond the World came to visit him, armed with cameras and tape recorders.
After paying their respects, they asked for his prawat, or personal history.
Now it so happens that the Thai word prawat can also mean police record, so Ajaan Fuang responded that he didn't have one, as he had never done anything wrong.
But the reporters were not easily discouraged.
If he didn't want to give his life story, they said, could he please at least teach them some Dhamma.
This is a request no monk can refuse, so Ajaan Fuang told them to close their eyes and meditate on the word buddho — awake.
They turned on their tape recorders and then sat in meditation, waiting for a Dhamma talk, and this was what they heard:
“That's today's Dhamma: two words — bud- and dho.
Now if you can't keep these two words in mind, it would be a waste of time to teach you anything else.
End of sermon.
When they realized that that was all, the reporters — looking very exasperated — gathered their cameras and tape recorders and left, never to bother him again.
§ “We human beings have long tongues, you know.
You sit around and suddenly your tongue flicks out to sea: You want to eat seafood.
Then it flicks around the world: You want to eat foreign cuisine.
You have to train your tongue and shrink it down to size.
“When you eat, keep your mind on your breath, and contemplate why you're eating.
If you're eating simply for the taste of the food, then what you eat can harm you.
After his trip to America, one of his students asked him if he had had a chance to eat pizza while he was there.
He mentioned that he had, and that it was very good.
This surprised one of his students who had gone along on the trip.
“You ate only two bites,” he said.
“We thought you didn't like it.
“Two bites were enough to fill me up,” he answered.
“Why would you want me to eat more?
Once a woman who had been studying with him for only a short while decided to prepare some food to donate to him.
Wanting to make sure it would be something he liked, she asked him straight out, “What kind of food do you like, Than Phaw?
His answer: “Food that's within reach.
It was a Friday evening, and a group of Ajaan Fuang's students were riding in the back of a pickup truck on their way from Bangkok to Wat Dhammasathit.
Another student had sent a bushel of oranges along with them to donate to the monks at the wat, and after a while on the road one of the students decided that the oranges looked awfully good.
So he came up with the following argument: “We're Than Phaw's children, right?
And he wouldn't want us to go hungry, right?
So anyone who doesn't have an orange isn't a child of Than Phaw.
Some of the group were observing the eight precepts, which forbid eating food after noon, so they were able to slip through the net.
Everyone else, though, helped him or herself to the oranges, even though a few of them felt bad about eating food intended for the monks.
When they arrived at the wat, they told Ajaan Fuang what had happened, and he immediately lit into them, saying that anyone who takes food intended for monks and eats it before it has been given to the monks is going to be reborn as a hungry ghost in the next life.
This scared one woman in the group, who immediately responded, “But I only ate one section!
Ajaan Fuang replied, “Well, if you're going to be a hungry ghost, you might as well eat enough to fill yourself up while you can.
During the Rains Retreat in a couple from the town of Rayong came out to the wat almost every evening to practice meditation.
The strange thing about them was that whatever happened in the course of their meditation would tend to happen to both of them at the same time.
On one occasion they both found that they couldn't eat, because they were overcome by a sense of the filthiness of food.
This lasted for three or four days without their getting weak or hungry, so they began to wonder what stage they had reached in their meditation.
When they mentioned this to Ajaan Fuang on their next visit to the wat, he had them sit in meditation, and then told them.
“Okay, contemplate food to see what it's made of.
Elements, right?
And what's your body made of?
The very same elements.
The elements in your body need the elements in food in order to keep going.
So why get all worked up about the filthiness of food?
Your body is even filthier.
When the Buddha teaches us to contemplate the filthiness of food, it's so that we can get over our delusions about it — not so that we won't be able to eat.
That ended their inability to eat food.
§ One of Ajaan Fuang's students — a seamstress — was criticized by a customer: “You practice the Dhamma, don't you?
Then why are you so greedy, charging such high prices?
People practicing the Dhamma should take only enough profit just to get by.
Although she knew her prices were fair, she couldn't think of a good answer, so the next time she saw Ajaan Fuang she told him what had happened.
He replied, “The next time they say that, tell them — 'Look, I'm not practicing the Dhamma to be stupid.' When I first went to stay at Wat Dhammasathit, the B-'s from Utapao Air Force Base could sometimes be heard high overhead in the wee hours of the morning, flying on their bombing missions into Cambodia.
Each time I heard them, I began to wonder what business I had meditating when there were so many injustices in the world that needed to be fought.
When I mentioned this to Ajaan Fuang, he said, “If you try to straighten out the world without really straightening yourself out first, your own inner goodness will eventually break down, and then where will you be?
You won't be able to do anybody — yourself or anyone else — any good at all.
“As soon as we're born, we're sentenced to death — just that we don't know when our turn will come.
So you can't be complacent.
Start right in and develop all your good qualities to the full while you still have the chance.
“If you want to be a good person, make sure you know where true goodness really lies.
Don't just go through the motions of being good.
“We all want happiness, but for the most part we aren't interested in building the causes for happiness.
All we want are the results.
But if we don't take an interest in the causes, how are the results going to come our way?
When I first went to practice meditation with Ajaan Fuang, I asked him if people really were reborn after death.
He answered, “When you start out practicing, the Buddha asks you to believe in only one thing: karma.
As for things aside from that, whether or not you believe them isn't really important.
One year, shortly before the Rains Retreat — a time when people traditionally make resolutions to step up their practice of the Dhamma — one of Ajaan Fuang's students approached him and said that she was thinking of observing the eight precepts during the Rains, but was afraid that going without the evening meal would leave her hungry.
He retorted: “The Buddha fasted until he didn't have any flesh at all — just skin and bones — so that he could discover the Dhamma to teach us, but here we can't even stand going without one single meal.
It's because of this that we're still swimming around in the cycle of birth and death.
As a result, she resolved that she'd have to observe the eight precepts on each Buddhist sabbath — the full moon, the new moon, and the half-moon days — during the three months of the Rains.
And so she did.
At the end of the Rains she felt really proud of herself for having kept to her resolution, but on her next visit to Ajaan Fuang, before she was able to broach the topic at all, he commented, “You're lucky, you know.
Your Rains Retreat has only twelve days.
Everyone else's is three months.
On hearing this she felt so embarrassed that she has observed the eight precepts every day throughout each Rains Retreat ever since.
§ Another student was meditating in Ajaan Fuang's presence when — in a spasm of mindlessness — she slapped a mosquito that was biting her arm.
Ajaan Fuang commented: “You charge a high price for your blood, don't you?
The mosquito asks for a drop, and you take its life in exchange.
A young man was discussing the precepts with Ajaan Fuang and came to number five, against taking intoxicants: “The Buddha forbade alcohol because most people lose their mindfulness when they drink it, right?
But if you drink mindfully it's okay, isn't it, Than Phaw?
“If you were really mindful,” he answered, “you wouldn't drink it in the first place.
There seem to be more excuses for breaking the fifth precept than for any other.
One evening another student was conversing with Ajaan Fuang at the same time that a group of people were sitting around them in meditation.
“I can't observe the fifth precept,” he said, “because I'm under a lot of group pressure.
When we have social occasions at work, and everyone else in the group is drinking, I have to drink along with them.
Ajaan Fuang pointed to the people sitting around them and asked, “This group isn't asking you to drink.
Why don't you give in to their group pressure instead?
The seamstress saw her friends observing the eight precepts at Wat Dhammasathit, and so decided to try it herself.
But in the middle of the afternoon, as she was walking through the monastery, she passed a guava tree.
The guavas looked inviting, so she picked one and took a bite.
Ajaan Fuang happened to be standing not far away, and so he remarked, “Hey.
I thought you were going to observe the eight precepts.
What's that in your mouth?
The seamstress realized in a jolt that she had broken her precepts, but Ajaan Fuang consoled her, “It's not all that necessary to observe the eight precepts, but make sure you observe the one precept, okay?
Do you know what the one precept is?
“No, Than Phaw.
What is it?
“Not doing any evil.
I want you to hold onto this one for life.
A woman came to Wat Dhammasathit to observe the precepts and meditate for a week, but by the end of the second day she told Ajaan Fuang that she had to return home, because she was afraid her family couldn't get along without her.
He taught her to cut through her worries by saying, “When you come here, tell yourself that you've died.
One way or another, your family will have to learn to fend for themselves.
On his first visit to Wat Dhammasathit, a middle-aged man was surprised to see an American monk.
He asked Ajaan Fuang, “How is it that Westerners can ordain?
Ajaan Fuang's answer: “Don't Westerners have hearts?
A Bangkok magazine once carried the serialized autobiography of a lay meditator who used his powers of concentration to treat diseases.
One installment mentioned how he had visited Ajaan Fuang, who had certified that he had attained jhana.
This didn't sound like Ajaan Fuang's style, but soon after the magazine came out, unusual numbers of people came to the wat under the impression that Ajaan Fuang, like the author of the autobiography, could treat illnesses through meditation.
One woman asked him if he treated kidney diseases, and he answered, “I treat only one kind of disease: diseases of the mind.
A student asked permission to keep a notebook of Ajaan Fuang's teachings, but he refused, saying, “Is that the sort of person you are?
— always carrying food around in your pocket for fear there'll be nothing to eat?” Then he explained: “If you jot everything down, you'll feel it's okay to forget what you've written, because it's all there in your notebook.
The end result is that all the Dhamma will be in your notebook, and none in your heart.
“The texts say that if you listen well, you'll gain wisdom.
To listen well, your heart has to be quiet and still.
You listen with your heart, not just with your ears.
Once you've listened, you have to put what you've heard into practice right then and there.
That's when you'll reap the benefits.
If you don't put it into practice, what you've heard will never become real inside you.
Once, while the chedi at Wat Dhammasathit was being built, some of the students working on the chedi got into a serious argument.
One of them became so upset that she went to tell Ajaan Fuang, who was staying in Bangkok at the time.
When she finished her report, he asked her, “Do you know what gravel is?
Taken aback, she answered, “Yes.
“Do you know what diamonds are?
“Yes.
“Then why don't you gather the diamonds?
What good do you get out of gathering gravel?
Even in a Buddhist country like Thailand, some young people who practice the Dhamma find that their parents are against it, and feel that they should be spending their time in more practical ways.
Once the parents of the seamstress tried to put a stop to her visits to Wat Makut, and this got her very angry.
But when she told her feelings to Ajaan Fuang, he warned her, “You owe a huge debt to your parents, you know.
If you get angry with them, or yell at them, you're stoking the fires of hell on your head, so watch out.
And remind yourself: If you wanted parents who would encourage your practice, why didn't you choose to be born from somebody else?
The fact that they're your parents shows that you've made past karma with them.
So just use up your old karma debts as they come.
There's no need to create any more karma by getting into arguments.
Channeling spirits has long been popular in Thailand, and even some people who practice the Dhamma also like to attend seances.
But Ajaan Fuang once said, “If you want results from your practice, you have to make up your mind that the Buddha is your one and only refuge.
Don't go taking refuge in anything else.
“If you practice the Dhamma, you don't have to be amazed by anyone else's powers or abilities.
Whatever you do, say or think, let your heart take its stand on the principles of reason.
“The truth lies within you.
If you're true in what you do, you'll meet with the truth.
If you're not, you'll meet only with things that are fake and imitation.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students reports that the first time she met him, he asked her, “Where do you usually go to make merit?” She answered that she had helped sponsor a Buddha image at that temple and contributed to a crematorium at this temple, etc.
So he asked further: “Why haven't you made merit at your heart?
Once Ajaan Fuang had one of his students cut away some of the grass and weeds that were threatening to overgrow the monastery.
She didn't really want to do the work, though, and all the while as she was cutting away she kept asking herself, “What kind of karma did I do that I have to work so hard like this?” When she had finished, he told her, “Well, you got some merit, but not very much.
“What?
After all that work, I still didn't get very much?
“If you want your full measure of merit, the merit has to go all the way to your heart.
There's another story involving grass.
One day Ajaan Fuang pointed out the overgrown grass near his hut and asked the same woman, “Don't you want the grass at the corral gate?
“What do you mean, grass at the corral gate?
“The opportunity to make merit right nearby that everyone else overlooks.
That's called 'grass at the corral gate.' Another time, Ajaan Fuang took some of his Bangkok students up the hill to clean the area around the chedi.
They found a large pile of trash that someone had thrown away up there, and one of the group complained, “How could anyone be so disrespectful as to do something like this?” But Ajaan Fuang told her, “Don't criticize whoever did it.
If they hadn't thrown the trash here, we wouldn't have the opportunity to earn the merit that comes from cleaning it up.
One day, after Ajaan Fuang's name had appeared in a magazine article, a group of three men from Bangkok took a day off from work to drive to Rayong and pay their respects to him.
After bowing down and then chatting for a while, one of them said, “Our country still has monks who practice rightly and well so that we can ask to have a share of their paramis, isn't that true, Than Phaw?
“It's true,” he answered, “but if we keep asking for a share of their paramis without developing any of our own, they'll see that we're simply beggars and they won't want to share with us any more.
A woman in the town of Samut Prakaan, just outside of Bangkok, sent word through one of Ajaan Fuang's students that she'd like to donate a large sum of money to help build the Buddha image at Wat Dhammasathit, but she wanted him to come to her home to give a blessing as she handed over the check.
He refused to go, saying, “If people want merit, they have to go looking for it.
They can't expect the merit to come looking for them.
Another woman once telephoned the main office at Wat Makut, saying that she was going to provide a meal for monks at her house and wanted to invite Ajaan Fuang to the meal because she had heard that he was a Noble Disciple.
When the invitation was conveyed to him, he refused it, saying, “Is her rice so special that only Noble Disciples can get to eat it?
One of Ajaan Fuang's students told him that she'd like to do something special to make merit on her birthday.
He replied, “Why does it have to be on your birthday?
Do you get less merit if you do it any other day?
If you want to make merit, go ahead and do it on the day the thought occurs to you.
Don't wait for your birthday, because your deathday may get to you first.
Referring to people who didn't like to meditate but were happy to help with the construction work at the wat, Ajaan Fuang once said, “Light merit doesn't register with them, so you have to find some really heavy merit for them to make.
That's the only way to keep them satisfied.
Shortly after the chedi was finished, a group of Ajaan Fuang's students were sitting and admiring it, taking joy in all the merit in store for them because they had had a hand in building it.
Ajaan Fuang happened to walk by and overhear what they were saying, and so he commented, as if to no one in particular, “Don't get attached to material things.
When you make merit, don't get attached to the merit.
If you let yourself get carried away, thinking 'I built this chedi with my own hands,' watch out.
If you happened to die right now, all you'd be able to think would be, 'This chedi is mine, it's mine.' Instead of being reborn in heaven with everyone else, you'd be reborn as a hungry ghost to guard over the chedi for a week or so because your heart was fixated on material things.
“If, when you do good, you get stuck on your goodness, you'll never get free.
Wherever you're stuck, that's where there's becoming and birth.
There is an old tradition in Buddhism — based on the Apadana tales — that whenever you make a gift to the religion or perform some other meritorious deed, you should dedicate the merit of the deed to a particular goal.
There were times when Ajaan Fuang would tell his students to make similar dedications every time they meditated, although the dedication he'd recommend would depend on the individual.
Sometimes he'd recommend the dedication King Asoka made at the end of his life: “In my future lives may I have sovereignty over the mind.
Other times he'd say, “There's no need to make any long, drawn-out dedications.
Tell yourself: If I have to be reborn, may I always encounter the Buddha's teachings.
But it wasn't always the case that he would recommend such dedications.
Once a woman told him that when she made merit she couldn't think of any particular goal to dedicate the merit towards.
He told her, “If the mind is full, there's no need to make any dedication if you don't want to.
It's like eating.
Whether or not you express a wish to get full, if you keep on eating, there's no way you can help but get full.
“Whatever you do, always think of your teacher.
If you forget your teacher, you're cutting yourself off at the root.
“A person who goes from teacher to teacher doesn't really have any teachers at all.
On occasion people would present Ajaan Fuang with amulets, and he would hand them out among his students — but only rarely among those who were especially close to him.
One day a monk who had lived several years with him couldn't help but complain, “Why is it that when you get good amulets, you never give any to me, and always to everybody else?
Ajaan Fuang replied, “I've already given you lots of things better than that.
Why don't you accept them?
“Meditators who live close to their teacher, but who don't understand him, are like a spoon in a pot of curry: It'll never know how sweet, sour, salty, rich or hot the curry is.
Ajaan Fuang's analogy for students who always have to ask their teachers for advice on how to handle even minor problems in everyday life: “They're just like baby puppies.
As soon as they defecate they have to run to their mother to have her lick them off.
They'll never grow up on their own.
“Students who get stuck on their teachers are like gnats.
No matter how much you chase them away, they keep coming back and won't leave you alone.
“If a teacher praises a student to his face, it's a sign that that's as far as the student will go — he probably won't be able to practice to any greater heights in this lifetime.
The reason the teacher praises him is so that he'll be able to take pride in the fact that at least he's made it this far.
His heart will have something good to hold on to when he needs it at death.
Many of Ajaan Fuang's students were convinced that he was able to read their minds, because time after time he would broach topics that happened to be going through their heads or weighing down their hearts at the moment.
I myself had many experiences like this, and many were reported to me while I was compiling this book.
In most cases of this sort, though, what he had to say had special meaning only for those directly involved, and so I'll ask to pass over them here.
But there are two cases I'd like to mention, since they strike me as being useful for all who practice the Dhamma.
Once, one of his students — a young man — took the bus from Bangkok to Rayong to help work on the chedi.
He got off at the mouth of the road leading to the wat, but didn't feel like walking the six kilometers it would take to get there, so he sat at the noodle stand by the intersection and said to himself — as a challenge to Ajaan Fuang — “If Than Phaw is really something special, may a car come by and give me a lift to the wat.” One hour passed, two, three, and not a single car or truck turned into the road, so he finally had to walk the distance on foot.
When he arrived at the wat, he went to Ajaan Fuang's hut to pay his respects, but as soon as Ajaan Fuang saw him approach, he got up, entered his room and closed the door.
This shook the student a little, but still he bowed down in front of the closed door.
The moment he finished, Ajaan Fuang opened the door a crack and said, “Look.
I didn't ask for you to come here.
You came of your own free will.
Another time, after the chedi was finished, the same young man was sitting in meditation at the chedi, in hopes that a voice would whisper the winning number of the next lottery in his ear.
What he heard, though, was the sound of Ajaan Fuang actually walking past and saying, as if to no one in particular, “Exactly what are you taking as your refuge?
“Ajaan Mun once said, 'People are all alike, but not at all alike, but in the final analysis, all alike.' You have to think about this for a good while before you can understand what he was getting at.
“If you want to judge other people, judge them by their intentions.
“When you want to teach other people to be good, you have to see how far their goodness can go.
If you try to make them better than they can be, you're the one who's being stupid.
“Nothing comes from focusing on the faults of others.
You can get more done by looking at your own faults instead.
“How good or bad other people are is their own business.
Focus on your own business instead.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students complained to him about all the problems she was facing at work.
She wanted to quit and live quietly by herself, but circumstances wouldn't allow it, because she had to provide for her mother.
Ajaan Fuang told her, “If you have to live with these things, then find out how to live in a way that rises above them.
That's the only way you'll be able to survive.
Advice for a student who was letting the pressure at work get her down: “When you do a job, don't let the job do you.
Another one of Ajaan Fuang's students was having serious problems, both at home and in her work, so he appealed to her fighting spirit: “Anyone who's a real, live person will have to meet up with real, live problems in life.
“When you meet with obstacles, you have to put up a fight.
If you give up easily, you'll end up giving up all your life long.
“Tell yourself you're made out of heartwood, and not out of sapwood.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students — a young nurse — had to put up with being the brunt of a lot of gossip at work.
At first she tried to ignore it, but as it happened more and more often, her patience began to wear thin.
One day, when the gossip was really getting to her, she went to meditate with Ajaan Fuang at Wat Makut.
While meditating, she saw a vision of herself repeating back, back, back to infinity, as if she were caught between two parallel mirrors.
The thought occurred to her that in her many previous lives she had probably had to endure an untold amount of the same sort of gossip, and this made her even more fed up with her situation.
So when she left meditation she told Ajaan Fuang of how tired she was of being gossiped about.
He tried to console her, saying, “This sort of thing is part and parcel of the world, you know.
Where there's praise, there also has to be criticism and gossip.
When you know this, why let yourself get involved?
Her mood was so strong, though, that she argued with him, “I'm not getting involved with them, Than Phaw.
They come and get involved with me!
So he turned the tables on her: “Then why don't you ask yourself — who asked you to butt in and be born here in the first place?
“If they say you're no good, remind yourself that their words go only as far as their lips.
They've never reached out and touched you at all.
“Other people criticize us and then forget all about it, but we take it and keep thinking about it.
It's as if they spit out some food and we pick it up and eat it.
When that's the case, who's being stupid?
“Pretend you have stones weighing down your ears, so that you don't get blown away by everything you hear said.
One day Ajaan Fuang asked, as if out of the blue, “If your clothing fell down into a cesspool, would you pick it back up again?
The woman he asked had no idea what he was getting at, but knew that if she wasn't careful about answering his questions, she'd come out looking like a fool, so she hedged her answer: “It depends.
If it was my only set of clothing, I'd have to pick it up.
But if I had other sets, I'd probably let it go.
What are you getting at, Than Phaw?
“If you like to hear bad things about other people, then even though you have no part in the bad karma of their acts, you still pick up some of the stench.
If any of his students were bearing a grudge about something, he would tell them: “You can't even sacrifice something as minor as this?
Think of it as making a gift.
Remember how many valuable things the Buddha sacrificed during his life as Prince Vessantara, and then ask yourself, 'This anger of mine has no value at all.
Why can't I sacrifice it, too?' “Think first before you act.
Don't be the sort of person who acts first and then has to think about it afterwards.
“Beware of fall-in-the-well kindness: the cases where you want to help other people, but instead of your pulling them up, they pull you down.
“When people say something is good, it's their idea of good.
But is it always what's really good for you?
“If people hate you, that's when you're let off the hook.
You can come and go as you like without having to worry about whether or not they'll miss you or get upset at your going.
And you don't have to bring any presents for them when you come back.
You're free to do as you like.
“Trying to win out over other people brings nothing but animosity and bad karma.
It's better to win out over yourself.
“Whatever you lose, let it be lost, but don't ever lose heart.
“If they take what's yours, tell yourself that you're making it a gift.
Otherwise there will be no end to the animosity.
“Their taking what's yours is better than your taking what's theirs.
“If it's really yours, it'll have to stay with you, no matter what.
If it's not really yours, why get all worked up about it?
“There's nothing wrong with being poor on the outside, but make sure you're not poor on the inside.
Make yourself rich in generosity, virtue, and meditation — the treasures of the mind.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students complained to him, “I look at other people, and they seem to have such an easy life.
Why is life so hard on me?” His answer: “Your 'hard life' is ten, twenty times 'the good life' for a lot of people.
Why don't you look at the people who have a harder time than you do?
Sometimes when any of his students were facing hardships in life, Ajaan Fuang would teach them to remind themselves: “How can I blame anyone else?
Nobody ever hired me to be born.
I came of my own free will.
“Everything that happens has its lifespan.
It won't last forever.
When its lifespan is up, it'll go away on its own.
“To have a partner in life is to suffer.
To have a good partner is really to suffer, because of all the attachment.
“Sensual pleasure is like a drug: One taste and you get addicted.
They say that with heroin it's hard to break the habit, but this is even worse.
It goes deep, right into the bone.
It's what made us get born in the first place, and has kept us circling through birth and death for aeons and aeons.
There's no medicine you can take to break the habit, to wash it out of your system, aside from the medicine of the Buddha's teachings.
“When we see Hindus worshiping Siva lingas it looks strange to us, but actually everyone in the world worships the Siva linga — i.e., they worship sex, simply that the Hindus are the only ones who are open about it.
Sex is the creator of the world.
The reason we're all born is because we worship the Siva linga in our hearts.
Once, when one of Ajaan Fuang's students was being pressured by her parents to look for a husband so that she could settle down and have children, she asked him, “Is it true what they say, that a woman gains a lot of merit in having a child, in that she gives someone else the chance to be born?
“If that were true,” he answered her, “then dogs would get gobs of merit, because they give birth to whole litters at a time.
He also told her, “Getting married is no way to escape suffering.
Actually, all you do is pile more suffering on yourself.
The Buddha taught that the five khandhas are a heavy burden, but if you get married, all of a sudden you have ten to worry about, and then fifteen, and then twenty… “You have to be your own refuge.
If you're the sort that has to take refuge in other people, then you'll have to see things the same way they do, which means you have to be stupid the same way they are.
So pull yourself out of all that, and take a good look at yourself until things are clear within you.
“You may think, 'my child, my child,' but is it really yours?
Even your own body isn't really yours.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students, when she was suffering a serious liver disease, dreamed that she had died and gone to heaven.
She took this as a bad omen and so went to Wat Makut to tell her dream to Ajaan Fuang.
He tried to console her, saying that it was really a good omen in disguise.
If she survived the disease, she'd probably get a promotion at work.
If she didn't, she'd be reborn in good circumstances.
As soon as he said this, though, she got very upset: “But I'm not ready to die!
“Look,” he told her, “when the time comes to go, you have to be willing to go.
Life isn't a rubber band you can stretch out or shrink as you like.
“If there are any sensual pleasures you really hunger for, it's a sign you enjoyed them before in a previous life.
That's why you miss them so much this time around.
If you think about this long enough, it should be enough to make you dispassionate and dismayed.
“Some people say that monks don't do any work, but actually the work of abandoning your defilements is the most difficult work in the world.
The work of the everyday world has its days off, but our work doesn't have any time off at all.
It's something you have to do hours a day.
Sometimes you may feel you're not up to it, but still you have to do it.
If you don't, who's going to do it for you?
It's your duty, and nobody else's.
If you don't do it, what are you living off the donations of other people for?
“Whatever work you're doing, keep an eye on your mind.
If you see that it's going off the path, stop whatever you're doing and focus all your attention on it.
The work of looking after your mind should always come first.
“The Buddha's Dhamma is akaliko — timeless.
The reason we haven't reached it yet is because we have lots of times: time for this, time for that, time to work, time to rest, time to eat, time to sleep… Our whole life turns into times, and as a result they don't give us a chance to see the truth clearly within ourselves.
So we have to make our practice timeless.
That's when the truth will appear in our hearts.
Ajaan Fuang was very meticulous about keeping things clean and in their place, and taught his students to be meticulous too, for that was the way he was taught by his teachers, and he knew that he had benefitted from it.
In his words, “If you can't master obvious things like this, how are you going to master the subtle things, like the mind?
The monk who attended to his needs — cleaning his hut, boiling the water for his bath, looking after him when he was sick, etc.
— had to be very observant, for Ajaan Fuang used the teacher-student relationship as an opportunity to teach by example.
Instead of explaining where things should be placed or when certain duties should be done, he left it up to the student to observe for himself.
If he caught on, Ajaan Fuang wouldn't say anything.
If he didn't, Ajaan Fuang would give him a dressing down — but still wouldn't explain what was wrong.
It was up to the student to figure things out for himself.
As Ajaan Fuang said, “If it gets to the point where I have to tell you, it shows that we're still strangers.
One evening, one of the monks at Wat Dhammasathit saw Ajaan Fuang working alone, picking up scraps of lumber around the chedi construction site and putting them in order.
The monk ran down to help him, and after a while asked him, “Than Phaw, this sort of work isn't something you should be doing alone.
There are lots of other people.
Why don't you get them to help?
“I am getting other people to help,” Ajaan Fuang answered as he continued to pick up pieces of wood.
“Who?” the monk asked as he looked around and saw no one else.
“You.
When I returned to Thailand in to be ordained, Ajaan Fuang gave me two warnings: “Being a meditator isn't simply a matter of sitting with your eyes closed.
You have to be sharp at everything you do.” “If you want to learn, you have to think like a thief and figure out how to steal your knowledge.
What this means is that you can't just wait for the teacher to explain everything.
You have to notice for yourself what he does, and why — for everything he does has its reason.
The relationship of a monk to his supporters is something of a balancing act.
One of Ajaan Fuang's favorite reminders to his monk disciples was, “Remember, nobody's hired you to become a monk.
You haven't ordained to become anybody's servant.” But if a monk complained that the monastery attendants weren't doing as they were told, he'd say, “Did you ordain to have other people wait on you?
“Our life depends on the support of others, so don't do anything that would weigh them down.
“Monks who eat the food that other people donate, but then don't practice, can expect to be reborn as water buffaloes next time around, to till the fields and work off their debts.
“Don't think that the small disciplinary rules aren't important.
As Ajaan Mun once said, logs have never gotten into people's eyes, but fine sawdust can — and it can blind you.
Western women are often upset when they learn that monks aren't allowed to touch them, and they usually take it as a sign that Buddhism discriminates against women.
But as Ajaan Fuang explained it, “The reason the Buddha didn't allow monks to touch women is not that there's anything wrong with women.
It's because there's something wrong with the monks: They still have mental defilements, which is why they have to be kept under control.
For anyone who tries to follow the celibate life, the opposite sex is the biggest temptation to leave the path.
If Ajaan Fuang was teaching monks, he'd say, “Women are like vines.
At first they seem so weak and soft, but if you let them grow on you, they curl up around you until they have you all tied up and finally bring you down.
When teaching nuns, he'd warn them about men.
Once a nun was thinking of disrobing and returning home, knowing that her father would arrange a marriage for her.
She asked Ajaan Fuang for advice, and he told her, “Ask yourself.
Do you want to live inside the noose or out?” As a result, she decided she'd rather stay out.
§ “If you find yourself thinking about sex, run your hand over your head to remind yourself of who you are.
Ajaan Fuang had many stories to tell about his times with Ajaan Lee.
One of my favorites was of the time a large group of Ajaan Lee's Bangkok students arranged to go with him on a meditation trip into the forest.
They agreed to meet at Hua Lampong, the main train station in Bangkok, and take the train north to Lopburi.
When the group assembled at the station, though, it turned out that many of them had each brought along at least two large suitcases of “necessities” for the trip, and even many of the monks from Bangkok monasteries had brought along large loads.
On seeing this, Ajaan Lee said nothing, but simply set out walking north along the railroad tracks.
Since he was walking, everyone had to walk, although it wasn't long before the members of the group most burdened down began complaining, “Than Phaw, why are you making us walk?
We've got so much heavy stuff to carry!
At first Ajaan Lee said nothing, but finally told them, as he kept on walking, “If it's heavy, then why burden yourself with it?” It took a few moments for his message to sink in, but soon the different members of the group had stopped to open their bags and throw everything unessential into the lotus ponds that lined either side of the railroad tracks.
When they reached the next train station, Ajaan Lee saw that they had trimmed down their belongings enough that he could let them take the next train north.
§ “When you live in a monastery, pretend that you're living alone: What this means is that once you've finished with the group activities — the meal, the chanting, the chores, and so on — you don't have to get involved with anyone.
Go back to your hut and meditate.
“When you live alone, pretend that you're in a monastery: Set up a schedule and stick to it.
When I went to Wat Asokaram — a very large monastery — for my first Rains Retreat, Ajaan Fuang told me, “If they ask you questions in Thai, answer in English.
If they ask in English, answer in Thai.
After a while they'll get tired to talking to you, and will leave you alone to meditate.
“It's good to live in a monastery where not everyone is serious about the practice, because it teaches you to depend on yourself.
If you lived only with people who were serious meditators, you'd get so that you wouldn't be able to survive anywhere else.
“We keep disagreeable people around the monastery as a way of testing to see if our defilements really are all gone.
“The purpose of adhering to the ascetic practices is to wear down your defilements.
If you adhere to them with the thought of impressing other people, you'd do better not to adhere to them at all.
On fasting as an aid to meditation: “For some people it works well, for others it works just the opposite — the more they fast, the stronger their defilements get.
It's not the case that when you starve the body you starve the defilements, because defilements don't come from the body.
They come from the mind.
“There's a passage where the Buddha asks, 'Days and nights pass by, pass by.
What are you doing right now?' So what answer do you have for him?
“If you go teaching others before your own practice is up to standard, you do more harm than good.
“Training a meditator is like training a boxer: You pull your punches and don't hit him any harder than he can take.
But when he comes back at you, he gives it everything he's got.
The first time I was going to give a sermon, Ajaan Fuang told me: “Pretend you have a sword in your hand.
If any people in the audience think critical thoughts of you, cut off their heads.
When I first went to Wat Dhammasathit, the trip from Bangkok was an all-day affair, since the roads were much worse and more roundabout than now.
One evening a woman rented a cab and traveled all the way from Bangkok to get Ajaan Fuang's advice on the problems she was having in her family, and after a couple of hours of consultation she took the cab all the way back.
After she left, he said to me, “There's one good thing about living way out here: If we were living near Bangkok, people with a lot of free time on their hands and no idea of how to spend it would come and waste our time chatting all day.
But here, when people make the effort to come out, it shows that they really want our help.
And no matter how many hours it takes to talk things over with them, it's no waste of time at all.
“When people come to see me, I have them sit and meditate first so that they know how to make their minds quiet.
Only then will I let them bring up any other problems they may want to talk about.
If you try discussing things with them when their minds aren't quiet, there's no way they'll understand.
“If people get it into their heads that they're enlightened when they aren't, then you shouldn't waste any breath on trying to straighten them out.
If they don't have faith in you %, then the more you try to reason with them, the more they'll get set in their opinions.
If they do have faith in you, then all it takes is one sentence or two and they'll come to their senses.
Once the father of one of the monks living with Ajaan Fuang wrote his son a letter asking him to disrobe, return home, continue his studies, get a job, start a family, and have a normal, happy life like everyone else in the world.
The monk mentioned this to Ajaan Fuang, who said, “He says his kind of happiness is something special, but look at it — what kind of happiness is it, really?
Just the same old smelly stuff you left when you ordained.
Isn't there any happiness better than that?
Many were the times when people would tell Ajaan Fuang that — with all the work and responsibilities in their lives — they had no time to meditate.
And many were the times he'd respond, “And you think you'll have time after you're dead?
“All you have to study is the meditation-word, buddho.
As for any other fields you might study, they never come to an end, and can't take you beyond suffering.
But once you're come to the end of buddho, that's when you'll come to true happiness.
“When the mind's not quiet — that's when its poor and burdened with difficulties.
It takes molehills and turns them into mountains.
But when the mind is quiet, there's no suffering, because there's nothing at all.
No mountains at all.
When there's a lot to the mind, it's simply a lot of defilement, making it suffer.
“If you're single-minded about whatever you think of doing, you're sure to succeed.
“When you're thinking buddho you don't have to wonder about whether or not you'll do well in your meditation.
If you put your mind to it, you're sure to do well.
The things that come to disturb you are simply the forces of temptation, come to put on a play.
Whatever the play, all you have to do is watch — you don't have to get on stage with them.
“What's really essential is that you bring your views in line with the truth.
Once your views are right, the mind will immediately come to rest.
If your views are wrong, everything is immediately wrong.
All the things you need for the practice — the breath, the mind — are already there.
So try to bring your views in line with the breath, and you won't have to use a lot of force in your meditation.
The mind will settle down and come to rest right away.
“The mind is like a king.
Its moods are like his ministers.
Don't be a king who's easily swayed by his court.
A group of laypeople who had studied the Abhidhamma together came to Ajaan Fuang to try out his version of mental training, but when he told them to sit, close their eyes, and focus on the breath, they immediately backed off, saying that they didn't want to practice concentration, for fear that they'd get stuck on jhana and end up being reborn in the Brahma worlds.
He responded, “What's there to be afraid of?
Even non-returners are reborn in the Brahma worlds.
At any rate, being reborn in the Brahma worlds is better than being reborn as a dog.
When Ajaan Fuang taught meditation, he didn't like to map things out in advance.
As soon as he had explained the beginning steps, he'd have the student start sitting right in his presence, and then take the steps back home to work on there.
If anything came up in the course of the practice, he'd explain how to deal with it and then go on to the next step.
Once a layman who had known more than his share of meditation teachers came to discuss the Dhamma with Ajaan Fuang, asking him many questions of an advanced nature as a way of testing his level of attainment.
Ajaan Fuang asked him in return, “Have you had these experiences in your own meditation yet?
“No, not yet.
“Then in that case I'd rather not discuss them, because if we discuss them when they're not yet a reality for you, they'll just be theories, and not the real Dhamma.
One meditator noticed that his practice under Ajaan Fuang was making quick progress, and so he asked what the next step would be.
“I'm not going to tell you,” Ajaan Fuang said.
“Otherwise you'll become the sort of amazing marvel who knows everything before he meets with it, and masters everything before he's tried his hand.
Just keep practicing and you'll find out on your own.
“You can't plan the way your practice is going to go.
The mind has its own steps and stages, and you have to let the practice follow in line with them.
That's the only way you'll get genuine results.
Otherwise you'll turn into a half-baked arahant.
“Don't make a journal of your meditation experiences.
If you do, you'll start meditating in order to have this or that thing happen, so that you can write it down in your journal.
And as a result, you'll end up with nothing but the things you've fabricated.
Some people are afraid to meditate too seriously, for fear that they'll go crazy, but as Ajaan Fuang once said, “You have to be crazy about meditation if you want to meditate well.
And as for whatever problems come up, there are always ways to solve them.
What's really scary is if you don't meditate enough for the problems to come out in the open in the first place.
“Other people can teach you only the outer skin, but as for what lies deeper inside, only you can lay down the law for yourself.
You have to draw the line, being mindful, keeping track of what you do at all times.
It's like having a teacher following you around, in public and in private, keeping watch over you, telling you what to do and what not to do, making sure that you stay in line.
If you don't have this sort of teacher inside you, the mind is bound to stray off the path and get into mischief, shoplifting all over town.
“Persistence comes from conviction, discernment from being mindful.
“Persistence in the practice is a matter of the mind, and not of your posture.
In other words, whatever you do, keep your mindfulness constant and don't let it lapse.
No matter what your activity, make sure the mind sticks with its meditation work.
“When you start out sitting in meditation, it takes a long time for the mind to settle down, but as soon as the session is over you get right up and throw it away.
It's like climbing a ladder slowly, step by step, to the second floor, and then jumping out the window.
A woman army officer sat in meditation with Ajaan Fuang at Wat Makut until it seemed that her mind was especially blissful and bright.
But when she returned home, instead of trying to maintain that state of mind, she sat around listening to a friend's woes until she herself started feeling depressed, too.
A few days later she returned to Wat Makut and told Ajaan Fuang what had happened.
He responded, “You took gold and traded it in for excrement.
Another student disappeared for several months, and on her return told Ajaan Fuang, “The reason I didn't show up is that my boss sent me to night school for a semester, so I didn't have any time to meditate at all.
But now that the course is over, I don't want to do anything but meditate — no work, no study, just let the mind be still.
She thought he'd be pleased to hear how intent she still was on meditating, but he disappointed her.
“So you don't want to work — that's a defilement, isn't it?
Whoever said that people can't work and meditate at the same time?
“Meditating isn't a matter of making the mind empty, you know.
The mind has to have work to do.
If you make it empty, then anything — good or bad — can pop into it.
It's like leaving the front door to your home open.
Anything at all can come strolling right in.
A young nurse practiced meditation with Ajaan Fuang several days running, and finally asked him one day, “Why wasn't today's session as good as yesterday's?
He answered: “Meditating is like wearing clothes.
Today you wear white, tomorrow red, yellow, blue, whatever.
You have to keep changing.
You can't wear the same set of clothes all the time.
So whatever color you're wearing, just be aware of it.
Don't get depressed or excited about it.
A few months later the same nurse was sitting in meditation when a sense of peace and clarity in her mind became so intense that she felt she would never have a bad mood infiltrate her mind again.
But sure enough, bad moods eventually came back as before.
When she mentioned this to Ajaan Fuang, he said, “Looking after the mind is like raising a child.
There will have to be bad days along with the good.
If you want only the good, you're in for trouble.
So you have to play neutral: Don't fall in with the good or the bad.
“When the meditation goes well, don't get excited.
When it doesn't go well, don't get depressed.
Simply be observant to see why it's good, why it's bad.
If you can be observant like this, it won't be long before your meditation becomes a skill.
“Everything depends on your powers of observation.
If they're crude and sloppy, you'll get nothing but crude and sloppy results.
And your meditation will have no hope of making progress.
One day a young woman was sitting in meditation with Ajaan Fuang and everything seemed to go well.
Her mind was clear and relaxed, and she could contemplate the elements in her body as he told her, step by step, with no problem at all.
But the next day, nothing went right.
After the session was over, he asked her, “How did it go today?
She answered, “Yesterday I felt as if I were smart, today I feel like I'm stupid.
So he asked her further, “Are the smart person and the stupid person the same person or not?
A student came to complain to Ajaan Fuang that she had been meditating for years, and still hadn't gotten anything out of it.
His immediate response: “You don't meditate to 'get' anything.
You meditate to let go.
The seamstress, after practicing meditation with Ajaan Fuang for several months, told him that her mind seemed more of a mess than it was before she began meditating.
“Of course it does,” he told her.
“It's like your house.
If you polish the floor every day, you won't be able to stand the least little bit of dust on it.
The cleaner the house, the more easily you'll see the dirt.
If you don't keep polishing the mind, you can let it go out and sleep in the mud without any qualms at all.
But once you get it to sleep on a polished floor, then if there's even a speck of dust, you'll have to sweep it away.
You won't be able to stand the mess.
“If you get excited by other people's experiences in meditation, it's like getting excited by other people's wealth.
And what do you gain from that?
Pay attention to developing your own wealth instead.
“Good will and compassion, if they aren't backed up by equanimity, can cause you to suffer.
That's why you need the equanimity of jhana to perfect them.
“Your concentration has to be Right Concentration: just right, on an even keel, all the time.
Whatever you do — sitting, standing, walking, lying down — don't let it have any ups and downs.
“Concentration: You have to learn how to do it, how to maintain it, and how to put it to use.
“Once you catch hold of the mind, it'll stay in the present, without slipping off to the past or future.
That's when you'll be able to make it do whatever you want.
“When you get so that you catch on to the meditation, it's like a kite that finally catches the wind.
It won't want to come down.
One evening, after a work party at Wat Dhammasathit, Ajaan Fuang took his lay students up to the chedi to meditate.
One woman in the group felt completely exhausted from all the work, but joined in the meditation anyway, out of deference to him.
As she sat there, her awareness got weaker and weaker, smaller and smaller, to the point where she thought she was going to die.
Ajaan Fuang happened to walk past and said, “There's no need to be afraid of death.
You die with every in and out breath.
This gave her the strength to fight off her exhaustion, and to continue meditating.
§ “To meditate is to practice dying, so that you'll be able to do it right.
When my father came for a visit to Wat Dhammasathit, I got him to sit and meditate with Ajaan Fuang, while I acted as interpreter.
Before starting, my father asked if his being a Christian would be an obstacle to the meditation.
Ajaan Fuang assured him that it wouldn't: “We're going to focus on the breath.
The breath doesn't belong to Buddhism or Christianity or anyone else.
It's common property all over the world, and everyone has the right to look at it.
So try looking at the breath until you can see your own mind and know your own mind.
Then the question of what religion you belong to won't be an issue, because we can talk about the mind instead of discussing religions.
This way we can understand each other.
“When you do anything in meditation, relate it to the breath, for that's the basis of the entire skill we're developing.
“Catching the mind is like catching eels.
If you simply jump down into the mud and try to grab hold of them, they'll slip off every which way.
You have to find something they like — as when people take a dead dog, put it in a big clay jar and then bury it in the mud.
In no time at all the eels come swimming into the jar of their own free will to feed off the dog, and then all you have to do it put your hand over the mouth of the jar and there you are: You've got your eels.
“It's the same with the mind.
You have to find something it likes, so make the breath as comfortable as you can, to the point where it feels good throughout the whole body.
The mind likes comfort, so it'll come of its own free will, and then it's easy to catch hold of it.
“You have to know the breath at all times, and then happiness will be yours.
The human state, the heavenly state, and nibbana are all here in the breath.
If you get carried away with other things, happiness will slip through your fingers, so you have to learn how to observe the in-and-out breath at all times.
Pay attention to how it's getting along — don't leave it to fend for itself.
When you know its way of life — sitting, standing, walking, everything — then you can get what you want from it.
The body will be light, the mind at ease, happy at all times.
“The breath can take you all the way to nibbana, you know.
“The first step is simply to look at the breath as it is.
You don't have to go fiddling around with it a lot.
Just think bud- with the in-breath, and dho with the out.
Bud- in, dho out.
Don't force the breath, or force the mind into a trance.
Simply hold the mind carefully right there with each breath.
“How do you use your powers of observation to get acquainted with the breath?
Ask yourself: Do you know the breath?
Is the breath there?
If you can't see whether the breath is for real, look further in until it's clearly there.
There's no great mystery to it.
It's always real, right there.
The important thing is whether or not you're for real.
If you are, then simply keep at it.
That's all there is to it.
Simply keep being real, being true in what you do, and your meditation will make progress.
It'll gradually grow stronger, and the mind will grow calm.
Just be clear about what you're doing.
Don't have any doubts.
If you can doubt even your own breath, then there are no two ways about it: You'll doubt everything.
No matter what happens, you'll be uncertain about it.
So be straightforward and true in whatever you do, for everything comes down to whether or not you're true.
“Once the mind stays with the breath, you don't have to repeat buddho in the mind.
It's like calling your water buffalo.
Once it comes, why keep calling its name?
“Make the mind and the breath one and the same.
Don't let them be two.
“Don't be a post planted in the mud.
Have you ever seen a post planted in the mud?
It sways back and forth and can never stand firm.
Whatever you do, be firm and single-minded about it.
Like when you focus on the breath: Make the mind one with it, like a post planted firmly in solid rock.
“Hold onto the breath the way a red ant bites: Even if you pull its body so that it separates from the head, the head will keep on biting and won't let go.
When I first heard Ajaan Fuang talk about “catching hold” of the breath, I didn't understand him.
I'd sit tensing up my body to catch hold of it, but this simply made me feel tired and ill at ease.
Then one day, as I was riding the bus to Wat Makut, I sat in concentration and found that if I let the breath follow its natural course, it felt a lot more comfortable, and the mind wouldn't run away from it.
When I reached Wat Makut, being a typical Westerner, I took him to task, “Why do you say to catch the breath?
The more you catch it, the more uncomfortable it is.
You have to let it go to flow naturally.
He laughed and said, “That isn't what I meant.
To 'catch it' means to stick with it, to follow it and to make sure you don't wander away from it.
You don't have to squeeze or force or control it.
Whatever it's like, just keep on watching it.
“Get so that you really know the breath, not just that you're simply aware of it.
“Observing the breath is the cause, the pleasure that arises is the result.
Focus as much as you can on the cause.
If you ignore the cause and get carried away with the result, it'll run out and you'll end up with nothing at all.
“When you focus on the breath, measure things by how much pleasure you feel.
If both the breath and the mind feel pleasant, you're doing okay.
If either the breath or the mind feels uncomfortable, that's when you have to make adjustments.
“The main thing when you meditate is to be observant.
If you feel ill at ease, change the breath until you feel better.
If the body feels heavy, think of spreading the breath so that it feels light.
Tell yourself that the breath can come in and out every pore of your skin.
“When the book says to focus on the breath sensations in the different parts of the body, it means to focus on whatever feelings are already there in the body.
“The breath can be a resting place for the mind, or it can be what the mind actively contemplates.
When the mind isn't willing to settle down and be still, it's a sign that it wants exercise.
So we give it work to do.
We make it scan the body and contemplate the breath sensations in the different parts to see how they're related to the in-and-out breath, to see where the energy flows smoothly and where it's blocked.
But make sure that your mind doesn't wander outside of the body.
Keep it circling around inside and don't let it stop until it gets tired.
Once it's tired you can find a place for it to rest, and it'll stay there without your having to force it.
“Make the breath viscous and then think of it exploding to fill the whole body.
Ajaan Fuang once told a student who liked to keep in shape with yoga and aerobic exercises every day: “Use the breath to keep in shape instead.
Sit in meditation and spread the breath throughout the body, to every part.
The mind will get trained and the body will be strong with no need to tie it into knots or make it jump around.
A nun who practiced meditation with Ajaan Fuang had had poor health since she was a child, and was always coming down with one disease or another.
Ajaan Fuang told her: “Every morning when you wake up, sit and meditate to give yourself a physical examination, to see where the aches and pains are, and then use your breathing to treat them.
The heavy pains will grow lighter; the light ones will disappear.
But don't make a big deal out of whether or not they disappear.
Keep on examining the body and dealing with the breath no matter what happens, because the important point is that you're training your mindfulness to stay with the body, to the point where it's strong enough to go above and beyond pain.
“Adjust the breath until it's perfectly even.
If you see a white light, bring it into the body and let it explode out to every pore.
The mind will be still; the body weightless.
You'll feel white and bright all over, and your heart will be at ease.
“When the breath fills the body, it's like water filling a jar to the brim.
Even though you may try to pour more into it, that's all it can take.
It's just right, in and of itself.
“Meditation needs rapture — a feeling of fullness in body and mind — as its lubricant.
Otherwise it gets too dry.
“When you meditate you have to let go in stages.
Like when they go into outer space: The space capsule has to let go of the booster rockets before it can reach the moon.
“When the mind is really in place you can let go of the breath, and it won't wander off anywhere.
It's like pouring cement: If the cement hasn't set, you can't remove the plywood forms, but once it's set, it'll stay where it is without any need for the forms at all.
“Spread the breath until the body and mind are so light that there's no sense of body at all — just awareness itself.
The mind will be clear like crystal clean water.
You can look down into the water and see your own face.
You'll be able to see what's going on in your mind.
“When the breath is full and still, you let go of it.
Then you think of each of the other elements in the body — fire, water, and earth — one by one.
When they're all clear you put them together, i.e., balance them so that the body isn't too hot, too cold, too heavy too light: just right in every way.
Now you let go of that and stay with the space element — a feeling of emptiness.
When you're skilled at staying with space, look at what's saying “space”.
This is where you turn to look at awareness itself, the element of consciousness.
Once the mind has become one like this, you can then let go of the oneness, and see what's left.
“After you can do this, you practice going in and out of the various stages until you're skilled at it, and you can notice the various modes of the mind as you do it.
That's where discernment will begin to appear.
“In contemplating yourself, the six elements have to come first.
You take them apart and put them back together again, as when you learn your ABC's and how to make them into words.
After a while you can make any word you want.
“Take your time to make sure that this foundation is solid.
Once it's solid, then no matter how many storeys you want to build on top of it, they'll go up quickly and stay in place.
“If you were to say it's easy, well yes, it's easy.
If you were to say it's hard, it's hard.
It all depends on you.
“The basic steps of breath meditation that Ajaan Lee describes in his Method are just the main outline of the practice.
As for the details, you have to use your own ingenuity to work variations on his outline so that it fits your experiences.
That's when you'll get results.
“If you're having any problems in your concentration, check what you're doing against the seven steps in Method.
I've found that if anyone comes to me with problems in their concentration, all I have to do is apply one of the seven steps.
They're basic to all meditation.
“The texts say that breath meditation is right for everyone, but that's not really the case.
Only if you're meticulous can you get results from focusing on the breath.
“A famous meditation teacher once criticized Ajaan Lee: 'Why do you teach people to look at the breath?
What is there to look at?
There's just in and out.
How are they going to gain discernment from looking at just that?' He answered, 'If that's all they see, that's all they'll get.' This is a question that comes from not knowing how to look.
“People of discernment can take anything at all and put it to good use.
One year — when Ajaan Fuang was seeing a Chinese doctor in Bangkok for his skin disease and staying at Wat Asokaram — a group of nuns and laypeople came to practice meditation with him every night.
Some members of the group would report having this or that vision in the course of their meditation, and finally one of the nuns complained: “I know that my mind isn't slipping off anywhere; it's staying right with the breath all the time, so why aren't I having any visions like everyone else?
Ajaan Fuang answered her, “Do you know how lucky you are?
With people who have visions, this, that, and the other thing is always coming in to interfere.
But you don't have any old karma to get in the way of your meditation, so you can focus directly on the mind without having to get involved with any outside things at all.
“Don't be amazed by people with visions.
Visions are nothing else but dreams.
There are true ones and false ones.
You can't really trust them.
A Bangkok housewife who was practicing meditation with Ajaan Fuang heard some of his other students say that meditation without visions was the straight path.
It so happened that she had frequent visions in her meditation, and so hearing this made her wonder why her path was so winding and convoluted.
When she asked Ajaan Fuang about this, he told her: “Having visions in your meditation is like having lots of lush wild greens growing along the side of your path.
You can gather them as you go along, so that you'll have something to eat along the way, and you'll reach the end of the path just like everyone else.
As for other people, they might see the greens without gathering them, or may not even see them at all — because their path goes through arid land.
“People who practice concentration fall into two groups: those who have signs via the eyes when their minds settle down, and those who have signs via the body.
People in the first group are the ones who see visions of people, animals, whatever.
Those in the second group don't have visions, but when their minds settle down, their bodies will feel unusually heavy or light, large or small, etc.
When these people focus on the elements in their body, they'll notice them as feelings: warmth, coolness, heaviness, spaciousness, and so forth.
“If I'm teaching people like this how to meditate, I don't have to worry about them too much, because there aren't many dangers in their path — aside from the danger of their getting discouraged because they don't see anything happening in their meditation.
The ones I worry about are those in the first group, because they have lots of dangers.
Their visions can lead them to jump to all sorts of false conclusions.
If they don't learn the right way to deal with their visions, they'll get stuck on them and never be able to reach any higher level than that.
“Visions — or whatever things appear in the course of your meditation: It's not the case that you shouldn't pay any attention to them, for some kinds of visions have important messages.
So when things like this appear, you have to look into how they're appearing, why they're appearing, and for what purpose.
“People who have visions have a double-edged sword in their hands, so they have to be careful.
The things that appear have their uses and their dangers.
So learn how to squeeze out their uses and leave the dangers behind.
Usually if any of Ajaan Fuang's students saw a vision of their own body in meditation, he'd have them divide it up in the vision into the four elements — earth, water, wind, and fire — or into its basic parts, and then set fire to it until it was nothing but ashes.
If the same vision reappeared, he'd have them deal with it the same way again until they were quick at it.
One of his students, a nun, was practicing this sort of meditation every day, but as soon as she had divided the body into its parts and was getting ready to set fire to it, another image of her body would appear right next to the first.
As soon as she was getting ready to cremate the second one, another one would appear right next to it, and then another, and another, like fish lined up on a platter waiting to be grilled.
As she looked at them she felt fed up with the idea of continuing, but when she mentioned this to Ajaan Fuang, he told her, “The whole purpose in doing this is to get fed up, but not fed up with the doing.
Another technique Ajaan Fuang taught for dealing with an image of one's own body would be to focus on what it looked like the first week in the womb, the second week, the third, and so on to the day of birth; then the first month after that, the second month, the first year, the second year, and so on up until old age and death.
One woman was trying this technique, but it seemed too slow to her, so she focused on five- and ten-year intervals instead.
When Ajaan Fuang found out, he told her, “You're skipping over all the important parts,” and then made up a new set of rules: “Think of your head and then think of pulling out one hair at a time and placing it in the palm of your hand.
See how much you can pull out, and then replant it one hair at a time.
If you haven't finished, don't leave your meditation until you do.
If you want to pull it out in bunches, okay, but you have to replant it one hair at a time.
You have to go into the details like this if you want to gain anything good from it.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students asked him, “Why is it that the intuitions I get from my concentration come in such short flashes, without letting me catch the whole picture?” He answered, “When they put a record on a record player, the needle has to keep bearing down continually if you're going to hear the whole story.
If you don't keep bearing down, how can you expect to know anything?
Another student was sitting in meditation with Ajaan Fuang when she saw an image of a dead person in her concentration, asking for a share of some of the merit from her practice.
This made her feel creepy, so she told Ajaan Fuang, “There's a ghost in front of me, Than Phaw.
“That's not a ghost,” he responded.
“That's a person.
“No, it's really a ghost,” she insisted.
“If that's a ghost,” he said, “then you're a ghost.
If you see it as a person, then you can be a person, too.
After that he told her to spread thoughts of goodwill if she saw anything like that again, and the image would go away.
So from that point on, that's what she'd do, at the drop of a hat, the minute she saw an image of a dead person in her meditation.
When Ajaan Fuang found out about this, he taught her, “Wait a minute.
Don't be in such a hurry to get rid of them.
First look at what condition they're in and then ask them what karma they did to become that way.
If you do this, you'll begin to gain some insight into the Dhamma.
Several weeks later she had a vision of an emaciated woman holding a tiny child.
The woman was wearing nothing but dirty rags, and the child was crying without stop.
The student asked the woman in her vision what she had done to be so miserable, and the answer was that she had tried to have an abortion, but both she and the child had died as a result.
Hearing this, the student couldn't help feeling sorry for them, but no matter how much she spread thoughts of goodwill to them, it didn't seem to help them at all, because their karma was so heavy.
This had her upset, so she told Ajaan Fuang.
He replied, “Whether or not they can receive your help is their business, and none of yours.
Different people have different karma, and some are beyond help for the time being.
You give what you can, but you don't have to go back and make an official inquiry into how things turned out.
Do your duty and leave it at that.
They ask for help, you give them what you can.
They appear for you to see so that you'll learn more about the results of karma.
That's enough.
Once you're finished, go back to the breath.
She kept following Ajaan Fuang's instructions until one day it occurred to her, “If I keep giving, giving, giving like this, will I have anything left for myself?” When she told her doubts to Ajaan Fuang, he gave her a blank look for a second and then said, “Boy, you really can be narrow-hearted when you want to be, can't you?” Then he explained: “Goodwill isn't a thing, like money, that the more you give, the less you have.
It's more like having a lit candle in your hand.
This person asks to light his candle from yours, that person asks to light hers.
The more candles you light, the brighter it is for everyone — including you.
Time passed and one day she had a vision of a dead man asking her to tell his children and grandchildren to make merit in such and such a way and to dedicate it to him.
When she left meditation, she asked permission to go inform the dead man's children, but Ajaan Fuang said, “What for?
You're not a mailman.
Even if you were, he doesn't have any money to pay your wages.
What kind of proof are you going to give them that what you say is true?
If they believe you, you're going to get carried away and think that you're some special kind of psychic.
Everywhere you go, you'll keep smiling this little smile to yourself.
And if they don't believe you, you know what they'll say, don't you?
“What, Than Phaw?
“They'll say you're crazy.
“There are true visions and false visions.
So whenever you see one, just sit still and watch it.
Don't get pulled into following it.
“You should watch visions the same way you watch TV: Just watch it, without getting pulled inside the tube.
Some of Ajaan Fuang's students would have visions of themselves or their friends in previous lifetimes and get all excited about what they saw.
When they'd report their visions to Ajaan Fuang, he'd warn them, “You aren't still wrapped up in the past, are you?
You're foolish if you are.
You've been born and died countless aeons.
If you took the bones of all your past bodies and piled them up, they'd be taller than Mount Sumeru.
The water in all the oceans is less than the water of the tears you've shed over all the sufferings, big and small, you've been through.
If you reflect on this with real discernment, you'll feel disenchanted with states of being, and no longer take pleasure in birth.
Your mind will aim straight for nibbana.
In Ajaan Fuang gained large numbers of new students.
One of them wondered why this was the case, and so asked herself about it in her meditation.
The answer came to her that Ajaan Fuang had had many children in a previous lifetime, and now they had been reborn as his students.
When she left meditation, she asked him why this was so, figuring that he'd tell her that he had once been a king with a large harem, but instead he said, “I was probably a fish in the sea, laying who knows how many eggs at a time.
One evening a school teacher was meditating at home and began remembering her previous lives all the way back to the time of King Asoka.
In her vision she saw King Asoka beating her father mercilessly over a trivial infraction of palace etiquette.
The next morning she went to tell Ajaan Fuang about her vision, and it was obvious that she was still furious with King Asoka for what she had seen him do.
Ajaan Fuang didn't affirm or deny the truth of her vision.
Instead, he spoke to her anger in the present, “Here you've been carrying this grudge for over, years, and where is it getting you?
Go ask forgiveness of him in your mind and have done with it.
“It's good that most people can't remember their previous lives.
Otherwise things would be a lot more complicated than they already are.
One woman, who at that point wasn't yet a student of Ajaan Fuang, was practicing meditation at home on her own when she had a vision of a sentence — somewhat like Pali, but not quite — appearing in her meditation.
So she copied it down and went from wat to wat, asking various monks to translate it for her.
No one could until she met one monk who told her that it was in arahant language, and only an arahant could understand what it said.
Then he had the gall to translate it for her, after which he told her to bring him any other sentences she got from her visions, and he'd translate them, too.
She wasn't completely convinced of what he had said, and happened to mention it to Ajaan Fuang when she first met him.
His response: “What?
Arahant language?
The minds of arahants are above and beyond conventions.
What kind of language would a mind like that have?
“People for the most part don't like the truth.
They prefer make-believe instead.
There were occasions when some of Ajaan Fuang's students would gain knowledge of one sort or another in their visions, get carried away with it, and yet he wouldn't take them to task.
One day the seamstress asked him why he didn't warn such people that their practice was going off course, and he told her, “You have to look at how mature they are.
If they're really adults, you can tell them straight out.
If their minds are still infants, you have to let them play for a while, like a child with a new toy.
If you're too harsh with them, they might get discouraged and give up completely.
As they begin to mature they're sure to start seeing for themselves what's proper and what's not.
“Don't have anything to do with the past or the future.
Just stay with the present — that's enough.
And even though that's where you're supposed to stay, you're not supposed to latch onto it.
So why do think you should latch on to things where you're not even supposed to stay?
“You know that you shouldn't believe even your own visions, so why go believing the visions of others?
“If you can't let go of your visions, you'll never gain release.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students asked him, “When you see something in a vision, how can you know whether it's true or false?
His answer: “Even when it's true, it's true only in terms of convention.
You have to get your mind beyond both true and false.
“The purpose of the practice is to make the heart pure.
All these other things are just games and entertainment.
“Whatever you experience, simply be aware of it.
You don't have to take after it.
The primal heart has no characteristics.
It's aware of everything.
But as soon as things make contact, within or without, they cause a lapse in mindfulness, so that we let go of awareness, forget awareness in and of itself, and take on all the characteristics of the things that come later.
Then we act out in line with them — becoming happy, sad or whatever.
The reason we're this way is because we take conventional truths and latch on to them tight.
If we don't want to be under their influence, we'll have to stay with primal awareness at all times.
This requires a great deal of mindfulness.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students was feeling mistreated by the world, and so went to him for consolation.
He told her, “What's there to feel mistreated about?
You're the one that's swayed under the events that have hit you, that's all.
Contemplate what's happening and you'll see that the mind is something separate.
Events come passing in and then go passing by.
So why be influenced by them?
Keep your mind right at the simple awareness that these things come and soon they'll be gone, so why follow them?
“What, really, is yours?
When you die, you won't be able to take any of these things with you, so why waste time wanting anything?
There's nothing you have to want at all.
Make your mind quiet.
Make it one.
You don't have to concern yourself with your own attainments or those of other people.
Simply be aware.
That's enough.
“Whenever anything hits you, let it go only as far as 'aware'.
Don't let it go all the way into the heart.
“All you need to do is keep your sense of simple awareness solid and strong, and nothing will be able to overwhelm you.
“Stay with awareness itself at all times — except when you sleep.
The minute you wake up, stay right at awareness, and it won't be long before discernment arises.
One woman who practiced meditation with Ajaan Fuang came to feel that she had split into two people: one person acting, and one watching.
She felt this way both while sitting in meditation and while she wasn't — to the point where she didn't feel like sitting in meditation at all, because she felt that sitting and not sitting were in no way different.
She asked him about this, and he told her, “If you don't want to, you don't have to sit.
Just keep this sense of 'the watcher' going at all times.
Sitting with your eyes closed is simply an external convention.
Just keep watching.
When the mind and the body become separate like this, the body can't press on the mind.
If the body presses on the mind, the mind will have to be under the influence of what goes on in the body.
“Right awareness has to be paired with the breath.
“To be aware means to be aware as soon as defilement arises, to see defilement and not act under its power.
“There's no past here, and no future, only the present.
No man, no woman, no sign of any kind at all.
There's nothing, not even self.
What self there is, is only in a conventional sense.
“Once awareness is solid, you have to get above and beyond it.
In, one of Ajaan Fuang's students had to move to Hong Kong, and so he set up a small meditation center there.
In one of his letters he asked Ajaan Fuang to write out a short outline of the main points of the practice, and this was the answer he received:
“Focus on all six of the elements: earth, water, wind, fire, space, and consciousness.
When you're acquainted with each of them, meld them into one, and focus on them until they grow stable and strong.
Your energy will gather together until both the body and the mind feel full.
When the physical elements are balanced and in harmony, they'll grow full, and the mind will let go of them on its own and turn to oneness.
The elements will be one, the mind will be one.
So now you turn your attention to the mind.
Focus on the mind until you become fully aware of it.
Then let go of that awareness, together with whatever knowledge you've gained, and there won't be anything left.
Let go even of the events in the present that you're aware of.
That's when intuitive discernment will arise, and meditation comes to an end.
One night Ajaan Fuang took a group of his students up to sit in meditation at the chedi on top of the hill in Wat Dhammasathit.
Looking out to the south, in the inky darkness, they could see the bright lights of the fishing boats far out at sea.
He commented, “When you're up on a high place like this, you can see everything.” For one woman listening, this had special meaning, because she knew he wasn't referring just to the view from the hill.
§ “Everything that happens to you has its causes.
Once you contemplate it skillfully until you know its causes, you'll be able to get past it.
“Our defilements have made us suffer enough already.
Now it's our turn to make them suffer.
There are two kinds of people: those who like to think and those who don't.
When people who don't like to think start meditating, you have to force them to contemplate things.
If you don't force them, they'll simply get stuck like a stump in concentration, and won't get anywhere at all.
As for those who like to think, they really have to use force to get their minds to settle down.
But once they've mastered concentration, you don't have to force them to contemplate.
Whatever strikes the mind, they're sure to contemplate it right away.
“The discernment that can let go of defilement is a special discernment, not ordinary discernment.
It needs concentration as its basis if it's going to let go.
“For insight to arise, you have to use your own strategies.
You can't use other people's strategies and expect to get the same results they did.
“When insights arise, don't try to remember them.
If they're real insights, they'll stay with you.
If you try to memorize them, they'll turn into labels and concepts, and will get in the way of new insights arising.
A meditator in Singapore once wrote a letter to Ajaan Fuang, describing how he applied the Buddha's teachings to everyday life: Whatever his mind focused on, he would try to see it as inconstant, stressful, and not self.
Ajaan Fuang had me write a letter in response, saying, “Do things ever say that they're inconstant, stressful, and not self?
They never say it, so don't go faulting them that way.
Focus on what labels them, for that's where the fault lies.
“Even though your views may be right, if you cling to them you're wrong.
The wife of a Navy lieutenant was meditating at home when suddenly she had an urge to give Ajaan Fuang a good tongue-lashing.
No matter how much she tried to drive the thought out of her mind, she couldn't.
Several days later she went to ask his forgiveness, and he told her, “The mind can think good thoughts, so why can't it think bad thoughts?
Whatever it's thinking, just watch it — but if the thoughts are bad, make sure you don't act in line with them.
A high school student once said that in practicing meditation, if his mind thought good thoughts he'd let them pass, but if it thought bad thoughts he'd put a stop to them right away.
Ajaan Fuang told him, “Just watch them.
See who it is that's thinking good thoughts and bad thoughts.
The good thoughts and bad thoughts will disappear on their own, because they fall under the Three Characteristics of inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
“If the mind is going to think, let it think, but don't fall for its thoughts.
“The defilements are like duckweed.
You have to keep pushing them out of the way so that you can see the clear water underneath.
If you don't keep pushing them aside, they'll move in to cover the water again — but at least you know that the water underneath them is clear.
A woman complained to Ajaan Fuang that she had been meditating for a long time but still couldn't cut any of her defilements.
He laughed and said, “You don't have to cut them.
Do you think you can?
The defilements were part and parcel of this world long before you came.
You were the one who came looking for them.
Whether or not you come, they exist on their own.
And who says that they're defilements?
Have they ever told you their names?
They simply go their own way.
So try to get acquainted with them.
See both their good and their bad sides.
One day Ajaan Fuang was explaining to a new student how to watch the arising and passing away of the defilements.
It so happened that she was a veteran reader of many Dhamma books, so she offered her opinion: “Instead of just looking at them this way, shouldn't I try to uproot them?
“If all you can think of is uprooting them,” he replied, “their fruit just might fall on the ground and start growing again.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students told him that she had reached the point in her meditation where she felt indifferent to everything she encountered.
He warned her, “Sure, you can be indifferent as long as you don't run into anything that goes straight to the heart.
“Everyone lives with suffering, suffering, suffering, but they don't comprehend suffering, which is why they can't free themselves from it.
“Those who know don't suffer.
Those who don't know are the ones who suffer.
There's suffering in every life — as long as there are the five khandhas, there has to be suffering — but if you really come to know, you can live in ease.
“When you're sick you have a golden opportunity.
You can contemplate the pains that arise from your illness.
Don't simply lie there.
Meditate at the same time.
Contemplate the behavior of the pains as they arise.
Don't let the mind fall in with them.
One of Ajaan Fuang's students was taking cobalt treatments for cancer until she developed an allergic reaction to the anesthesia.
The doctors were at a loss as to what to do, so she suggested that they try the treatment without the anesthesia.
At first they were reluctant to do so, but when she assured them that she could use the power of her meditation to withstand the pain, they finally agreed to give it a try.
After the treatment Ajaan Fuang visited her at the hospital.
She told him that she had been able to concentrate her mind so as to endure the pain, but it had left her exhausted.
He advised her: “You can use the power of concentration to fight off pain, but it squanders your energy.
You have to approach the pain with discernment, to see that it's not you.
It's not yours.
Your awareness is one thing, the pain is something separate.
When you can see it in this way, things will be easier.
Several months later the same woman went to hear a famous Bangkok monk give a sermon on the cycle of life, death, and rebirth as an ocean of suffering.
It had a profound effect on her, and afterwards she went to visit Ajaan Fuang and told him about it.
As she was speaking, the image of the ocean struck her as so overwhelming that tears came to her eyes, so he said, “Now that you know it's an ocean, why don't you just cross over to the other side?” That was enough to stop her tears.
§ “The Buddha didn't teach us to cure our pains.
He taught us to comprehend them.
“It's true that illness can be an obstacle to your meditation, but if you're intelligent enough to take illness as your teacher, you'll see that the body is a nest of illnesses, and that you shouldn't cling to it as yours.
You can then uproot the attachments that are concerned about the body — because nothing in it is yours at all.
It's simply a tool for you to use to make good karma and pay off your old bad karma debts as you are able.
“When you focus on seeing pain and stress, you have to get to the subtle levels — to the point where you see that stress arises the instant you open your eyes and see things.
Advice for a woman who had to live with one illness after another: “Use your mindfulness to contemplate the body until you can visualize it as bones falling down in a heap, and you can set them on fire until there's nothing left.
Then ask yourself: Is that your self?
Then why does it make you suffer and feel pain?
Is there any 'you' in there?
Keep looking until you reach the true core of the Dhamma — until there's nothing of yours at all.
The mind will then see itself as it really is, and let go of its own accord.
“Tell yourself: The reason I still feel suffering is because I still have an 'I'.
“The day will arrive when death comes to you, forcing you to let go of everything of every sort.
That's why you should practice letting go well in advance so that you can be good at it.
Otherwise — let me tell you — it's going to be difficult when the time comes.
“You don't have to be afraid of death.
You'd do better to be afraid of birth.
“When you die don't get caught up on the symptoms of dying.
§ “Lift the mind above what it knows.
“Whatever dies, let it die, but don't let the heart die.
A tape-recorded talk given to one of his students who had reached an impasse in her meditation.
Once the mind is firmly established in the breath, you then try to separate the mind from its object — from the breath itself.
Focus on this: The breath is an element, part of the wind element.
Awareness of the breath is something else.
So you've got two things that have come together.
Now, when you can separate them — through realizing the breath's true nature as an element — the mind can stand on its own.
After all, the breath isn't you, and you aren't the breath.
When you can separate things in this way, the mind gains power.
It's set loose from the breath, and is wise to the breath's every aspect.
When mindfulness is full, it's wise to all the aspects of the breath, and can separate itself from them.
Now if it so happens that your mind is strong and your mindfulness sharp while you're doing this, that's when insight occurs.
The knowledge will arise in that moment, letting you know that you've really let go.
If your mindfulness is still weak, though, you won't be able to let go.
Only when your mindfulness is really resilient will you have mindfulness and insight arising together.
This is something you have to keep contemplating whenever you have the chance.
When you can separate the mind from its objects, it'll be freed from all its burdens.
So focus your attention right down, in the area of the heart.
Keep it focused there, and then observe the breath and what it is that's aware of the breath.
Be as observant as you can, and eventually you'll see that they separate from each other.
When they've separated, that gives you the chance to investigate further inside.
And once you've investigated this one element, you'll find that what you learn applies to everything else.
When you investigate the breath, you'll find that it's not a being, not a person — so what is there to latch on to?
You can't latch on to it as your self, for it simply goes its own way.
When you look at the breath you'll see that it doesn't have a body — no head, no legs, no hands, no feet, nothing at all.
When you see this, you let go of it, in line with the way it really is.
The texts say, 'Cago patinissaggo mutti analayo': You move out of the breath.
You remove your concerns for it.
You don't make it your home any longer — because it's not yours.
You let it go in line with its original nature.
You give it back.
Whatever it's got, you give it back to nature.
All of the elements — earth, water, wind, fire, and space — you give back to nature.
You let them return to what they originally were.
When you examine all five of these things, you'll see that they're not a being, not a person, not 'us', not 'them'.
You let them all return to their original nature in every way.
This then brings us to the mind, what it is that's aware of these five elements.
What is it going to stay with now?
Turn your powers of observation on this knowing element that is now standing on its own, with nothing else left.
Examine it to see what's what, and that's when another level of insight will arise.
If you want to gain the insight that will let go of all things in line with their original nature, there has to be a special realization that arises in the act of letting go.
If there isn't this realization, your letting go is simply an ordinary, everyday label or perception.
It's mundane discernment.
But when this special realization arises in the act of letting go — the instant you let go, the result comes right back at you, verifying, certifying what's happened for what it really is: You know.
You've let go.
You then experience the purity within you.
This is called transcendent discernment.
When the realization arises within you, verifying what you've seen and what you've done, that's called transcendent discernment.
As long as this realization doesn't arise, your discernment is still mundane.
So you keep working at your investigation into things until all the conditions are ripe.
Then when they're ripe, there's nothing more you have to do, for transcendent discernment penetrates things completely the very instant it arises.
It's not like mundane discernment at all.
The path we follow, then, is to be observant, to investigate things.
Keep making a focused investigation until you reach the strategic point.
When the mind reaches that point, it lets go on its own.
What happens is that it reaches a point of fullness — the Dhamma within it is full — and it lets go.
Once it lets go, the results will appear immediately.
So.
Keep on practicing.
There's nothing to be afraid of.
You'll have to reap results, there's no doubt about it.
You reap results all along the way.
Like right now, while you're sitting in meditation here.
You know that the breath and the mind are comfortable with each other.
That's a result of the practice.
Even though you haven't yet reached the end of the path, you're still gaining a sense of comfort and ease in your meditation.
The mind is at peace with the in-and-out breath.
As long as the mind and breath can't separate from each other, they have to help each other along.
The mind helps the breath, and the breath helps the mind until they can get fully acquainted.
Once the mind gets fully acquainted, it can let go.
When it knows, it lets go.
As long as it doesn't really know, it won't really let go.
What this means is that you have to associate with the breath, spend time with it, and gradually come to know it.
As the mind gets more and more acquainted, it will be able to unravel its attachments to body, feelings, perceptions, thought-constructs, and consciousness.
Its identity-views — seeing these things as the self — will fall away.
This is the way to freedom.
The moment this transcendent discernment arises, you'll be free.
You'll be able to disentangle yourself from all the conventional truths of the world that say, 'person', 'self', 'man', 'woman', 'us', 'them', and so on.
But as long as you can't yet let go, you still have to depend on these things.
They're your resting spots, but not your refuge.
You simply lean on each other, and help each other along, so that you can make progress on your way.
You can't abandon these things, for they're the path of your practice.
As long as you stick with the practice, you won't fall back.
But as soon as you let up on the practice, you'll start back-sliding immediately.
You'll fall prey to doubts, wondering whether or not the Dhamma is true.
You have to keep being observant of the mind: awareness itself.
It's not the case that the mind isn't aware, you know.
Its basic nature is awareness.
Just look at it.
It's aware of everything — aware, but it can't yet let go of its perceptions, of the conventions it holds to be true.
So you have to focus your investigation on in.
Focus on in until the mind and its objects separate from each other.
Simply keep at it.
If you're persistent like this, without let-up, your doubts will gradually fade away, fade away, and eventually you'll reach your true refuge within you, the basic awareness called buddha that sees clearly through everything.
This is the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha appearing within you as your ultimate refuge.
This is when you'll know what's actually within, what's actually without, what's actually a resting spot, and what's really your refuge.
You'll be able to distinguish these things.
Things outside are simply resting spots.
Like the body: It's a resting spot.
For the brief moment that the elements of earth, water, wind, and fire stay balanced together, you can rest with the body.
But as for your true refuge, you've already seen it.
It's this basic awareness itself, within the mind.
Your awareness of the breath is a refuge on one level.
When it separates from the breath, it's a refuge on another level.
And as for your true refuge — buddha — that's the awareness that lies further within.
Once you realize this, that's all there is.
It's sovereign in and of itself.
It knows clearly and truly, all around.
That's the true refuge within you.
As for things outside, they're just temporary supports, things you can depend on for a little while, like a crutch.
As long as there's the breath to keep them alive, you make use of them.
When there's no more breath, that's the end of the problem.
The physical elements separate and no longer depend on each other, so the mind returns to its own true refuge.
And where is that?
Just where is that buddha awareness?
When we've trained the mind to be its own refuge, there will be no sorrow at that moment in the meditating heart.
The Buddha's own search was for this refuge.
He taught all of his disciples to take refuge in themselves, for we can depend on others only for a little while.
Other people merely show us the way.
But if you want what's really true and good in life, you have to depend on yourself — teach yourself, train yourself, depend on yourself in every way.
Your sufferings come eventually from you.
Your happiness, eventually from you.
It's like eating: If you don't eat, how are you going to get full?
If you leave it up to other people to eat, there's no way you're going to get full.
If you want to be full, you yourself have to eat.
It's the same with the practice.
You can't let yourself latch on to things outside you.
Things outside are inconstant.
Impermanent.
Undependable.
They change with every in-and-out breath.
This holds not only for you, but for everyone.
If you don't part from one another while you're still alive, you part when you die.
You part from things with every in-and-out breath.
You can't base the meaning of your life on these things — and you don't have to.
You can simply tell yourself that this is the way things are all over the world.
The world offers nothing lasting.
We don't want things to be that way, but that's the way they are.
They don't lie under anyone's control at all.
This is true not only with things outside, but also with things within you.
You want the body to stay alive, you don't want it to die, but it's going to die.
You don't want it to change, but it changes, constantly.
This is why you have to get your mind in shape so that it can take refuge in itself, in line with the principles of the skill the Buddha taught.
And you don't have to feel doubts about the practice, for all the qualities you need to develop in the practice are already present within you.
All forms of good and evil are present within you.
You already know which path is the good one, which path is the shoddy one, so all you have to do is train your heart to hold onto the good path.
Stop and take a look at yourself right now: Are you on the right path?
Whatever is wrong, don't latch onto it.
Let go of it.
Past, future, whatever, let go of it, leaving only the present.
Keep the mind open and at ease in the present at all times, and then start investigating.
You already know that things outside aren't you or yours, but inside you there are many levels you have to examine.
Many levels you have to examine.
Even the mind isn't really yours.
There are still inconstant and stressful things inside it.
Sometimes it wants to do this, sometimes to do that, it's not really yours.
So don't get too attached to it.
Thought-constructs are the big issue.
Sometimes they form good thoughts, sometimes evil thoughts, even though you know better.
You don't want to think those things, and yet they keep appearing in the mind, in spite of your intentions.
So you have to regard them as not being yours.
Examine them.
There's nothing dependable about them.
They don't last.
They're impersonal events, so let them go in line with their own nature.
And what is there that's lasting, solid, dependable, and true?
Keep looking on in.
Focus your mindfulness on the breath, and ask yourself right there.
Eventually you'll come to see what's what within you.
Whenever you have any doubts or problems in the practice, focus down on the breath and ask the mind right there, and understanding will arise, to loosen up your wrong views and help you past your impasse.
But even this understanding is inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
Sabbe dhamma anatta: Everything that arises, the Buddha said, is inconstant and not self.
Even the understandings that arise in the mind aren't constant.
Sometimes they arise, sometimes they don't.
So don't get too attached to them.
When they arise, take note of them, and then let them follow their own course.
Let your views be Right Views: i.e., just right, not going overboard.
If you go overboard with them, you latch on tight to them, and then they turn wrong on you, for you've lost sight of what you're doing.
What this all boils down to is that the more mindfulness in your practice, the better.
As your mindfulness gets more and more mature, more and more complete, it turns into something transcendent.
The transcendent discernment we mentioned above arises from the power of your mindfulness as it becomes more and more complete.
So keep training your mindfulness until it's Great Mindfulness.
Try to keep it constant, persistent, and focused, until you see all things for what they are.
That's how you'll advance in the Buddha's teachings.
§ “Our practice is to go against the stream, against the flow.
And where are we going?
To the source of the stream.
That's the 'cause' side of the practice.
The 'result' side is that we can let go and be completely at ease.
“The stages of the practice… Actually the different stages don't say what they are.
We simply make up names for them.
As long as you stay stuck on these made-up names, you'll never get free.
“When teaching people, you have to teach them in line with their temperaments and aptitudes, but eventually they all come to the same point: letting go.
“Nibbana is subtle and takes a lot of discernment.
It's not something that the force of desire can reach.
If we could get there through the force of desire, everyone in the world would have gotten there by now.
“Some people talk about, 'temporary nibbana, temporary nibbana,' but how can nibbana be temporary?
If it's nibbana, it has to be constant.
If it's not constant, it's not nibbana.
“When they say that nibbana is empty, they mean that it's empty of defilement.
“Right where there's no one to be pained, no one to die.
Right there.
It's in each and every person.
It's as if your hand were palm-down, and you turn it palm-up — but only people of discernment will be able to do it.
If you're dense, you won't see it, you won't catch on to it, you won't go beyond birth and death.
“The heart when it's released is like the fire element in the air.
When fire goes out, it isn't annihilated anywhere.
It still permeates space, simply that it doesn't latch onto any kindling, so it doesn't appear.
“When the mind 'goes out' from defilement, it's still there, but when new kindling comes, it doesn't catch fire, doesn't latch on — not even to itself.
That's what's called release.
From Keeping the Breath in Mind, by Ajaan Lee.
There are seven basic steps:
Be clearly aware of each in-and-out breath.
Observe the breath as it goes in and out, noticing whether it's comfortable or uncomfortable, broad or narrow, obstructed or free-flowing, fast or slow, short or long, warm or cool.
If the breath doesn't feel comfortable, change it until it does.
For instance, if breathing in long and out long is uncomfortable, try breathing in short and out short.
As soon as you find that your breathing feels comfortable, let this comfortable breath sensation spread to the different parts of the body.
To begin with, inhale the breath sensation at the base of the skull and let it flow all the way down the spine.
Then, if you are male, let it spread down your right leg to the sole of your foot, to the ends of your toes, and out into the air.
Inhale the breath sensation at the base of the skull again and let it spread down your spine, down your left leg to the ends of your toes, and out into the air.

Then let the breath from the base of the skull spread down over both shoulders, past your elbows and wrists, to the tips of your fingers, and out into the air.
Let the breath at the base of the throat spread down the central nerve at the front of the body, past the lungs and liver, all the way down to the bladder and colon.
Inhale the breath right at the middle of the chest and let it go all the way down to your intestines.
Let all these breath sensations spread so that they connect and flow together, and you'll feel a greatly improved sense of well-being.
Learn four ways of adjusting the breath:
Breathe whichever way is most comfortable for you.
Or, better yet, learn to breathe comfortably all four ways, because your physical condition and your breath are always changing.
Become acquainted with the bases or focal points for the mind — the resting spots of the breath — and center your awareness on whichever one seems most comfortable.
A few of these bases are:
If you suffer from frequent headaches or nervous problems, don't focus on any spot above the base of the throat.
And don't try to force the breath or put yourself into a trance.
Breathe freely and naturally.
Let the mind be at ease with the breath — but not to the point where it slips away.
Spread your awareness — your sense of conscious feeling — throughout the entire body.
Unite the breath sensations throughout the body, letting them flow together comfortably, keeping your awareness as broad as possible.
Once you are fully aware of the aspects of the breath you already know in your body, you'll come to know all sorts of other aspects as well.
The breath, by its nature, has many facets: breath sensations flowing in the nerves, those flowing around and about the nerves, those spreading from the nerves to every pore.
Beneficial breath sensations and harmful ones are mixed together by their very nature.
To summarize: for the sake of improving the energy already existing in every part of your body, so that you can contend with such things as disease and pain; and for the sake of clarifying the knowledge already within you, so that it can become a basis for the skills leading to release and purity of heart — you should always bear these seven steps in mind, because they are absolutely basic to every aspect of breath meditation.
“Bhikkhus, they do not savor the deathless who do not savor mindfulness of the body; they savor the deathless who savor mindfulness of the body.
“A skeleton wrapped up in skin…
The body is thought to be most obviously “me,” what I regard as the most tangible part of myself.
Around it therefore are constructed many views, all of them distorted to some extent, which prevent insight arising into the body as it really is.
This book is a small anthology relating to the body in various ways, and presents material which, if contemplated by the earnest and sincere student of Dhamma, will eventually provide fruitful insight and, thereby, freedom from the many desires and fears centered on the body.
Such desires for pleasures in which the body is the instrument, awaken and intensify greed of all kinds, for food or sex for instance.
Greed which is often accompanied by pleasurable sensations — and therefore desired — needs a rather bitter medicine to combat it: hence the number of pieces here on the unattractiveness of the body, its decay and death — all unpleasant matters.
Some of the material, concerned with bodily unattractiveness, is like a medicine which need only be taken while the disease of greed-lust is active, and afterwards may be discontinued.
It is important to understand this, and not to form the mistaken impression that the Buddha advocated viewing all beauty as loathsome.
It is only that there is a hook in beauty which tangles with the greed in one's own heart and leads to more and more complications and difficulties.
Fears center around aging-decay, disease and death.
They are not overcome by pretending they do not exist, as the ostrich is said to bury its head in the sand at the approach of enemies.
Only resolutely facing these inevitable features of life can bring insight and relief from fear.
The Buddha's instructions on contemplation of the body are addressed to those who are able, through their life-style, to practice them.
This means in effect monks and nuns, together with dedicated lay people.
The former group have this contemplation given to them by their Teachers at the time of Going-forth from home to homelessness, and they need such a medicine to combat lust, which is destructive to the celibate Holy Life.
Lay people keeping the Five Precepts have contentment with their partners as an important part of their practice.
Sex is a natural part of their life but should still be restrained and kept within the bounds of the Third Precept.
If not, how much trouble follows!
But some of them may wish to live without sexual attachment, and this cannot be done in the way of Dhamma by ignoring the power of the sexual drive, or by suppressing it.
Only when it is treated with mindfulness can it be transcended.
The aspect of mindfulness which is needed for this is the subject, or rather the interrelated subjects of this book.
In the world today people are subjected to a bombardment of sensuality by way of the mass media.
Sex especially is used as a bait to sell things, and as a titillation of sensory experience.
When this subjection is continued, the defilements of the mind, notably lust, greed, and attachment, are sure to be strengthened.
Then when this has happened the result is not more happiness, only an increase of dukkha, suffering, trouble, and difficulties.
The medicine for such over-indulgence and over-stimulation is given in this book.
It is said that this subject of meditation is unique to the Buddha's Teachings and that elsewhere it is not clearly taught.
This is not surprising as we find that desire is sometimes accepted as being “natural.” Wherever desires are viewed as “natural,” that is, inherent in one's nature or self, nothing much can be done about them.
But the Buddha analyzed desires into those which are wholesome — to practice Dhamma, for instance — and the unwholesome ones, among which are greed and lust.
They may not be gross either, as in the case of the meditator who is greedy for bliss, or visions, and attached to such things.
The Buddha has provided the medicine for all unwholesome desires, and according to our various ways of life we can use it to effect partial or complete cures.
When the emphasis is so much on sensuality, youth, and beauty as we find now, the darker sides of life get pushed away and attempts are made, always unsuccessful, to sweep them under the carpet.
Those who try to do so will not be pleased with the exercises contained in the Buddha's contemplation of the body.
Such things will appear to them as morbid and unnatural.
Yet they are also a part of this life and should not be ignored.
And if the effort is made to ignore what is unpleasant about the body, sooner or later one will be jolted into the recognition of these things.
Such jolts are not pleasant.
Rather than leave it until one is forced to know the body's unpleasant sides it is better to acquaint one's emotions with this knowledge gradually.
In this spirit, Bag of Bones is being published.
Unfortunately, being only a book it cannot give person-to-person advice on special problems.
It can only offer some general guidelines to people who are interested in reducing their greed and lust.
A word of warning: meditation on the unattractiveness of the body can be very potent and should only be practiced with moderation and care, especially if one has no personal contact with a Teacher of Buddhist meditation.
If fear and anxiety, or other extreme unwholesome emotional states arise after practice of it, then it will be better to lay it down and take up Loving-kindness or Recollection of the Buddha as one's meditation instead.
This book, therefore, is not so much for beginners in Buddhism but rather for those who have already practiced for some time.
May it inspire many people to practice the Dhamma more intently!
Translations which have no one's name after them are by the compiler.
And all other reflections, dialogues, and poems too are his work, and have been jotted down as they occurred to him, mostly in the peaceful Forest Hermitage of Ven.
Nyanaponika Mahathera outside Kandy.
May I also here acknowledge the venerable Mahathera's kind advice and help in bringing this collection to print.
“Bhikkhus, when one dhamma is developed and cultivated it leads to a great sense of urgency, to great benefit, to great safety from bondage, to great mindfulness and full awareness, to obtainment of knowledge and insight, to a pleasant abiding here and now, to realization of the fruit of true knowledge and deliverance.
What is that one dhamma?
It is mindfulness occupied with the body.
— A., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
— M., Mindfulness of the Body
“When anyone has developed and repeatedly practiced mindfulness of the body, he has included whatever wholesome dhammas there are that partake of true knowledge.
“Just as anyone who extends his mind over the great ocean has included whatever streams there are that flow into the ocean, so too, when anyone has developed and repeatedly practiced mindfulness of the body, he has included whatever wholesome dhammas there are that partake of true knowledge.
— M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli 
“This my body consists of the four great elements, is procreated by a mother and father, is built up out of boiled rice and bread, is of the nature of impermanence, of being worn and rubbed away, of dissolution and disintegration, and this my consciousness has that for its support and is bound up with it.
— M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
“Now this body that has material form consists of the four great elements, it is procreated by a mother and father, and built up out of boiled rice and bread, it has the nature of impermanence, of being worn and rubbed away, of dissolution and disintegration.
It must be regarded —
“When a man regards it thus, he abandons his desire for the body, affection for the body, and his habit of treating the body as a basis for his inferences.
— M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
You live by “following the body”?
Eating when it's hungry, resting when it's tired, dressing when necessary, urinating, defecating, going to work to get money — all for what?
For this body?
Then what about the time when its end comes?
What was it all for?
How much time do you spend on your body —
How much time do you spend on your mind?
Three things we never forget to do for the body:
Three things we usually forget to do with the mind:
The mind gets dirty and needs washing, it becomes hungry and needs nutriment, and it is most of the time diseased and needs curing.
Why are we so forgetful of our own good?
“And what is gratification in the case of form?
“Suppose there were a girl of warrior-noble cast or brahmin caste or householder stock, in her fifteenth or sixteenth year, neither too tall nor too short, neither too thin nor too fat, neither too dark nor too fair: is her beauty and loveliness then at its height?
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Now the pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on that beauty and loveliness are the gratification in the case of form.
“And what is danger in the case of form?
“Later on one might see that same woman here at eighty, ninety or a hundred years, aged, as crooked as a roof, doubled up, tottering with the aid of sticks, frail, her youth gone, her teeth broken, grey haired, scanty-haired, bald, wrinkled, with limbs all blotchy: how do you conceive this, bhikkhus, has her former beauty and loveliness vanished and the danger become evident?
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Bhikkhus, this is the danger in the case of form.
— M., “The Mass of Suffering,” trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
N.B.
Women reading this should change the sex of the person in the above.
— Verses of the Elder Bhikkhunis -
“Come, bhikkhus, abide contemplating ugliness in the body, perceiving repulsiveness in nutriment, perceiving disenchantment with all the world, contemplating impermanence in all formations.
— M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
Directly counter goes this to the world's way which is: to see beauty in the body or at any rate disguise the ugliness, to delight in food both physical and mental, to be enchanted with the world, and to regard mental formations as a basis for a permanent self or soul.
Rohitassa, a deva:
“Lord, the world's end where one is neither born nor ages nor dies, nor passes away nor reappears: is it possible to know or see or reach that by traveling there?
The Buddha:
“Friend, that there is a world's end where one is neither born nor ages nor dies, nor passes away nor reappears, which is to be known or seen or reached by traveling there — that I do not say.
Yet I do not say that there is ending of suffering without reaching the world's end.
Rather it is in this fathom-long carcass with its perceptions and its mind that I describe the world, the origin of the world, the cessation of the world, and the way leading to the cessation of the world.
— S., A., trans, Ven.
Ñanamoli
The current rash of so much porn has the effects we see, increased and open expression of greed and lust.
The meditation techniques which can cure these diseases are all the different aspects of mindfulness concerned with the body — for they cut the body down to size, without harming it, while emphasizing the importance of the mind.
Contemplation of the body's unattractiveness is not a popular meditation.
People are happy to try to rid themselves of anger and hatred because they are painful.
This can be done by the well-known meditations developing loving-kindness.
But meditating upon the nature of this body dulls the appetites rooted in greed — and greed is often associated with pleasure.
And isn't pleasure what this life's all about?
Safely bagged by Mara — Death and Lord of the sensual realm!
When the body is not washed it attracts flies and vermin which feed on it.
When the mind is not purified but is full of lust, hate and delusion what does it attract…?
The body is so near, yet like an unexplored continent.
Large areas in it are a blank.
While this is so, greed, lust and craving dwell safely in the jungles of ignorance.
People's attitudes to the body are liable to swing from the extreme of indulging the desires connected with the body, to the other extreme of mortifying it.
The Middle Way of mindfulness regarding the body is unknown to them.
When desires connected with bodily pleasures can be indulged, which means that greed rules the mind, aversion only arises if one's aims are thwarted; but when a person has undertaken some method of self-discipline not guided by wisdom, then suppressed desires find their outlet not only by aversion but also by bodily mortification.
As though the body was responsible!
So, having no wisdom, people subject their bodies to “disciplines” and rigors of various kinds in order, they think, to control strong desires.
Then aversion, that is self-hatred in a more or less subtle form, reigns supreme and sufferings are increased.
Desires can never be understood in this way, only suppressed.
The only way to understand desires is through mindfulness, and the various exercises on mindfulness of the body are for this purpose.
There are very few beings who do not suffer from lust, in this world of sensuality at any rate.
It is a great sickness of the mind, an epidemic with no beginning, and no end in sight for most beings.
Wise men want to be cured of this disease and the Buddha offers for this the medicine of contemplating the unattractive in one's own body.
One should not try to see the ugly or foul in others.
This could turn to hatred — even if not, it could result in a “sour grapes” attitude to them.
Towards others maintain one of the Divine Abidings: loving-kindness, compassion, joy-with-others, or equanimity, but towards one's own selfish desires for pleasure develop the seeing of unattractiveness.
True love, which is cool, unattached metta, and compassion for others' sorrows, do not grow when people are bound up with greed and sensuality.
When lust arises in the mind, which leads to more defilements, more burning desires in future, just take a look at this butcher's shop of a body.
Anything attractive about red meat?
Are white bones specially lovable?
Or coiled “innards” desirable?
Lust soon disappears when the body is regarded in this way.
Repeating this practice, lust becomes weaker and arises less often.
”…no one who searches earnestly throughout the whole of this fathom-long carcass, starting from the soles of the feet upwards, starting from the top of the hair downwards, and starting from the skin all round, ever sees even the minutest atom of pureness in it such as a pearl or a crystal or a beryl or aloes or sandalwood or saffron or camphor or talcum powder, etc; on the contrary, he sees nothing but various very malodorous offensive drab-looking sorts of impurity consisting of head-hair, body-hairs, and the rest.
— M.R., iii,, trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
The practice of this mindfulness attending to the body can begin by reciting this passage:
“In this very body, from the soles of the feet up, from the crown of the head down, surrounded by skin, full of these various mean impurities, he reviews thus:
“There are in this body:
“In this very body, from the soles of the feet up, from the crown of the head down, surrounded by skin, full of these various mean impurities, he reviews thus.
— M., Satipatthana Sutta, trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
There is no unhealthy self-disgust or aversion here, just seeing what is unattractive as it really is.
But in later times some teachers went to extremes in this matter.
One must suspect in such a case not the proper dispassion with the body but rather perverted passion.
Lust can switch to aversion and hatred quickly.
It is a remarkable thing that the first five parts on this list — the “person” we see — are all dead!
Hair of the head and body lives only at its roots, we see dead hair.
Nails that we see are dead nails, the quick is painful and hidden.
The teeth, all that is visible, are dead, and their tender living roots we only experience painfully from time to time.
Outer skin is dead — horrible if it was not, for it is sensitive enough already.
The living skin below is more painful.
So when we get excited about a visual form — someone else's body — we are stimulated by impressions of what has died already.
Strange to be excited by what is dead on the outside and dying within!
However, the real lure is in our own minds: the thoughts of lust that arise there and embellish the corpse before us.
Apart from this, live bodies and dead ones differ only in degree.
Lust fastens only on the body.
But loving-kindness and compassion are concerned with the well-being of peoples' minds and bodies.
When we see a “person,” we see just the first five of the parts: head-hair, body-hair, nail, teeth and skin.
When head-hair is of certain colors and forms, body-hair present or absent according to sex and race, nails cut and cleaned, teeth white, polished and with none missing, and skin, well washed and unblemished by scars or wrinkles and covering flesh of certain shapes — then with all these conditions fulfilled, desire arises!
What about grey or white hair on the head or body — thin and straggly, nails cracked, dirty and broken, teeth yellow or mostly missing and skin wrinkled and blotchy?
Who gets excited?
Staring at corpses as recommended by commentary-writer Buddhaghosa in his Path of Purification is not really to the point.
One has inwardly to stare at this corpse to accomplish anything.
And he gets much too complicated in his descriptions of how to do the actual practice, which does not require a lot of categories and analysis, or things to be learnt by heart.
This applies to both the meditation of corpses and to the parts of the body.
In the latter case, just a few parts are needed for repetition and inspection, and even one will be sufficient if one's mind wanders.
Simplicity and directness cut out the clutter of thoughts — and clearing those out is the way to get into meditation.
— M.
R., iii 
“Again, a bhikkhu judges this same body as though he were looking at bodily remains thrown on a charnel ground, bones without sinews scattered in all directions: here a hand bone, there a foot bone, there a shin bone, there a thigh bone, there a hip bone, there a back bone, there a rib bone, there a breast bone, there an arm bone, there a shoulder bone, there a neck bone, there a jaw bone, there a tooth bone, there the skull.
“This body too is of such a nature, it will be like that, it is not exempt from that!
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body in himself, or he abides contemplating the body as a body externally, or he abides contemplating the body as a body in himself and externally.
Or else he abides contemplating in the body its arising factors, or he abides contemplating in the body its vanishing factors, or he abides contemplating in the body its arising and vanishing factors.
“Or else, mindfulness that 'There is a body' is simply established in him to the extent of bare knowledge and remembrance, while he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
— from M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
When the mind is calm, look into this bony frame to see its emptiness, how the wind blows through it.
Who owns these bones?
It seems that as the Elder was on his way from Cetiyapabbata to Anuradhapura for alms, a certain daughter-in-law of a clan, who had quarreled with her husband and had set out early from Anuradhapura all dressed up and tricked out like a celestial nymph to go to her relatives' home, saw him on the road, and being low-minded, she laughed a loud laugh.
“What is that?”, the Elder looked up and finding in the bones of her teeth the perception of foulness, he attained arahatship.
But her husband who was going after her saw the Elder and asked “Venerable sir, did you by any chance see a woman?” The Elder told him:
— The Path of Purification, I, 
A mound of about five feet high of bones, skulls, long bones and vertebrae all mixed up.
No knowing where one person's bones ended and another's began.
Over them all the hot sun beat down and bleached them, the rains lashed down and washed them; these remains of unknown poor people waiting to be cremated in a Chinese graveyard in Bangkok.
A rare and stirring sight in these days of “window-dressing.
Suppose, that during meditation, this bony frame appeared to one's mind's eye but when one opened the eyes at the meditation's end, the bones of the hand, or other parts, were still visible without their covering of “decent” flesh — how upsetting for oneself — and others if they too could see it.
How very odd to be so fearful of a part of one's “own” body!
Once there was a man who had charge of a hothouse in which a great variety of tropical water-lilies and gourds were growing.
On this particular afternoon it was cold and raining outside, so that a continuous stream of visitors entered to warm themselves and admire the exotic plants.
Having sprayed the plants over with water from a hose the man bent down to turn off the tap.
When he raised his eyes he saw, not people, but a procession of skeletons.
The vision lasted a moment and was gone.
An indication of what sort of meditation he should practice, perhaps?
“Bhikkhus, the bones of a single person journeying on, wandering on for an eon, would make a cairn, a pile, a mound as great as Mount Vepulla, were there a collector of those bones and if the collection were not destroyed.
— Itivuttaka 
“Just as when a space is enclosed by timber and creepers, grass and clay, there comes to be the term 'house,' so too, when a space is enclosed by bones and sinews, flesh and skin, there comes to be the term 'form'.
— M., para, trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
— M.
R.
again
— M.
R., quoting “Questions of Milinda” 
Monks, it is just like an ulcer that had been growing for many years, having nine gaping wounds, nine lesions, and whatever discharged and oozed out of it would be foul and stinking, it would be loathsome.
“Ulcer,” monks, is a name for this body consisting of the four great elements, procreated by mother and father, and built up out of rice and bread.
It is subject to impermanence, to breaking up and wearing away, to dissolution and to disintegration, having nine gaping wounds, nine lesions.
Whatever discharges and oozes out of it is foul and stinks, it is loathsome.
Therefore, monks, turn away from this body.
“A man's body is structurally simply a hollow ring.
A hollow ring elongated into a hollow cylinder, with the inner portion further lengthened and coiled; and above the upper orifice there bulges a head and between the upper and lower orifices the limbs stick out.
The world passes in small portions through the ring, helped in by spoon and gulping, and out by pressure and paper.
— A Thinker's Notebook” by Ven.
Ñanamoli,, March '
A woman, infatuated, came to a bhikkhu and stripped off her clothes.
The bhikkhu, without batting an eyelid, said —
“Now take off your skin.
“Beauty is skin-deep” — how true this saying is.
Who wants a beautiful body without skin?
How fragile is skin, but how strong is lust!
Another view of the body:
On this subject we have also:
“As to sharing the body with many: This body is shared by many.
Firstly, it is shared by the eighty families of worms.
There too, creatures live in dependence on the outer skin, on the inner skin, on the flesh, on the sinews, on the bones, on the marrow, feeding on these things.
And there they are born, grow old and die, evacuate and make water; and the body is their maternity home, their hospital, their charnel ground, their privy and their urinal.
The body can also be brought to death with the upsetting of these worms.
And just as it is shared with the eighty families of worms, so too it is shared by the several hundred internal diseases, as well as by such external causes of death as snakes, scorpions and what not.
— The Path of Purification, Chapter VII, 
— Sutta-Nipata, Vijaya Sutta, Verses -
— Verses of the Elder Bhikkhus -
— Verses of the Elder Bhikkhus -
— Verses of the Elder Bhikkhus -
His family tried to snare him, with the bait of his former wives and good food, into returning to the household life, at which he said:
— M., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
The vast array of “beauty products,” for both male and female, should make people think.
If it is so necessary to beautify the body what is it really like?
— Wijayasiri Amaratunga
The body is like a leaky barrel, oozing all the time.
But a barrel can be bunged up, while the body must continue oozing its whole life.
A drum has four characteristics — it is round in section, covered by hide, is beaten frequently, and emits sound.
In the same way the body has four characteristics: it is round in section or fairly much so, it also is covered by hide, it is beaten by the many sorts of physical and mental dukkha, and emits sound — that is, the sounds indicating pleasure which is unreliable and impermanent, and those which accompany sufferings such as weeping and lamentation.
And who is the beater?
His name is Craving.
The Buddha said:
“Birth is dukkha, disease is dukkha, decay is dukkha, death is dukkha” — all this is dukkha related to this body.
It is interesting that each sort of dukkha has special institutions in Western society to screen it off from the generality of people, who are “in between” these events so to speak.
Birth takes place in maternity wards and nursing homes.
Other parts of the same hospital take care of “disease.” For “decay” we have old peoples' homes and the geriatric wards, while “death” may occur in all such places, the corpse then going on to the undertakers' chapels, and to religious rites.
Things hidden away are unhealthy.
Look at the dukkha!
Look at it!
When one considers how many things afflict this body, it is a wonder that it keeps going so well and for so long!
Many, many kinds of dukkha!
There is so much dukkha connected with this body, which people never notice due to shifting around from one position to another.
When tired of walking or standing, they sit down; when tired of sitting, they stand or lie down; when they have enough of lying down, they get up.
Walking an unexpectedly long distance is dukkha.
Standing long in queue is dukkha.
Sitting in even a comfortable chair for hours is dukkha.
Lying in a hospital bed for days or weeks is dukkha.
By changing position we evade the dukkha, or make it less obvious.
But when someone starts to meditate, spending hours on walking meditation, hours on sitting meditation — then this bodily dukkha can be felt and investigated.
“The uninstructed ordinary person, bhikkhu, has a saying: 'There is a bottomless abyss in the great ocean.' But the uninstructed ordinary person speaks of what does not exist, of what cannot be found, that is that there is a bottomless abyss in the great ocean.
A designation for painful bodily feeling, bhikkhus, is this term 'bottomless abyss.' When an uninstructed ordinary person experiences painful bodily feeling, he grieves, is afflicted laments, beats his breast, cries out loud and becomes distraught.
So it is said, bhikkhus, the uninstructed ordinary person has not emerged from the bottomless abyss, has not obtained a firm foothold.
“But, bhikkhus, when an instructed Noble Disciple experiences painful bodily feeling he does not grieve, is not afflicted, does not lament, nor beat his breast, nor cry out loud, nor become distraught.
So it is said, bhikkhus, the instructed Noble Disciple has emerged from the bottomless abyss and has obtained a firm foothold.
— S.
XXXVI,, trans.
Ven.
Nyanaponika
“Why does one say 'form'?
It is deformed, that is why it is called 'form.' Deformed by what?
By cold and heat and hunger and thirst, by contact with mosquitoes, flies, wind, sunburn, and creeping things.
— S.
XII,, trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli
One could play similar word games in English: Why is it called a body?
Because it is one's abode, therefore it is a body; or again because it bodes no good, therefore it is a body — though this is rather pessimistic perhaps.
To balance up one could etymologize thus: It is called a body since depending on it bodhi is discovered.
Look at it like this:
There's a wardrobe with lots of clothes to cover your body.
Are they all needed?

There is a pantry, stacked with food.
Is all that variety and quantity needed?

There's the house one lives in with its furnishings.
Is it too large or too luxurious?

There's that medicine chest of pills and creams and whatnot.
Can you use them all?
Are they all needed?

Then read these verses:
— The Path of Purification, Ch.
XI, para.

— 'Pansa' /
Food arranged nicely on plates is attractive to the eyes and nose.
“It looks good!” — “It smells goods!” — people say.
When it reaches the mouth it is attractive to the tongue and touch.
They say “How good it tastes!” or “Real crunchy!”.
But just spit it out — attractive to the eyes now or not?
Greed can only arise if conditions are right for it.
And how attractive is the same food spewed up after a few hours in the belly?
It becomes even less desirable when after a day or two its remains are expelled.
Three stages for contemplation!
As the meditator finds out, without food the body becomes weak, with much food it is heavy and disturbed: two kinds of dukkha.
The only way is to know moderation in food, neither altogether abstaining, which can easily become the extreme of self-mortification; nor overeating, which is just the other extreme of sensual pleasure.
— Translated from a traditional Pali recollection, “Yatha paccayam… At one time the Lord was staying at Ayojjhaya on the bank of the river Ganges.
There the Lord addressed the bhikkhus as follows: “Suppose, bhikkhus, a large fleck of foam were floating on this river Ganges and a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Having done this it would appear to him to be empty, insubstantial, without essence — for what essence could there be in a fleck of foam?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatever body, past, future, or present, in oneself or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, that a bhikkhu sees, observes and properly examines… It would appear to him to be empty, insubstantial, without essence — for what essence could there be in a body?… The Kinsman of the Sun made clear:
— from S.
XXII, 
B.
Whose is that body?
R.
It's mine, of course!
B.
Better be careful with that “of course.” Anyway, how do you know it's your body?
R.
Well, I see it — every day for years.
B.
So it's yours because you see it?
R.
Yes.
Besides, I feel it's mine.
B.
O.K.
So that's another reason why it belongs to you.
You feel it — right?
R.
Sure!
It feels like me.
B.
Any other evidence that it's yours?
What about the other senses?
R.
I suppose you could say that I hear it too.
My guts gurgle and my feet thump the deck.
Of course it smells like me too.
Taste?
Oh I don't think that helps identify it very much.
So that's all the senses, and they tell me that it is mine.
B.
You've left out the most important sense — the mind.
That tells you “this is my body” all the time…
R.
Yes, if you want to call mind a sense.
Yes, it identifies what is mine and what is not.
B.
Well, I don't think it is so easy to tell what is one's own and what is not.
R.
Oh, that's easy.
I have power over what is mine — like my own bank-account.
I can do what I like with it.
B.
I see that you have a bandaged finger.
Show me how much power you have over it by healing it instantly!
R.
Can't do that, you know.
It's not natural!
B.
Well now, what is natural?
And does power over a thing signify ownership?
For instance, that bit of dead wood over there.
Is it myself?
R.
Oh, come on… of course not!
B.
But it's quite natural, and one can do nothing about making it live again.
When it lived, that life was conditioned by many factors, now it's dead because of those factors' change.
Yet you say “my body”!
T.
It is mine!
It has belonged to me since I was born!
B.
Righto!
Then “your” body, which you can't heal — at least you know when it is going to die?
R.
No… I've no idea… but…
B.
But it's your body, and you can't cure it, can't stop it getting old, can't stop it dying, you don't even know when that body's going to die.
But still it's your body.
How much yours?
B.
And who is the owner anyway?
“This body, bhikkhus, is not yours nor is it others'.
It should be seen as produced by past kamma, volitions, and feelings.
Regarding this, the learned noble disciple thoroughly and systematically attends to dependent origination: This being, that is; from the arising of this, that arises; this not being, that is not; from the cessation of this, that ceases.
That is to say: Unknowing conditions kamma-formations…
The brain proclaimed: “I'm the boss here.
Get up instantly, lazy bones!
Groans from the bones: “I'm broken!
I'm smashed!
Who are you ordering around anyway?
Yeah, who is he?
Garn!
We boss the lot, unless we are whole the contraption can't stand!
Outcry from the tendons: “You bones'll stand up by yourselves, will yer?
Won't do without us!
Just fall to bits, a right skelington!
A howl from the heart: “What are you all quarreling about?
No one gets anywhere without me, Old Brain least of all!
A grunt from the guts: “Now don't you get superior, heart!
Where you goin-a-be without us workers sending you food?
Clamor from the kidneys: “Fine mess you'll be in without us!
Loud laugh from the lungs: “ 'Ere, wotcha gonna do without us twin windbags?
Won't get very far, will yer?
Shriek from the skin: “Shudup the lot of you!
I wrap you all up so that you don't look like a butcher's shop!
And so the debate went on but no master could be found.
We take a bag to go shopping, and it gets filled up with what we want, if we pay the price.
In the same way this skin bag gets filled up, according to our desires.
And we pay the price: old age and death.
The Buddha:
Here life's for mortals, wretched and brief, unknown its end; incalculable and 'tis to dukkha joined.
That those who are born will never die no means are there indeed!
Having reached decay there's death, thus is the law for beings.
As for fruit that is ripe there's always fear of falling so for mortals who are born there's always fear of death.
Just as vessels made of clay by a maker of pots all end by being broken, so death is of life.
The young and those who're great in age, the fools together with the wise, all go under the sway of death, for all death is the goal.
Those who are overcome by death and going to another world, the father cannot protect his son, nor relatives their kin.
While relatives are watching, weeping and lamenting, see mortal beings one by one led as an ox to slaughter.
As the world is thus afflicted by death and by decay, therefore the wise grieve not knowing the nature of the world.
Their path you do not know by which they come, by which they go.
Neither end is seen by you, useless your lament!
If then by lamenting benefits were obtained then the wise would do so, a fool just hurts himself.
Not by crying nor by grief the mind attains to peace but still more dukkha is produced, the body as well is harmed.
One becomes both pale and thin — one merely hurts oneself, not thus are the dead protected, it's useless to lament!
By not forsaking grief one goes to greater dukkha, bewailing those who've died, one's in the sway of grief.
See other men who go along, go according to kamma, so beings tremble here with fear come under the sway of death.
However they conceive it, it's quite other than that, just so is separation — see the nature of the world!
Though one lived for hundred years or even more, such a man is separated from his kin and here he leaves his life.
So having heard the arahats, give up your lamentation.
Seeing the corpse: “He'll not be met by me again.
As a burning house with water should be extinguished, so one wise and steadfast, a man who's wise in wholesomeness quickly is rid of arisen grief as wind a tuft of down.
One who desires his own happiness: let him pull out his own arrow — lamentations and longings, the grief that's in himself.
Arrow withdrawn, unattached, the mind attains to peace, passed beyond all grief, griefless and extinguished.
— Salla Suttas, Sutta-nipata, verses -
— Jara Sutta, Sutta-nipata, verses -
— From the Dhammapada commentary story of the Weavers' daughter
“As soon as evening comes, or when the night vanishes and day is breaking, a bhikkhu reflects in this way: “Truly there are many possibilities for me to die — I may be bitten by a snake, or stung by scorpion or centipede — and thereby lose my life.
But this would be an obstacle for me.
Or I may stumble and fall down, or food eaten may not agree with me.
Or bile, phlegm and piercing bodily “winds” may upset me — and thereby I may lose my life.
Then men or ghosts may attack me — and thereby I may lose my life.
But this would be an obstacle for me.' Then the bhikkhu should consider thus: 'Are there still found in me unsubdued evil unwholesome factors which, if I should die this day or night, might lead me to dukkha?' Now, if he understands that this is the case, he should use his utmost resolution, energy, effort, endeavor, steadfastness, attentiveness, and clear-mindedness to overcome these evil unwholesome factors.
— A., trans.
after Ven.
Nyanatiloka in Buddhist Dictionary, P.
— From Middle Length Discourses No., trans.
Ven.
Ñanamoli Thera
“Short indeed is this life of men, limited, fleeting, full of woe and torment; it is just like a dewdrop that vanishes as soon as the sun rises; like a water-bubble; like a line drawn on water; like a torrent dragging everything along and never standing still; like cattle for slaughter that every moment look death in the face.
— A., condensed trans.
after Ven.
Nyanatiloka in Buddhist Dictionary, p.
If “I” am dying when this Bag of Bones packs up, then the pain is terrible indeed; but if it's just this bag of bones packing up………then?
A.
What's going to die?
B.
I am going to die!
A.
Nonsense!
B.
What do you mean?
A.
The body is going to die.
It's only you dying if you identify the body as yourself.
B.
That's a good thought.
Then I am not going to die.
I shall live for ever!
A.
Can do, if that's what you want!
But think of the sufferings, born and dying, again and again.
B.
How do I get out of it?
A.
Just as you don't identify with the body, so you try not identifying with the mind.
B.
Wow!
How come!
Impossible!
I don't identify with my mind.
There's only one me.
A.
Suppose you see no me, suppose there is just emptiness, and no me perceiving it, what then?
Interesting that religions concern themselves so much with the dead bodies.
Ceremonies of various sorts are all conducted round the lifeless lumps of decaying flesh.
Yet each religion is concerned really with whatever is thought of as continuing.
It shows that attachment to the body as the person' is very strong.
And in English we talk of “the dead” as opposed to “the living.” But for a Buddhist there are no dead people, only decaying bodies.
Paradoxically, a person, while not rid of the concept of personality, never dies.
Villagers in Buddhist countries are often better schooled in the body and its end than are educated Westerners.
The former have plenty of chances to go to the local temple, or to see the nearest meditation teacher.
And what do they hear?
Again and again they hear the sound of ANICCA, DUKKHA, ANATTA of all parts of the human being, mind and body.
By hearing frequently it sinks in, so that even if people never penetrate these Three Marks of Existence in themselves, at least they have an attitude of accepting them to some extent.
It helps with decay, disease, and death.
And they see friends and kin cremated, not in a posh chapel with soft music, solemn colors and concealed oven, but on top of a pile of logs in the forest.
That's the body burning — there's that smell of meat…and this body too will go the same way.
These things are good to see.
They are healthy, wholesome.
There is no false solemnity, things are just the way they are.
Undisguised.
People in Buddhist lands who have so often heard teaching about ANICCA, impermanence, are more ready to accept the common end than a great many Westerners.
Old age, disease and death are better accepted by Buddhists as just as natural a part of life as birth.
One does not bewail the birth of a child — though painful enough for both mother and child — so why bewail the naturally succeeding events?
Buddhists who know the Dhamma well talk naturally and calmly about their old age and death as they have contemplated as ANICCA everything in this world.
There is nothing like living in a little hut in the tropical forest to make one realize how vulnerable this body is to all sorts of attack.
How very small creatures can make life difficult if not precarious for this body.
A city-dweller misses most of this and may easily get a false sense of security.

Another thing which life in the wilds makes really necessary is mindfulness.
Mindfulness where one puts one's feet, specially in the dark.
And then one cannot get on without loving-kindness too, since all sorts of other beings are so near to oneself, near to this body which one fears for.
Loving-kindness rids one of such fears and hatreds.
We have so many fears — all things out there — ghosts, darkness, unknown people, loneliness, and so on.
The really fearful things, this mind-and-body's precarious state, we never see.
The body has a side which most of us don't want to see and know.
We wish to hush up its dirt, stinks, belches and farts, to disregard and overlook them.
Yet finally when laid low and near to death, these stenches and filths can be disguised no longer.
It is a salutary lesson, if one gets the chance, to go to an autopsy and watch the doctors and nurses pulling a body to pieces.
One's eyes are not prepared for this sight even if one has watched a butcher chopping up meat.
And one's nose can well be assaulted too by the overpowering stench of decay if the corpse is just a few days old.
To see this is to experience for oneself some Dhamma: how the body is just conditioned and decaying bits and pieces.
“As this body is, so that body was; as that body is, so this body will be.
Lists like the following ten stages of the body's decay are often illustrated in traditional Buddhist art, in ancient books and on temple walls, as often seen in Thailand.
These are like special prescriptions for the disease of lust:
— Francis Story, from The Buddhist Outlook
— Verses of the Elders Bhikkhus, -
The “Knowing and Seeing” — insight — that this thera saw in himself is first:
Seeing no difference between the living and the dead bodies — only time makes a difference.
Then seeing the dead body as totally foul — not attracted to this or repelled by that, and applying this to his own body.
Then seeing that all the time, day or night, the body has the same qualities — not that it is desirable at some times but not at others.
The enjoyments that most get from senses-pleasures — here the example of a quintet is given — this thera has found far more abundantly in seeing Dhamma rightly.
Spiritual objector:
“All this pondering over corpses and looking into the body's parts is just morbid.
One should look at the body as a pure temple of the spirit.
Practical Upasaka:
“It goes against the grain to gaze at the bits and pieces in this body and see that they have nothing attractive about them.
But this way lies Liberation.
To glorify the body is to be bound by craving for it.
Doctor:
I cannot understand you when you say that the body is unbeautiful; to me it is such a wonderful machine!
The trouble with that view of the “wonderfulness of the body” is that it is near delight and delighting in the body is another name for craving, the root of dukkha.
Seeing the body's unattractiveness is opposed to craving.
“You're wrong, man, sex is just natural, like breathing — just something you've got to do.
Just like eating.
It's a beautiful natural function!
“Not true!
Your comparisons are not apt.
“How come?
You mean it's not natural?
“Yes, sex is natural for people with desire, that means sex-desire or lust, in their hearts.
But lust is a hindrance to the development of mental-emotional purity.
But your comparisons to breathing and eating don't stand examination.
Breathing is an automatic body function.
No kamma, good or bad, is made because no intention is needed to decide to breathe!
“Eating is different because, though necessary for the body's life, it is connected with intention, so kamma is made.
When greed for food is present, bad kamma is made which will fruit as suffering.
But when food is eaten mindfully and just to keep the body going, then good kamma is made — of mindful reflection.
“Sex is different from both these.
No sex takes place without desire or lust: this is among the unwholesome mental factors — it can never be karmically wholesome — so unwholesome kamma is made which has the nature to limit the mind to sensual things.
“That's painting sex too black!
“No, that's being realistic.
Of course, states of mind will vary while one has sex — more or less lust and more or less of loving-kindness.
More lust means more bad kamma.
More loving-kindness, as between two people deeply attached to each other, less bad kamma and more good kamma.
In the latter case it is called kamma which is dark and bright, with a dark and bright result.
M.
It's all the work of Satan — this foul body.
We agree with you Buddhists about that.
B.
Well, the body is certainly not pleasant when examined, but we do not say that it has been created, by Satan.
M.
But all matter is evil, foul, dragging the soul into darkness, as our Mani says.
B.
That's not what the Buddha says, though.
Matter is just earth, water, fire, and air elements which are quite neutral, neither good nor evil.
They form bodies due to kamma made by beings; good or evil kammas both lead to the formation of bodies.
M.
You must admit, though, that your body is a hindrance to the attainment of spiritual states.
You have to feed it and rest it, dose it with medicine when it gets sick.
Because of its wretchedness the soul is weighed down.
B.
No, I do not admit that.
The body is the basis and vehicle for practice so one should take care of it without pampering it.
Though it has to eat, sleep, excrete, and it gets sick too, at these times we should be mindful, which is possible at all times when not asleep.
Even the difficulties of the body can be used in Dhamma-practice.
And what is this about a soul being weighed down?
M.
Well, that is the pure aspirations, the pure thoughts, the still states of contemplation — that is the beginning of discovering the soul.
B.
Oh, then the impure aspirations, thoughts and confused states of mind must be not soul!
You should investigate all mental states, pure and impure, calm and distracted, and find out whether any of them are substantial or permanent.
What would you find, do you think?
M.
All right, they're changing.
But behind them all is the pure tranquil soul, eternally unchanging.
B.
But have you experienced this or are you just telling me some dogma or belief?
M.
Yes, I think I have experienced it.
Then one is free from the trammels of this body.
B.
Really you need to examine all mental states, as I mentioned before, and the body too, in the same light.
They're all Anicca, Dukkha, Anatta…
M.
What…?
B.
Sorry!
I get so used to using those words that they have slipped off my tongue, unmindfully I am afraid!
They mean impermanent, unsatisfactory, and no self.
When you look at them like this you neither love the soul nor hate the body.
That is, put in a Buddhist way, you don't cling to pure tranquility and identify it as your soul or self, neither do you reject this body.
Don't lay the blame on this poor old body!
It's not to blame.
M.
But Mani says that it is.
B.
Well then, I shall ask you a question.
What makes decisions and choices, is it the body or the mind?
M.
The mind decides, of course.
B.
Then how can the body be blamed?
It is not evil, nor is matter darkness.
Poor old body just gets dragged along by the decisions the mind makes.
M.
But you Buddhists practice contemplation of the body as foul.
I have read about it.
B.
Yes, but that does not mean it is evil.
That kind of meditation is just to break up the attachment to the beauty of bodies.
It is the attachment in one's own mind, not any Satan or evil creator, that is responsible for keeping the mind tied down to sensual pleasures.
Look inside for the evil creator — his name is attachment, greed, desire, lust — and he is put out of business by contemplating the unattractive.
The good creator is in there too, the mind that creates pure mental states, the experience of jhana and so on.
But all this creating keeps one in the round of rebirth, you know!
A.
Hey, man!
Why you cut your hair and beard?
Hair's natural to have but you monks cut it off.
We should keep it; it's natural, it's beautiful.
Bhikkhu: It's cut off for two reasons.
First, it decorates this body.
You people like decoration.
That's what lay life is all about.
But bhikkhus like the body plain, without distractions, so that they can see what it's really like.
A.
Well, what's it really like?
B.
If you like it as it is, “naturally,” you should try not washing, not brushing the teeth or cleaning the nails, not combing the hair — and so on.
Body and its parts are only beautiful if washing is also “natural.
A.
So, you said that hair decorates, what's your other reason?
B.
It's a disguise, that beard and moustache — it's something to hide behind, a mask.
When you have no hair on the head and face you have no mask behind which to retire.
Is it natural or beautiful to hide things?
Isn't it better to open up?
Who solves problems by hiding them away?
Shaving hair and beard is also an outer token of the shaving off of conceit and pride which has to be done steadily and carefully over years of practice.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
There are two things beginning meditators should search for as external aids to their practice:
Suitable companions: Be judicious in choosing people to associate with.
Search only for companions who have peace of mind.
This can be any group at all, as long as the group as a whole is aiming for mental peace.
A suitable location: Choose a quiet place with an agreeable atmosphere, far from human society.
Places of this sort, providing physical seclusion, are conducive to the practice of meditation.
Examples listed in the Canon include caverns and caves, the shade of an over-hanging cliff-face, the forest wilderness, and empty houses or buildings where not too many people will come passing by.
Places like this are an excellent aid and support for a beginning meditator.
When you go to stay in such a place, don't let your thoughts dwell on topics that will act as enemies to your peace of mind.
For example, don't preoccupy yourself with magic spells or the black arts.
Instead, call to mind and put into practice those principles and qualities that will be to your benefit.
For example:
Santutthi: Be content with the possessions you already have.
Viveka: Aim solely for peace, quiet and seclusion.
Asansagga: Don't entangle yourself with human companionship.
Viriyarambha: Be singleminded and persistent at making the mind still and at peace.
Silanussati: Reflect on your own conduct to see if you've overstepped any of your precepts, and — if you have — immediately purify your behavior through your own intention.
Samadhi-katha: Focus on calling to mind the meditation theme on which your mind can become firmly established.
Pañña-katha: Focus exclusively on those topics that will give rise to discernment and clear insight.
Vimutti: Make the mind well-disposed toward the search for release from all defilements.
Vimutti-ñana-dassana: Focus on contemplating how to come to the realizations that will enable you to gain release from the fermentation of all defilements.
These principles are guidelines for meditators of every sort and will direct the mind solely to the path leading beyond all suffering and stress.
What follows is a short-hand list of essential principles, selected to help prevent meditators from getting tied up in the course of their practice.
These principles, though, should be viewed merely as incidental to the Dhamma.
The reality of the Dhamma has to be brought into being within ourselves through our own energies: This is called practicing the Dhamma.
If we go no further than the lists, we'll end up with only concepts of the Dhamma.
Our ultimate aim should be to make the mind still until we reach the natural reality that exists on its own within us, that knows on its own and lets go on its own.
This is the practice of the Dhamma that will lead us to the realization of the Dhamma — the true taste and nourishment of the Dhamma — so that we will no longer be caught up on the ropes.
In other words, conceptualized Dhamma is like a rope bridge for crossing over a river.
If we take the bridge down and then carry it with us, it will serve no purpose other than to weigh us down and get us all tied up.
So no matter how much conceptualized Dhamma you may have memorized, when you come to the point where you're practicing for real you have to take responsibility for yourself.
Whether you are to win or lose, let go or cling, will depend on how much quality you've built into your own mind.
This is why we are taught not to cling to the scriptures and texts, to meanings and concepts.
Only when we train ourselves to get beyond all this will we be heading for purity.
Attahi attano natho:
Nothing can help us unless we can rely on ourselves.
Only when we realize this will we be on the right track.
The Buddha attained all of the truths he taught before he put them into words.
It wasn't the case that he came up with the words first and then put them into practice later.
He was like the scientists who experiment and get results before writing textbooks.
But people who simply read the textbooks know everything — for example, they may know every part in an airplane — but they can't produce one out of their own knowledge.
To be a consumer and to be a producer are two different things.
If we cling merely to the concepts of the Dhamma, simply memorizing them, we're no more than consumers.
Only if we make ourselves into producers, so that others can consume, will we be acting properly.
To be successful producers, we have to accept responsibility for ourselves.
If there's any area where we don't succeed, we should make use of our own ingenuity until we do.
If we rely merely on the ingenuity of others, then we can't depend on ourselves.
And if we can't depend on ourselves, why should we let other people think that they can depend on us?
This is why I have compiled this list of principles merely as a brief beginning guide for meditators.
Tecivarikanga: the practice of using only one set of three robes.
Pindapatikanga: the practice of going for alms.
Sapadacarikanga: the practice of not by-passing any donors on one's alms path.
Ekasanikanga: the practice of eating no more than one meal a day.
Pattapindikanga: the practice of eating one's food only from one's bowl.
Khalupacchabhattikanga: the practice of not accepting any food presented after one has eaten one's fill.
Araññikanga: the practice of living in the wilderness.
Rukkhamulikanga: the practice of living under the shade of a tree.
Abbhokasikanga: the practice of living out under the open sky.
Sosanikanga: the practice of living in a cemetery.
Yathasanthatikanga: the practice of living in whatever place is assigned to one.
Nesajjikanga: the practice of not lying down.
Avasika-vatta: duties of a host-monk when a newcomer arrives.
Gamika-vatta: duties of a monk when leaving a monastery.
Anumodana-vatta: duties connected with expressing appreciation for donations.
Bhattaka-vatta: duties to observe before and after one's meal.
Pindicarika-vatta: duties to observe when going for alms.
Araññika-vatta: duties to observe when living in the wilderness.
Senasana-vatta: duties to observe in looking after one's dwelling place.
Jantaghara-vatta: duties to observe in using the fire-house.
Vaccakuti-vatta: duties to observe in using the toilet.
Upajjhaya-vatta: duties to observe in attending to one's preceptor.
Acariya-vatta: duties to observe in attending to one's teacher.
Saddhiviharika-vatta: a preceptor's duties toward his pupil.
Antevasika-vatta: a teacher's duties toward his pupil.
The four right exertions: making the effort to prevent evil from arising, to abandon whatever evil has arisen, to give rise to the good that hasn't yet arisen, and to maintain the good that has.
The four foundations of achievement:
The five pre-eminent factors: conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, discernment.
The five strengths: conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, discernment.
The seven factors for Awakening:
The eightfold path:
Ten recollections; ten foul objects; ten kasinas; four sublime abidings; four formless absorptions; one resolution into elements; and one perception of the filthiness of food.
Dhammanussati: recollection of the virtues of the Dhamma.
Sanghanussati: recollection of the virtues of the Sangha.
Silanussati: recollection of one's own moral virtue.
Caganussati: recollection of one's generosity.
Devatanussati: recollection of the qualities that lead to rebirth as a heavenly being.
Kayagatasati: mindfulness immersed in the body.
Maranassati: mindfulness of death.
Anapanassati: mindfulness of breathing.
Upasamanussati: recollection of the virtues of nibbana — ultimate pleasure; unexcelled ease, free from birth, aging, illness and death.
Vinilaka: a livid corpse, with patchy discoloration — greenish, reddish, yellowish — from the decomposition of the blood.
Vipubbaka: a festering corpse, oozing lymph and pus from its various orifices.
Vichiddaka: a corpse falling apart, the pieces scattered about, radiating their stench.
Vikkhayittaka: a corpse that various animals, such as dogs, are gnawing, or that vultures are picking at, or that crows are fighting over, pulling it apart in different directions.
Vikkhittaka: corpses scattered about, i.e., unclaimed bodies that have been thrown together in a pile — face up, face down, old bones and new scattered all over the place.
Hatavikkhittaka: the corpse of a person violently murdered, slashed and stabbed with various weapons, covered with wounds — short, long, shallow, deep — some parts hacked so that they're almost detached.
Lohitaka: a corpse covered with blood, like the hands of a butcher, all red and raw-smelling.
Puluvaka: a corpse infested with worms: long worms, short worms, black, green, and yellow worms, squeezed into the ears, eyes, and mouth; squirming and squiggling about, filling the various parts of the body like a net full of fish that has fallen open.
Atthika: a skeleton, some of the joints already separated, others not yet, the bones — whitish, yellowish, discolored — scattered near and far all over the place.
Karuna: compassion, sympathy, pity, aspiring to find a way to be truly helpful.
Mudita: appreciation for the goodness of other people and for our own when we are able to help them.
Upekkha: When our efforts to be of help don't succeed, we should make the mind neutral — neither pleased nor upset by whatever it focuses on — so that it enters the emptiness of jhana, centered and tranquil to the point where it can disregard acts of thinking and evaluating as well as feelings of rapture and ease, leaving only oneness and equanimity with regard to all objects and preoccupations.
Viññanancayatana: being absorbed in boundless consciousness as one's preoccupation, with no form or figure acting as the sign or focal point of one's concentration.
Akiñcaññayatana: focusing exclusively on a fainter or more subtle sense of cognizance that has no limit and in which nothing appears or disappears, to the point where one almost understands it to be nibbana.
Nevasañña-nasaññayatana: being absorbed in a feeling that occurs in the mind, that isn't awareness exactly, but neither is it non-awareness; i.e., there is awareness, but with no thinking, no focusing of awareness on what it knows.
These four formless absorptions are merely resting places for the mind, because they are states that the mind enters, stays in, and leaves.
They are by nature unstable and inconstant, so we shouldn't rest content simply at this level.
We have to go back and forth through the various levels many times so as to realize that they're only stages of enforced tranquillity.
One resolution into elements: i.e., regarding each part of the body simply in terms of physical properties or elements.
One perception of the filthiness of food: i.e., viewing food as something repugnant and unclean — with regard to where it comes from, how it's prepared, how it's mixed together when it's chewed, and where it stays in the stomach and intestines.
With one exception, all of the meditation themes mentioned here are simply gocara dhamma — foraging places for the mind.
They're not places for the mind to stay.
If we try to go live in the things we see when we're out foraging, we'll end up in trouble.
Thus, there is one theme that's termed “vihara dhamma” or “anagocara”: Once you've developed it, you can use it as a place to stay.
When you practice meditation, you don't have to go foraging in other themes; you can stay in the single theme that's the apex of all meditation themes: anapanassati, keeping the breath in mind.
This theme, unlike the others, has none of the features or various deceptions that can upset or disturb the heart.
As for the others:
— The ten foul objects can give rise after a while to visions and sometimes to sense of alienation and discontent that turns into restlessness and distress, your mind being unable to fashion anything on which it can come to rest, to the point where you can't eat or drink.
— The ten kasina, after you've stared at them a long while, can give rise to visions that tend to pull you out of your sense of the body, as you become enthralled by their color and features, to the point where you may become completely carried away.
— As for the resolution into elements, when you become more and more engrossed in contemplating the elements, everything in the world becomes nothing more than elements, which are everywhere the same.
You come to believe that you no longer have to make distinctions: You're nothing more than elements, members of the opposite sex are nothing more than elements, food is nothing more than elements, and so you can end up overstepping the bounds of morality and the monastic discipline.
— As for the perception of the filthiness of food, as you become more and more caught up in it, everything becomes repulsive.
You can't eat or sleep, your mind becomes restless and disturbed, and you inflict suffering on yourself.
— As for the four sublime abodes, if you don't have jhana as a dwelling for the mind, feelings of good will, compassion, and appreciation can all cause you to suffer.
Only if you have jhana can these qualities truly become sublime abodes, that is, restful places for the heart to stay.
Thus only one of these themes — anapanassati, keeping the breath in mind — is truly safe.
This is the supreme meditation theme.
You don't have to send your awareness out to fix it on any outside objects at all.
Even if you may go foraging through such objects, don't go living in them, because after a while they can waver and shift, just as when we cross the sea in a boat: When we first get into the boat we may feel all right, but as soon as the boat heads out into the open bay and we're buffeted by wind and waves, we can start feeling seasick.
To practice keeping the breath in mind, though, is like sitting in an open shelter at dockside: We won't feel queasy or sick; we can see boats as they pass by on the water, and people as they pass by on land.
Thus, keeping the breath in mind is classed:
— as “anagocara,” an exercise in which you focus exclusively on the breath while you sit in meditation, without having to compound things by sending your awareness out to grab this or get hold of that;
— and as “dhamma-thiti,” i.e., all you have to do is keep your mind established firm and in place.
The beginning stage is to think buddho — “bud-” with the in-breath, and “dho” with the out.
Fixing your attention on just this much is enough to start seeing results.
There's only one aim, and that's:
If there is anything you're unsure of, or if you encounter any problems, then consult the following pages.
This handbook on keeping the breath in mind has had a number of readers who have put it into practice and seen results appearing within themselves in accordance with the strength of their practice.
Many people have come to me to discuss the results they've gained from practicing the principles in this book, but now it's out of print.
For this reason I've decided to enlarge it and have it printed again as an aid for those who are interested in the practice.
Now, if you're not acquainted with this topic, have never attempted it, or aren't yet skilled — if you don't know the techniques of the practice — it's bound to be hard to understand, because the currents of the mind, when they're written down as a book, simply won't be a book.
The issues involved in dealing with the mind are more than many.
If your knowledge of them isn't truly comprehensive, you may misunderstand what you come to see and know, and this in turn can be destructive in many ways.
You may lose whatever respect you had for the practice, deciding that there's no truth to it.
You may gain only a partial grasp of things, leading you to decide that other people can't practice or are practicing wrongly, and in the end you're left with no way to practice yourself.
So you decide to “let go” simply through conjecture and speculation.
But the truth is that this simply won't work.
True and complete letting go can come only from the principles well-taught by the Buddha: virtue, concentration, and discernment, which are a synopsis of the eightfold path he taught in his first sermon.
So in our practice we should consider how virtue, concentration, discernment, and release can be brought into being.
Virtue forms the basis for concentration; concentration, the basis for discernment; and discernment, the basis for release from ignorance, craving, and attachment.
Thus in this book, which is a guide to developing Right Concentration, I would like to recommend to other meditators a method that, in my experience, has proven safe and productive, so that they can test it for themselves by putting it into practice until they start seeing results.
The main concern of this book is with the way to mental peace.
Now, the word “peace” has many levels: A mind infused with virtue has one level of peace and happiness; a mind stilled through concentration has another level of peace and happiness; a mind at peace through the power of discernment has still another level of happiness; and the peace of a mind that is released is yet another level, with a happiness completely apart from the rest.
In these matters, though, meditators tend to prefer the results to the causes.
They aren't as interested in abandoning their own defilements through the principles of the practice as they are in standing out among society at large.
They appropriate the ideas and observations of other people as being their own, but by and large their wisdom is composed of bahira pañña — remembered “outsights,” not true insight.
So when you want the reality of the principles taught by the Buddha, you should first lift your mind to this principle — Right Concentration — because it's an excellent gathering of the energies of your mind.
All energy in the world comes from stopping and resting.
Motion is something that destroys itself — as when our thinking goes all out of bounds.
Take walking for instance: When we walk, energy comes from the foot at rest.
Or when we speak, energy comes from stopping between phrases.
If we were to talk without stopping, without resting between phrases, not only would it waste energy, but the language we'd speak wouldn't even be human.
So it is with practicing the Dhamma: Release comes from concentration and discernment acting together.
Release through the power of the mind requires more concentration and less discernment; release through discernment, more discernment and less concentration — but there is no way that release can be attained without the stillness of concentration.
Thus, resting the mind provides the strength needed to support all the qualities developed in the practice, which is why it's such an essential part of Right Concentration.
It forms a well-spring and a storage place for all knowledge, whether of the world or of the Dhamma.
If you aren't acquainted with this basic principle, skilled awareness won't arise.
And if you don't have skilled awareness, how will you be able to let go?
You'll have to go groping around in unskilled awareness.
As long as the mind is in the grips of unskilled awareness, it's bound to be deluded by its fashionings.
Unskilled awareness is a brine in which the mind lies soaking; a mind soaked in its juices is like wet, sappy wood that, when burned, gives off smoke as its signal, but no flame.
As the smoke rises into the air, you imagine it to be something high and exalted.
It's high, all right, but only like smoke or overcast clouds.
If there's a lot of it, it can obscure your vision and that of others, so that you can't see the light of the sun and moon.
This is why such people are said to be “groping.” Those who train their own hearts, though, will give rise to skilled awareness.
When skilled awareness penetrates the heart, you'll come to realize the harmful potency of mental fashionings.
The arising of skilled awareness in the heart is like the burning of dry, sapless wood that gives off flame and light.
Even though there may be some smoke, you don't pay it any mind, because the firelight is more outstanding.
The flame of skilled awareness gives rise to five sorts of results:
The heart becomes purified.
The heart becomes radiant in and of itself.
The heart develops majesty.
The three skills, the eight skills, and the four forms of acumen will arise.
All of these things arise through the power of the mind.
The nature of the mind is that it already has a certain amount of instinctive intuition — the times when it knows on its own, as when you happen to think of a particular person, and then he or she actually shows up.
All good qualities, from the mundane to the transcendent, are always present in each of us.
These qualities — the Dhamma — aren't the exclusive possession of any particular group or person.
We all have the right to develop them and put them into practice.
For these qualities to yield results, we have to develop them in conjunction with the following four principles:
Viriya: being persistent in the practice.
Citta: being intent on the practice.
Vimansa: being circumspect in what we do, i.e., circumspect before we do it, circumspect while we're doing it, and circumspect with regard to the results that arise from what we've done.
These four principles form the foundation for success in all areas, whether in matters of the world or of the Dhamma.
Once they're actualized within us and focused together on a single goal, we're bound to succeed in line with our aspirations.
The results they yield, briefly put, are of two sorts:
Puññariddhi: power in terms of the Dhamma that will accrue to meditators, providing means for settling issues that relate to the world and the heart, or for liberating the mind from all mundane influences.
This is termed:
Thus, I would like to invite all Buddhists — all who hope for peace and well-being — to reflect on the principles of practice dealing with Right Concentration presented here as a guide for those who are interested.
If you have any questions dealing with this book, or any problems arising from the practice of training the mind, I will be glad to give whatever advice I can.
May you prosper and be well.
Whoever feels that this book is of use and would like to print it again for free distribution, may go ahead and do so without having to ask permission.
Some parts may not be correct in terms of the Pali, so wherever there may be any mistakes, I ask your forgiveness.
Homage to the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One.
Ukasa, dvaratayena katam, sabbam aparadham khamatha me bhante.
Asking your leave, I request that you forgive me for whatever wrong I have done with the three doors.
Vandami bhante cetiyam sabbam sabbattha thane, supatithitam sariranka-dhatum, maha-bodhim buddha-rupam sakkarattham.
I revere every stupa established in every place, every Relic of the Buddha's body, every Great Bodhi tree, every Buddha image that is an object of veneration.
Aham vandami dhatuyo.
Aham vandami sabbaso.
Iccetam ratanattayam, aham vandami sabbada.
I revere the relics.
I revere them everywhere.
I always revere the Triple Gem.
Buddham jivitam yava nibbanam saranam gacchami: I take refuge in the Buddha from now until attaining nibbana.
Dhamma-puja mahappanno: I ask to pay homage to the Dhamma, the teachings of the Buddha, which are a well-spring of discernment for beings human and divine.
Thus, this worship of the Dhamma is a means of developing great discernment.
Dhammam jivitam yava nibbanam saranam gacchami: I take refuge in the Dhamma from now until attaining nibbana.
Sangha-puja mahabhogavaho: I ask to pay homage to those followers of the Buddha who have practiced well in thought, word, and deed; and who possess all wealth, beginning with Noble Wealth.
Thus, this homage to the Sangha is a means of developing great wealth.
Sangham jivitam yava nibbanam saranam gacchami: I take refuge in the Sangha from now until attaining nibbana.
N'atthi me saranam aññam, Buddho dhammo sangho me saranam varam: Etena saccavajjena hotu me jayamangalam: I have no other refuge: The Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha are my highest refuge.
By means of this vow, may the blessing of victory be mine.
Yankiñci ratanam loke vijjati vividham puthu, Ratanam buddha-dhamma-sangha-samam natthi, Tasma sotthi bhavantu me: Of the many and varied treasures found in the world, none equal the Triple Gem.
Therefore, may well-being be mine.
Declare your purity, taking the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha as witness once more, repeating this Pali passage:
Now develop thoughts of good will, saying:
Sabbe satta sada hontu avera sukha-jivino: May all beings always live happily, free from animosity.
Katam puñña-phalam mayham sabbe bhagi bhavantu te: May all share in the blessings springing from the good I have done.
Spreading thoughts of good will to the six directions:
The western quarter: “Pacchimasmim disa-bhage sabbe satta, etc.
The northern quarter: “Uttarasmim disa-bhage sabbe satta, etc.
The southern quarter: “Dakkhinasmim disa-bhage sabbe satta, etc.
The lower regions: “Hetthimasmim disa-bhage sabbe satta, etc.
The upper regions: “Uparimasmim disa-bhage sabbe satta avera hontu, abyapajjha hontu, anigha hontu, sukhi attanam pariharantu.
Sabbe satta sada hontu avera sukhajivino.
Katam puññaphalam mayham sabbe bhagi bhavantu te.” 
When you have finished spreading thoughts of good will to all six directions, cleanse your heart of thoughts of animosity and apprehension.
Make your heart completely clear and at ease.
Good will acts as a support for purity of virtue and so is an appropriate way of preparing the heart for the practice of tranquillity and insight meditation.
I.e., remove all befouling mental states from the mind.
The things that befoul and darken the mind are the five Hindrances:
— Byapada: ill will, malevolence, hatred.
— Thina-middha: torpor, lethargy, drowsiness, listlessness.
— Uddhacca-kukkucca: restlessness and anxiety.
— Vicikiccha: doubt, uncertainty.
When any of these unskillful states occupy the heart, it's not flourishing, blooming, or bright.
For the heart to bloom, it has to be free from all five of the Hindrances; and for it to be free in this way, we have to develop concentration or absorption, which is composed of directed thought, evaluation, rapture, pleasure, and singleness of preoccupation.
The heart will then be clear, bright, and resplendent.
In Pali, this is called “sobhana-citta.” Thus, in this section we will discuss how to develop concentration as a means of eliminating the Hindrances as follows:
Sit in a half-lotus position, your right leg on top of your left; your hands palm-up in your lap, your right hand on top of your left.
Keep your body comfortably erect and your mind on what you're doing.
Don't let your thoughts go spinning forward or back.
Be intent on keeping track of the present: the present of the body, or the in-and-out breath; and the present of the mind, or mindfulness and all-round alertness.
The present of the body and the present of the mind should be brought together at a single point.
In other words, make the object of the mind single and one.
Focus your attention on the breath, keeping watch over it until you're clearly aware that, “This is the in-breath,” and “This is the out.” Once you can see clearly in this way, call to mind the virtues of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, gathering them into a single word, “Buddho.” Then divide “Buddho” into two syllables, thinking “bud-” with the in-breath, and “dho” with the out, at the same time counting your breaths: “Bud-” in, “dho” out, one; “bud-” in, “dho” out, two; “bud-” in “dho” out, three, and so on up to ten.
Then start counting again from one to nine; then one to eight, one to seven… six… five… four… three… two… one… zero.
In other words:
Keep three points — the breath, your mindfulness, and your awareness — together in a single stream.
If when you've finished counting you find that your mind still won't stay with the breath, start by counting again, from one to ten and so on to zero.
Keep this up until you feel that your mind has settled down, and then stay with zero.
In other words, you no longer have to count, you no longer have to think “Buddho.” Simply keep careful watch over your breath and your awareness.
Keep your awareness focused on a single point, being mindful and watchful.
Don't send it in and out after the breath.
When the breath comes in, you know.
When it goes out, you know, but don't make your awareness go in or out.
Keep it neutral and still.
Keep watch only on the present.
When you can do this, the five Hindrances won't be able to find entry into the mind.
This is called “parikamma bhavana,” repetition meditation.
At this point, the mind becomes light and can put aside its heavy burdens.
When the mind is light, so is the body.
In Pali this is called, “kaya-lahuta, citta-lahuta.” The mind is peaceful and solitary — free from agitation and unrest — clear and calm with the refined sense of the breath.
When the mind reaches this state, it's in the sphere of directed thought, which is the first factor of jhana.
Now survey and examine the characteristics of the breath.
Try adjusting the breath in four different ways: Breathe in long and out long, and see whether your mind is at ease with that sort of breath.
Then breathe in short and out short to see whether you feel comfortable and at ease that way.
Then see whether you feel at ease breathing in long and out short, or in short and out long.
Continue breathing in whichever of these four ways feels most comfortable and then let that comfortable breath spread throughout the different parts of the body.
At the same time, expand your sense of mindful awareness along with the breath.
When the breath runs throughout the body, and the sensations of breath in the various parts of the body are coordinated, they can be put to use, for example, to relieve feelings of pain.
Your sense of mindfulness at this point is broad; your alertness, complete and mature.
When mindfulness is spread throughout the body, this is called kayagatasati — mindfulness immersed in the body.
Your frame of reference is large and expansive, and so is called “mahasatipatthana.” Your alertness is present throughout, aware both of the causes — i.e., what you're doing — and of the results coming from what you've done.
All of these characteristics are aspects of evaluation, the second factor of jhana.
Now that the body and mind have received nourishment — in other words, now that the breath has provided for the body, and mindfulness has provided for the mind — both body and mind are bound to reap results, i.e., rapture.
The body is full and refreshed, free from restlessness.
The mind is full and refreshed, free from anxiety and distraction, broad and blooming.
This is called rapture, which is the third factor of jhana.
Once fullness arises in this way, body and mind settle down and are still.
In Pali this is termed “kaya-passaddhi, citta-passaddhi.” This feeling of stillness leads to a sense of relaxation and ease for both body and mind, termed pleasure.
These are the beginning steps in dealing with the mind.
Once you are able to follow them, you should make a point of practicing them repeatedly, back and forth, until you're skilled at entering concentration, staying in place, and withdrawing.
Even just this much can form a path along which the mind can then progress, for it has to some extent already reached the level of upacara bhavana, threshold concentration.
These include: the tip of the nose; the middle of the head; the palate; the base of the throat; the tip of the breastbone; the “center,” two inches above the navel.
In centering the breath at any of these points, people who tend to have headaches shouldn't focus on any point above the base of the throat.
Coordinate the various aspects of breath in the body, such as the up-flowing breath, the down-flowing breath, the breath flowing in the stomach, the breath flowing in the intestines, the breath flowing along every part of the body, hot breath, cool breath, warm breath: Mesh these various sorts of breath so that they're balanced, even, and just right, so as to give rise to a sense of ease and comfort throughout the body.
The purpose of examining and coordinating the breath is to expand your sense of mindfulness and awareness so that they are sensitive throughout the entire body.
This will then benefit both body and mind.
The enlarged sense of the body is termed mahabhuta-rupa; expanded awareness is termed mahaggatam cittam.
This sense of awareness will then go on to reap the benefits of its beauty that will arise in various ways, leading it to the level of appana bhavana, fixed penetration.
The characteristics of the in-and-out breath, as they interact with the properties of the body, can cause the properties of water and earth to be affected as follows:
There are three types of blood in the human body:
These different types of blood, as they nourish the nerves in the body, can cause people to have different tendencies:
Warm breath can cause a person to have moderate tendencies as far as affection is concerned, but strong tendencies toward a quick and violent temper — tendencies associated with anger.
Cool breath causes weak tendencies toward affection, but strong tendencies toward greed, craving material objects more than anything else.
If we know clearly which physical properties are aggravating greed, anger, or delusion, we can destroy the corresponding properties and these states of mind will weaken on their own.
“Remove the fuel, and the fire won't blaze.
To adjust these properties skillfully gives rise to discernment, which lies at the essence of being skillful.
Adjust the property of warmth so that the blood is clear and light red, and your discernment will be quick, your nerves healthy, your thinking perceptive, subtle, and deep.
In other words, to make heavier use of the nerves in the physical heart is the way of the Dhamma.
As for the nerves of the brain, to use them a great deal leads to restlessness, distraction, and heavy defilements.
These are just a few of the issues related to the breath.
There are many, many more, that people of discernment should discover on their own.
Ñana-dhatu-vijja: knowledge of the subtleties of all elements, the pre-eminent qualities, the six sense media; acute insight into the qualities of the mind; expertise in concentration.
Concentration gives rise to liberating insight, acquaintance with the process of fashioning;
These are of two sorts:
Images of either sort can appear at certain mental moments or with certain people.
When the mind becomes still, uggaha nimittas can appear in either of two ways:
Uggaha nimittas of both sorts can be either beneficial or harmful, true or false, so we shouldn't place complete trust in them.
If we're thoroughly mindful and alert, they can be beneficial.
But if our powers of reference are weak or if we lack strength of mind, we're likely to follow the drift of whatever images appear, sometimes losing our bearings to the point where we latch on to the images as being real.
Uggaha nimittas are of two sorts:
b.
Thought-images: When the breath is subtle and the mind is still and unoccupied, things can occur to it.
Sometimes we may think of a question and then immediately know the answer.
Sometimes we don't even have to think: The knowledge pops into the mind on its own.
Things of this sort are also classed as uggaha nimittas.
Sometimes they may be true, sometimes false, sometimes mixed.
You can't trust them to be absolutely true.
Sometimes they're true, and that truth is what leads us to fall for them.
For example, they may be true about three things and false about seven.
Once we've placed our confidence in them, even the false things will appear true to us.
This is one way of giving rise to the corruptions of insight.
So when sensation-images or thought-images arise in one way or another, you should then practice adjusting and analyzing them.
In other words, when a visual image arises, if it's large, make it small, far, near, large, small, appear, and disappear.
Analyze it into its various parts and then let it go.
Don't let these images influence the mind.
Instead, have the mind influence the images, as you will.
If you aren't able to do this, then don't get involved with them.
Disregard them and return to your original practice with the breath.
If a thought-image arises by way of the mind, stop, take your bearings, and consider exactly how much truth there is to the knowledge it gives.
Even if it's true, you shouldn't latch onto what you know or see.
If you latch onto your knowledge, it'll become a corruption of insight.
If you latch on to your views, they'll become a form of attachment and conceit, in which you assume yourself to be this or that.
Thus, you should let go of these things, in line with their true nature.
If you aren't wise to them, they can skew your practice so that you miss out on the highest good.
Ñana: knowledge enabling you to know in an uncanny way things you never before knew, such as pubbenivasanussati-ñana, the ability to remember previous lifetimes.
Even knowledge of this sort, though, can mislead you.
If you learn good things about your past, you may get pleased.
If you learn bad or undesirable things about your past, you may get displeased.
Cutupapata-ñana: Sometimes you may learn how people and other living beings die and are reborn — knowing, for instance, where they are reborn when they have died from this world — which can cause you to become engrossed in the various things you come to know and see.
As you become more and more engrossed, false knowledge can step in, and yet you still assume it to be true.
Piti: a sense of physical and mental fullness and satisfaction, full to the point of infatuation — physically satisfied to the point where you don't feel hunger or thirst, heat or cold; mentally satisfied to the point where you become engrossed and oblivious, lazy and lethargic, perhaps deciding that you've already achieved the goal.
What's actually happened is that you've swallowed your mood down whole.
Passaddhi: The body is at peace and the mind serene, to the point where you don't want to encounter anything in the world.
You see the world as being unpeaceful and you don't want to have anything to do with it.
Actually, if the mind is really at peace, everything in the world will also be at peace.
People who are addicted to a sense of peace won't want to do any physical work or even think about anything, because they're stuck on that sense of peace as a constant preoccupation.
Sukha: Once there's peace, there's a sense of physical and mental pleasure and ease; and once there's a great deal of pleasure, you come to hate pain, seeing pleasure as something good and pain as something bad.
Your view of things falls into two parts.
Pain is the same thing as pleasure: When pleasure arises, pain is its shadow; when pain arise, pleasure is its shadow.
As long as you don't understand this, you give rise to a kind of defilement — again, you swallow your mood down whole.
When a deep and arresting sense of relaxation, stillness, ease, or freedom from disturbance arises, you get engrossed in that feeling.
What has happened is that you're simply stuck on a pleasing mental state.
Adhimokkha: being disposed to believing that your knowledge and the things you know are true.
Once “true” takes a stance, “false” is bound to enter the picture.
True and false go together, i.e., they're one and the same thing.
For example, suppose we ask, “Is Nai Daeng at home?” and someone answers, “No, he isn't.” If Nai Daeng really exists and he's really at home, then when that person says, “He's not at home,” he's lying.
But if Nai Daeng doesn't exist, that person can't lie.
Thus, true and false are one and the same…
Paggaha: excessive persistence, leading to restlessness.
You're simply fastened on your preoccupation and too strongly focused on your goal…
Upatthana: being obsessed with a particular item you've come to know or see, refusing to let it go.
Upekkha: indifference, not wanting to meet with anything, be aware of anything, think about anything, or figure anything out; assuming that you've let go completely.
Actually, though, this is a misunderstanding of that very mental moment.
Nikanti: being content with your various preoccupations, simply attached to the things you experience or see.
All of these things, if we aren't wise to them, can corrupt the heart.
So, as meditators, we should attend to them and reflect on them until we understand them thoroughly.
Only then will we be able to give rise to liberating insight, clear knowledge of the four truths:
The factors that enable these forms of stress to arise are three:
b.
Bhava-tanha: desire for things to be this way or that at times when they can't be the way we want them; wanting things to be a certain way outside of the proper time or occasion.
This is called “being hungry” — like a person who hungers for food but has no food to eat and so acts in a way that shows, “I'm a person who wants to eat.” Bhava-tanha is another factor that enables stress to arise.

c.
Vibhava-tanha: not wanting things to be this way or that, e.g., having been born, not wanting to die; not wanting to be deprived of the worldly things we've acquired: for example, having status and wealth and yet not wanting our status and wealth to leave us.
The truth of the matter is that there's no way it can be avoided.
As soon as the change comes, we thus feel stress and pain.

Different states of becoming arise first in the mind, then giving rise to birth.
Thus, people of discernment let go of these things, causing:
Nirodha — cessation or disbanding — to appear in the heart.
In other words, the mind discovers the limits of craving and lets it go through the practice of insight meditation, letting go of all fashionings, both good and bad.
To be able to let go in this way, we have to develop:
Magga — the Path — so as to make it powerful.
In other words, we have to give rise to pure discernment within our own minds so that we can know the truth.
Stress is a truth; its cause is a truth; its cessation and the Path are truths: To know in this way is liberating insight.
And then when we let all four truths fall away from us so that we gain release from “true,” that's when we'll reach deathlessness.
Truths have their drawbacks in that untrue things are mixed in with them.
Wherever real money exists, there's bound to be counterfeit.
Wherever there are rich people, there are bound to be thieves waiting to rob them.
This is why release has to let go of truths before it can reach nibbana.
Meditators, then, should acquaint themselves with the enemies of concentration, so as to keep their distance from all five of the Hindrances, the two sorts of uggaha nimittas, and the ten corruptions of insight.
The mind will then be able to gain release from all things defiling, dirty, and damp.
What this means is that the mind doesn't hold onto anything at all.
It lets go of supposings, meanings, practice, and attainment.
Above cause and beyond effect: That's the aim of the Buddha's teachings.
Those who want to get rid of kama-tanha — desire and attraction for the six types of sensory objects — have to develop virtue that's pure all the way to the heart: This is termed heightened virtue.
Those who are to get rid of bhava-tanha — thoughts that stray out, choosing objects to dwell on — first have to develop Right Concentration, pure and circumspect: This is termed heightened mind.
Those who are to get rid of vibhava-tanha — attachment to knowledge and viewpoints, attainments and states of becoming, theories and conceits — will first have to develop clear-seeing discernment, cognitive skill that's pure and fully developed: This is heightened discernment.
Thus, the threefold training — virtue, concentration, and discernment — is a group of truths that can let go of the causes of stress.
Other than this, there's no way to release.
I.e., keep death in mind.
This is where the mind advances to the development of liberating insight, taking death as its theme.
“Death” here refers to the death occurring in the present — physical sensations arising and passing away, mental acts arising and passing away, all in a moment of awareness.
Only when you're aware on this level can you be classed as being mindful of death.
Now that we've brought up the topic of death, we have to reflect on birth, seeing how many ways sensations are born and how many ways mental acts are born.
This is something a person with a quiet mind can know.
A.
Sensations have up to five levels of refinement:
Panita-rupa: exquisite sensations that make the body feel pleasurable, light, and refined.
Focus on what causes them until they disappear…
Sukhumala-rupa: delicate sensations, tender, yielding, and agile.
When they arise, focus on what causes them until they disappear.
Olarika-rupa: physical sensations that give a sense of grandeur, exuberance, brightness, and exultation: “Mukhavanno vipassidati.” When they arise, focus on finding out what causes them until they disappear…
All four of these sensations arise and disband by their very nature; and it's possible to find out where they first appear.
An explanation of this sort of sensation: When the mind is quiet and steadily concentrated, it has the power to create images in the imagination.
Whatever images it thinks of will then appear to it; and once they appear, the mind tends to enter into them and take up residence.
If the mind fastens onto these sensations, it is said to take birth — simply because it has no sense of death.
These sensations can appear in any of five ways:
b.
arising from thoughts imbued with greed, hatred, or delusion — arising, taking a stance, and then disbanding;
c.
arising with an in-breath and disbanding with the following out-breath;
d.
arising from the cleansing of the blood in the lungs — appearing and disbanding in a single instant;
e.
arising from the heart's pumping blood into the various parts of the body, the pressure of the blood causing sensations to arise that correspond to sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations.
Sensations of this sort are arising and disbanding every moment.
Another class of sensation is termed “gocara-rupa” — sensations that circle around the physical body.
There are five sorts — light, sound, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations — each having five levels.
For instance, common light travels slowly; in the flash of an eye it runs for a league and then dies away.
The second level, subtle light, goes further; and the third level goes further still.
The fourth and fifth levels can travel the entire universe.
The same holds true for sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations.
The relationships between all the potentials in the universe are interacting at every moment, differing only as to whether they're fast or slow.
This is the inequality that has been termed “anicca-lakkhana” — inherent inconstancy.
Whoever is ignorant is bound to think that all this is impossible, but actually this is the way things already are by their nature.
We'll come to know this through vijja — cognitive skill — not through ordinary labels and concepts.
This is called true knowing, which meditators who develop the inner eye will realize for themselves: knowing the arising of these sensations, their persisting and their disbanding, in terms of their primary qualities and basic regularity.
B.
As for mental acts that arise and die, their timespan is many thousands of times faster than that of sensations.
To be able to keep track of their arising and dying away, our awareness has to be still.
The four kinds of mental acts are:
— Sañña: recognizing and labeling the objects of the mind.
— Sankhara: mental fabrications or fashionings of good and bad.
— Viññana: distinct consciousness or cognizance of objects.
One class of these mental acts stays in place, arising and disbanding with reference to the immediate present.
Another class is termed “gocara vedana” “gocara sañña,” etc., which go out to refer to the world.
Each of these has five levels, differing as to whether they're common, refined, or subtle, slow or fast.
These five levels connect with each other, running out in stages, and then circling back to their starting point, disbanding and then arising again — all without end.
When we don't have the skill to discern the primary sensations and mental acts that stay in place, we can't see into the “gocara” sensations and mental acts that go flowing around.
This is termed “avijja,” the unawareness that opens the way for connecting consciousness, giving rise to the act of fashioning, which is the essence of kamma.
This gives fruit as sensations and feelings that are followed by craving, and then the act of labeling, which gives rise to another level of consciousness — of sensory objects — and then the cycle goes circling on.
This is termed the “khandha-vatta,” the cycle of the aggregates, circling and changing unevenly and inconsistently.
To see this is called aniccanupassana-ñana, the knowledge that keeps track of inconstancy as it occurs.
This is known through the inner eye, i.e., the skill of genuine discernment.
Thus, those who practice the exercises of insight meditation should use their sensitivities and circumspection to the full if they hope to gain release from unawareness.
Fashionings, in this context, are like waves on the ocean.
If we're out in a boat on the ocean when the waves are high, our vision is curtailed.
Our senses of hearing, smell, taste, touch, and ideation are all curtailed.
We won't be able to perceive far into the distance.
What this means is that when our minds are immersed in the Hindrances, we won't be able to perceive death at all.
But once we've been able to suppress the Hindrances, it's like taking a boat across the ocean when there are no waves.
We'll be able to see objects far in the distance.
Our eyes will be clear-seeing, our ears clear-hearing, our senses of smell, taste, touch and ideation will be broad and wide open.
The water will be clear, and the light brilliant.
We'll be able to know all around us.
In the same way, those who are to know death clearly have to begin by practicing concentration as a foundation for developing liberating insight.
How do the five sorts of above-mentioned sensation arise?
What are their causes?
How do they disappear?
How do physical and mental feelings arise?
How do they disappear?
What are their causes?
How do labels and concepts arise?
What are their causes?
How do they disappear?
How do mental fashionings arise?
What are their causes?
How do they disappear?
How does consciousness arise by way of the senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, touch, and ideation?
What are its causes?
How does it disappear?
Altogether there are four levels to each of the five aggregates: external and internal, staying in place and streaming outward.
These can be known at all times, but only people who have the discernment that comes from training the mind in tranquillity and insight meditation will be able to know death on this level.
The discernment that arises in this way has been termed pubbenivasanussati-ñana, i.e., understanding past sensations, future sensations, and sensations in the present.
These sensations differ in the way they arise and pass away.
To know this is to have mastered one cognitive skill.
Cutupapata-ñana: With discernment of this sort, we're able to keep track of the states of our own mind as they arise and disappear, sometimes good as they arise and good as they disappear, sometimes bad as they arise and bad as they disappear, sometimes good as they arise and bad as they disappear, sometimes bad as they arise and good as they disappear.
To be able to keep track in this way is to know states of being and birth.
Asavakkhaya-ñana: When the discernment of this skill arises, it leads to disenchantment with the way sensations and mental acts arise and disappear and then arise again, simply circling about: coarser sensations going through the cycle slowly, more refined sensations going quickly; coarser mental acts going slowly, more refined mental acts going quickly.
When you can keep track of this, you know one form of stress.
Now focus attention back on your own mind to see whether or not it's neutral at that moment.
If the mind approves of its knowledge or of the things it knows, that's kamasukhallikanuyoga — indulgence in pleasure.
If the mind disapproves of its knowledge or of the things it knows, that's attakilamathanuyoga, indulgence in self-infliction.
Once you've seen this, make the mind neutral toward whatever it may know: That moment of awareness is the mental state forming the Path.
When the Path arises, the causes of stress disband.
Try your best to keep that mental state going.
Follow that train of awareness as much as you can.
The mind when it's in that state is said to be developing the Path — and at whatever moment the Path stands firm, disbanding and relinquishing occur.
When you can do this, you reach the level where you know death clearly.
People who know death in this way are then able to reduce the number of their own deaths.
Some of the Noble Ones have seven more deaths ahead of them, some have only one more, others go beyond death entirely.
These Noble Ones are people who understand birth and death, and for this reason have only a few deaths left to them.
Ordinary people who understand their own birth and death on this level are hard to find.
Common, ordinary birth and death aren't especially necessary; but people who don't understand the Dhamma have to put up with birth and death as a common thing.
So whoever is to know death on this level will have to develop the cognitive skill that comes from training the mind.
The skill, here, is knowing which preoccupations of the mind are in the past, which are in the future, and which are in the present.
This is cognitive skill.
Letting go of the past, letting go of the future, letting go of the present, not latching onto anything at all: This is purity and release.
As for unawareness, it's the exact opposite, i.e., not knowing what's past, not knowing what's future, not knowing what's present — that is, the arising and falling away of sensations and mental acts, or body and mind — or at most knowing only on the level of labels and concepts remembered from what other people have said, not knowing on the level of awareness that we've developed on our own.
All of this is classed as avijja, or unawareness.
No matter how much we may use words of wisdom and discernment, it still won't gain us release.
For instance, we may know that things are inconstant, but we still fall for inconstant things.
We may know about things that are stressful, but we still fall for them.
We may know that things are not-self, but we still fall for things that are not-self.
Our knowledge of inconstancy, stress, and not-self isn't true.
Then how are these things truly known?
Like this:
“Knowing both sides” means knowing what's constant and what's inconstant, what's stress and what's ease, what's not-self and what's self.
“Letting go both ways” means not latching onto things that are constant or inconstant, not latching onto stress or ease, not latching onto self or not-self.
“Shedding everything” means not holding onto past, present, or future: Awareness doesn't head forward or back, and yet you can't say that it's taking a stance.
“Simply mindful and aware, the mind remains independent, not attached to anything in the world.
There are three sets of results arising from the practice.
Cutupapata-ñana: the ability to know how the living beings of the world die and are reborn.
Asavakkhaya-ñana: understanding how to put an end to the defilements of the heart.
Manomayiddhi: psychic power, making things appear in line with your thoughts — for example, thinking of a visual image that then appears to the physical eye.
Those who are to develop this skill must first become expert at uggaha nimittas.
Iddhividhi: the ability to change such images as you like.
Those who are to develop this skill must first become expert in patibhaga nimittas.
Dibbacakkhu: clairvoyance, the ability to see great distances.
Only people with good optic nerves — and who understand how to adjust the physical properties in the body so as to keep the nerves charged and awake — will be able to develop this skill.
Dibbasota: clairaudience, the ability to hear sounds at great distances.
Only people whose auditory nerves are good — and who understand how to adjust the properties in the body so that they act as a conducting medium — will be able to develop this skill.
Cetopariya-ñana: knowing the thoughts and mental states of other people.
To do this, you first have to adjust the fluids nourishing your heart muscles so that they're clean and pure.
Pubbenivasanussati-ñana: the ability to remember previous lives, knowing by means of mental images or intuitive verbal knowledge.
To remember past lives, you first have to understand how to interchange the physical properties in the body.
Asavakkhaya-ñana: knowing the causes for mental defilement; knowing the means for putting an end to mental fermentations.
Dhamma-patisambhida-ñana: acumen — acquired by means of your own heart — with regard to all fashioned properties and qualities.
Nirutti-patisambhida-ñana: the ability to understand by means of the heart the affairs and languages of people and other living beings in the world.
Patibhana-patisambhida-ñana: the intuitive ability to respond promptly and aptly in situations where you're called on to speak; the ability to respond to an opponent without having to think: Simply by focusing the mind heavily down, the right response will appear on its own, just as a flashlight gives off light immediately as we press the switch.
Taken together, all of these skills arise exclusively from training the heart and are called bhavana-maya-pañña — discernment developed through training the mind.
They can't be taught.
You have to know them on your own.
Thus, they can be called paccatta-vijja, personal skills.
If you're astute enough, they can all become transcendent.
If not, they all become mundane.
Thus, the principles of discernment are two:
Mundane discernment: studying and memorizing a great deal, thinking and evaluating a great deal, and then understanding on the common level of labels and concepts.
Transcendent discernment: knowledge that comes from practicing Right Concentration; intuitive understanding that arises naturally on its own within the heart, beyond the scope of the world; clear insight; release from all views, conceits, defilements, and fermentations of the mind.
Upakara dhamma.
There are three sets of qualities that are of help in giving rise to cognitive skill.
Indriya-sanvara: being constantly mindful of the six “gateways” — the senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, touch, and ideation — making sure they don't give rise to anything that would disturb your own peace or that of others.
Bhojane mattannuta: having a sense of moderation in the amount of food you eat — not too much, not too little, eating only food that's compatible with your physical make-up; making sure that it's light food: Otherwise, you'll have to eat only half-full or on the small side.
As far as food is concerned, if you can get by on only one meal a day, you'll find it much easier to train the mind.
There are three ways of eating:
b.
Eating just enough to keep the body going.
This is termed “being content with what you have.
Eating no more than half full.
This is termed “being a person of few wants,” who has no worries associated with food and whose body weighs lightly.
Just as a tree with light heartwood won't sink when it falls in the water, so the meditation of such a person is not inclined to lead to anything low.
The senses of such a person — the nerves of the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and body — tend toward peacefulness and are well-suited for helping the mind to attain peace.
Jagariyanuyoga: awakening the physical properties of the body by developing the factor that fashions the body, i.e., adjusting the in-and-out breath so that it's thoroughly beneficial to the properties of earth, water, wind, and fire within the body.
This is termed developing mindfulness immersed in the body, as in the verse:
“The disciples of the Buddha Gotama are always well alert, their mindfulness constantly, by day and by night, immersed in the body”… their mindfulness charging the body whether their eyes are open or closed.
At the same time, we have to understand how to keep the mind wide awake through developing jhana, starting with directed thought, evaluation, rapture, pleasure, and singleness of object.
The mind will then awaken from its forgetfulness.
With regard to forgetfulness, the Buddha taught that when the mind gets drawn in by its objects, it faints for a spell.
If this happens often enough to become a habit, it gives rise to delusion, leaving us no way to give rise to the discernment of liberating insight.
Hiri: inner shame at the thought of doing evil, not daring to do evil either openly or secretly, because we realize that there are no secret places in the world.
Even if other people don't see us doing evil, we ourselves are sure to see.
Ottappa: fear of evil, not being attracted to the idea of doing evil; viewing bad kamma as a poisonous cobra raising its head and spreading its hood, and thus not daring to go near.
Bahusacca: studying and training yourself constantly, seeking advice from those who are knowledgeable and expert in the practice.
Don't associate with people who have no knowledge of the matters in which you are interested.
Viriya: persistence in abandoning the defilements of the mind — i.e., the Hindrances; perseverance in giving rise to good within the mind by developing such things as the first jhana.
Briefly put, there are three ways to do this: being persistent in giving rise to the good, in maintaining the good, and in constantly developing the good that has already arisen.
Satipatthana: giving your powers of reference a frame and a focal point by developing mindfulness immersed in the body or mindfulness of breathing, etc.
Pañña: discernment; circumspection that's all-encompassing and fully reasonable in doing good, in maintaining the good, and in using the good so as to be of benefit at large — for low-level benefits, intermediate benefits, and ultimate benefits, with regard to this life, lives to come, and the ultimate benefit, nibbana.
This is what is meant by discernment.
The second jhana.
Directed thought and evaluation disappear; awareness settles in on its sense of ease and rapture.
The body is relaxed, the mind quiet and serene.
The body feels full, like the earth saturated with rain water to the point where puddles form.
The mind feels brighter and clearer.
As awareness focuses more heavily on its one object, it expands itself even further, letting go of the sense of rapture and entering the third jhana.
The third jhana has two factors:
b.
Ekaggatarammana: Awareness is firm and fixed in a snug fit with its object.
As it focuses strongly and forcibly expands itself, a bright sense of light appears.
The mind seems much more open and blooming than before.
As you focus in with complete mindfulness and alertness, the sense of pleasure begins to waver, and as the mind adjusts its focus slightly it enters the fourth jhana.
The fourth jhana has two factors:
b.
Ekaggatarammana: The mind is solitary, its mindfulness full and bright — as if you were sitting in a brightly-lit, empty room with your work finished, free to relax as you like.
The mind rests, its energy strong and expansive.
Now withdraw from this level back out to the first and then enter in again.
As you do this repeatedly, liberating insight will arise on its own, just like a light connected to a battery: When we press down on the switch, the light flashes out on its own.
And then we can use whatever color of bulb we want and put it to use in whatever way we like, depending on our own skill and ingenuity.
In other words, the skills mentioned above will appear.
People who develop jhana fall into three classes:
Those who develop jhana to the fourth level, there gaining liberating insight into the Noble Truths, are said to excel in conviction.
They develop a moderate number of skills, and their Awakening occurs at a moderate rate.
Their release is the first level of ceto-vimutti, release through concentration.
Those who become skilled at the four levels of jhana — adept at entering, staying in place, and withdrawing — and then go all the way to the four levels of arupa-jhana, after which they withdraw back to the first jhana, over and over again, until finally intuitive knowledge, the cognitive skills, and liberating discernment arise, giving release from mental fermentation and defilement: These people are said to excel in persistence.
People who practice jhana a great deal, developing strong energy and bright inner light, can Awaken suddenly in a single mental instant, as soon as discernment first arises.
Their release is cetopariyavimutti, release through mastery of concentration.
These are the results to be gained by meditators.
But there have to be causes — our own actions — before the results can come fully developed.
The “Seven Important Sets of Principles” listed in the prologue to Basic Themes are common to all schools of Buddhism.
In the Pali canon they appear in a number of discourses as the Buddha's own summary of the essential points of his teaching.
Many of these principles are discussed in connection with various aspects of the practice at different points in this book.
What follows is a selection of excerpts from Ajaan Lee's other writings and talks dealing with these principles as they relate directly to the practice of keeping the breath in mind.
The four frames of reference when we sit in meditation: The breath is “body”; comfort and discomfort are “feeling”; purity and clarity are states of “mind”; and steadiness of mind is “mental quality.
Chanda: being content to focus on the breath.
Viriya: trying to adjust the breath so that it's comfortable.
Citta: paying attention to how the breath is flowing.
Vimansa: knowing how to use the breath to benefit every part of the body.
If we follow these four “paths to success,” they will lead us to liberating insight.
In order to divest our hearts of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, etc., we have to develop concentration, which is composed of seven basic qualities:
Dhamma-vicaya-sambojjhanga: We let the breath spread throughout the body, making an enlarged frame of reference.
We know how to adjust, improve, choose, and use our breaths so that they give us comfort.
We throw out whichever breaths are harmful and foster whichever ones are beneficial.
Viriya-sambojjhanga: We don't abandon or forget the breath.
We stick with it, and it sticks with us as we keep warding the Hindrances from the heart.
We don't fasten on or become involved with distracting perceptions.
We keep trying to make our stillness of mind stronger and stronger.
Piti-sambojjhanga: When the mind is quiet, the breath is full and refreshing.
We are free from the Hindrances and from every sort of restlessness, like a white cloth that's spotlessly clean.
When the mind is clear in this way, it feels nothing but comfort and fullness, which gives rise to a sense of satisfaction, termed “rapture.
Passaddhi-sambojjhanga: The breath is solid throughout the body.
The elements are at peace, and so is the mind.
Nothing feels troublesome or aroused.
Samadhi-sambojjhanga: The breath is firm, steady, and unwavering.
The mind takes a firm stance in a single preoccupation.
Upekkha-sambojjhanga: When body, feelings, mind, and mental qualities are fully snug with one another in these two types of breath — when the mind stays with these aspects of the breath — it doesn't have to fashion anything at all.
It doesn't latch onto any manifestation of good or bad.
Neutral and unperturbed, it doesn't approve or disapprove of anything.
When mindfulness saturates the body the way flame saturates every thread in the mantle of a Coleman lantern, the elements throughout the body work together like a group of people working together on a job: Each person helps a little here and there, and in no time at all — almost effortlessly — the job is done.
Just as the mantle of a Coleman lantern whose every thread is soaked in flame becomes light, white, and dazzling, so if you soak your mind in mindfulness until it's aware of the entire body, both the body and mind become buoyant.
When you think using the power of mindfulness, your sense of the body will immediately become thoroughly bright, helping to develop both body and mind.
You'll be able to sit or stand for long periods of time without getting tired, to walk for great distances without getting fatigued, to go for unusually long periods of time on just a little food without getting hungry, or to go without food and sleep altogether for several days running without losing energy.
As for the heart, it will become pure, open, and free from blemish.
The mind will become bright, energetic, and strong.
Saddha-balam: Your conviction will run like a car running without stop along the road.
Viriya-balam: Your persistence will accelerate and advance.
Sati-balam: Your mindfulness will be robust and vigorous.
Samadhi-balam: Your concentration will become unwavering and resilient.
No activity will be able to kill it.
In other words, no matter what you're doing — sitting, standing, walking, talking, whatever — as soon as you think of practicing concentration, your mind will immediately be centered.
Whenever you want it, just think of it and you have it.
When your concentration is this powerful, insight meditation is no problem.
Pañña-balam: Your discernment will be like a double-edged sword: Your discernment of what's outside will be sharp; your discernment of what's inside will be sharp.
When these five strengths appear in the heart, the heart will be fully mature.
Your conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, and discernment will all be mature and pre-eminent in their own spheres.
It's the nature of mature adults that they cooperate.
When they work together on a job, they finish it.
So it is when you have these five adults working together for you: You'll be able to complete any task.
Your mind will have the power to demolish every defilement in the heart, just as a nuclear bomb can demolish anything anywhere in the world.
When your concentration has strength, it gives rise to discernment: the ability to see stress, its cause, its disbanding, and the Path to its disbanding, all clearly within the breath.
We can explain this as follows: The in-and-out breath is stress — the in-breath the stress of arising, the out-breath the stress of passing away.
Not being aware of the breath as it goes in and out, not knowing the characteristics of the breath: This is the cause of stress.
Knowing when the breath is coming in, knowing when it's going out, knowing its characteristics clearly — i.e., keeping your views in line with the truth of the breath: This is Right View, part of the Noble Path.
Knowing which ways of breathing are uncomfortable, knowing how to vary the breath; knowing, “That way of breathing is uncomfortable; we'll have to breathe like this in order to feel at ease”: This is Right Intention.
The mental factors that think about and properly evaluate all aspects of the breath are Right Speech.
Knowing various ways of improving the breath; breathing, for example, in long and out long, in short and out short, in short and out long, in long and out short, until you come across the breath that's most comfortable for you: This is Right Action.
Knowing how to use the breath to purify the blood, how to let this purified blood nourish the heart muscles, how to adjust the breath so that it eases the body and soothes the mind, how to breathe so that you feel full and refreshed in body and mind: This is Right Livelihood.
Trying to adjust the breath so that it comforts the body and mind, and to keep trying as long as you aren't fully at ease: This is Right Effort.
Being mindful of the in-and-out breath at all times, knowing the various aspects of the breath — the up-flowing breath, the down-flowing breath, the breath in the stomach, the breath in the intestines, the breath flowing along the muscles and out to every pore — keeping track of these things with every in-and-out breath: This is Right Mindfulness.
A mind intent only on matters of the breath, not pulling any other objects in to interfere, until the breath is refined, giving rise to fixed absorption and then liberating insight: This is Right Concentration.
When all of these aspects of the Noble Path — virtue, concentration, and discernment — are brought together fully mature within the heart, you gain insight into all aspects of the breath, knowing that, “Breathing this way gives rise to good mental states; breathing that way gives rise to bad mental states.” You let go of the factors — i.e., the breath in all its aspects — that fashion the body, the factors that fashion speech, the factors that fashion the mind, whether good or bad, letting them be as they truly are, in line with their own inherent nature: This is the disbanding of stress.
Apaya: States of deprivation, i.e., the four lower realms of existence: rebirth in hell, as a hungry ghost, as an angry demon, or as a common animal.
In Buddhism, none of these states are regarded as eternal conditions.
Arahant: A “worthy one” or “pure one,” i.e., a person whose heart no longer has any defilements and is thus not destined for further rebirth.
A title for the Buddha and the highest level of his Noble Disciples.
Ariyadhana: “Noble Wealth,” i.e., qualities that serve as “capital” in the quest for liberation: conviction, virtue, conscience, fear of evil, erudition, generosity, and discernment.
Ayatana: Sense media, i.e., the six senses and their corresponding objects.
Bhavanga: The mind's underlying preoccupation or resting state, which determines its state of being and to which it reverts in between its responses to stimuli.
Brahma: An inhabitant of the higher heavens, a position earned — but not forever — through the cultivation of virtue and meditative absorption, along with the attitudes of limitless love, compassion, appreciation, and equanimity.
Dhamma: Event; phenomenon; the way things are in and of themselves; quality — both in its neutral and in its positive senses: the basic qualities into which natural phenomena — mental and physical — can be analyzed; the terms in which things are known by the sense of ideation.
Also, any teaching that analyzes phenomena into their basic terms.
This is one sense in which the Buddha's doctrine is his “Dhamma.” The quality of one's heart and mind, as manifest by the rectitude, fairness, compassion, composure, discernment, etc., revealed in one's actions.
The manifestations can be enumerated and prescribed as principles that can then be put into practice and developed as means of removing shoddiness from the heart so that its genuine, unchanging quality can become fully apparent from within: This is the Buddha's Dhamma in its ultimate sense.
Dhatu: Element, property, potential.
Basic forces that, when aroused out of their latent state, cause activity on the physical or psychological level.
In traditional Thai physics, which is based on the physics of the Pali canon, the four dhatu of earth, water, fire, and wind are said to permeate all matter in latent or potential form.
To become manifest, they have to be aroused.
Thus, for example, the act of starting a fire is explained as the arousal of the fire-dhatu, which already exists in the air and in the object to be ignited.
Once this is “seized,” it clings to the fuel, and the object will be on fire.
The fire will continue burning as long as tejas has sustenance to cling to.
When it runs out of sustenance or is forced to let go, it will grow quiet — returning to its normal, latent state — and the individual fire will go out.
On the level of the human body, diseases are explained as resulting from the aggravation or imbalance of any of these four physical properties.
Diseases are classified by how they feel: Fevers are attributed to the fire property, dizziness and faintness to the wind property, constipation to the earth property, etc.
Well-being is defined as a state in which none of these properties is dominant.
All are quiet, unaroused, balanced and still.
There are a number of lists of dhatus given in the Pali canon.
The six dhatus are the four physical properties plus space and consciousness.
The dhatus are the six senses, their respective objects, and the acts of consciousness associated with each.
Gotarabhu-ñana: “Change of lineage knowledge” — the glimpse of nibbana that changes one from an ordinary, run-of-the-mill person to a Noble One.
This is also classed as “ñana-dassana visuddhi,” purity of knowledge and vision.
Indra: King of the gods in the sensual heavens.
Indriya: Pre-eminent or dominating qualities.
The qualities that can dominate consciousness are: the senses of vision, hearing, smell, taste, touch, ideation; femininity, masculinity, life; pleasure, pain, joy, sorrow, equanimity; conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, discernment; the realization that “I shall come to know the unknown,” final knowledge, the state of final-knower.
Jhana: Absorption in a single object or preoccupation.
Rupa-jhana refers to absorption in a physical sensation; arupa-jhana, to absorption in a mental notion or state.
When Ajaan Lee uses the term “jhana” by itself, he is usually referring to rupa-jhana.
Kamma: Acts of intention that result in states of being and birth.
Kammapatha: Ten guidelines for moral conduct — not killing, not stealing, not engaging in sexual misconduct, not lying, not speaking divisively, not using coarse or vulgar language, not speaking idly, not coveting, not harboring anger, holding right views.
Kasina: An object stared at with the purpose of fixing an image of it in one's consciousness, the image then being manipulated to fill the totality of one's awareness.
Kesa: Hair of the head; the first in the list of parts of the body used as a meditation theme for counteracting lust.
Khandha: Aggregate — the component parts of sensory perception; physical and mental phenomena as they are directly experienced: rupa — sensations, sense data; vedana — feelings of pleasure, pain, and indifference that result from the mind's savoring of its objects; sañña — labels, names, allusions; sankhara thought-formations; viññana — sensory consciousness.
Nibbana: The “unbinding” of the mind from sensations and mental acts, preoccupations and suppositions.
As this term is also used to refer to the extinguishing of a fire, it carries the connotations of stilling, cooling, and peace.

Niramisa-sukha: Literally, “un-raw” pleasure, or pleasure “not of the flesh.” The bliss and ease of nibbana, a pleasure independent of sensations or mental acts.
Nirodha: Disbanding, disappearance, cessation.
In the absolute sense, this refers to the utter disbanding of stress and its causes.
In an applied sense, it can refer to the temporary and partial suppression of defilement and stress attained in tranquillity meditation.
Nivarana: Hindrances; mental qualities that hinder the mind from attaining concentration and discernment: sensual desire, ill will, torpor & lethargy, restlessness & anxiety, and uncertainty.
Pali: The name of the most ancient recension of the Buddhist scriptures now extant and — by extension — of the language in which it was composed.
Patimokkha: The basic monastic code, composed of rules.
Sankhara: Fashioning — the forces and factors that fashion things, the process of fashioning, and the fashioned things that result.
As the fourth khandha, this refers to the act of fashioning thoughts, urges, etc.
within the mind.
As a blanket term for all five khandhas, it refers to all things, physical or psychological, fashioned by nature.
Stupa: Originally, a tumulus or burial mound enshrining relics of the Buddha or objects associated with his life.
Over the centuries, however, this has developed into the tall, spired monuments familiar in temples in Thailand, Sri Lanka and Burma; and into the pagodas of China, Korea and Japan.
Tejas: See “dhatu.
The translations in this book are based on the editions printed during Ajaan Lee's lifetime that seem most definitive and complete.
At certain points, these editions differ from those currently available.
In particular, I was able to locate a copy of the essay, Basic Themes, containing corrections in Ajaan Lee's own hand.
These have been incorporated in the translation.
If these translations are in any way inaccurate or misleading, I ask forgiveness of the author and reader for having unwittingly stood in their way.
As for whatever may be accurate — conducive to the aims intended by the author — I hope the reader will make the best use of it, translating it a few steps further, into the heart, so as to attain those aims.
— The translator
Over the years, Pali and Buddhist scholars have used a bewildering array of numbering schemes to refer to suttas and other passages in the Tipitaka.
On this website I use the following convention to identify texts within the Sutta Pitaka:
Readers who are accustomed to other numbering systems or who wish to compare Access to Insight's translations against the original Pali texts may refer to the alternative reference numbers that appear in braces on the pages that contain the short summaries of the suttas.
These alternate references consist either of the corresponding volume and starting page number in the PTS printed Pali edition, the verse numbers, the nipata and sutta number, or some combination thereof.
The braces may also contain additional notes concerning a text's location within the Tipitaka, especially in cases where the numbering varies between editions of the Tipitaka.
Some books and articles on Access to Insight contain substantial amounts of Pali text.
Many of them use the Velthuis method to represent romanized Pali's accented characters that are not part of the standard roman and ASCII alphabets.
In this scheme two basic rules are observed: 
For example: paa.naatipaataa verama.nii sikkhaa-pada.m samaadiyaami and itihida.m aayasmato ko.n.da~n~nassa a~n~na-ko.n.da~n~no'tveva naama.m ahosiiti.
– Pali diacritics.
You can copy and paste these letters when you need them for searches:
I have no surviving records of news summaries for the shaded intervals.
This page contains the contact and referral information for many of the contributing authors and original publishers of materials offered on Access to Insight.
If you are trying to track down the author or publisher of a page you saw on Access to Insight, the gray box at the bottom of the page in question may have some contact information.
If not, the information presented here may be helpful.
Also listed here are several distributors who offer print editions of some of the works you'll find on the website.
For sutta translations by the Amaravati Sangha.
For sutta translations by Andrew Olendzki.
For the writings of Bhante H.
Gunaratana.
For sutta translations and other writings by Bhikkhu Bodhi.
For books published by the Buddhist Publication Society.
The BPS is a nonprofit publisher of books on Theravada Buddhism, with an excellent international mail-order service.
Their current international mail-order catalog is available from their website.
The BPS runs the Nyanaponika Dhamma Dana Project, which distributes free copies of BPS publications to libraries and schools.
Publications from the BPS are distributed in the USA by Pariyatti, in Canada by SourceVipassana and in Europe by Wisdom Books 
For articles by Larry Rosenberg.
For the complete catalog of the essays, books, articles, and audio recordings of Thanissaro Bhikkhu.

For sutta translations and other writings by Thanissaro Bhikkhu.
Metta Forest Monastery publishes and distributes free books from the Thai forest traditions, including translations of teachings by Ajaan Lee, Upasika Kee, Ajaan Fuang, and Ajaan Suwat, as well as books by Thanissaro Bhikkhu, including The Wings to Awakening: An Anthology from the Pali Canon, Mind Like Fire Unbound: An Image in the Early Buddhist Discourses, and many more.
For translations by the The Yahoo!
Pali Collective.
The Pali Collective is a Yahoo!
group with some very knowledgeable and helpful members who can help you with your Pali studies.
Since its founding in, this nonprofit organization has been the world's pre-eminent publisher of texts from the Pali canon.
The PTS offers offer a hardbound edition of the complete Tipitaka in romanized Pali, and most of the Tipitaka in English translation.
Some of their translations of key texts are now very badly out of date, and have been superseded by more fluent translations from other publishers.
Nevertheless, many of their translations are still valuable.
Their romanized Pali editions are indispensable tools for the serious Pali student.
PTS books are distributed in North America by Pariyatti.
www.palitext.com
Pariyatti is a nonprofit bookseller with a large online catalog of books on Buddhism and meditation from various publishers.
Pariyatti is the official North American distributor for the Buddhist Publication Society and the Pali Text Society.
For articles by Bhikkhu Ariyesako.
For articles by Ayya Medhanandi.
Canadian distributor of books published by the Buddhist Publication Society.
For books by Ajaan Maha Boowa.
Wat Pah Baan Taad is the forest monastery of which Ajaan Maha Boowa was abbot.
Their website provides a list of free books by Maha Boowa, many of which are available upon request in both print and electronic formats.
European distributor of books published by the Buddhist Publication Society.
Wisdom is a nonprofit publisher and distributor of Buddhist books, including several important modern translations of the Digha, Majjhima, Samyutta, and Anguttara Nikayas.
This glossary covers many of the Pali words and technical terms that you may come across in the books and articles available on this website.
The “” link that follows some entries will take you to a more detailed article on the selected topic.
The Tipitaka, or Pali canon, is the collection of primary Pali language texts which form the doctrinal foundation of Theravada Buddhism.
The Tipitaka and the paracanonical Pali texts together constitute the complete body of classical Theravada texts.
The Pali canon is a vast body of literature: in English translation the texts add up to thousands of printed pages.
Most of the Canon has already been published in English over the years.
Although only a small fraction of these texts are available on this website, this collection can be a good place to start.
The three divisions of the Tipitaka are:
These pages invite you to explore some of the Buddha's basic teachings as they are presented in the Pali canon.
Each page in this section contains a selection of short passages from the suttas that introduce or illustrate different aspects of a single topic.
If you encounter a particularly meaningful or interesting passage you can, in most cases, read the full text of the sutta from which it came by simply following the link at the end of that passage.
Many of the passages are cross-referenced to other pages, allowing you to pursue a theme to whatever depth or breadth you desire.
This is by no means an exhaustive tutorial.
A number of the topics introduced here are explored more thoroughly in the Study Guides.
The General Index also has many references to additional readings on related topics.
Begin your tour by exploring the Threefold Refuge:
Further reading:
Access to Insight is an HTML website dedicated to providing accurate, reliable, and useful information concerning the practice and study of Theravada Buddhism, as it has been handed down to us through both the written word of the Pali canon and the living example of the Sangha.
Everything available at Access to Insight is offered in full cooperation with the authors, translators, and publishers concerned, with the clear understanding that none of it is to be sold.
Please help yourself to whatever you find useful.

The name “Access to Insight” refers to the collection of files that reside on the Internet domain www.accesstoinsight.org.
The domain name is owned by the Barre Center for Buddhist Studies, which also manages the website.
In early, with the help of the Barre Center for Buddhist Studies, John Bullitt set up a dialup computer bulletin board service in his home in an effort to see if networked computers might be useful as a support for other students and practitioners of Buddhism.
Initially dubbed “BCBS OnLine,” the BBS soon joined Fidonet, an international network of dialup BBS's, and adopted the name “Access to Insight”.
By the end of it joined DharmaNet, Barry Kapke's California-based Buddhist BBS network.
In early DharmaNet launched the Dharma Book Transcription Project, of which Bullitt served as librarian, and under whose auspices about a hundred high-quality books on Buddhism were transcribed to computer through the dedicated efforts of an international team of volunteer transcribers and proofreaders.
These books were soon distributed via DharmaNet to scores of BBS's around the world.
In mid- a dialup Internet e-mail connection was installed that allowed anyone on the Internet to retrieve these books via an e-mail file server.
This proved to be a popular service.
By late the BBS — now independent of BCBS — spent far more of its time serving file requests from around the world via the Internet than in handling the requests of local callers.
Internet users from far and wide were coming to depend on Access to Insight's now rickety and overworked ' computer as their link to information — both the timely and the timeless — about Buddhism.
In March this website was born; the following November the BBS was closed down.
Over the next eighteen years Access to Insight steadily grew from a modest collection of two or three suttas and a handful of articles into an extensively indexed and cross-referenced library of more than one thousand suttas and several hundred articles and books.
By the end of this growth subsided and it settled into “retirement” as a static website.
In Bullitt transferred ownership of the domain name and management of the website to BCBS.
To explore ATI's history in detail, see the archives of old news summaries.
If you have a question, please first check to see if it is already answered in the FAQ, the Help file, or the Indexes.
If you have questions about the content of this website — or about the Dhamma in general — please consult a teacher, knowledgeable friend, or one of the online Pali or Dhamma discussion groups.
If you have any questions about copyright that aren't covered in this document, please direct them to the author or prior publisher of the article in question.
If, after reading the above, you still have a pressing need to contact us, you can reach us at: accesstoinsight.feedback@gmail.com.

One overarching principle guided my choice of what to include in these pages, and what to leave out: a conviction that the teachings found in the Pali canon are just as relevant today as when they were first put into practice, years ago.
Despite all the obvious material advances in the human world since the Buddha's time, the Four Noble Truths appear to be as vital today as ever: suffering and stress still pervade our lives; the cause still appears to be craving in all its insidious manifestations; and there is no reason to suspect that the Noble Eightfold Path is any less effective today at bringing an end to all that suffering and stress.
The emphasis here is on practice.
For the most part I selected books, articles, and sutta translations that I personally found helpful to develop a better understanding of the Buddha's teachings, rather than texts that tend to fuel intellectual debates on abstract philosophical concepts.
Beyond these basic principles, it all comes down to a matter of personal taste.
If you are looking for authors or teachers who are not represented on Access to Insight, a simple Google search may be fruitful.
This website aims to be selective rather than comprehensive.
It was never my goal to publish translations of every single one of the Tipitaka's,-plus suttas.
What you see here is a selection of suttas that meet three criteria: they are, in my opinion, good translations; I personally found them useful; and their copyright holders have provided them for free distribution.
There are many other fine translations of important suttas available in print today, and I encourage you to support their continued publication by purchasing copies.
Someday, perhaps, these publishers will make those translations available freely to all.
Until then, however, we must learn to make do with what we have.
Happily, what we already have is pretty darn wonderful.

The same criteria applied to my selection of books, articles, and other materials on the site.
Years ago I decided to limit Access to Insight's content exclusively to the English language, simply because I am fluent only in English.
I prefer not to put anything on the website that I can't understand myself.
My role in assembling Access to Insight was primarily that of facilitator and librarian, helping to bring together under one virtual roof the fruits of the hard work of many people: authors, translators, publishers, transcribers, and proofreaders.
The unstinting generosity and commitment to the Dhamma demonstrated by these many contributors continues to amaze and inspire me.
If you have found anything of value at Access to Insight please join me in thanking those who have made this website possible:
Thank you all.
The sutta translations were made by many esteemed translators, including: Venerables Bhikkhu Bodhi, Acharya Buddharakkhita, Bhikkhu Khantipalo, Ñanamoli Thera, Ñanavara Thera, Narada Thera, Nyanaponika Thera, Soma Thera, Thanissaro Bhikkhu, and Sister Vajira; I.B.
Horner, John D.
Ireland, K.R.
Norman, and F.Woodward.
For a complete list of translators, see “Translations by Translator”.
Now that Access to Insight is entering “retirement”, there is really only one thing to be done: Study and put into practice the Dhamma teachings described in the suttas, articles, and books on this website.
That's what they're here for.
I am no longer receiving donations for Access to Insight.
If you feel moved to make a donation to support this work, I invite you to make a donation to any of the charitable institutions affiliated with the authors or translators whose work you find particularly rewarding.
Alternatively, you may simply make a donation to the charity of your choice.
In the Buddha's words, “Give wherever the mind feels confidence”.
The graphic that appears on the home page is a stylized rendition of a copper amulet that was made and consecrated in Thailand in.
The amulet depicts an image of the Buddha meditating under the arch of a protective deity, or naga, in a design popularized by Somdet Toh.
The reverse contains the Pali text of the Jinapañjara Gatha, a traditional protective chant that describes a person surrounded on all sides by a field of extraordinary purity and goodness: the Triple Gem, all the past Buddhas, all the Buddha's elder arahant disciples, and — as if that weren't enough — all the suttas.
In a dangerous and frightening world it is hard to imagine a safer place in which to dwell.
But, of course, it is the purity and goodness of the mind that offers the only true protection.
By seeking out the company of a kalyanamitta and by training oneself to infuse the mind only with what is good and noble, progress on the path of Dhamma is assured.
The Victor's Cage — and the amulet on which it appears — thus serves as metaphor and reminder of the admirable qualities of mind that the practicing Buddhist strives to develop.
As with the ten recollections, reflecting on the Victor's Cage offers encouragement when the chips are down: I am not alone in this endeavor; I can do this.
In times of anxiety and stress, when the mind is most susceptible to wandering off into unskillful states, a recollection like this is sometimes all that's needed to restore the mind to balance and to steer it onwards down the path.
And sometimes the familiar feel of a well-worn amulet between one's fingers is enough to do the trick.
My hope is that this website may serve its visitors in much the same way.
“Most Thai amulet collectors view the arch as a bell.
Somdej Toh was abbot of Wat Rakang, i.e., Bell Temple, and the bell has given its name to the arch.
The arch is invariably referred to as a “rakang” in any amulet of this iconography.
“The naga-over-the-Buddha amulets typically feature a -headed Mucalinda and are not known to be stylised into an abstract arch.
“I suspect the amulet is issued by one of temples closely associated with Somdet Toh, ie Wat Rakang, Wat Inn and Wat Bangkhunpom, where he made many of these amulets.
The Jinapanjara Katha began to be featured on these amulets some years ago, because Somdet Toh was supposed to have used that katha to consecrate all of his amulets.
A more likely reason is that the minting technology finally caught up and permitted the katha to be squeezed onto the small surface area.
— from an email received on August.
For more about Somdet Toh see “The Legends of Somdet Toh” and ThailandAmulets.com &lt;http://www.thailandamulets.com&gt;.
With the exception of the files from the Sri Lanka Tripitaka Project, the contents of each page on this website are protected by one of several kinds of copyright licenses.
Some of these licenses are modern Creative Commons licenses, while some are home-made licenses that were drafted by Dhamma authors and online publishers in the early days of the Internet.
You'll find the details about the license in the light gray box at the bottom of each page.
Although the particulars of each license may vary, they all share the same core principle:
You may not sell any texts copied or derived from this website.
Everything on this website is made available to you thanks to the generosity of dozens of authors, translators, publishers, and transcribers, all of whom contributed their efforts with the explicit understanding that the fruits of their labors would be given away free of charge, as an expression of dana.
You may download these files to your computer, print them out, read them, share them with your friends, copy them to your own website, translate them into other languages, and redistribute them electronically — provided that you do not charge any money for them.
They are not in the public domain.
If you have additional questions about the copyright status of anything you see on this website, please contact the author or original publisher of the document in question.
Yes, provided that you make them available free of charge and follow these technical guidelines to respect the copyright.
You are welcome to copy any or all pages from Access to Insight and repost them on your own free website.
Here are some technical guidelines to help you do so without infringing on the underlying copyright licenses.
If you examine the HTML source of a given page, you'll notice that the copyrighted portions are clearly demarcated in the markup, thus:
It is this chunk of text that is governed by the license that appears at the bottom of the page.
You are free to strip off everything from that file that lies outside of this “protected text chunk” and replace it with your own formatting, packaging, etc., provided that you also abide by the terms of the copyright license.
In general, this means that you must also include these three elements:
The particular order or placement on the page of these three elements is not important, as long as you make it easy for your readers to find them.
In general, the HTML markup within the protected text chunk is NOT subject to copyright.
You are free to modify the HTML or strip it off entirely, as you please — unless the license explicity forbids re-formatting.
Here is an example of one particular page from Access to Insight as it might appear in a repackaged form on someone else's website.
These guidelines also apply when converting the files into entirely different formats.
For example, if you convert a file to Microsoft Word, PDF, or some other format, please include the three elements described above.
N.B.
A few PDF files have been locked and password-protected by their publisher, to restrict reformatting.
Please do not attempt to circumvent these security measures.
If you are interested in converting password-protected files, please ask the author or publisher for permission.
No.
The amount you charge is irrelevant: if you charge one penny or one thousand dollars, you're still selling.
It doesn't matter if you're hoping to make a profit or not.
What you do with the money you receive is irrelevant.
These teachings are to be given away, not sold.
Requiring someone to pay for reproduction costs or for shipping costs is equivalent to selling.
If you were sending a birthday gift to a beloved family member, would you enclose a bill for the wrapping paper, ribbon, and postage?
Of course not.
A gift is a gift.
Please be very careful here.
As long as you make it crystal clear that anyone may receive a copy free for the asking — regardless of whether he or she makes a donation — then that's fine.
You should put no pressure — subtle or otherwise — on anyone to pay.
These teachings are to be given away, not sold.
If the excerpt falls within the scope of “Fair Use”, then you are free to use the excerpt and no further permission is required.
If the excerpt is more substantial, please contact the author or original publisher to request permission.
If you're writing a paper for a school or university, you should check with your instructor to see what citation standards you are expected to follow.
To cite individual pages from the website, you might consider the citation format that's shown in the light gray box at the bottom of every page.
Many of the books, articles, and translations appearing on this website are also available in print form from various publishers.
Here is a partial list of sources for some of these printed books:
There is no Pali script.
Pali is a spoken language with no alphabet of its own.
Pali texts can be written phonetically using just about any alphabet: Devanagari, Thai, Burmese, Roman, Cyrillic, Klingon, etc.
Writing Pali in non-Indic languages, however, often requires the addition of special accents or diacritics to signify certain sounds not represented in the standard alphabet.
So, if you are looking for a hand-written version of the word mettā for a tattoo or a painting, it's very easy: you can write it out yourself, in any alphabet you like.
The Pali texts were first written down several centuries after the Buddha's death, at the Fourth Buddhist Council.
To see what those early — and beautiful!
— written transcriptions look like, visit the Fragile Palm Leaves Foundation &lt;http://echo.mpiwg-berlin.mpg.de/content/buddhism/fplf&gt;.
To find a particular word or passage within those ancient manuscripts, you'll have to find a scholar who specializes in them.
If you're thinking of purchasing your own printed copy of the Tipitaka, be forewarned: the Pali canon is huge; owning a complete set is a serious commitment.
The Pali Text Society's edition of the Tipitaka fills over, pages in approximately fifty hardbound volumes, taking up about five linear feet of shelf space, and costing about US$,.
Moreover, a few of the more obscure books in the Tipitaka are simply unavailable in English translation, so if you really must read the entire Tipitaka, you'll just have to learn Pali.
The PTS has for over a century been the leading publisher of the Tipitaka, both in romanized Pali and in English translation, but many of their translations are now badly out of date.
Much better translations of several portions of the Canon are now available from other publishers.
Here are my recommendations for printed translations that add up to a useful — if incomplete — version of the Tipitaka:
— the Venerable Ananda, in Thag.

The one disciple of the Buddha most often mentioned in his discourses is Ananda.
Amongst all those great monks around the Buddha he occupies a unique position, and this in many respects, as will be mentioned in these pages.
His unique position had already begun before his birth.
He came to earth, just as the Buddha did, from the Tusita heaven, and was born on the same day as he and in the same caste, namely the warrior caste of the royal family of the Sakyas.
Their fathers were brothers, so that Ananda was the Buddha's cousin.
He had three brothers, Anuruddha, Mahanama, Pandu, and one sister, Rohini.
Anuruddha entered the Sangha together with Ananda and became an arahant, a fully enlightened one.
Mahanama, the prince of the Sakyas, became a once-returner as a householder, while the only thing known about Pandu is the fact that he survived the near-extinction of the Sakya clan during the Buddha's th year.
Ananda's only sister, Rohini, had a skin disease as a result of former jealousy, and lived in seclusion at home until the Buddha talked to her about the karmic cause of her affliction and paved the way to stream-entry for her.
Rohini recovered and was later reborn in the “heaven of the gods of the thirty-three” as the wife of Sakka, the king of the gods.
When he was years old, Ananda joined his brother Anuruddha and his cousin Devadatta and also many other Sakyan nobles to become a “homeless one”, a monk.
The venerable Belatthassa, an arahant — a fully liberated saint — became his teacher in the Sangha.
Only one verse by the venerable Belatthasisa has survived to this day:
Under the guidance of this holy one, Ananda was introduced into the monk's discipline.
He was a willing and diligent pupil and was able to attain the fruit of stream-entry already during his first rains retreat.
Later Ananda told his fellow monks, that the venerable Punna Mantaniputta had been of great help to him during his learning period.
He had taught Dhamma to the new monks and had explained to them that the “I am” conceit does not arise without a cause — namely, it is brought about through form, feeling, perceptions, mental formations, and consciousness.
For a better understanding of this, the venerable Punna had given a fitting analogy:
If somebody should want to see his reflection or image, he could do so only through a cause, namely a mirror or a clear body of water.
In the same way do the five aggregates reflect the image of “I am.” As long as one depends on them and is supported by them, so long will an “I” be reflected.
Only when one does not rely on them any longer, will the image of “I” disappear.
Ananda thought about this analogy again and again and ever more deeply, until he penetrated the suffering, impermanence and no-self aspects of the five aggregates, and no longer relied upon them as his support.
He then began to reap the benefits of monkhood, beginning with the fruit of stream-entry.
Ananda was always well content with his life as a monk.
He understood the blessings of renunciation and had entered upon the Path, which is a joy to tread if one can cross the stream in company with like-minded friends.
During the first years of his life as a monk, Ananda was fully occupied with the purification of his own mind; he blended easily into the Sangha and slowly developed more and more resilience and mental strength.
When the Buddha and Ananda were both years of age, the Buddha called a meeting of the monks and declared: “In my years as a monk, as Father of the Sangha, I have had many different attendants, but none of them has really filled the post perfectly, as again and again some willfulness has become apparent.
Now I am years old and it is necessary for me to have a trustworthy and reliable attendant.” At once all the noble disciples offered their services.
But the Buddha did not accept them.
Then the great monks looked at Ananda, who had held back modestly, and asked him to come forward voluntarily.
Due to his impeccable behavior as a monk, he seemed predestined for the post.
When he was asked why he was the only one who had not offered his services, he replied that the Buddha knew best who was suitable as his attendant.
He had so much confidence in the Blessed One, that it did not occur to him to express his own wishes, although he would have liked to become the attendant of the Buddha.
Then the Buddha declared that Ananda would be pleasing to him and that he wanted him as his attendant.
Ananda was in no way proud that the Master had preferred him to his greatest disciples, but instead asked a favor of having eight conditions fulfilled.
First of all, the Master should never pass a gift of robes on to him; second, he should never give him any almsfood, which he himself had received; third, having received a dwelling place he should never give it to him; fourth, never to include him in any personal invitation.
Besides these four negative conditions, he also had four positive wishes, namely: if he was invited to a meal, he asked for the right to transfer this invitation to the Buddha; if people came from outlying areas, he asked for the privilege to lead them to the Buddha; if he had any doubts or inquiries about the Dhamma, he asked for the right to present these to the Buddha at any time; and if the Buddha gave a discourse during his absence, he asked for the privilege to have the Buddha repeat it to him privately.
He explained his reasons for these requests in this way: if he did not pose the first four conditions, then people could say that he had accepted the post of attendant only because of material gain.
But if he did not express the other four conditions, then it could rightly be said that he fulfilled the duties of his post without being mindful of his own advancement on the Noble Path.
The Buddha granted him these very reasonable requests, which were quite in accordance with the teaching.
From then on Ananda was the constant companion, attendant and helper of the Blessed One for twenty-five years.
In those twenty-five years of his fame, he continued with the same incessant striving for purification as in the first eighteen years of his monkhood as an unknown disciple.
He said of himself:
The twenty-five years mentioned in this verse refer to the period during which he was the Buddha's attendant, and not to the whole of his life as a monk.
During this period, though he was still a “learner,” “one in the higher training,” no thoughts of lust or hate arose in him; the implication being that his close connection with the Buddha and his devotion to him gave no room for these.
Only such a man could fill the post of a constant companion for the Buddha.
Added to that were Ananda's special positive qualities.
How Ananda attained arahantship and survived the Buddha will be related in due course.
Ananda's praise has been voiced on many occasions in the Pali Canon.
The greatest recognition for a monk would surely have been when the Buddha asked him to substitute for him as a teacher and then later confirmed that he, himself, would not have presented the teachings in any other way.
This praise was given by the Exalted One to Sariputta and to Ananda.
A similarly high esteem is shown in the fact that monks to whom the Buddha had given a short discourse would ask an experienced monk to explain the teaching more fully.
The venerable Maha Kaccana was a master in this, and so were Sariputta and Ananda.
Besides the equal status Ananda had in these respects with Sariputta, the disciple who was most similar to the Master, there were occasions when the Buddha specially praised Ananda.
He said, for instance, to the monks, that King Pasenadi, to whom Ananda had given a discourse, was very blessed because he had been given the boon of the sight and company of Ananda.
Further: just as the multitude of aristocrats, brahmans, ordinary folk and ascetics found joy in seeing a world ruler, equally joyful were the monks, nuns, and male and female disciples about Ananda.
“If a party of these goes to Ananda to see him, his presence alone gives them joy.
When he speaks Dhamma to them, there will be joy for them because of his words.
And they are still not satisfied when Ananda reverts to silence”.
In answer to the question of a lay disciple how he could honor the Dhamma, after having honored the Buddha and Sangha, the Buddha's reply was the third praise: “If you, householder, wish to honor the Dhamma, go and honor Ananda, the Guardian of the Dhamma”; whereupon the lay disciple invited Ananda to a meal and gave him a gift of valuable cloth.
But Ananda turned it over to Sariputta, because he had the greatest mastery of the Teaching; Sariputta, however, gave it to the Buddha, because he alone was the cause of all bliss.
Another time the Master praised him thus: after Ananda had answered a question of the Buddha and had left, the Buddha said to the other monks:
A layman who had been following another teaching was converted to the Dhamma after a talk with Ananda.
At the end he exulted how amazing it had been that Ananda had neither elevated his own teaching into the heavens nor dragged the other into the dirt.
“Totally straightforward was the exposition of the Dhamma, the inner meaning was explained and he, himself, was not carried away”.
A second time he was praised by King Pasenadi, after having given a good explanation to the crown prince of Kosala.
“Truly, he looks like Ananda,” because the word means esteemed, loveable, agreeable.
And King Pasenadi said that Ananda's words had been well-founded.
In view of this abundance of praise, recognition and privileges, mutterings of envy and resentment could have been expected.
But this was not the case at all.
He was a man who had no enemies.
This rare advantage had not come to him without a cause, but had been enjoyed by him not only in this life but also in many previous existences.
Ananda was so much taken up by subordinating his entire life to the Dhamma, that fame could not touch him and make him proud.
He knew that all that was good in him was due to the influence of the Teaching.
When seen in this way, there can be no pride.
One who cannot be proud, has no enemies, and such a one does not meet with envy.
If someone turns inward completely and keeps away from any social contact, as Ananda's brother Anuruddha did, then it is easy to be without enemies.
But if someone like Ananda, who had daily contact with a large number of people with regard to diverse matters, lives without enemies, without rivals, without conflict and tensions, it borders on a miracle.
This quality is truly a measure of Ananda's uniqueness.
Although Ananda did experience justified criticism and was occasionally admonished, that was something entirely different.
A friendly reminder, a warning or even a substantial reproach to change one's behavior are aids towards more intense purification.
Such criticism, if taken to heart, leads to more inner clarity and higher esteem by others.
The instances in which Ananda was admonished mostly referred to points of social behavior, points of the Vinaya; hardly ever to points of self-purification and were never related to his understanding of the Dhamma.
The instances were as follows.
Once, when the Buddha was suffering from wind in the stomach, Ananda cooked a rice gruel for him, which had helped the Enlightened One when he had previous complaints of this sort.
The Buddha admonished him thus: “It is not the proper way for ascetics, it is not proper monk's behavior, to prepare meals in the house.” After the incident it was decreed an offense for a monk to cook for himself.
Ananda adhered to this rule from then on, with full insight into its necessity as a part of true homelessness.
Once Ananda went on alms-round without his double robe.
Fellow monks drew his attention to the rule established by the Buddha, that a monk should always wear his three robes when going to the village.
Ananda agreed wholeheartedly and explained that he had simply forgotten it.
Since this and the former case concerned a simple disciplinary rule, the matter was thereby settled.
That someone like Ananda, who had a most extraordinary memory, could also forget something, was due to the fact that even a stream-winner is not yet perfect.
The Buddha, however, required of the monks that they pay diligent attention to the small, everyday things of a monk's life, and that they base their higher spiritual exertions on the foundation of the discipline.
This served to eliminate purely intellectual understanding and conceit.
A different kind of criticism was leveled at Ananda in two instances by the venerable Maha Kassapa.
Thirty disciples of Ananda had left the Sangha.
Kassapa reproached Ananda that he had not guarded the young men sufficiently.
He had gone on walking tours with them, without their having the senses well restrained, without having learned to be moderate in eating, and not having trained themselves in wakefulness.
Therefore he was a “destroyer of corn,” “a spoiler of the families.” His followers crumbled away.
“This youngster is still uncontrolled.” So did the venerable Maha Kassapa reprove him.
To this rather strong reproach, Ananda only replied that the gray hair had grown on his head in the service of the Sangha and yet Kassapa still called him a “youngster.” It may be that in this instance Ananda had overrated his own strength and underrated the worldliness of his pupils.
Ananda did not argue about the objective justification of the censure for his failure.
After all he was not yet an arahant and was still subject to some defilements.
He only objected to the generalization implied by the criticism.
One may, however, assume that a saint, an arahant, like Kassapa, would have known which form of criticism would be most helpful to Ananda.
The second incident with Kassapa had a different background.
Ananda had asked Kassapa to accompany him to a nunnery and to teach there.
After initial hesitation, Kassapa had agreed.
After the discourse was over, a headstrong nun accused Kassapa that only he had been talking and had not let the wise Ananda utter a single word.
It was, she said, as if the needle salesman had tried to sell his wares in the presence of the needle manufacturer.
Ananda begged Kassapa to forgive her.
But Kassapa replied that Ananda should show restraint, lest an inquiry into his behavior should be initiated.
This was meant by Kassapa to be a reproach that Ananda had been overzealous in his teaching, and had overlooked the danger of personal attachment.
This criticism also will have benefited Ananda in the future.
In any case, Kassapa blamed Ananda in both instances because of his love for him; there was always an excellent relationship between these two monks.
Another monk, Udayi, once criticized Ananda in the following incident.
Ananda had asked the Blessed One how far his voice would reach in the universe.
The Lord had answered that the Enlightened Ones were immeasurable and could reach further than a thousandfold world system, even further than a three-thousandfold world system.
They could penetrate all those worlds with their shining splendor and reach all beings living there with their voice.
Ananda was delighted with this description, so all-encompassing and transcending all horizons, and he exclaimed: “How fortunate I am, that I have such an almighty, powerful master!
Udayi objected: “What good does it do to you brother Ananda, that your master is almighty and powerful?” With these few words a strong reproach was uttered.
Namely that Ananda always looked at the person of the Buddha only, and thereby forgot his real benefit, namely his own enlightenment.
The Buddha immediately took sides with Ananda with the following words:
“Not so, Udayi, not so, Udayi!
Should Ananda die without being fully liberated; he would be king of the gods seven times because of the purity of his heart, or be king of the Indian subcontinent seven times.
But Udayi, Ananda will experience final liberation in this very life.
That the Buddha made this prophecy in the presence of Ananda showed his confidence in him.
He knew that his wide knowledge of the Buddha-word would not make Ananda negligent in his practice.
This utterance also indicated that the Buddha found it useful to shield Ananda from reproach — self-inflicted and by others — by consoling him that his efforts and strivings would result in the highest attainment still in this lifetime.
The Tathagata could make such a declaration only in the case of one who inclined rather towards being extremely conscientious than too negligent.
The only time that the Buddha admonished Ananda on his own accord was also the most important incident.
The Buddha had instructed Ananda to oversee the distribution of cloth for robes to the monks.
Ananda had accomplished this task very satisfactorily.
The Buddha praised him for his circumspection and told the other monks that Ananda was very skilled in sewing; he was able to make several different kinds of seams.
For a good monk it was necessary that he hemmed his robes, so that they did not fray at the edges, and one could not accuse him of carelessly handling and wasting the offerings of the laity.
Later, when the Buddha was residing near his hometown he saw numerous seats prepared in a monastery and asked Ananda whether many monks lived there.
Ananda confirmed this and added, “It is now time to prepare our robes, venerable sir.” Ananda referred here to the Buddha's instructions that a monk should care for his robes properly.
However, Ananda seemed to have arranged a sort of sewing circle, maybe to teach his fellow monks that commended art of making seams.
This was probably how it came to the communal evening sewing hours.
Ananda had not considered that from this a home-like conversational hour would result after the day's efforts and hardships.
Therefore the Buddha gave this very emphatic injunction concerning the danger of mundane gregariousness for the monk:
A monk does not deserve praise who enjoys socializing, who finds contentment in it, enjoys togetherness, is pleased with it.
That such a monk should attain at will the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of solitude, the bliss of tranquility, the bliss of awakening, in their totality, that is impossible.
Whosoever finds his whole happiness in togetherness, has no access to the bliss which exists independent of the desire for togetherness.
Even if one who is still attached to others attains meditative absorption, it will not be fully controlled nor will it be complete.
Such absorption can in this case only be a result of forceful suppression.
Still greater will be the difficulty of attaining final liberation for a person who makes himself dependent on companionship.
Therefore the Buddha ends his explanation with the statement  that he cannot find any form, the attachment to which would not produce dukkha, because of the inherent impermanence in it, even if it were the highest divine form of a brahma.
This is the universal aspect of the Dhamma.
Subsequently the Buddha expounded the Path of Practice, which he explained solely with reference to Ananda, not mentioning the first seven steps of the Noble Eightfold Path, but starting with the eighth step.
This was because Ananda had the faculty for deep meditation, and as one in the higher training was as deeply imbued with the Dhamma as anyone outside sainthood could be.
He only needed a few hints, which put the right perspective on the community work mentioned above.
Therefore the Buddha expounded here the highest goal — total voidness of concepts, objects and names — and showed the last steps.
Furthermore he appealed to Ananda's love for him as the Master, and emphasized that this love could only be proven if Ananda followed him into the highest attainment.
One could say that he made use of both approaches, factual and personal, to help Ananda cut off all remaining worldliness once and for all, and he concluded with this analogy:
Therefore, Ananda, bear amity towards me, not hostility; long shall that be for your benefit and happiness.
I shall not treat you, Ananda, as the potter treats his unfired pots.
Repeatedly admonishing, I shall speak to you, Ananda, repeatedly testing.
He who is sound will stand the test.
This analogy will be easier to understand, if one takes a look at the th Jataka story.
It tells of a past life of Ananda.
He had abdicated from a king's throne and had become an ascetic, just like the Buddha did when a bodhisatta.
One day it transpired that the ascetic — who later became Ananda — had a small store of salt to flavor his food, which went against the ascetic rule of poverty.
The Bodhisatta reprimanded him thus: he had let go of all the riches of his kingdom, but now he had started to store provisions again.
The ascetic became ill-humored because of that.
He replied that one must not hurt the other person when reprimanding him; one must not be rough with one's reproach, as if cutting with a blunt knife.
The Bodhisatta replied: amongst friends it was not necessary to speak like a potter handling his unfired, i.e., very delicate, pots.
A friend could also utter words of blame, because only through repeated exhortation, and constant, constructive criticism, could one give a person that solidity which was like fired clay.
Then the ascetic asked the Bodhisatta's pardon and requested that the Bodhisatta should, out of compassion, always guide him further.
The analogy of the clay pots — easily understandable in those days because it was a common trade — referred to sensitivity and touchiness.
For a potter takes the raw, not quite dry, clay pot gently with both hands lest it should break.
Then after firing he would repeatedly test it for flaws such as cracks or splits, and use it only if it were well baked.
He would tap it again and again and only a sound one would stand the test.
In the same way only a sound person, one with excellent qualities, would reach path and fruit of sainthood.
Just as in that past life the reproach of the Bodhisatta was fruitful and brought Ananda — the ascetic — to brahma realms, so it was also fruitful this time, because Ananda accepted the criticism happily, was content with it, took it to heart and followed it until he attained the total destruction of suffering in this life.
One of the virtues of Ananda, which established his fame, was his conduct as the Buddha's attendant.
The Buddha said of him, that he was the best of all attendants, was the foremost of all those monks who had ever filled this post.
The term “attendant” is actually not comprehensive enough.
There is hardly an English word, which can do full justice to his position.
If we were to choose designations such as “secretary” or “adjunct,” then we would not express the most intimate aspects of his attendance, extending to many little items of personal assistance given to the Master.
If we called him a “servant,” then we would omit the organizational and directing aspects, which manifested on many occasions.
And if we looked for examples in the world's literature of a confidante of a great man, who accompanied him constantly, we would not find his likeness.
This loving attention for years consisted of the following services: Ananda brought water for washing to the Buddha and tooth-wood, he arranged his seat, washed his feet, massaged his back, fanned him for coolness, swept his cell, and mended his robes.
He slept nearby at night to be always on hand.
He accompanied him on his rounds through the monastery and after meetings he checked to see whether any monk had left anything behind.
He carried the Buddha's messages and called the monks together, even sometimes at midnight.
When the Buddha was sick, he obtained medicine for him.
Once when monks neglected a very sick fellow monk, the Buddha and Ananda washed him and together carried him to a resting-place.
In this way Ananda performed the many daily tasks and cared for the physical well-being of his enlightened cousin like a good mother or a caring wife.
But above all, he also had the duties of a good secretary, namely the smooth communication between the thousands of monks and the Master.
Together with Sariputta and Moggallana he tried to sort out, and attend to, the manifold problems of human relationships turning up in a community.
In a case of dispute of the monks of Kosambi, and in the case of a schism in the Sangha through Devadatta.
Ananda played an important role in clarifying and keeping order.
Often he was the go-between for the monks, getting an audience with the Master for them, or he brought the Buddha's words to members of other sects.
He refused no one and felt himself to be a bridge rather than a barrier.
On several occasions the monks made a great deal of noise, so that the Buddha asked Ananda about the reason for this.
Ananda was always able to explain it fully.
The Buddha then took care of it accordingly.
The last of these three occasions is significant.
On behalf of the Buddha, Ananda called the large group of noisy monks together and reproached them for their behavior and sent them away.
Thereupon the group went into solitude and worked so diligently on the purification of their hearts, that all of them attained the three knowledges during one rains retreat.
The Master called them together once more.
When they arrived at the Awakened One, he dwelt in imperturbable meditation.
The holy monks realized the depth of their master's meditation, sat down and entered in the same absorption.
After they had thus passed the first four hours of the night — truly the kind of “greeting” fit for holy ones — Ananda got up and requested the Buddha to greet the monks who had arrived.
Because all of them were in imperturbable meditation, no one could hear him.
After a further four hours, Ananda repeated his request.
Again total silence answered him.
And a third time, at dawn, Ananda got up, prostrated before the Buddha, put his hands together and requested a greeting for the monks.
Thereupon the Buddha came out of his meditation and answered Ananda: “If you were able to attain supersensual experiences, then you would have known, that all of us had entered into imperturbable absorption, where words cannot penetrate”.
This account serves to show the unerring patience Ananda possessed, as well as his limitations.
Such an occurrence may have contributed to Ananda's determination to practice meditation again and again, despite his many duties.
The traditional texts speak of two occasions when he asked the Buddha for a meditation subject, which he could practice in solitude.
The Master told him on one occasion, to concentrate on the five aggregates, and the other time to contemplate the six sense-spheres.
Amongst the many things which Ananda requested from the Buddha for others, the following may be mentioned: when the monk Girimananda and the monk Phagguna were sick, Ananda asked the Exalted One to visit them and strengthen them by teaching them Dhamma.
It was also Ananda who asked the Buddha — upon Anathapindika's suggestion — to have a shrine erected in the monastery.
In these and many other ways, Ananda showed himself as a solicitous monk who combined maternal and paternal qualities.
His ability for organization, negotiation, and arrangements had already been manifested earlier, when — in a past life — he fulfilled a similar function for the king of the gods, Sakka.
In the few instances when Ananda's past lives in the deva and brahma worlds are mentioned, it always related to those lives in which he held the position of a main helper and adjutant of Sakka; particularly as the heavenly charioteer Matali or as a deva such as the heavenly architect Vissakamma or the rain-god Pajjuna or the five-crested celestial musician Pañcasikha.
Especially Ananda's willingness to sacrifice himself is worth mentioning.
When Devadatta let loose a wild elephant to kill the Buddha, Ananda threw himself in front of the Buddha rather to die himself than to see the Exalted One killed or injured.
Three times the Buddha asked him to step back, but he did not comply.
Only when the Enlightened One moved gently from the spot through supernatural powers, could he be dissuaded from his intention to sacrifice himself.
This action of Ananda spread his fame even further.
The Buddha told the other monks that already in four former lives Ananda had shown himself equally willing to sacrifice himself.
Even in long bygone times as an animal, as a swan or a gazelle he had stayed with the Bodhisatta when he had been caught in a trap.
In another case the Bodhisatta first sacrificed himself for his monkey mother, then Ananda And in three other recorded cases, Ananda — in his former rebirths — saved the Buddha-to-be's life through his care and skill.
These stories amplify the virtues of Ananda and his age-old association with the Buddha.
Amongst the distinctions which gave Ananda a special place amongst the Buddha's disciples, one of the most noteworthy was that he was the only monk who was not yet an arahant amongst those whom the Buddha called pre-eminent in specific abilities.
This means that he had qualities which equaled those of the arahants.
While others were mentioned only because of one superior quality, Ananda was the one amongst the seventy-five pre-eminent disciples who excelled in five abilities.
He was pre-eminent among those who had heard much, who had a good retentive memory, who mastered the sequential order, who were energetic and among those who attended.
Upon close examination, one can see that these five qualities belong to the vast complex of virtues which give sati its strength and power.
The quality of mindfulness is power of the mind, power of memory, mastery over recollections and ideas.
It is the faculty to use the tool of the mind at any time at will and not be driven by it.
In short, mindfulness is circumspection and orderliness, self-restraint, control, self-discipline.
In a narrower sense, sati or mindfulness is the ability to remember.
Ananda had this ability to a phenomenal degree.
He could immediately remember everything, even if he had heard it only once.
He could repeat discourses of the Buddha flawlessly up to, words, without leaving out a single syllable.
He was able to recite, four-line stanzas of the Buddha.
It may sound like a miracle to us to be able to accomplish such a feat.
But the miracle is solely that we encumber our minds with a hundred-thousand useless things, which hinder us from becoming master over our memory.
The Buddha said once that the only reason why one forgets anything is the presence of one of the five hindrances.
Because Ananda was one in the higher training, he was able to let go of these hindrances at will and so could concentrate completely on what he heard.
Because he did not want anything for himself, he absorbed the discourses without resistance or distortion, arranged them properly, knew what belonged together, recognized within different expressions the common denominator, and like a faithful and skilled registrar, could find his way around in his own mind.
This is the quality of “having heard much.” He who has heard much in this sense, has discarded willfulness from his own mind and has become a vessel of truth.
He has heard much truth and that means that he has erased all untruth in himself.
Such a one is “born from the mouth” of the teacher, is truly trained, because he let himself be shaped by the teaching of the Exalted One.
Hence he who has heard much is the one who is most humble and a most sincere champion of truth.
Everything good which he carries in his mind and upon which he acts, he does not ascribe to his own ability, but to the Dhamma, which he has heard from his teacher.
Such a person is truly humble.
— Rainer Maria Rilke
This could rightly be said of Ananda.
When he came to the Buddha he was still ignorant, thinking in a wrong way.
Each teaching of the Awakened One forced him to correct his outlook.
Constantly losing his old concepts, he totally yielded to the truth.
This quality of listening well and training the mind is named as the first of the five specific abilities of Ananda and it is recorded that all of his disciples, too, were well versed in this respect.
But the Buddha said it would not be easy to find one who equaled Ananda in this.
The question as to which monk lent radiance to the Gosinga Forest, was answered by Ananda in this way:
The monk who has heard much, is guardian of the word, treasurer of the teaching, and of what is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good at the end, and transmits word by word and in the right way the completely purified life of the homeless ones: all this he knows, remembers, ably explains, keeps in his heart and understands completely.
He discourses on Dhamma to the four kinds of listeners, in completeness, in part and in the right context to bring them to final eradication of desires.
The second quality is the retention in mind and making use of the discourses heard, and their application to one's own self-inquiry.
For the third quality widely differing renderings have been given by translators.
According to the ancient commentary, it refers to Ananda's capacity to perceive in his mind the internal connection and coherence of a discourse.
This he was able to do by understanding well the meaning and significance of the teaching concerned, with all its implications.
Hence, even when his recitation was interrupted by a question, he was able to resume the recital where he had left off.
The fourth quality was his energy, his unflagging dedication to his task in studying, memorizing and reciting the Buddha's words and in personally attending on the Master.
The fifth and last quality was that of a perfect attendant, which was described earlier.
If one looks at these five qualities, one receives a vivid picture of Ananda.
The central quality, however, is that of a guardian of the Dhamma, which can also be seen in the following chapters.
Because of his key position among the Buddha's entourage of monks, Ananda was naturally the focus of much attention, and he had to deal with a very large number of people.
To all those who came into contact with him, he was a model in his blameless conduct, in his untiring solicitude for the Master and for the community of monks, in his unperturbable friendliness, his patience and his readiness to help.
Some potential conflicts did not even arise in his presence, and those which did arise became mitigated and resolved through his influence.
Ananda, as a man without enemies, had a strong and deep impact upon others through his exemplary conduct as well as through his instructions.
His image, as the Buddha's faithful companion, left particularly strong traces in the minds of his contemporaries.
Ananda was always master of a situation, and like a king, he had a sovereign comprehension of affairs.
Therefore, thanks to his circumspection, he could handle and organize whatever occurred in the daily life of the Buddha and the community.
Through the extraordinary power of his memory, he was able to learn from his experiences and never repeat the same mistakes, as most people are liable to do again and again, due to their weak memory.
Hence, he could remember people well, though he may have met them only once, and he could, therefore, deal with them suitably, without leaving the impression that he “manipulated” them.
His circumspection accorded with the facts of a situation so naturally that all reasonable people could only agree with him.
Both brothers, Anuruddha and Ananda, were no longer in need of female companionship, in any way or form, because of their inner detachment from worldliness and their strong spirit of renunciation.
To both, however, the other sex presented a challenge in different ways.
If one has much contact with people, one has to take the difference of the sexes into account.
With Ananda this showed as special care and effort to look after all four kinds of disciples, not only monks and laymen, but also nuns and laywomen.
Without Ananda there would have been only three kinds of disciples, because it was he who was instrumental in the founding of the nun's order.
This happened as follows:
When many nobles of the Sakya clan had become monks, their wives, sisters, and daughters also had the wish to live a life of purification under the Awakened One.
A large number of Sakya ladies, under the guidance of the Buddha's stepmother, Maha-Pajapati, followed the Exalted One and tried in vain to gain permission to establish an order of nuns.
Ananda saw the Buddha's step-mother with swollen feet, covered with dust, eyes full of tears at the gate of the monastery of Vesali.
When he asked her compassionately for the reason of her sorrow, she replied that the Master had three times rejected her request for the establishment of an order of nuns.
Ananda decided out of compassion to intercede himself.
He went to the Master, but his request was also denied three times.
Then he asked: “Is a woman able to gain the fruit of stream-entry, once-returning, non-returning, and arahantship, if she leaves the household life and enters into homelessness and follows the teaching and discipline of the Exalted One?
The Buddha affirmed this.
Thereupon Ananda rephrased his request:
If a woman is able to do this, Master — and moreover Maha-Pajapati Gotami has rendered great service to the Master: she is his aunt, his governess and nurse, nourished the Exalted One with her own milk after his mother died — therefore it would be well if the Blessed One would allow women to leave home for the homeless life, to follow the teaching and discipline of the Master.
Ananda here brought two arguments to bear.
First the fact that a woman in the Order could gain the highest fruit, become a saint, an arahant in this very life, which goal can be attained only very rarely in the household life.
Second, he brought up the very personal element of gratitude for the particularly meritorious services of Maha-Pajapati for the Buddha, which would be a good reason for him to help his step-mother now to gain final liberation.
In response to these arguments the Buddha agreed to the establishment of an order of nuns, provided certain cautions and rules were followed.
One might gain the impression from this account, that it needed Ananda's intense and clever arguments to change the Buddha's mind.
But an awakened one's mind cannot be changed, because he is always in touch with absolute reality.
What happened here was solely the same event, which all Buddhas encounter, because all of them have established an order of nuns.
The whole incident was not meant to prevent the founding of the female branch of the Order, but only to strengthen by that hesitation the message that this brought great dangers with it.
For this reason, the Buddha stipulated eight conditions, which were so selected that only the best women would agree to abide by them.
They also served to bring about a separation of the sexes in the Order in the best possible manner.
In spite of this, the Exalted One declared that because of the founding of the Order of Nuns the dispensation would last only five hundred instead of a thousand years.
Following the Buddha's proclamation of the rules and regulations for nuns, Ananda asked him about the qualities a monk should have to be a teacher of nuns.
The Buddha did not reply that he had to be an arahant, a saint, but indicated eight practical and concrete qualities, which also someone like Ananda, who was not yet an arahant, could possess.
These eight qualities were: the teacher of nuns must be virtuous; second, have comprehensive knowledge of the Dhamma; third he must be well acquainted with the Vinaya, especially the rules for nuns; fourth, he must be a good speaker with a pleasant and fluent delivery, faultless in pronunciation, and intelligibly convey the meaning; fifth, he should be able to teach Dhamma to the nuns in an elevating, stimulating, and encouraging way; sixth, he must always be welcome to the nuns and liked by them — that is, they must be able to respect and esteem him not only when he praises them but especially when there is an occasion for reproach; seventh, he must never have committed sexual misconduct with a nun; eighth, he must have been a fully ordained Buddhist monk for at least years.
Since Ananda had been instrumental in the founding of the Order of Nuns, he now also wanted to help them to advance on the Noble Path.
This brought about some difficulties for him.
There were two occasions in which nuns stood up for him without justification against Kassapa.
One of them has been mentioned in Section, “Ananda's Renown.” Both nuns left the Order; they showed thereby that they were no longer able to sustain the necessary impersonal and purely spiritual relationship with their teacher, Ananda.
Even more extreme was the case of the nun in Kosambi, whose name is not known.
She sent a messenger to Ananda, asking him to visit her, as she was sick.
In reality she had fallen in love with Ananda and wanted to seduce him.
Ananda mastered the situation with complete aplomb.
In his sermon to her he explained that this body had arisen because of nutrition, craving and pride.
But one could use these three as means for purification.
Supported by nutrition, one could transcend nutrition.
Supported by craving, one could transcend craving.
Supported by pride, one could transcend pride.
The monk took in such nutriment as would enable him to lead the holy life.
He sublimated his craving and was supported by his longing for holiness.
And pride spurred him on to reach that which others had already attained, namely the realization of Dhamma in himself.
In this way he could, in due course, transcend nutrition, craving and pride.
But there was a fourth cause for the arising of the body, namely sexual intercourse, but this was an entirely different matter.
This had been called the destruction of the bridge to Nibbana by the Blessed One.
In no way could its sublimation be used as a path to holiness.
Thereupon the nun got up from the bed, prostrated before Ananda, confessed her offense and asked for forgiveness.
Ananda accepted the confession and declared that in the Order it was an advantage to confess one's faults and to restrain oneself thereafter.
This incident is an excellent example of Ananda's great skill to give a suitable Dhamma discourse on the spur of the moment, to find the right word at the right time.
Another incident happened with regard to the wives of King Pasenadi.
They had pondered over three things: seldom does a Buddha appear in the world, seldom is one reborn as a human being and seldom is one healthy in mind and body.
Yet in spite of the existence of these favorable conditions, they could not go to the monastery and hear the Dhamma.
As the king's women they were confined to the harem like birds in a cage, and that was really a disaster for them.
They went to the king and asked him to request the Buddha to send a monk to the palace to teach them the Dhamma.
The king promised.
The lay disciple praised by the Buddha — a non-returner — declined to do it, because it was a monk's duty.
Thereupon the king asked his wives which monk would be most acceptable to them They discussed it among themselves and unanimously requested the king that he should ask Ananda, the guardian of the Dhamma, to come and teach them.
The Blessed One complied with the request presented to him by the king and from then on Ananda taught Dhamma to the women.
One day during this period one of the crown jewels was stolen.
Everything was searched and the women felt very troubled because of the unrest occasioned thereby.
Because of this they were not as attentive and eager to learn as usual.
Ananda asked them for the reason and when he heard it, out of compassion he went to the king and advised him.
In order to make an end to the anxiety and unrest he told the king to summon everyone who could possibly be the thief and to give them an opportunity to return the jewel unobtrusively.
He should have a tent erected in the courtyard of the palace, put a large pot of water inside and have everyone enter alone.
So it was done, and the jewel thief, alone in the tent, let the jewel drop into the pot.
Thereby the king regained his property, the thief went unpunished, and peace reigned once again in the palace.
This incident increased Ananda's popularity even more and thereby the popularity of the Sakya monks.
The monks also praised Ananda, that he had restored peace through gentle means.
Shortly before the Buddha died, Ananda asked him a question concerning women: “How shall we relate to women, Master?” — “Do not look at them.” — “But if one sees one, Master?” — “Do not address her.” — “But if one talks to us?” — “Keep mindfulness and self-control.”.
This question was posed by Ananda in view of the imminent death of the Buddha, just before the preparations for the funeral.
This problem must therefore have been an important one for him.
For himself he did not need an admonition to practice self-control; sensual desire had been overcome by him for years.
But during the years he had seen how the problem of the relationship between the sexes again and again stirred the emotions.
The question may have been asked by him for this reason, but also on account of the warning of the Buddha that the Order was endangered through the foundation of the Nun's Order and its lifespan shortened.
He wanted to give his contemporaries and his successors a last word of the Buddha on this topic.
Of all the monks, Sariputta was Ananda's closest friend.
There does not seem to have been a close relationship between Ananda and his brother Anuruddha, because the latter preferred solitude, while Ananda was fond of people.
Sariputta was the disciple who most resembled the Master, and with whom he could talk in the same way as with the Buddha.
It is remarkable that of all the monks only Sariputta and Ananda received an honorary title from the Buddha: Sariputta was called the Commander-in-Chief of the Dhamma and Ananda its Guardian.
One can see their complementary roles in this.
Sariputta, the lion, was the active teacher; Ananda more the preserver and treasurer.
In certain aspects, Ananda's methods resembled more those of Maha-Moggallana, whose inclinations were also motherly and preserving.
Ananda and Sariputta often worked together, twice visited the sick Anathapindika together, dealt with the dispute of the monks of Kosambi, and had many Dhamma discussions with each other.
When Ananda received the message one day that Sariputta had died, he was deeply affected:
He felt physically quite wretched and even the Dhamma was not alive in him at that moment, such was the impact of the death message.
Then the Buddha afforded him great consolation.
He asked Ananda to reflect whether Sariputta had taken with him virtue or meditation, wisdom, liberation, or the purity of liberation?
Ananda had to agree that these, the only important aspects, had not changed.
But, he added, Sariputta had been such a helpful companion and friend for him and others.
Again the Buddha directed the conversation onto a higher level by reminding Ananda of what he, the Buddha, had always taught: that nothing that has arisen can remain forever.
The death of Sariputta was, for the other disciples, like cutting off the main branch of a large tree.
But that should only be another reason for relying on oneself, on no one else, and be one's own light and refuge.
Many discussions which Ananda had with other monks are also recorded.
Only a few can be related here.
One day the Venerable Vangisa accompanied Ananda on his alms round.
On the way Vangisa was overcome by dissatisfaction, the most dangerous illness of ascetics.
His heart was flooded by sensual desire.
All of a sudden a monk's life seemed senseless and a waste to him, but house and family life attractive and wholesome.
The Venerable Vangisa asked Ananda for help.
When Ananda became aware of what was going on in his companion, he spoke to him in verse, because Vangisa, the poet in the Sangha, had voiced his request also in verse.
Ananda said:
Ananda showed him that he constantly refueled sensual desire because his perception was not controlled, and so he became captivated by feminine charm.
When the feeling of deprivation became too strong it would manifest as weariness of mind and dissatisfaction, as a kind of aversion towards the ascetic life.
Therefore Vangisa had to contemplate soberly those things which seemed beautiful and desirable; then he would understand that the body was not beautiful.
This would be wholesome practice.
The monk Channa was plagued with doubts about the Dhamma.
He understood that the five aggregates are impermanent, but he was afraid of Nibbana, thought it to be the destruction of the ego.
So he came for advice to Ananda.
Ananda consoled him: he would understand the teaching, he was already beginning to break through the hard shell.
Channa was delighted and listened with undivided attention to Ananda's exposition of the Buddha's discourse on being and not-being.
Thereupon Channa exclaimed how wonderful it was to have such wise brothers as teachers.
Now he was firm in the Dhamma again.
If one considers as conversation also the silent, inner rapport with a Dhamma discourse, then the whole of the Pali Canon actually consists of Ananda's conversations with the Buddha.
He was almost always present when the Buddha gave a discourse, and not only during the time he was his attendant.
And those few discourses which the Blessed One had given in Ananda's absence he repeated for him afterwards.
We cannot repeat here all the dialogues between the Buddha and Ananda mentioned in the Pali Canon.
Some have already been mentioned.
The Buddha often addressed Ananda with a question or teachings, which were either meant for Ananda's spiritual growth or gave the occasion for a discourse to all the monks present.
It is always more stimulating for the listeners when two experts discuss a subject with each other, rather than only one speaking.
In this way many of the conversations between the Buddha and Ananda are discourses for the instruction of others.
One special occasion for a discourse was that the Buddha had smiled when he had came to a certain locality.
Ananda knew that a fully enlightened one does not smile without cause, and understood immediately that here was reason for a question.
So he asked the Awakened One why he had smiled.
Thereupon the Master gave detailed explanation of an incident in the past, a Jataka story, which had taken place at that locality.
The conversations in which Ananda asked the question and took the initiative are far more numerous than the ones the Buddha started.
For instance, Ananda asked whether there was a fragrance which went against the wind, different from that of flowers and blossoms.
The answer was: the fragrance of him who has taken the triple refuge, is virtuous and generous.
Another time Ananda asked how one could live happily in the Order.
The answer was: if one is virtuous oneself, but does not blame others for lack of virtue; if one watches oneself, but not others; if one does not worry about lack of fame; if one can obtain the four meditation absorptions without difficulty; and finally if one becomes a holy one, an arahant.
So here the first step on the path to holiness is mentioned as not criticizing or watching others, but only making demands on oneself.
Ananda asked what were the purposes and blessings of virtue.
The answer was: to be free of self-reproach, free of guilt feelings, with a clear conscience.
But Ananda asked further, what were the purposes and blessings of a clear conscience.
The Buddha replied, that it would bring joy in wholesome thoughts and actions, happiness with progress made and incentive for further striving.
And what would result from that?
One would experience exaltation in one's heart, being drawn towards the good and perfect bliss; and from that would further result deep calm and insight.
In this way Ananda inquired about many aspects of the Dhamma.
Sometimes Ananda reported certain views of his to the Buddha, so that the Buddha could either accept or correct them.
For instance he said that good friendship was half of the holy life.
Unexpectedly the Buddha disagreed: noble friendship was more than half it was all of it.
What would the holy life be like, if they had not all come to the Buddha, as their best friend, to be shown the right way?.
The best-known remark of Ananda must surely be the one where he said that causal arising was very profound, but it seemed quite clear to him.
Again the Buddha disagreed: it was profound, but very difficult to penetrate.
Because it was not properly understood, there was no liberation for beings caught in the wheel of life and death.
And then the Buddha explained to Ananda causal arising in its manifold aspects.
Once Ananda saw an archer perform extraordinary feats.
He told the Buddha how he had admired that.
The Buddha used this statement to draw an analogy.
He said it was more difficult to understand and penetrate the Four Noble Truths than to hit and penetrate with an arrow a hair split seven times.
Another report says that Ananda once saw the famous Brahman Janussoni, a disciple of the Buddha, driving along in his glorious, white chariot.
He heard the people exclaim that the chariot of the priest of King Pasenadi's court was the most beautiful and best of all.
Ananda reported this to the Buddha and asked him how one could describe the best chariot according to Dhamma.
The Buddha explained in a detailed analogy what the vehicle to Nibbana had to consist of: the draft-animals had to be faith and wisdom, moral shame the brake, intellect the reins, mindfulness the charioteer, virtue the accessories, jhana the axle, energy the wheels, equanimity the balance, renunciation the chassis; the weapons were love, harmlessness and solitude, and patience its armor.
A summary of Ananda's former lives shows that he was only seldom a god, seldom an animal, and mostly a human.
One can see that his most important aspect was as a human, while his brother Anuruddha had almost always been a god, and Devadatta very often an animal.
His close connection with the Buddha is shown in the fact that he was often his brother.
The examples of former lives given here will be mainly those which exemplify that he, too, had to exert himself to attain virtue.
Jataka.
He and the Bodhisatta were born as cousins among the outcastes or Candalas.
Their job was the fumigation of malodorous places.
In order to escape the contempt they were held in, they disguised themselves as young men of the Brahman caste and went to the University at Takkasila to study.
Their deceit was discovered and they were beaten up by their fellow students.
A wise and kindly man ordered the students to stop and advised the two Candalas to become ascetics.
They followed this advice, and in due course died; as punishment for their deceit, they were reborn as animals, namely as offspring of a doe.
They were inseparable and died together by the arrow of a hunter.
In the next life they were sea hawks and again died together because of a hunter.
With this, their existences below the human level came to an end.
Ananda was born as the son of a king and the Bodhisatta as the son of the priest at court.
While Ananda held the higher position in a worldly sense, the Bodhisatta had more inner abilities, because for one thing, he could remember all the above three lives.
But Ananda could only remember his life as a Candala.
At the age of sixteen, the Bodhisatta became a sincerely striving ascetic while Ananda became king.
Later on the Bodhisatta visited the king.
He praised the happiness of asceticism and explained the unsatisfactoriness of the world of the senses.
Ananda admitted that he realized this, but that he could not let go of his desires, that he was held fast like an elephant in a swamp.
Thereupon the Bodhisatta advised him that even as a king he could practice virtue, such as not levying unjust taxes, and supporting ascetics and priests.
But when hot passions arose in him, he should remember his mother.
How he had been completely helpless as a baby, and if his mother had not brought him up, he would never have become king.
Thereupon Ananda resolved to become an ascetic, and both attained to the brahma realm.
Jataka.
The Bodhisatta had been born as a poor laborer and endeavored to keep the fast days.
His longing to be reborn as a king was fulfilled.
Ananda lived in his kingdom as a poor water-carrier.
His whole fortune was a coin which he had hidden under a stone in a certain place.
When a festival was observed in the city, the water-carrier's wife urged him to enjoy himself too and asked him whether he had any money at all.
He said he had this coin but it was twelve miles away.
She replied he should get it and that she had saved up the same amount.
They could buy garlands, incense and drinks with that.
Ananda set out in spite of the midday heat, happy in the expectation of the festival.
When he passed through the courtyard of the king's palace he sang a song.
The king saw him and asked the reason for his joyfulness.
He answered that he did not notice the heat, as he was being driven by hot desire, and told his story.
The king asked how much his treasure amounted to, maybe one hundred thousand pieces?
When he finally heard that it was only one coin, he exclaimed that Ananda should not walk through the heat but that he would give him a similar coin.
Ananda replied that he was very grateful because then he would have two coins.
The king then offered him two coins but Ananda said he would fetch his own one nevertheless.
The king now became excited and raised his offer to millions, to the post of viceroy, but Ananda would not let go of his coin.
Only when the king offered him half his kingdom did he agree.
The kingdom was divided up, and Ananda was called King One Coin.
One day the two of them went hunting.
When they became tired, the Bodhisatta put his head in the lap of his friend and fell asleep.
Then the thought came to Ananda to kill the king and to rule the whole kingdom by himself.
He was drawing his sword, when he remembered how grateful, he — a poor yokel — should be to the king and how wicked it was of him to have such a wish arise.
He put his sword back in its sheath, but even a second and a third time he was overcome by the same desire.
Feeling that this thought might rise in him again and again and could lead him on to very evil deeds, he threw away his sword, woke the king, prostrated before him and asked his forgiveness.
The Bodhisatta forgave him and said he could have the whole kingdom and he would be satisfied to serve as viceroy under him.
But Ananda replied that he was finished with his lust for power, he wanted to become an ascetic.
He had seen the cause of desire and how it grew; now he wanted to pull it out by the roots.
He went to the Himalayas and reached perfect insight.
The Bodhisatta remained in the world.
Jataka.
The Bodhisatta was a righteous king of Benares who practiced the ten royal virtues, so that he gave alms, practiced the moral rules, and observed sacred days.
Now one of his ministers carried on an intrigue in his harem.
The gentle king waived the death penalty, only banished him and allowed him to take his family and fortune along.
The minister then went to live at a neighboring king's court, became his confidant and told him one could easily occupy Benares, because its king was much too gentle.
But the neighboring king, Ananda, was suspicious, because he was well acquainted with the strength and power of the State of Benares.
The minister advised him to experiment.
He should destroy one village of Benares.
If any of his men were caught, the king would probably even reward the prisoners.
True enough, when the marauders were brought before the Bodhisatta, and lamented they had plundered out of hunger, he gave them money.
This served to convince Ananda of the truth of the treacherous minister's words and he marched into the State of Benares.
The commander-in-chief of the Bodhisatta wanted to defend the kingdom, but the latter said that he did not want to be the cause of harm for others.
If the other king wanted his kingdom, he should have it.
He let Ananda capture him and put him into prison.
There he practiced loving-kindness meditation towards the rapacious King Ananda, who was struck down by a fever and plagued by a guilty conscience.
Ananda asked the Bodhisatta's pardon, returned his kingdom to him and swore to be his ally forever.
The Bodhisatta returned to his throne and spoke to his ministers about the virtues and rewards of harmlessness, saying that because he had made peace with the invaders, hundreds were spared death on the battlefield.
Then he renounced his throne, became an ascetic and attained to the brahma realm.
Ananda, however, remained king.
A welcome addition to Ananda's conversations with the Awakened One is the account concerning the last events in the life of the Buddha, in which Ananda played a leading role.
It is the Maha-Parinibbana Sutta, the discourse on the Buddha's passing away, his ultimate entrance into Nibbana.
These records convey a special mood, namely that of parting, which was especially painful for Ananda.
It is also the first small beginning of the decline of the Dhamma, which will slowly disappear with increased distance from the Buddha's lifetime, until a new Buddha arises.
This entire text gives, as it were, voice to the admonition to practice Dhamma while there is still chance.
It reflects once more Ananda's whole character, and therefore we will follow its course, and emphasize those points which are important as far as Ananda is concerned.
The first section of the Maha-Parinibbana Sutta starts at Rajagaha, the capital of the State of Magadha.
Devadatta's attempt to create a schism in the Sangha had happened seven years earlier.
King Ajatasattu reigned in Magadha.
King Pasenadi of Kosala had just been overthrown and the Sakya clan had come to its tragic end in which Ananda's brother, Prince Mahanama, was killed.
At that time, three famous warrior clans lived north of the Ganges, near the Himalayas.
They were the Koliyas, the Mallas and the Vajjians, all of which had retained relative independence from the Maharaja Ajatasattu.
He had the intention of destroying the Vajjians and to incorporate their land in his.
While the Buddha could not prevent the ruin of those Sakyans who had not entered the Order, because they had to pay a kammic debt, he did help the Vajjians and later indirectly also the Mallas.
This is the external “political” background of the last years of the Buddha's life.
In detail, this incident happened as follows:
The king gave orders to his minister, Vassakara, to go to the Buddha and to announce his intention to go into battle against the Vajjians.
While Vassakara delivered his message, Ananda stood behind the Buddha and fanned him.
The Awakened One turned to Ananda and put seven questions to him about the life style and conditions of the Vajjians.
Ananda declared that they often had council meetings in which they deliberated harmoniously, did not repeal their old laws, followed the advice of their elders, did not rape women, honored their temples and shrines, did not revoke gifts to religious places, and that they gave protection and hospitality to all true priests and ascetics.
With these seven qualities, said the Buddha, one could expect prosperity for the Vajjians, not decline.
Some time earlier the Buddha had given these seven rules to them.
The king's minister replied that even one of these qualities would be enough for their continued existence as a clan.
As long as the Vajjians kept to these seven rules, it would be impossible for the king to conquer them, except through inner dissension or treachery.
He left with this conviction in mind and reported to the king that it would be useless to start a war against the Vajjians.
Indians in those days had so much confidence in the spiritual strength of a people, that the hint of moral superiority was sufficient to prevent a war.
Only much later, after the death of the Buddha, was it possible for the king to overrun the Vajjians, and this only because they had meanwhile forsaken their moral integrity.
This highly political discussion was used by the Buddha as an occasion to request Ananda to call all monks of the area together.
He would give them an exhortation about seven things, which would serve for the continued existence of the Sangha.
The monks should assemble frequently, should conduct their affairs amicably, should not make new rules but obey the old ones, should honor the elders of the Sangha and give heed to their advice, should resist craving, enjoy solitude, and practice mindfulness at all times, so that like-minded persons would be attracted and those who were already living the holy life would be happy.
After the Buddha had spoken in this way to the monks, he gave them the following terse summary of the teaching, which recurs many times throughout this narrative:
That is virtue, that is concentration, that is wisdom.
Concentration fortified with virtue brings great benefits and great fruits.
Wisdom fortified with concentration brings great benefits and great fruits.
The mind fortified with wisdom becomes liberated from all taints, namely from the taint of sensual desire, the taint of  being and the taint of ignorance.
After this exhortation, the Buddha commenced his last journey.
He always went to places where there were people ready to understand Dhamma, or where misunderstandings needed to be sorted out, or where brute force could be prevented.
On this last journey he went first in the direction of the Ganges river to Nalanda, which later became a famous Buddhist teaching center.
This town was Sariputta's birthplace and here he took leave of the Buddha.
He wanted to stay there and teach Dhamma to his mother before he died.
When saying farewell, this great disciple voiced once more the Buddha's praise: “It is clear to me, Lord, that there is no one more distinguished in wisdom.
Then the Awakened One went with a large company of monks to Vesali.
This town was the capital of the Vajjians, whose virtue he had praised, and from whom he had averted the threat of King Ajatasattu's attack.
Why did the Buddha go to the capital of the Vajjians and spend the last of the forty-five rains retreats of his life in that vicinity?
It is not too far-fetched to think that this was meant as a non-aggressive warning to King Ajatasattu to keep the peace, and to the Vajjians to keep up their virtue.
At Vesali he became ill with a deadly disease.
He overcame it by will-power, as he did not want to die without having assembled the disciples once more.
That a Buddha can become ill is due to the imperfection of the body, but that he can master the illness at will is due to the perfection of the Awakened One.
Ananda had been extremely grieved about the Buddha's illness.
He was so worried that he could not think properly.
He related to the Buddha that he had found consolation in the fact that surely the Awakened One would not attain final Nibbana without having given regulations about the Community of monks.
But the Buddha rejected this.
What was there left to pronounce for the disciples?
He had taught the Dhamma in all its aspects and kept nothing secret.
Only one who believed that it was he who had to guide the monks, one who was still possessed of the “I am” conceit, could believe himself to be so important.
Furthermore the Buddha declared that he was now eighty, had reached old age, and could move the body only with difficulty, just like an old cart.
His body was only at ease when he entered upon and dwelled in the signless deliverance of the mind.
With this he implied that a Buddha's body is also subject to the law of impermanence.
But he immediately gave Ananda an antidote for the sadness caused by these words: “So Ananda, each of you should be an island unto himself, with himself and no other as his refuge; each of you should make the Dhamma his island, have the Dhamma and no other as his refuge.
The third chapter of the Discourse is located at Vesali, where the Buddha dwelled for the rains retreat.
One day he requested Ananda to take a sitting mat and to go with him to the Capala Shrine and pass the day there in meditation.
When they were seated the Blessed One looked at the peaceful landscape before him and reminded Ananda of the many beautiful spots in the vicinity.
The reason for this seemingly unmotivated description of the countryside becomes clear later.
The Buddha said that anyone who had developed the Four Bases to Success, had made them his vehicle and his foundation could, if he wished, live out the age.
The Exalted One had done all that, and he could, if requested, live to the end of this age.
Although Ananda was given such a plain and broad hint, which certainly coincided with his longing, he did not beg the Buddha to stay alive, out of compassion for all beings.
Not only once, but a second and third time, the Buddha addressed Ananda in this way.
But Ananda did not take these hints; in his confusion he was not himself, being ensnared by Mara.
Mara had power over him, as he had not yet fully purified himself.
At this moment Ananda, who usually was so circumspect, had lost his mindfulness, which previously had happened only in negligible matters.
Otherwise our whole aeon would have taken quite a different turn.
Could it be that Ananda was too much absorbed in the pleasant feeling of being at that moment in so close companionship with the Buddha, in that enchanting evening hour in the peaceful scenic environment of the sala forest?
Was it, perhaps, just this very attachment to the Buddha's company that prevented a response which properly should have issued out of that very attachment — a response that would have accorded with his deepest wishes for a longer life for the Exalted One?
If Mara had not intervened, Ananda would have asked the Buddha to accept the burden of a prolonged life, out of compassion for the world.
But Mara prevented it, because innumerable beings would have escaped his clutches in such an event.
This scene belongs to the mysteries of the Pali Canon and one could puzzle about it endlessly.
One can only accept the fact that it is our own doing which brought us into an age in which the person who could have kept the Awakened One alive to this day was blinded by Mara and remained silent.
Let us continue the account: The Buddha dismissed Ananda, who seated himself under a nearby tree and started meditating.
Then Mara appeared before the Buddha and reminded him of a promise made forty-five years before, immediately after his enlightenment: Mara had then requested the Buddha to enter final Nibbana and not to teach.
But the Buddha had replied that he would not die until he had established and well taught the four kinds of disciples, and until the holy life was well advanced.
But now that had been accomplished, Mara declared, and it was time to fulfill his promise.
The Buddha replied that he would attain final Nibbana in three months from that time.
One might wonder why the Buddha even gave Mara a promise and also why it was Mara, the Evil One, to whom he first announced the time of his death.
But just here the supreme detachment of an Awakened One becomes apparent.
He considered this mortal body, which he carried around, as belonging to Mara.
Immediately after enlightenment, the Awakened One had determined for himself how long he wanted to keep this body.
There is no reason for a Buddha to go back on such a resolve, and only  Mara would understand it is a “promise,” rather than a freely arrived at, voluntary ending.
In any case, the Buddha now dismissed the idea of remaining alive throughout the aeon.
He had to specifically let go of this possibility, as it seems to have been the norm for a Buddha to continue living.
When the Awakened One relinquished the will to live, there was a great earthquake, and thunder resounded, such was the powerful effect on the natural elements when he renounced them as a basis for life.
When Ananda became aware of the quake and thunder, he asked the Buddha for their cause.
The Buddha replied that there were eight reasons for earthquakes: there are occasions when great forces move, this was the first reason; or a monk or Brahman may possess supernormal power and have reached a certain kind of meditation, that was the second reason; while the last six concerned the conception, birth, enlightenment, the start of the teaching of the Dhamma, relinquishing the will to live, and final Nibbana of a Buddha.
One can see from this how deeply connected a Buddha, the highest of all beings, is with the whole cosmos.
The expositions that follow on eight kinds of assemblies, eight fields of mastery and eight liberations seem quite unmotivated in this context.
It appears to be one of those occasions for a spontaneously arisen discourse.
Scholars speak about insertions into the text because at first there were eight reasons for earthquakes, then three other “eights” were brought in.
In reality there is a deeper connection, designed to bring Ananda from the superficial to the profound and to let him know the quickly approaching death of the Buddha in such a way that it would not disturb him.
After the Buddha had helped to direct Ananda on the path towards enlightenment, he related how he had told Mara forty-five years ago that he would not attain final Nibbana until the Dhamma was well established.
Now Mara had appeared before him and he had told him he would live only for another three months.
Therefore he had now relinquished the will to live.
That had been the reason for the earthquake.
Thereupon Ananda begged the Awakened One three times that he should remain for the whole aeon.
But the Buddha replied that the appropriate time for this had lapsed.
When Ananda asked for the third time, the Buddha inquired whether he had faith in the Perfect One's enlightenment.
When Ananda affirmed this, he asked why then was he urging him three times.
Ananda replied that his reason was because the Awakened One had said he could remain for an aeon due to his practice of the four bases to success.
The Buddha asked whether Ananda had believed this.
Ananda affirmed it.
Then the Buddha made it clear to him that he had let the opportunity slip by — “what you missed in this hour, no eternity can return,” and told him that, if Ananda had then requested him, he would have complied the third time.
And he also reminded him that not only now, but already fifteen times previously he had made this statement to Ananda, that due to the four bases to success he could remain for a whole aeon.
Five of the places where he had said it were near Vesali, and it was in this respect that the Buddha had referred to them in the beginning of these accounts.
But Ananda had always remained silent.
Finally the Buddha added the admonition that he had always spoken about the impermanence of all phenomena, and that it was unthinkable that a perfect one should go back on his word.
In three months time he would attain final Nibbana.
Thereupon he requested Ananda to assemble the monks of the area.
He then addressed the assembly with the exhortation always to practice insight, so that this holy life may endure long for the welfare and happiness of many.
At the end of the discourse he made it known that he would pass away in three months.
He gave them some stanzas for contemplation; amongst them are these:
The fourth chapter of this account tells of the Buddha resuming his journeys after the rains retreat and declaring that he would not return to Vesali.
On the way he spoke to the monks on the same topics he had expounded earlier: that they had to travel through this long round of rebirths because they had not penetrated four things.
Before, he had named them as the four truths, but now he spoke on the four stages of the fourth truth: a noble one's virtue, a noble one's concentration, a noble one's wisdom, and a noble one's deliverance.
And again, as so often on his last journey, he emphasized concentration fortified by virtue.
At the next resting place he explained to the monks how they should act, if someone purported to quote his words.
One should remember these sentences and look for verification in the Vinaya or confirmation in the suttas.
If one could not find them there, then one would have to come to the conclusion that it had been wrongly learned by that person, and should reject it.
This admonition was extremely important for the faithful transmission of his words and has been the reason why to this day one can distinguish between the Buddha's own words and post-canonical or unauthentic texts.
After this, the Buddha journeyed to the province of the Mallas, the warrior clan nearest to the Himalayas.
It is possible that meantime he had also been in not-too-distant Savatthi, because it was there that the news of Sariputta's death reached him.
In the land of the Mallas, the neighbors of the Sakyas, he became seriously ill, after taking food from the goldsmith Cunda.
He had asked the goldsmith to give the mushroom dish only to him and to offer the monks something else.
Then he asked that the remainder of the dish be buried, because only a Buddha could digest it and no one else.
Also this second illness, cholera, was born by the Buddha with equanimity and he was not deterred from his journey.
He had difficulty speaking, though.
On the way he asked Ananda to spread his robe as he was exhausted and wished to rest.
Ananda should bring him some water from the nearby stream.
Ananda would have preferred to bring water from the river, because the stream had been churned up by many carts.
After the Buddha had repeated his request three times, however, the obedient Ananda went to the stream and saw that the water had become quite clear in the meantime.
He was delighted about his Master's magical powers.
A similar incident had happened earlier in the land of the Mallas where a well had been stopped up.
On the way, the Buddha met Pukkusa, a prince of the Mallas, a disciple of A.lara Kalama.
Pukkusa had been together with that ascetic some fifty years earlier.
Pukkusa started his conversation with the statement how astounding it was, what a deep peace those could achieve who had gone forth into homelessness.
Once his master had been so deeply concentrated that he did not see nor hear five-hundred carts passing by him and yet there was no question of his being asleep.
The Buddha countered this with the question, whether it was more difficult to be so deeply concentrated while there was thunder and lightning, and rain torrents coming down.
Pukkusa agreed with this.
Thereupon the Buddha related that he had abided once like that, while all around him oxen and plowmen were killed by lightning.
This account sufficed for Pukkusa to declare that the Buddha had thereby expounded the Dhamma in its manifold aspects; he took refuge and became a lay disciple, the last one in the Buddha's lifetime.
Then he presented two sets of golden-hued robes to the Buddha.
The Buddha asked that he give one to him and the other one to Ananda.
On this occasion Ananda did not reject the gift.
He remarked that the golden hue of the robe was almost without brilliance compared to the bright radiance of the Buddha's skin.
The Exalted One said that there are two occasions when the complexion of the Perfect One becomes exceptionally clear and bright: on the day of enlightenment and on the day of his death.
In the last hours of the following night he would attain final Nibbana.
After he had taken a bath in the vicinity, the Buddha turned to Ananda and said that no one should reproach the goldsmith Cunda that the Buddha had died after taking a meal from him.
There were two offerings in the world that are best: the almsfood after which the Bodhisatta becomes enlightened and the almsfood after which he attains final Nibbana.
Cunda would gain much merit from his gift: his life would be prolonged and his well-being heightened.
He would gain much influence, fame and a heavenly rebirth.
The fifth chapter starts with the Buddha's request to Ananda to accompany him to the region of Kusinara, to the sala-tree grove of the Mallas.
When they arrived, Ananda arranged a couch for him, with the head to the north, between two large sala trees.
Although it was not the right season, the trees were in flower and sprinkled their blossoms over the body of the Buddha.
And blossoms of the heavenly mandarava tree fell from the sky, together with heavenly scents, and there was music of the spheres.
This peaceful, idyllic picture of the last hours of the founder of Buddhism has been compared with the death of Jesus Christ by a Japanese Buddhist, D.T.
Suzuki.
In both cases the deaths of the founders have become symbols for those who follow their teachings.
The Awakened One then said that veneration for him through heavenly music, scents, and blossoms was not honoring him the right way: who, as a disciple of the Master, enters upon the proper way and practices the Dhamma, he honors the Perfect One with the highest reverence.
Just then, the Venerable Upavana was fanning the Blessed One.
When the Buddha requested Upavana to stand aside, Ananda wanted to know why he was so summarily dismissed.
The Buddha explained that innumerable deities had come from all directions of the world to have a last glance at a fully enlightened one, who so seldom can be seen.
But since Upavana, an eminent monk, was standing in front of him, they could not see him.
Upavana's spiritual radiance must have been more powerful than the penetrative ability of the gods.
Ananda inquired further into details about the gods and learned that some were weeping and wailing, but that those free from sense desire were resigned and calm.
The Buddha gave Ananda another directive: there were four places in the world worthy of veneration, which would inspire a faithful follower — the birthplace of the Buddha, the place of enlightenment, the place where he taught the Law for the first time and the place of final Nibbana.
All those who would travel to visit these shrines with confident hearts would attain a heavenly rebirth.
Seemingly out of context, Ananda asked the question, already narrated, how one should act towards women.
Following that, he asked how to deal with the body of the Blessed One.
That was a matter for lay people, the Buddha replied; the monks should be concerned with striving for their own deliverance.
Then Ananda wanted to know how the lay people should carry out the funeral ceremony.
The Buddha gave detailed instructions about the cremation and the erection of a stupa.
There were four beings worthy of a stupa: a perfect Buddha; an enlightened one who does not teach; a disciple who is an arahant — fully enlightened; and a universal monarch.
He who worships there would also attain good results.
Then Ananda, overpowered by grief, went aside, clasped the door jamb and wept.
He knew he still had to battle and conquer, and the Master, who had compassion on him, would soon be no more.
What remained as the fruit of his twenty-five years of service?
This famous scene is often depicted in Buddhist art and is reminiscent of the weeping Christians beneath the cross.
When the Buddha did not see Ananda near him and inquired where he was, he had him summoned and said to him: “Do not sorrow.
Have I not told you many times that everything changes and vanishes?
How could something that came to being and was formed not be destroyed?
For a long time, Ananda, you have attended the Perfect One, gladly, sensitively, sincerely and without reserve, with bodily acts of loving-kindness, as well as with speech and thoughts.
You have made great merit, Ananda; keep on endeavoring and soon you will be free from all taints.
Following this, he told him an incident of long ago, in which Ananda already served him and made much worldly merit.
After the Awakened One had foretold a second time that Ananda would soon attain arahantship, he turned to the monks and once more proclaimed the praise of Ananda: all the Buddhas of the past had had such excellent attendants and all Buddhas of the future would have them too.
His skill in dealing with people was admirable.
Each assembly of monks who were taught by Ananda, were always overjoyed and everyone wanted to listen to him further.
Ananda had such remarkable, extraordinary popularity, as one otherwise only finds in a universal monarch.
Here too, as so often in the texts, one can find the two ways he addressed Ananda: on the one hand, great praise for him and a summons to the monks to appreciate his greatness; on the other hand, however, always the reminder to overcome the last defilements.
After this praise, Ananda turned the conversation to another topic.
He suggested that it might be better if the Buddha did not die here in the backwoods, but in one of the great capitals, such as Savatthi, Rajagaha, Kosambi, or Benares.
It is noteworthy, that he did not propose the Buddha's hometown of Kapilavatthu.
It would have been the most appropriate with respect to distance as well as suitability.
But Kapilavatthu had been ransacked and almost destroyed recently by the son of King Pasenadi.
So Ananda did not mention it, just as he did not mention Vesali, because the Buddha had said that he would not return there.
Ananda thought that the funeral ceremony could be performed better in one of the large cities by the lay followers living there.
But the Buddha, lying on his deathbed, explained to him in great detail, why Kusinara was not an unimportant place at all.
The Buddha had lived there a long time ago as the universal monarch Maha-Sudassana, and he had left his body there no less than six times as the universal monarch; this was the seventh and last time.
The splendor and magnificence of that kingdom had been destroyed, had disappeared and vanished.
This, indeed, was enough to make one weary of all conditioned things as one of the most famous stanzas of the Dhamma taught:
The Buddha's discourse about Maha-Sudassana was the last great teaching he gave.
Subsequently he let Ananda summon the Mallas of Kusinara, so that they could bid farewell to him.
At that time, a wanderer called Subhadda was in Kusinara and heard about the forthcoming final Nibbana of the Buddha.
He thought that it was rare that a Buddha appeared in the world.
Therefore it would be well if he could have a doubt resolved by him, before it was too late.
He begged Ananda to let him approach the Buddha.
Ananda refused him, saying that the Master should not be troubled any more.
Ananda refused permission three times, out of love for his master.
But the Buddha told Ananda to let the wanderer approach him, because he wanted to inquire for the sake of knowledge and not to cause trouble.
Subhadda then asked him a question about which teaching was actually correct, as some of the teachers of different sects contradicted each other.
The Buddha replied that he would rather teach him the Dhamma: wherever one follows the Noble Eightfold Path, there one can find the true holy life, there the four fruits of the homeless life would be found.
If monks live in the right way, then the world will never be devoid of arahants, or true saints.
Over fifty years he has been a monk and had expounded the Dhamma — and apart from adherence to Dhamma there could be no holy life.
This short discourse was sufficient for Subhadda, just as it had been for Pukkusa, to realize the Dhamma in its manifold aspects and to go for refuge to the Buddha and ask for admission into the order of monks.
The Buddha remarked about the rule, according to which wanderers of other sects had to be put on probation for four months.
Subhadda agreed readily, he even wanted to be put on probation for four years.
Thereupon the Buddha accepted him immediately, making a last exception, and this very last monk disciple of the Buddha soon became an arahant.
The sixth part of this narrative which now follows, begins with the last instructions of the Buddha: first of all the monks should never think, after his death, that they now did not have a teacher anymore, because now the Dhamma and Vinaya would be their teacher.
To this day, the word of the Buddha laid down in the texts is decisive for the followers of his teaching.
Second, after his death the monks should no longer address each other indiscriminately as “friend.” The senior monks, senior in years in the Order, could address the junior ones as “friend” or with their names, while the junior ones should use “Venerable Sir.” This rule also served as an affirmation of the tradition which was now to be lived by the senior monks as an example, and which should be honored in them instead of honoring the Buddha.
This is the way of reverence according to seniority in the Order and does not depend on any qualities that monks or nuns may have.
The third rule gave the monks permission to abolish the lesser and minor rules and all they entailed, according to their own judgment.
After his death some details would be difficult to understand and might be considered petty.
As a guarantee that at least the main rules would be followed, the assembly of monks might decree that minor rules would no longer be binding.
Whoever wanted could keep them, but there would be no compulsion any more.
The fourth and last instruction was to impose the higher penalty on the monk Channa.
Ananda asked how that was to be understood.
The Buddha explained that Channa was not to be spoken to or advised or instructed, no matter what he did.
After these primarily external directions which Ananda was to fulfill, the Buddha once more turned to the whole assembly of monks and asked them whether they had any doubt or problem concerning actions or teachings of the Enlightened One, the content and meaning of the Dhamma, the order of monks and, above all, about the Path or the way of practice.
Those were the four important points for questions.
They should consider them, so that they would not regret it later when the voice of the Teacher had been silenced.
But upon being asked three times, the group did not respond.
Thereupon Ananda said it was amazing that not even one monk had any doubts.
The Buddha corrected him once again, because Ananda could not know for sure that really no one had any doubts.
It was possible that a monk did not want to voice his doubt or that he was not conscious of it in this last hour.
Only with such total knowledge could one speak in this manner.
But in reality it was exactly as Ananda had said.
The Buddha showed in this way the difference between Ananda's confidence and his own, the Perfect One's, insight.
The least of the five-hundred monks present was a stream-winner, because the absence of doubt is one of the signs of this attainment.
And once more the Master turned to the assembly of monks to give them his final words of farewell:
Now, monks, I declare this to you: It is the nature of all formed things to dissolve.
Strive with diligence!
After the Exalted One had spoken these last words, he entered into the four jhanas and the formless spheres of meditation absorption, until he attained the stage of cessation of perception and feeling.
He thus went once more through the whole sequence of meditation states up to that of cessation.
While the Master was reclining on the couch and going through the jhanas, Ananda said to his brother Anuruddha: “The Exalted One has attained final Nibbana, Venerable Sir.” He no longer addressed him as “friend,” but as a senior monk, although both had been ordained on the same day.
Anuruddha, however, had the divine eye and corrected him: the Buddha was absorbed in the state of “cessation,” but had not yet passed away.
To recognize this last subtle difference of a state of mind was only possible for an arahant, who was — like Anuruddha — skilled in clairvoyance.
Subsequently the Buddha entered the nine stages of concentration in reverse order, back to the first jhana.
Then he attained again to the four jhanas, and during his absorption in the fourth jhana his body died.
As soon as his body ceased to live, an earthquake and thunder occurred, just as he had predicted.
The Brahma Sahampati, who had induced the Buddha to teach and who himself was a non-returner, spoke a stanza, which pointed to the impermanence of even a Buddha's body.
The king of the gods, Sakka, also spoke a stanza.
He who was also a stream-winner, recited once more the famous lines which the Buddha had proclaimed during his own discourse: “Conditions truly they are transient.” As a third, Anuruddha gave voice to two verses: Peaceful had been the death of the Master, without mortal pangs, gentle like a lamp he was extinguished.
But Ananda lamented:
And all those of the five-hundred monks who had not yet attained full liberation from passions, lamented like Ananda.
Anuruddha, however, consoled them all.
He pointed to the immutable law of impermanence and turned their attention to the presence of invisible deities, amongst whom there were also those who lamented and those who were free of passions, fully enlightened.
He passed the rest of the night talking to his brother about the Dhamma.
In the forty-three years of their lives as homeless ones, not a single conversation about the Dhamma seems to have taken place between these two very dissimilar brothers.
But now Anuruddha devoted himself to his brother, who was in need of consolation.
Towards morning Anuruddha asked him to take the message of the final Nibbana of the Buddha to the Mallas.
Out of the circle of close disciples Anuruddha seems to have naturally taken over the role of the one who gives the directives.
And Ananda went to the town and informed the Mallas.
Thereupon the Mallas gathered all the requisites for a great funeral ceremony, such as flowers and incense, and went in a procession to the sala-tree forest.
There they paid homage to the body of the Buddha with festive dance, singing, and music, with banners and flags, with flowers and incense, until the seventh day.
One may wonder why they thought of festivities at such a time.
But why should they grieve?
That would change nothing.
They showed respect and veneration for the Master with their dancing and singing.
They exulted that a Buddha had appeared in the world, that they had heard more or less of his Dhamma, that he had wandered through India for such a long time teaching the multitudes, and that he had founded the Sangha to preserve the Dhamma.
In the seventh day they erected a pyre for the cremation.
At this time, Maha-Kassapa, who had not been with the Buddha, during his last days, was on his way to Kusinara, with a group of monks.
He met a naked wanderer on the road and asked him about the Master.
The wanderer replied that he had attained final Nibbana seven days before.
Then the monks in his company who had not become holy ones yet, grieved and lamented.
One of the monks present, however, declared that it was a good thing that the stern ascetic had died, because now one could do again what one pleased.
So soon the voice of the world, the voice of craving, had made itself heard.
This monk, whose name also happened to be Subhadda, just as the last disciple of the Buddha, expressed what ignoble beings feel towards a Buddha: he is a troublesome reproach for them, a disturber of their superficial ways.
When the Mallas wanted to light the funeral pyre, they were unable to do so.
Anuruddha said that the deities were preventing them, because they wanted to wait for the arrival of the venerable Kassapa.
The venerable Kassapa soon arrived and, together with his company of monks, he circumambulated the corpse as a last mark of respect towards the “Giver of the Deathless.” Then the funeral pyre ignited itself.
The corpse burned until only the bones remained; no ashes were to be seen.
When the neighboring clans heard the news of the Master's death, they all sent messengers to ask for relics, so that they could erect stupas for them.
However, the Mallas requested the relics for themselves, because the Buddha had died on their land.
Only when a Brahman urged them not to have a dispute about the relics of the greatest peace-maker, and suggested that they divide everything unto eight parts, did they relent.
So it came about that the bones of the Buddha were divided into eight parts.
The Brahman asked for the urn, and another clan received the ashes of the coals.
In this way ten stupas were erected as memorials.
Ananda said in verse about himself
After the funeral ceremonies were over, Ananda saw only one duty left to him, namely to attain to total liberation as prophesied to him by the Buddha.
Kassapa advised him to live in the forest in the province of the Kosala, which was near the Mallas and the Sakyans.
When it became known that the Buddha's cousin was living in solitude in the forest nearby, he was inundated with visitors.
The lay disciples wanted to be consoled about the death of the Buddha and also about the death of Sariputta and Moggallana, as well as the death of their just and beloved King Pasenadi.
All four had died within the year.
Day and night, in the village and in the forest, Ananda had to console the lay disciples and was never alone.
Thereupon a deity who lived in the forest appeared to him.
He was concerned about Ananda's spiritual progress and advised him as follows:
The venerable Ananda, exhorted by the deity, was stirred again to a sense of urgency.
In the meantime the venerable Maha-Kassapa had decided to call a council of monks together to strengthen the Teaching and the Discipline.
Because of unsafe conditions in the country of Kosala, the council was to take place in Rajagaha under the protection of King Ajatasattu.
All living arahants, almost five hundred, were to take part and, in addition, Ananda, the only one who was a non-arahant.
Ananda knew most of the discourses of the Buddha and therefore was indispensable to the council.
When the date set for the council came closer, Anuruddha suggested that his brother Ananda should only be admitted if he had overcome the last taints and had become an arahant.
He knew the power of such an incentive.
When Ananda heard this, he decided to employ every bit of strength and ability he possessed to realize Nibbana.
He practiced the four foundations of mindfulness, a way which came most natural to him according to his tendencies.
In the early hours of the morning, when he wanted to rest after his exertion, he knew without a doubt the he had attained release from all passions.
The next day the council began.
A place had been kept for him.
Ananda appeared through the air through supernatural power and sat down at his place.
When Anuruddha and Kassapa became aware that he had become an arahant, they expressed their brotherly joy with him and opened the council, which took place during the rains retreat.
Other monks could not come to Rajagaha at this time.
During the council, Kassapa questioned the Keeper of the discipline, Upali, about each rule and its origin, so that the Vinaya was laid down first.
The next item on the agenda was the Doctrine.
Kassapa asked Ananda first about the longest discourses, then about the middle-length ones, and then the other collections.
After the recitation of the Dhamma and Discipline, Ananda mentioned those matters which the Buddha had left as a legacy with him to settle.
He told the assembly that the Master had allowed the lesser rules to be abolished.
The holy monks could not agree what was meant by “lesser rules.” Thereupon Kassapa suggested: the lay people would say that the monks had become slothful after the death of the Master, if now they abolished rules.
Since it was not known which rules were meant, it would be best not to abolish any of them.
In that case one would be sure not to act against the Master's wishes.
And so it was done.
The elder monks present said it had been a breach of the training rules that Ananda had not asked which rules were meant, and he should confess this as a wrongdoing.
Second, he was accused of having sewn a robe for the Exalted One, after having stepped on it.
He replied that nothing had been further from his mind than disrespect for the Blessed One.
Nevertheless, if the venerable ones considered it a wrongdoing, he would acknowledge it as such.
Third, he was criticized for the fact that he had allowed women to salute the remains of the Blessed One first.
He replied that at the time of the funeral arrangements, he had thought it would not be an unsuitable time for them and therefore he had allowed them to pay their homage first.
But here too he would accept their verdict.
The fourth accusation which the monks leveled at Ananda, referred to the time when he had neglected to beg the Blessed One to remain for an aeon.
Ananda defended himself by saying he had been possessed by Mara at the time, and therefore had not been responsible for his actions — how could he have otherwise failed to make this request?
Ananda's behavior in the face of these accusations was exemplary: he submitted to the judgment of the other holy ones, although he, himself, could not see any wrongdoing, a fact which he did not fail to mention.
Subsequently Ananda reported the second instruction, which the Buddha had given immediately before his death, namely imposing the higher penalty on the monk Channa.
The present assembly requested Ananda to present this decision to Channa himself.
Ananda objected that Channa was a violent and unruly person.
The assembly advised him to take a number of monks along.
Leading a large group he journeyed to Kosambi where Channa was living, and informed him of the last will of the Buddha, that he had been declared dead in the Order.
This penalty had been explained by the Buddha to the horse trainer Kesi.
He would use it against monks who could not be changed to wholesomeness either through admonition or discipline.
Whoever could not be trained in this way would be considered as dead in the Order: he would not be spoken to, whatever he did.
When Channa heard this, he became so horrified that he lost consciousness.
When he regained his sense, he was deeply ashamed that the Master had proclaimed this penalty against him as his last instruction given to the Order.
This gave him the impetus to put forth his most strenuous effort; within a short time he became an arahant.
So this penalty showed itself to be the Buddha's last act of compassion for the benefit and happiness of the monk Channa, being effective even after the Buddha's death.
When Channa had become a holy one, he went to Ananda and begged him for a repeal of the penalty.
Ananda replied that as soon as he had attained release from the passions, the penalty was no longer operative in any case.
After the death of the Buddha, the venerable Maha-Kassapa, as the most respected disciple, had taken over the guidance of the Order.
He had however not the status of being a “refuge” as the Buddha had been, nor was he his deputy.
He was simply the foremost of the monks with the ten higher qualities.
He was, so to say, the symbol for the observance of Dhamma and Discipline.
Everyone turned to him for all questions regarding the Order.
In this way he became the Elder of the Sangha.
After him Ananda became the second leading elder, the second most venerated holy one, who was designated to look after the Order.
After he had already been a monk for over forty years, he survived the Buddha another forty.
And after having been the personal attendant of the Buddha for twenty-five years, he became the foremost of the holy ones for a similar length of time.
At the time of the second council, one hundred years after the final Nibbana of the Buddha, a personal disciple of Ananda was still alive.
He was a very old monk by name of Sabbakami, who — it was said — had been in the Order for one hundred and twenty years.
When Ananda reached one hundred and twenty years, he felt that his death was near.
He went from Rajagaha on a journey to Vesali, just as his master had done.
When the king of Magadha and the princes of Vesali heard that Ananda would soon die, they hurried to him from both directions to bid him farewell.
In order to do justice to both sides, Ananda chose a way to die in keeping with his gentle nature: he raised himself into the air through his supernormal powers and let his body be consumed by the fire element.
The relics were divided and stupas erected.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
This index can help you locate sutta translations, articles, transcribed talks, books, and other things on this website.
This is not an exhaustive index: not every text is indexed here, nor have I included references to each and every occurrence of a given topic in the texts.
Nevertheless, I hope you find it helpful in steering you in the right direction.
The tilde stands for the head-word in a given entry.
Short essays and individual chapters from books are shown in quotation marks.
Books and longer works are shown in italics.
Links to terms listed elsewhere in this index are shown in bold face.
There are more than, web pages on this site, containing hundreds of books, articles, sutta translations, and more — all of which may be a bit overwhelming if you're new to the site or to the teachings of Theravada Buddhism.
Here are some starting points to help you get oriented.
“Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will listen when discourses that are words of the Tathagata — deep, deep in their meaning, transcendent, connected with emptiness — are being recited.
We will lend ear, will set our hearts on knowing them, will regard these teachings as worth grasping & mastering.' That's how you should train yourselves.
The Pali canon contains many thousands of suttas, of which more than one thousand are now available in English translation here at Access to Insight.
When faced with such a vast store of riches, three questions naturally spring to mind: Why should I read the suttas?
Which ones should I read?
How should I read them?
There are no simple cookie-cutter answers to these questions; the best answers will be the ones you discover on your own.
Nevertheless, I offer here a few ideas, suggestions, and tips that I've found to be helpful over the years in my own exploration of the suttas.
Perhaps you'll find some of them helpful, too.
The short answer is: Whichever ones you like.
It can be helpful to think of the Dhamma as a multi-faceted jewel, with each sutta offering a glimpse of one or two of those facets.
For example, there are teachings of the four Noble Truths and the Eightfold Path; of dana and sila; of mindfulness of breathing and mindfulness of death; of living skillfully as a layperson or as an ordained monk.
No single sutta says it all; each one depends upon all the others to paint a complete picture of the Buddha's teachings.
The more widely you can read in the suttas, the more complete your picture of this jewel becomes.
As a starting point, every student of Buddhism should study, reflect upon, and put into practice the Five Precepts and the Five Subjects for Daily Contemplation.
Furthermore, we should take to heart the Buddha's advice to his young son, Rahula, which concerns our basic responsibilities whenever we perform an intentional act of any kind.
From there, you can follow along with the Buddha's own step-by-step or “graduated” system of teachings that encompasses the topics of generosity, virtue, heaven, drawbacks of sensuality, renunciation, and the four Noble Truths.
If you're interested in a solid grounding on the basics of the Buddha's teachings, three suttas are widely regarded as essential reading: Setting the Wheel of Dhamma in Motion, The Discourse on the Not-self Characteristic, and The Fire Sermon.
Together, these suttas — the “Big Three” of the Sutta Pitaka — define the essential themes of the Buddha's teachings that reappear in countless variations throughout the Canon.
In these suttas we are introduced to such fundamental notions as: the Four Noble Truths; the nature of dukkha; the Eightfold Path; the “middle way”; the “wheel” of the Dhamma; the principle of anatta and the analysis of one's “self” into the five aggregates; the principle of shedding one's enchantment with sensual gratification; and the many planes of being that characterize the vast range of Buddhist cosmology.
These basic principles provide a sturdy framework upon which all the other teachings in the Canon can be placed.
Furthermore, these three suttas demonstrate beautifully the Buddha's remarkable skill as teacher: he organizes his material in clear, logical, and memorable ways by using lists; he engages his listeners in an active dialogue, to help them reveal for themselves the errors in their understanding; he conveys his points by using similes and imagery that his listeners readily understand; and, most significantly, time and again he connects with his listeners so effectively that they are able to realize for themselves the transcendent results that he promises.
Seeing the Buddha for the extraordinarily capable teacher that he is encourages us to proceed even deeper into the Canon, confident that his teachings won't lead us astray.
A few other fruitful points of departure:
When you find a sutta that captures your interest, look for others like it.
From there, wander at will, picking up whatever gems catch your eye along the way.
To get the most from your sutta studies, it can be helpful to consider a few general principles before you actually begin reading and, once you've begun reading a sutta, to bear in mind a few questions as you read.
It is probably best not to let yourself get too comfortable with any one particular translation, whether of a word or of an entire sutta.
Just because, for example, one translator equates “suffering” with dukkha or “Unbinding” with nibbana, doesn't mean that you should accept those translations as truth.
Try them on for size, and see how they work for you.
Allow plenty of room for your understanding to change and mature, and cultivate a willingness to consider alternate translations.
Perhaps, over time, your own preferences will change.
Remember that any translation is just a convenient — but provisional — crutch that you must use until you can come to your own first-hand understanding of the ideas it describes.
If you're really serious about understanding what the suttas are about, you'll just have to bite the bullet and learn some Pali.
But there's an even better way: read the translations and put the teachings they contain into practice until you get the results promised by the Buddha.
Mastery of Pali is, thankfully, not a prerequisite for Awakening.
To facilitate this slow ripening process, allow yourself plenty of room for the suttas.
Don't cram your sutta reading in among all your other activities.
Don't read too many suttas all at once.
Make sutta study a special, contemplative activity.
It should be a pleasant experience.
If it becomes dry and irritating, put it all aside and try again in a few days, weeks, or months.
Sutta study calls for more than simply reading it once or twice and telling yourself, “There.
I've 'done' the Satipatthana Sutta.
What's next?” After you finish reading a sutta, take a little time out afterwards for some breath meditation to give the teachings a chance to settle down into the heart.
As you read a sutta, keep in mind that you are eavesdropping on the Buddha as he teaches someone else.
Unlike many of the Buddha's contemporaries from other spiritual traditions, who would often adhere to a fixed doctrine when answering every question, the Buddha tailored his teachings to meet the particular needs of his audience.
It is therefore important to develop a sensitivity to the context of a sutta, to see in what ways the circumstances of the Buddha's audience may be similar to your own, so you can gauge how best to apply the Buddha's words to your own life situation.
As you read, it can be helpful to keep certain questions circulating gently in the back of your mind, both to help you understand the context of the sutta and to help you tune in to the different levels of teaching that are often going on at once.
These questions aren't meant to make you into a Buddhist literary scholar; they're simply meant to help each sutta come alive for you.
Theravada, the “Doctrine of the Elders,” is the school of Buddhism that draws its scriptural inspiration from the Tipitaka, or Pali canon, which scholars generally agree contains the earliest surviving record of the Buddha's teachings.
For many centuries, Theravada has been the predominant religion of continental Southeast Asia and Sri Lanka.
Today Theravada Buddhists number well over million worldwide.
In recent decades Theravada has begun to take root in the West.
The Buddha — the “Awakened One” — called the religion he founded Dhamma-vinaya — “the doctrine and discipline.” To provide a social structure supportive of the practice of Dhamma-vinaya, and to preserve these teachings for posterity, the Buddha established the order of bhikkhus and bhikkhunis — the Sangha — which continues to this day to pass his teachings on to subsequent generations of laypeople and monastics, alike.
As the Dhamma continued its spread across India after the Buddha's passing, differing interpretations of the original teachings arose, which led to schisms within the Sangha and the emergence of as many as eighteen distinct sects of Buddhism.
One of these schools eventually gave rise to a reform movement that called itself Mahayana and that referred to the other schools disparagingly as Hinayana.
What we call Theravada today is the sole survivor of those early non-Mahayana schools.
To avoid the pejorative tone implied by the terms Hinayana and Mahayana, it is common today to use more neutral language to distinguish between these two main branches of Buddhism.
Because Theravada historically dominated southern Asia, it is sometimes called “Southern” Buddhism, while Mahayana, which migrated northwards from India into China, Tibet, Japan, and Korea, is known as “Northern” Buddhism.
The language of the Theravada canonical texts is Pali, which is based on a dialect of Middle Indo-Aryan that was probably spoken in central India during the Buddha's time.
Ven.
Ananda, the Buddha's cousin and close personal attendant, committed the Buddha's sermons to memory and thus became a living repository of these teachings.
Shortly after the Buddha's death, five hundred of the most senior monks — including Ananda — convened to recite and verify all the sermons they had heard during the Buddha's forty-five year teaching career.
Most of these sermons therefore begin with the disclaimer, “Evam me sutam” — “Thus have I heard.
After the Buddha's death the teachings continued to be passed down orally within the monastic community, in keeping with an Indian oral tradition that long predated the Buddha.
By BCE the Sangha had systematically arranged and compiled these teachings into three divisions: the Vinaya Pitaka, the Sutta Pitaka, and the Abhidhamma Pitaka.
Together these three are known as the Tipitaka, the “three baskets.” In the third century BCE Sri Lankan monks began compiling a series of exhaustive commentaries to the Tipitaka; these were subsequently collated and translated into Pali beginning in the fifth century CE.
The Tipitaka plus the post-canonical texts together constitute the complete body of classical Theravada literature.
Pali was originally a spoken language with no alphabet of its own.
It wasn't until about BCE that the Tipitaka was first fixed in writing, by Sri Lankan scribe-monks, who wrote the Pali phonetically in a form of early Brahmi script.
Since then the Tipitaka has been transliterated into many different scripts.
Although English translations of the most popular Tipitaka texts abound, many students of Theravada find that learning the Pali language — even just a little bit here and there — greatly deepens their understanding and appreciation of the Buddha's teachings.
No one can prove that the Tipitaka contains any of the words actually uttered by the historical Buddha.
Practicing Buddhists have never found this problematic.
Unlike the scriptures of many of the world's great religions, the Tipitaka is not regarded as gospel, as an unassailable statement of divine truth, revealed by a prophet, to be accepted purely on faith.
Instead, its teachings are meant to be assessed firsthand, to be put into practice in one's life so that one can find out for oneself if they do, in fact, yield the promised results.
It is the truth towards which the words in the Tipitaka point that ultimately matters, not the words themselves.
Although scholars will continue to debate the authorship of passages from the Tipitaka for years to come, the Tipitaka will quietly continue to serve — as it has for centuries — as an indispensable guide for millions of followers in their quest for Awakening.
Shortly after his Awakening, the Buddha delivered his first sermon, in which he laid out the essential framework upon which all his later teachings were based.
This framework consists of the Four Noble Truths, four fundamental principles of nature that emerged from the Buddha's radically honest and penetrating assessment of the human condition.
He taught these truths not as metaphysical theories or as articles of faith, but as categories by which we should frame our direct experience in a way that conduces to Awakening:
Because of our ignorance of these Noble Truths, because of our inexperience in framing the world in their terms, we remain bound to samsara, the wearisome cycle of birth, aging, illness, death, and rebirth.
Craving propels this process onward, from one moment to the next and over the course of countless lifetimes, in accordance with kamma, the universal law of cause and effect.
According to this immutable law, every action that one performs in the present moment — whether by body, speech, or mind itself — eventually bears fruit according to its skillfulness: act in unskillful and harmful ways and unhappiness is bound to follow; act skillfully and happiness will ultimately ensue.
As long as one remains ignorant of this principle, one is doomed to an aimless existence: happy one moment, in despair the next; enjoying one lifetime in heaven, the next in hell.
Because the roots of ignorance are so intimately entwined with the fabric of the psyche, the unawakened mind is capable of deceiving itself with breathtaking ingenuity.
The solution therefore requires more than simply being kind, loving, and mindful in the present moment.
The practitioner must equip him- or herself with the expertise to use a range of tools to outwit, outlast, and eventually uproot the mind's unskillful tendencies.
For example, the practice of generosity erodes the heart's habitual tendencies towards craving and teaches valuable lessons about the motivations behind, and the results of, skillful action.
The practice of virtue guards one against straying wildly off-course and into harm's way.
The cultivation of goodwill helps to undermine anger's seductive grasp.
The ten recollections offer ways to alleviate doubt, bear physical pain with composure, maintain a healthy sense of self-respect, overcome laziness and complacency, and restrain oneself from unbridled lust.
And there are many more skills to learn.
The good qualities that emerge and mature from these practices not only smooth the way for the journey to Nibbana; over time they have the effect of transforming the practitioner into a more generous, loving, compassionate, peaceful, and clear-headed member of society.
The individual's sincere pursuit of Awakening is thus a priceless and timely gift to a world in desperate need of help.
The Eightfold Path is best understood as a collection of personal qualities to be developed, rather than as a sequence of steps along a linear path.
The development of right view and right resolve facilitates the development of right speech, action, and livelihood.
As virtue develops so do the factors identified with concentration.
Likewise, as concentration matures, discernment evolves to a still deeper level.
And so the process unfolds: development of one factor fosters development of the next, lifting the practitioner in an upward spiral of spiritual maturity that eventually culminates in Awakening.
The long journey to Awakening begins in earnest with the first tentative stirrings of right view — the discernment by which one recognizes the validity of the four Noble Truths and the principle of kamma.
One begins to see that one's future well-being is neither predestined by fate, nor left to the whims of a divine being or random chance.
The responsibility for one's happiness rests squarely on one's own shoulders.
Seeing this, one's spiritual aims become suddenly clear: to relinquish the habitual unskillful tendencies of the mind in favor of skillful ones.
As this right resolve grows stronger, so does the heartfelt desire to live a morally upright life, to choose one's actions with care.
At this point many followers make the inward commitment to take the Buddha's teachings to heart, to become “Buddhist” through the act of taking refuge in the Triple Gem: the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
With one's feet thus planted on solid ground, and with the help of an admirable friend or teacher to guide the way, one is now well-equipped to proceed down the Path, following in the footsteps left by the Buddha himself.
Right view and right resolve continue to mature through the development of the path factors associated with sila, or virtue — namely, right speech, right action, and right livelihood.
These are condensed into a very practical form in the five precepts, the basic code of ethical conduct to which every practicing Buddhist subscribes: refraining from killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and using intoxicants.
Even the monks' complex code of rules and the nuns' ultimately have these five basic precepts at their core.
Having gained a foothold in the purification of one's outward behavior through the practice of sila, the essential groundwork has been laid for delving into the most subtle and transformative aspect of the path: meditation and the development of samadhi, or concentration.
This is spelled out in detail in the final three path factors: right effort, by which one learns how to favor skillful qualities of mind over unskillful ones; right mindfulness, by which one learns to keep one's attention continually grounded in the present moment of experience; and right concentration, by which one learns to immerse the mind so thoroughly and unwaveringly in its meditation object that it enters jhana, a series of progressively deeper states of mental and physical tranquillity.
Right mindfulness and right concentration are developed in tandem through satipatthana, a systematic approach to meditation practice that embraces a wide range of skills and techniques.
Of these practices, mindfulness of the body is particularly effective at bringing into balance the twin qualities of tranquillity and insight, or clear-seeing.
Through persistent practice, the meditator becomes more adept at bringing the combined powers of samatha-vipassana to bear in an exploration of the fundamental nature of mind and body.
As the meditator masters the ability to frame his immediate experience in terms of anicca, dukkha, and anatta, even the subtlest manifestations of these three characteristics of experience are brought into exquisitely sharp focus.
At the same time, the root cause of dukkha — craving — is relentlessly exposed to the light of awareness.
Eventually craving is left with no place to hide, the entire karmic process that fabricates dukkha unravels, the eightfold path reaches its noble climax, and the meditator gains, at long last, his or her first unmistakable glimpse of the Unconditioned — Nibbana.
This first enlightenment experience, known as stream-entry, is the first of four progressive stages of Awakening, each of which entails the irreversible shedding or weakening of several fetters, the manifestations of ignorance that bind a person to the cycle of birth and death.
Stream-entry marks an unprecedented and radical turning point both in the practitioner's current life and in the entirety of his or her long journey in samsara.
For it is at this point that any lingering doubts about the truth of the Buddha's teachings disappear; it is at this point that any belief in the purifying efficacy of rites and rituals evaporates; and it is at this point that the long-cherished notion of an abiding personal “self” falls away.
The stream-enterer is said to be assured of no more than seven future rebirths before eventually attaining full Awakening.
But full Awakening is still a long way off.
As the practitioner presses on with renewed diligence, he or she passes through two more significant landmarks: once-returning, which is accompanied by the weakening of the fetters of sensual desire and ill-will, and non-returning, in which these two fetters are uprooted altogether.
The final stage of Awakening — arahatta — occurs when even the most refined and subtle levels of craving and conceit are irrevocably extinguished.
At this point the practitioner — now an arahant, or “worthy one” — arrives at the end-point of the Buddha's teaching.
With ignorance, suffering, stress, and rebirth having all come to their end, the arahant at last can utter the victory cry first proclaimed by the Buddha upon his Awakening:
“Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done!
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.
The arahant lives out the remainder of his or her life inwardly enjoying the bliss of Nibbana, secure at last from the possibility of any future rebirth.
When the arahant's aeons-long trail of past kamma eventually unwinds to its end, the arahant dies and he or she enters into parinibbana — total Unbinding.
Although language utterly fails at describing this extraordinary event, the Buddha likened it to what happens when a fire finally burns up all its fuel.
Buddhism is sometimes naïvely criticized as a “negative” or “pessimistic” religion and philosophy.
Surely life is not all misery and disappointment: it offers many kinds of happiness and sublime joy.
Why then this dreary Buddhist obsession with unsatisfactoriness and suffering?
The Buddha based his teachings on a frank assessment of our plight as humans: there is unsatisfactoriness and suffering in the world.
No one can argue this fact.
Dukkha lurks behind even the highest forms of worldly pleasure and joy, for, sooner or later, as surely as night follows day, that happiness must come to an end.
Were the Buddha's teachings to stop there, we might indeed regard them as pessimistic and life as utterly hopeless.
But, like a doctor who prescribes a remedy for an illness, the Buddha offers both a hope and a cure.
The Buddha's teachings thus give cause for unparalleled optimism and joy.
The teachings offer as their reward the noblest, truest kind of happiness, and give profound value and meaning to an otherwise grim existence.
One modern teacher summed it up well: “Buddhism is the serious pursuit of happiness.
Until the late th century, the teachings of Theravada were little known outside of southern Asia, where they had flourished for some two and one-half millennia.
In the past century, however, the West has begun to take notice of Theravada's unique spiritual legacy in its teachings of Awakening.
In recent decades this interest has swelled, with the monastic Sangha from various schools within Theravada establishing dozens of monasteries across Europe and North America.
Increasing numbers of lay meditation centers, founded and operated independently of the monastic Sangha, strain to meet the demands of lay men and women — Buddhist and otherwise — seeking to learn selected aspects of the Buddha's teachings.
The turn of the st century presents both opportunities and dangers for Theravada in the West: Will the Buddha's teachings be patiently studied and put into practice, and allowed to establish deep roots in Western soil, for the benefit of many generations to come?
Will the current popular Western climate of “openness” and cross-fertilization between spiritual traditions lead to the emergence of a strong new form of Buddhist practice unique to the modern era, or will it simply lead to confusion and the dilution of these priceless teachings?
These are open questions; only time will tell.
Spiritual teachings of every description inundate the media and the marketplace today.
Many of today's popular spiritual teachings borrow liberally from the Buddha, though only rarely do they place the Buddha's words in their true context.
Earnest seekers of truth are therefore often faced with the unsavory task of wading through fragmentary teachings of dubious accuracy.
How are we to make sense of it all?
Fortunately the Buddha left us with some simple guidelines to help us navigate through this bewildering flood.
Whenever you find yourself questioning the authenticity of a particular teaching, heed well the Buddha's advice to his stepmother:
the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities lead to passion, not to dispassion; to being fettered, not to being unfettered; to accumulating, not to shedding; to self-aggrandizement, not to modesty; to discontent, not to contentment; to entanglement, not to seclusion; to laziness, not to aroused persistence; to being burdensome, not to being unburdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is not the Dhamma, this is not the Vinaya, this is not the Teacher's instruction.'
the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities lead to dispassion, not to passion; to being unfettered, not to being fettered; to shedding, not to accumulating; to modesty, not to self-aggrandizement; to contentment, not to discontent; to seclusion, not to entanglement; to aroused persistence, not to laziness; to being unburdensome, not to being burdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is the Dhamma, this is the Vinaya, this is the Teacher's instruction.'
The truest test of these teachings, of course, is whether they yield the promised results in the crucible of your own heart.
The Buddha presents the challenge; the rest is up to you.
This description of the unified role of samatha and vipassana is based upon the Buddha's meditation teachings as presented in the suttas.
The Abhidhamma and the Commentaries, by contrast, state that samatha and vipassana are two distinct meditation paths.
It is impossible to reconcile these divergent views from studying the texts alone; any doubts about the roles of samatha and vipassana are best resolved through the actual practice of meditation.
The suttas listed below are available here at Access to Insight.
A handful of sutta-like passages from the Vinaya Pitaka are also listed here.
Sutta references are either to sutta number, samyutta and sutta number, nipata and sutta number, verse number, vagga and sutta number, or vagga and poem number.
The translator's name appears in the square brackets.
A number of suttas are regarded by senior Theravada Buddhist teachers as being especially noteworthy.
Click on to visit the Sutta Readings website and hear a teacher read it aloud.
To download a PDF edition of a book, just click on the PDF icon.
For more info about using PDF files, see “Working with PDF documents”.
To inaugurate this new feature:
If you're a regular visitor here, you'll notice these pages changing around a bit from day to day, as I experiment with the use of graphic devices If you're not using Netscape, you probably won't notice any of these things, which may be for the better, anyway.
If you have suggestions or criticisms about either the look, the layout, or the content of these pages, I welcome your comments.
This fall, Access to Insight BBS in Pepperell, Massachusetts, will be moving to the Internet.
Since the BBS has served the online community of Dhamma students and practitioners — many of whom have been associated in some way with the Insight Meditation Society in Barre, Massachusetts — by providing books, retreat schedules, and other information free of charge.
For most of our callers, dialing up the BBS has meant an expensive long-distance telephone call.
More and more of our callers have been getting acquainted with the Internet and the World Wide Web, and finding this Web page to be a useful alternative to dialing up the BBS.
In the weeks ahead I'll be moving our library of Theravada files, which currently live at the BBS, onto our new ftp site.
These files will be easily accessible from this Web page.
The final step in the transition will take place on the uposatha day of November, when the dial-up BBS will be shutting down for good.
I must apologize for any inconvenience this change may bring.
My hope is that by focusing my efforts on maintaining this Web site I can ultimately provide a better service to the meditation community.
The INSIGHT mailing list, a supportive environment on the Internet for friendly discussion of meditation practice, is under new management and has moved to another site.
For information about the mailing list, including subscription instructions, send e-mail to &lt;DELETED&gt; with the words “info insight” in the message body.

The focus here is on resources to support and deepen Buddhist meditation practice.
While the emphasis is on teachings from the Theravada Buddhist tradition, other Buddhist traditions are welcome and represented as well.
Many of the resources found here may also be found at Access to Insight BBS and other DharmaNet --> Dharmanet sites.
This homepage is brand new and under heavy construction.
If something here doesn't work as advertised, try again next week -- maybe by then I'll have fixed it.
If you have any comments, corrections, questions, or suggestions for improvements please drop me a note.
Back to FAQ   |   see the ATI edition
The next three lines contain the copyright notice, the attribution, and the license restatement.
They can go in any order and appear anywhere on the page, as long as they are easy for your readers to find and to read.
Copyright © Thanissaro Bhikkhu 
From Access to Insight.

The text of this page is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial.
International License.
To view a copy of the license, visit creativecommons.org/licenses/by-nc/./.

According to the Buddhist monastic code, monks and nuns are not allowed to accept money or even to engage in barter or trade with lay people.
They live entirely in an economy of gifts.
Lay supporters provide gifts of material requisites for the monastics, while the monastics provide their supporters with the gift of the teaching.
Ideally — and to a great extent in actual practice — this is an exchange that comes from the heart, something totally voluntary.
There are many stories in the texts that emphasize the point that returns in this economy — it might also be called an economy of merit — depend not on the material value of the object given, but on the purity of heart of the donor and recipient.
You give what is appropriate to the occasion and to your means, when and wherever your heart feels inspired.
For the monastics, this means that you teach, out of compassion, what should be taught, regardless of whether it will sell.
For the laity, this means that you give what you have to spare and feel inclined to share.
There is no price for the teachings, nor even a “suggested donation.” Anyone who regards the act of teaching or the act of giving requisites as a repayment for a particular favor is ridiculed as mercenary.
Instead, you give because giving is good for the heart and because the survival of the Dhamma as a living principle depends on daily acts of generosity.
The primary symbol of this economy is the alms bowl.
If you are a monastic, it represents your dependence on others, your need to accept generosity no matter what form it takes.
You may not get what you want in the bowl, but you realize that you always get what you need, even if it's a hard-earned lesson in doing without.
One of my students in Thailand once went to the mountains in the northern part of the country to practice in solitude.
His hillside shack was an ideal place to meditate, but he had to depend on a nearby hilltribe village for alms, and the diet was mostly plain rice with some occasional boiled vegetables.
After two months on this diet, his meditation theme became the conflict in his mind over whether he should go or stay.
One rainy morning, as he was on his alms round, he came to a shack just as the morning rice was ready.
The wife of the house called out, asking him to wait while she got some rice from the pot.
As he was waiting there in the pouring rain, he couldn't help grumbling inwardly about the fact that there would be nothing to go with the rice.
It so happened that the woman had an infant son who was sitting near the kitchen fire, crying from hunger.
So as she scooped some rice out of the pot, she stuck a small lump of rice in his mouth.
Immediately, the boy stopped crying and began to grin.
My student saw this, and it was like a light bulb turning on in his head.
“Here you are, complaining about what people are giving you for free,” he told himself.
“You're no match for a little kid.
If he can be happy with just a lump of rice, why can't you?” As a result, the lesson that came with his scoop of rice that day gave my student the strength he needed to stay on in the mountains for another three years.
For a monastic the bowl also represents the opportunity you give others to practice the Dhamma in accordance with their means.
In Thailand, this is reflected in one of the idioms used to describe going for alms: proad sat, doing a favor for living beings.
There were times on my alms round in rural Thailand when, as I walked past a tiny grass shack, someone would come running out to put rice in my bowl.
Years earlier, as lay person, my reaction on seeing such a bare, tiny shack would have been to want to give monetary help to them.
But now I was on the receiving end of their generosity.
In my new position I may have been doing less for them in material terms than I could have done as a lay person, but at least I was giving them the opportunity to have the dignity that comes with being a donor.
For the donors, the monk's alms bowl becomes a symbol of the good they have done.
On several occasions in Thailand people would tell me that they had dreamed of a monk standing before them, opening the lid to his bowl.
The details would differ as to what the dreamer saw in the bowl, but in each case the interpretation of the dream was the same: the dreamer's merit was about to bear fruit in an especially positive way.
The alms round itself is also a gift that goes both ways.
On the one hand, daily contact with lay donors reminds the monastics that their practice is not just an individual matter, but a concern of the entire community.
They are indebted to others for the right and opportunity to practice, and should do their best to practice diligently as a way of repaying that debt.
At the same time, the opportunity to walk through a village early in the morning, passing by the houses of the rich and poor, the happy and unhappy, gives plenty of opportunities to reflect on the human condition and the need to find a way out of the grinding cycle of death and rebirth.
For the donors, the alms round is a reminder that the monetary economy is not the only way to happiness.
It helps to keep a society sane when there are monastics infiltrating the towns every morning, embodying an ethos very different from the dominant monetary economy.
The gently subversive quality of this custom helps people to keep their values straight.
Above all, the economy of gifts symbolized by the alms bowl and the alms round allows for specialization, a division of labor, from which both sides benefit.
Those who are willing can give up many of the privileges of home life and in return receive the free time, the basic support, and the communal training needed to devote themselves fully to Dhamma practice.
Those who stay at home can benefit from having full-time Dhamma practitioners around on a daily basis.
I have always found it ironic that the modern world honors specialization in almost every area — even in things like running, jumping, and throwing a ball — but not in the Dhamma, where it is denounced as “dualism,” “elitism,” or worse.
The Buddha began the monastic order on the first day of his teaching career because he saw the benefits that come with specialization.
Without it, the practice tends to become limited and diluted, negotiated into the demands of the monetary economy.
The Dhamma becomes limited to what will sell and what will fit into a schedule dictated by the demands of family and job.
In this sort of situation, everyone ends up poorer in things of the heart.
The fact that tangible goods run only one way in the economy of gifts means that the exchange is open to all sorts of abuses.
This is why there are so many rules in the monastic code to keep the monastics from taking unfair advantage of the generosity of lay donors.
There are rules against asking for donations in inappropriate circumstances, from making claims as to one's spiritual attainments, and even from covering up the good foods in one's bowl with rice, in hopes that donors will then feel inclined to provide something more substantial.
Most of the rules, in fact, were instituted at the request of lay supporters or in response to their complaints.
They had made their investment in the merit economy and were interested in protecting their investment.
This observation applies not only to ancient India, but also to the modern-day West.
On their first contact with the Sangha, most people tend to see little reason for the disciplinary rules, and regard them as quaint holdovers from ancient Indian prejudices.
When, however, they come to see the rules in the context of the economy of gifts and begin to participate in that economy themselves, they also tend to become avid advocates of the rules and active protectors of “their” monastics.
The arrangement may limit the freedom of the monastics in certain ways, but it means that the lay supporters take an active interest not only in what the monastic teaches, but also in how the monastic lives — a useful safeguard to make sure that teachers walk their talk.
This, again, insures that the practice remains a communal concern.
As the Buddha said,
Monks, householders are very helpful to you, as they provide you with the requisites of robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicine.
And you, monks, are very helpful to householders, as you teach them the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, and admirable in the end, as you expound the holy life both in its particulars and in its essence, entirely complete, surpassingly pure.
In this way the holy life is lived in mutual dependence, for the purpose of crossing over the flood, for making a right end to suffering and stress.
Periodically, throughout the history of Buddhism, the economy of gifts has broken down, usually when one side or the other gets fixated on the tangible side of the exchange and forgets the qualities of the heart that are its reason for being.
And periodically it has been revived when people are sensitive to its rewards in terms of the living Dhamma.
By its very nature, the economy of gifts is something of a hothouse creation that requires careful nurture and a sensitive discernment of its benefits.
I find it amazing that such an economy has lasted for more than, years.
It will never be more than an alternative to the dominant monetary economy, largely because its rewards are so intangible and require so much patience, trust, and discipline in order to be appreciated.
Those who demand immediate return for specific services and goods will always require a monetary system.
Sincere Buddhist lay people, however, have the chance to play an amphibious role, engaging in the monetary economy in order to maintain their livelihood, and contributing to the economy of gifts whenever they feel so inclined.
In this way they can maintain direct contact with teachers, insuring the best possible instruction for their own practice, in an atmosphere where mutual compassion and concern are the medium of exchange; and purity of heart, the bottom line.
Two remarkable stories from the Mahavagga:
An anthropologist once questioned an Eskimo shaman about his tribe's belief system.
After putting up with the anthropologist's questions for a while, the shaman finally told him: “Look.
We don't believe.
We fear.
In a similar way, Buddhism starts, not with a belief, but with a fear of very present dangers.
As the Buddha himself reported, his initial impetus for leaving home and seeking Awakening was his comprehension of the great dangers that inevitably follow on birth: aging, illness, death, and separation.
The Awakening he sought was one that would lead him to a happiness not subject to these things.
After finding that happiness, and in attempting to show others how to find it for themselves, he frequently referred to the themes of aging, illness, death, and separation as useful objects for contemplation.
Because of this, his teaching has often been called pessimistic, but this emphasis is actually like that of a doctor who focuses on the symptoms and causes of disease as part of an effort to bring about a cure.
The Buddha is not afraid to dwell on these topics, because the Awakening he teaches brings about a total release from them.
This study guide provides an introduction to the Buddha's teachings on aging, illness, death, and separation.
The passages included here — all taken from the Pali canon — are arranged in five sections.
The first section presents medical metaphors for the teaching, showing how the Buddha was like a doctor and how his teaching is like a course of therapy offering a cure for the great dangers in life.
The second section diagnoses the problems of aging, illness, death, and separation.
This section touches briefly on the Buddha's central teaching, the four noble truths.
For more information on this subject, see A Path to Freedom and the study guide, The Four Noble Truths.
The third section contains passages that use aging, illness, death, and separation, as reminders for diligence in the practice.
The central passage here is a set of five recollections, in which recollection of aging, illness, death, and separation forms a background for a fifth recollection: the power of one's actions to shape one's experience.
In other words, the first four recollections present the dangers of life; the fifth indicates the way in which those dangers may be overcome, through developing skill in one's own thoughts, words, and deeds.
Useful articles to read in conjunction with this section are Affirming the Truths of the Heart, Karma, and The Road to Nirvana is Paved with Skillful Intentions.
The fourth section contains passages that give specific advice on how to deal with problems of aging, etc.
The Buddha's teachings on kamma provide an important underpinning for how problems of pain and illness are approached in this section.
Given the fact that the experience of the present moment is shaped both by past and by present intentions, it is possible that — if an illness is the result of present intentions — a change of mind can effect a cure in the illness; but if the illness is the result of past intentions, a change of mind may have no effect on the illness but can at least protect the mind from being adversely affected by it.
Thus some of the passages focus how practicing the Dhamma can cure a person of illness, whereas others focus on how the Dhamma can ensure that, even though a person may die from an illness, the illness will make no inroads on the mind.
The fifth section gives examples of how the Buddha and his disciples skillfully negotiated the problems of aging, illness, death, and separation.
From the Anguttara Nikaya:
…and an appeal for your help.
These Wheel Publications are also now available for online reading:
Here are some of the new URLs to be aware of:
From Ajaan Lee:
Some more gems from the Therigatha…
…and from the Theragatha…
…and finally:
And one other sutta:
Mastery of Dhamma sometimes calls for a warrior's strength:
Over the next couple of weeks I'll be making the final corrections and additions to the website before making the CD.
So as you browse through the website, please let me know of any bugs or errors — large or small — that you find.
With your help, together we can make the website — and the CD — better than ever!
In making this change, I had to rearrange a few files in the website.
If you find any bugs, please let me know.
§.
Then Ven.
Maha Kassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “You are now old, Kassapa.
Your robes made of cast-off hemp rags are heavy for you.
So wear robes donated by householders, eat invitational meals, and live close by me.
“Lord, for a long time I have lived in the wilderness and have extolled living in the wilderness.
I have been an almsgoer and have extolled being an almsgoer.
I have worn cast off rags and have extolled wearing cast off rags.
I have worn only one set of the triple robe and have extolled wearing only one set of the triple robe.
I have been modest and have extolled being modest.
I have been content and have extolled being content.
I have been reclusive and have extolled being reclusive.
I have been unentangled and have extolled being unentangled.
I have kept my persistence aroused and have extolled having persistence aroused.
“But, Kassapa, what compelling reason do you see that you for a long time have lived in the wilderness and have extolled living in the wilderness… that you have kept your persistence aroused and have extolled having persistence aroused?
“Lord, I see two compelling reasons that for a long time I have lived in the wilderness and have extolled living in the wilderness… that I have kept my persistence aroused and have extolled having persistence aroused: seeing a pleasant abiding for myself in the here & now, and feeling sympathy for later generations: 'Perhaps later generations will take it as an example: “It seems that the disciples of the Awakened One and those who awakened after him lived for a long time in the wilderness and extolled living in the wilderness; were almsgoers and extolled being almsgoers; wore cast off rags and extolled wearing cast off rags; wore only one set of the triple robe and extolled wearing only one set of the triple robe; were modest and extolled being modest; were content and extolled being content; were reclusive and extolled being reclusive; were unentangled and extolled being unentangled; kept their persistence aroused and extolled having persistence aroused.”' “Good, Kassapa.
Very good.
It seems that you are one who practices for the happiness of many, out of compassion for the world, for the welfare, benefit, & happiness of beings human & divine.
So continue wearing your robes of cast off hemp cloth, go for alms, and live in the wilderness.
Then, when the Blessed One had entered the Rains Retreat, there arose a severe illness within him.
Sharp & deadly were the pains, but he bore them mindfully, alert, & unperturbed.
The thought occurred to him, “It would not be proper for me to enter total Unbinding without addressing my attendants & without taking leave of the community of monks.
Why don't I, suppressing this illness with persistence, remain resolved on the fabrication of life?” So he suppressed the illness with persistence & remained resolved on the fabrication of life.
His illness abated.
Then he recovered from the illness.
Soon after his recovery he came out of his dwelling & sat down in the shade of the building, on a seat prepared for him.
Then Ven.
Ananda approached him and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “What a happy sight to see the Blessed One in comfort!
What a happy sight to see the Blessed One at ease!
Because of the Blessed One's sickness my own body felt as if it were drugged.
I lost my bearings.
Things were unclear to me.
Yet I still took a measure of comfort in the thought that the Blessed One would not enter total Unbinding as long as he hadn't given at least some pronouncement concerning the community of monks.
“What more does the community of monks want from me, Ananda?
I have taught the Dhamma without an inner or an outer version.
The Tathagata has no closed fist with regard to teachings.
Whoever has the thought, 'I will rule the community of monks,' or 'The community of monks is dedicated to me,'he should give some pronouncement concerning the community of monks.
But the Tathagata has no such thoughts.
So why should he give some pronouncement concerning the community of monks?
“I am old now, Ananda, & aged.
My years have turned eighty.
Just as an old cart is kept going with the help of bamboo strips, it seems to me as if the Tathagata's body is kept going with the help of bamboo strips.
The only time the Tathagata's body feels at ease is when, not attending to any theme at all, and with the cessation of certain feelings, he enters & remains in the theme-less concentration of awareness.
Therefore each of you should remain with your self as an island, your self as your refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
Remain with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as your refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
And how does a monk remain with his self as an island, his self as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge?
How does he remain with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is how a monk remains with his self as an island, his self as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge, with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
For those who — now or after I am gone — remain with their self as an island… the Dhamma as their refuge, without anything else as a refuge, they will be the highest of the monks who desire training.
§.
I have heard that on one occasion Ven.
Anuruddha was staying near Savatthi in the Dark Forest — diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then a large number of monks went to Ven.
Anuruddha and on arrival said to him, “What dwelling are you dwelling in so that the pains that have arisen in the body do not invade or remain in the mind?
“When I dwell with my mind well-established in the four frames of reference, the pains that have arisen in the body do not invade or remain in the mind.
Which four?
There is the case where I remain focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
I remain focused on feelings in & of themselves… mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
When I dwell with my mind well-established in these four frames of reference, the pains that have arisen in the body do not invade or remain in the mind.

I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at the Maddakucchi Deer Reserve.
Now at that time his foot had been pierced by a stone sliver.
Excruciating were the bodily feelings that developed within him — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — but he endured them mindful, alert, & unperturbed.
Having had his outer robe folded in four and laid out, he lay down on his right side in the lion's posture, with one foot placed on top of the other, mindful & alert.
Then devatas from the Satullapa retinue, in the far extreme of the night, their extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Maddakucchi, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, they stood to one side.
As she was standing there, one of the devatas exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a naga is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a naga, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a lion is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a lion, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a thoroughbred is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a thoroughbred, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a chief bull of the herd is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a chief bull of the herd, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a strong burden-carrier is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a strong burden-carrier, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a tamed one is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a tamed one, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “See a concentration well-developed, a mind well-released — neither pressed down nor forced back, nor with mental fabrication kept blocked or suppressed.
Whoever would think that such a naga of a man, lion of a man, thoroughbred of a man, chief bull of a man, strong burden-carrier of a man, such a tamed man should be violated: what else is that if not blindness?
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at the Maddakucchi Deer Reserve.
Now at that time his foot had been pierced by a stone sliver.
Excruciating were the bodily feelings that developed within him — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — but he endured them mindful, alert, & unperturbed.
Having had his outer robe folded in four and laid out, he lay down on his right side in the lion's posture, with one foot placed on top of the other, mindful & alert.
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and recited this verse in his presence:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me” — vanished right there.
On that occasion Citta the householder was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then a large number of garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants assembled and said to him: “Make a wish, householder: 'In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!' When this was said, Citta the householder said to the garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants: “Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.
When this was said, Citta the householder's friends & companions, relatives and kinsmen, said to him: “Steady your mindfulness, master.
Don't ramble.
“What did I say that you say to me: 'Steady your mindfulness, master.
Don't ramble'?
“You said: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “That was because garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants have assembled and said to me: 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”' And I said to them: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “But what compelling reason do those garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants see, master, that they say to you, 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”'?
“It occurs to them: 'This Citta the householder is virtuous, of admirable character.
If he should wish: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!” — then, as he is virtuous, this wish of his would succeed because of the purity of his virtue.
A righteous one, he will wield righteous power.' Seeing this compelling reason, they assembled and said: 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”' And I said to them: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “Then, master, instruct us, too.
“Then you should train yourselves: 'We will be endowed with verified confidence in the Buddha: “Indeed, the Blessed One is pure & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the cosmos, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.
“'We will be endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: “The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.
“'We will be possessed of verified confidence in the Sangha: “The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.
“'Whatever there may be in our family that can be given away, all that will be shared unstintingly with virtuous ones who are of admirable character.' That's how you should train yourselves.
Then, having enjoined his friends & colleagues, his relatives & kinsmen, to place confidence in the Buddha, Dhamma, & Sangha; having exhorted them to undertake generosity, Citta the householder passed away.
§.
— Thag.
XVI.
Once Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Upasena were staying near Rajagaha in the Cool Forest, at Snakeshood Grotto.
Then it so happened that a snake fell on Ven.
Upasena's body.
Then Ven.
Upasena said to the monks, “Quick, friends, lift this body of mine onto a couch and carry it outside before it is scattered like a fistful of chaff!
When this was said, Ven.
Sariputta said to Ven.
Upasena, “But we don't see any alteration in your body or change in your faculties.
Then Ven.
Upasena said, “Quick, friends, lift this body of mine onto a couch and carry it outside before it is scattered like a fistful of chaff!
Friend Sariputta, in anyone who had the thought, 'I am the eye' or 'The eye is mine,' 'I am the ear' or 'The ear is mine,' 'I am the nose' or 'The nose is mine,' 'I am the tongue' or 'The tongue is mine,' 'I am the body or 'The body is mine,' 'I am the intellect' or 'The intellect is mine': in him there would be an alteration in his body or a change in his faculties.
But as for me, the thought does not occur to me that 'I am the eye' or 'The eye is mine,'… 'I am the tongue' or 'The tongue is mine,'… 'I am the intellect' or 'The intellect is mine.' So what alteration should there be in my body, what change should there be in my faculties?
Now, Ven.
Upasena's I-making, my-making, & obsession with conceit had already been well rooted out for a long time, which is why the thought did not occur to him that “I am the eye” or “The eye is mine,”… “I am the tongue” or “The tongue is mine,”… “I am the intellect” or “The intellect is mine.
Then the monks lifted Ven.
Upasena's body on a couch and carried it outside.
And Ven.
Upasena's body was scattered right there like a fistful of chaff.
Ven.
Revata's Farewell
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Ven.
Dabba Mallaputta went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Now is the time for my total Unbinding, O One-Well-Gone!
“Then do, Dabba, what you think it is now time to do.
Then Ven.
Dabba Mallaputta, rising from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One and, circling him on the right, rose up into the air and sat cross-legged in the sky, in space.
Entering the fire property and emerging from it, he was totally unbound.
Now, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered the fire property and then emerged from it and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Just as when ghee or oil is burned and consumed, neither ashes nor soot can be discerned, in the same way, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered the fire property and then emerged from it and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said, “When Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered the fire property and then emerged from it and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Just as when ghee or oil is burned and consumed, neither ashes nor soot can be discerned, in the same way, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered the fire property and then emerged from it and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Then the Blessed One went with a large number of monks to the Black Rock on the slope of Isigili.
From afar he saw Ven.
Vakkali lying dead on a couch.
Now at that time a smokiness, a darkness was moving to the east, moved to the west, moved to the north, the south, above, below, moved to the intermediate directions.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, do you see that smokiness, that darkness…?
“Yes, Lord.
“That is Mara, the Evil One.
He is searching for the consciousness of Vakkali the Clansman: 'Where is the consciousness of Vakkali the Clansman established?' But, monks, it is through unestablished consciousness that Vakkali the Clansman has attained total Unbinding.
Ven.
Sariputta said, “Friends, just now as I was withdrawn in seclusion, this train of thought arose to my awareness: 'Is there anything in the world with whose change or alteration there would arise within me sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'There is nothing in the world with whose change or alteration there would arise within me sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.' When this was said, Ven.
Ananda said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Sariputta my friend, even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher would there arise within you no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair?
“Even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher, my friend, there would arise within me no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Still, I would have this thought: 'What a great being, of great might, of great prowess, has disappeared!
For if the Blessed One were to remain for a long time, that would be for the benefit of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of sympathy for the world; for the welfare, benefit, & happiness of human & divine beings.' “Surely,” “it's because Ven.
Sariputta's I-making & mine-making and obsessions with conceit have long been well uprooted that even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher, there would arise within him no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Then the Blessed One went to the audience hall and on arrival sat down on the seat prepared for him.
When he was seated, he addressed the monks: “The qualities I have pointed out, having known them directly: You should grasp them thoroughly, cultivate them, develop them, & pursue them so that this holy life may long endure & remain steadfast for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of the multitude, out of sympathy for the world, for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human & celestial beings.
And what are those qualities?
The four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, the noble eightfold path.
These are the qualities I have pointed out, having known them directly, that you should grasp thoroughly, cultivate, develop, & pursue… for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human & celestial beings.” Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “I exhort you, monks: All fabrications are subject to decay.
Bring about completion by means of heedfulness.
It will not be long before the Tathagata's total Unbinding.
He will attain total Unbinding in three month's time.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Then… he said further:
Then the Teacher said further:
Then the Blessed One with a large community of monks went to the far shore of the Hiraññavati River and headed for Upavattana, the Mallans' sal-grove near Kusinara.
On arrival, he said to Ven.
Ananda, “Ananda, please prepare a bed for me between the twin sal-trees, with its head to the north.
I am tired, and will lie down.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” Ven.
Ananda prepared a bed between the twin sal-trees, with its head to the north.
Then the Blessed One lay down on his right side in the lion's sleeping posture, with one foot on top of the other, mindful & alert.
Now at that time the twin sal-trees were in full bloom, even though it was not the time for flowering.
They showered, strewed, & sprinkled on the Tathagata's body in homage to him.
Heavenly coral-tree blossoms fell from the sky, showering, strewing, & sprinkling the Tathagata's body in homage to him.
Heavenly sandalwood powder fell from the sky, showering, strewing, & sprinkling the Tathagata's body in homage to him.
Heavenly music was playing in the sky, in homage to the Tathagata.
Heavenly songs were sung in the sky, in homage to the Tathagata.
Then the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ananda, “Ananda, the twin sal-trees are in full bloom, even though it's not the flowering season.
They shower, strew, & sprinkle on the Tathagata's body in homage to him.
Heavenly coral-tree blossoms are falling from the sky… Heavenly sandalwood powder is falling from the sky… Heavenly music is playing in the sky… Heavenly songs are sung in the sky, in homage to the Tathagata.
But it is not to this extent that a Tathagata is worshipped, honored, respected, venerated, or paid homage to.
Rather, the monk, nun, male lay follower, or female lay follower who keeps practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, who keeps practicing masterfully, who lives in accordance with the Dhamma: that is the person who worships, honors, respects, venerates, & pays homage to the Tathagata with the highest homage.
So you should train yourselves: 'We will keep practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, we will keep practicing masterfully, we will live in accordance with the Dhamma.' That's how you should train yourselves”…
Then Ven.
Ananda, going into a building, stood leaning against the door jamb, weeping: “Here I am, still in training, with work left to do, and the total Unbinding of my teacher is about to occur — the teacher who has had such sympathy for me!
Then the Blessed One said to the monks, “Monks, where is Ananda?
“Lord, Ven.
Ananda, having gone into that building, stands leaning against the door jamb, weeping: 'Here I am, still in training, with work left to do, and the total Unbinding of my teacher is about to occur — the teacher who has had such sympathy for me!' Then the Blessed One told a certain monk, “Come, monk.
In my name, call Ananda, saying, 'The Teacher calls you, my friend.' “As you say, lord,” the monk answered and, having gone to Ven.
Ananda, on arrival he said, “The Teacher calls you, my friend.
“As you say, my friend,” Ven.
Ananda replied.
Then he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Enough, Ananda.
Don't grieve.
Don't lament.
Haven't I already taught you the state of growing different with regard to all things dear & appealing, the state of becoming separate, the state of becoming otherwise?
What else is there to expect?
It's impossible that one could forbid anything born, existent, fabricated, & subject to disintegration from disintegrating.
“For a long time, Ananda, you have waited on the Tathagata with physical acts of good will — helpful, happy, whole-hearted, without limit; with verbal acts of good will… with mental acts of good will — helpful, happy, whole-hearted, without limit.
You are one who has made merit.
Commit yourself to exertion, and soon you will be without mental fermentations.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “Monks, those who, in the past, were worthy ones, rightly self-awakened, had foremost attendants, just as I have had Ananda.
Those who, in the future, will be worthy ones, rightly self-awakened, will have foremost attendants, just as I have had Ananda.
Ananda is wise, he knows, 'This is the time to approach to see the Tathagata.
This is the time for monks, this the time for nuns, this the time for male lay-followers, this the time for female lay-followers, this the time for kings & their ministers, this the time for sectarians, this the time for the followers of sectarians.
“There are these four marvelous & amazing qualities in Ananda.
If a group of monks approaches to see Ananda, they are gratified at the sight of him.
If he speaks Dhamma to them, they are gratified with what he says.
Before they are sated, he falls silent.
If a group of nuns approaches to see Ananda… If a group of male lay followers approaches to see Ananda… If a group of female lay followers approaches to see Ananda, they are gratified at the sight of him.
If he speaks Dhamma to them, they are gratified with what he says.
Before they are sated, he falls silent.
These are the four marvelous & amazing qualities in Ananda.
There are these four marvelous & amazing qualities in a wheel-turning monarch.
If a group of noble warriors approaches to see him… If a group of brahmans approaches to see him… If a group of householders approaches to see him… If a group of contemplatives approaches to see him, they are gratified at the sight of him.
If he speaks to them, they are gratified with what he says.
Before they are sated, he falls silent.
In the same way, monks, there are these four marvelous & amazing qualities in Ananda.
If a group of monks… a group of nuns… a group of male lay followers… a group of female lay followers approaches to see Ananda, they are gratified at the sight of him.
If he speaks Dhamma to them, they are gratified with what he says.
Before they are sated, he falls silent.
These are the four marvelous & amazing qualities in Ananda”…
Now at that time Subhadda the Wanderer was staying in Kusinara.
He heard, “Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will take place.” Then the thought occurred to him: “I have heard the elder wanderers, teachers of teachers, saying that only once in a long, long time do Tathagatas — worthy ones, rightly self-awakened — appear in the world.
Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will occur.
Now there is a doubt that has arisen in me, but I have faith that he could teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might abandon that doubt.
So he went to Upavattana, the Mallans' sal-grove and, on arrival, said to Ven.
Ananda, “I have heard the elder wanderers, teachers of teachers, saying that only once in a long, long time do Tathagatas — worthy ones, rightly self-awakened — appear in the world.
Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will occur.
Now there is a doubt that has arisen in me, but I have faith that he could teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might abandon that doubt.
It would be good, Ven.
Ananda, if you would let me see him.
When this was said, Ven.
Ananda said to him, “Enough, friend Subhadda.
Don't bother the Blessed One.
The Blessed One is tired.
For a second time… For a third time, Subhadda the Wanderer said to Ven.
Ananda, “…It would be good, Ven.
Ananda, if you would let me see him.
For a third time, Ven.
Ananda said to him, “Enough, friend Subhadda.
Don't bother the Blessed One.
The Blessed One is tired.
Now, the Blessed One heard the exchange between Ven.
Ananda & Subhadda the Wanderer, and so he said to Ven.
Ananda, “Enough, Ananda.
Don't stand in his way.
Let him see the Tathagata.
Whatever he asks me will all be for the sake of knowledge, and not to be bothersome.
And whatever I answer when asked, he will quickly understand.
So Ven.
Ananda said to Subhadda the Wanderer, “Go ahead, friend Subhadda.
The Blessed One gives you his leave.
Then Subhadda went to the Blessed One and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, these brahmans & contemplatives, each with his group, each with his community, each the teacher of his group, an honored leader, well-regarded by people at large — i.e., Purana Kassapa, Makkhali Gosala, Ajita Kesakambalin, Pakudha Kaccayana, Sañjaya Belatthaputta, & the Nigantha Nataputta: Do they all have direct knowledge as they themselves claim, or do they all not have direct knowledge, or do some of them have direct knowledge and some of them not?
“Enough, Subhadda.
Put this question aside.
I will teach you the Dhamma.
Listen, and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” Subhadda answered, and the Blessed One said, “In any doctrine & discipline where the noble eightfold path is not found, no contemplative of the first… second… third… fourth order is found.
But in any doctrine & discipline where the noble eightfold path is found, contemplatives of the first… second… third… fourth order are found.
The noble eightfold path is found in this doctrine & discipline, and right here there are contemplatives of the first… second… third… fourth order.
Other teachings are empty of knowledgeable contemplatives.
And if the monks dwell rightly, this world will not be empty of arahants.
And no contemplative of the second… third… fourth order.
Other teachings are empty of knowledgeable contemplatives.
And if the monks dwell rightly, this world will not be empty of arahants.
Then Subhadda the Wanderer said, “Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to point out the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the community of monks.
Let me obtain the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, let me obtain admission.
“Anyone, Subhadda, who has previously belonged to another sect and who desires the going forth & admission in this doctrine & discipline, must first undergo probation for four months.
If, at the end of four months, the monks feel so moved, they give him the going forth & admit him to the monk's state.
But I know distinctions among individuals in this matter.
“Lord, if that is so, I am willing to undergo probation for four years.
If, at the end of four years, the monks feel so moved, let them give me the going forth & admit me to the monk's state.
Then the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ananda, “Very well then, Ananda, give Subhadda the going forth.
“Yes, lord,” Ananda answered.
Then Subhadda said to Ven.
Ananda, “It is a gain for you, Ananda, a great gain, that you have been anointed here in the Teacher's presence with the pupil's anointing.
Then Subhadda the Wanderer received the going forth & the admission in the Blessed One's presence.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Subhadda became another one of the arahants, the last of the Blessed One's face-to-face disciples.
Then the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ananda, “Now, if it occurs to any of you — 'The teaching has lost its authority; we are without a Teacher' — do not view it in that way.
Whatever Dhamma & Vinaya I have pointed out & formulated for you, that will be your Teacher when I am gone”…
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “If even a single monk has any doubt or perplexity concerning the Buddha, Dhamma, or Sangha, the path or the practice, ask.
Don't later regret that 'The Teacher was face-to-face with us, but we didn't bring ourselves to cross-question him in his presence.' When this was said, the monks were silent.
A second time… a third time, the Blessed One said, “If even one of the monks has any doubt or perplexity concerning the Buddha, Dhamma, or Sangha, the path or the practice, ask.
Don't later regret that 'The Teacher was face-to-face with us, but we didn't bring ourselves to cross-question him in his presence.' A third time, the monks were silent.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “Now, if it's out of respect for the Teacher that you don't ask, let a friend inform a friend.
When this was said, the monks were silent.
Then Ven.
Ananda said to the Blessed One, “It's amazing, lord.
It's marvelous.
I'm confident that, in this community of monks, there is not even a single monk who has any doubt or perplexity concerning the Buddha, Dhamma, or Sangha, the path or the practice.
“You, Ananda, speak out of confidence, while there is knowledge in the Tathagata that, in this community of monks, there is not even a single monk who has any doubt or perplexity concerning the Buddha, Dhamma, or Sangha, the path or the practice.
Of these monks, the most backward is a stream-winner, not destined for the planes of deprivation, headed to self-awakening for sure.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “Now, then, monks, I exhort you: All fabrications are subject to decay.
Bring about completion by means of heedfulness.” Those were the Tathagata's last words.
Then the Blessed One entered the first jhana.
Emerging from that he entered the second jhana.
Emerging from that, he entered the third… the fourth jhana… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Emerging from that, he entered the cessation of perception & feeling.
Then Ven.
Ananda said to Ven.
Anuruddha, “Ven.
Anuruddha, the Blessed One is totally unbound.
“No, friend Ananda.
The Blessed One isn't totally unbound.
He has entered the cessation of perception & feeling.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from the cessation of perception & feeling, entered the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Emerging from that, he entered the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the fourth jhana… the third… the second… the first jhana.
Emerging from the first jhana he entered the second… the third… the fourth jhana.
Emerging from the fourth jhana, he immediately was totally Unbound.
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, there was a great earthquake, awesome & hair-raising, and the drums of the devas sounded.
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Sahampati Brahma uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Sakka, ruler of the gods, uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Ven.
Anuruddha uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Ven.
Ananda uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, some of the monks present who were not without passion wept, uplifting their arms.
As if their feet were cut out from under them, they fell down and rolled back & forth, crying, “All too soon is the Blessed One totally unbound!
All too soon is the One Well-gone totally unbound!
All too soon, the One with Eyes has disappeared from the world!” But those monks who were free from passion acquiesced, mindful & alert: “Fabrications are inconstant.
What else is there to expect?
Then Ven.
Anuruddha addressed the monks, “Enough, friends.
Don't grieve.
Don't lament.
Hasn't the Blessed One already taught the state of growing different with regard to all things dear & appealing, the state of becoming separate, the state of becoming otherwise?
What else is there to expect?
It's impossible that one could forbid anything born, existent, fabricated, & subject to disintegration from disintegrating.
The devatas, friends, are complaining.
“But, Ven.
Anuruddha, what is the state of the devatas the Blessed One is referring to?
“Friend Ananda, there are devatas who perceive space to be earth.
Tearing at their hair, they are weeping.
Uplifting their arms, they are weeping.
As if their feet were cut out from under them, they fall down and roll back & forth, crying, 'All too soon is the Blessed One totally unbound!
All too soon is the One Well-gone totally unbound!
All too soon, the One with Eyes has disappeared from the world!' Then there are devatas who perceive earth to be earth.
Tearing at their hair, they are weeping.
Uplifting their arms, they are weeping.
As if their feet were cut out from under them, they fall down and roll back & forth, crying, 'All too soon is the Blessed One totally unbound!
All too soon is the One Well-gone totally unbound!
All too soon, the One with Eyes has disappeared from the world!' But those devatas who are free from passion acquiesce, mindful & alert: 'Fabrications are inconstant.
What else is there to expect?' Then Ven.
Anuruddha & Ven.
Ananda spent the remainder of the night in Dhamma talk.
Then two brahmans — feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old — went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, they exchanged courteous greetings with him and, after an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to him: “Master Gotama, we are brahmans — feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old.
And we have done no admirable deeds, no skillful deeds, no deeds that allay our fears.
Teach us, Master Gotama.
Instruct us, Master Gotama, for our long-term benefit & happiness.
“Indeed, brahmans, you are feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old.
And you have done no admirable deeds, no skillful deeds, no deeds that allay your fears.
This world is swept away by aging, by illness, by death.
With the world thus swept away by aging, illness, & death, any restraint of body, speech, & intellect practiced here will be one's shelter, cave, island, & refuge after death in the world beyond.
Then two brahmans — feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old — went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, they exchanged courteous greetings with him and, after an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to him: “Master Gotama, we are brahmans — feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old.
And we have done no admirable deeds, no skillful deeds, no deeds that allay our fears.
Teach us, Master Gotama.
Instruct us, Master Gotama, for our long-term benefit & happiness.
“Indeed, brahmans, you are feeble old men, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life, years old.
And you have done no admirable deeds, no skillful deeds, no deeds that allay your fears.
This world is on fire with aging, illness, & death.
With the world thus on fire with aging, illness, & death, any restraint of body, speech, & intellect practiced here will be one's shelter, cave, island, & refuge after death in the world beyond.
Then the householder Nakulapita… went to Ven.
Sariputta and on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Ven.
Sariputta said to him, “Your faculties are clear & calm, householder, your complexion pure.
Have you had the opportunity today of listening to a Dhamma talk in the presence of the Blessed One?
“How could it be otherwise, venerable sir?
I have just now been sprinkled by the Blessed One with the deathless ambrosia of a Dhamma talk.
“And how were you sprinkled by the Blessed One with the deathless ambrosia of a Dhamma talk?
“Just now I went to the Blessed One and on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As I was sitting there I said to him, 'Lord, I am a decrepit old man, aged, advanced in years, having come to the last stage of life.
I am afflicted in body & ailing with every moment.
And it is only rarely that I get to see the Blessed One & the monks who nourish the heart.
May the Blessed One teach me, may the Blessed One instruct me, for my long-term benefit & happiness.'
“When this was said, the Blessed One said to me, 'So it is, householder.
So it is.
The body is afflicted, weak, & encumbered.
For who, looking after this body, would claim even a moment of true health, except through sheer foolishness?
So you should train yourself: “Even though I may be afflicted in body, my mind will be unafflicted.” That is how you should train yourself.' That's how I was sprinkled by the Blessed One with the deathless ambrosia of a Dhamma talk.
“But why didn't it occur to you to question the Blessed One further: 'In what way is one afflicted in body & afflicted in mind?
And in what way is one afflicted in body but unafflicted in mind?'
“I would come from a long way away to hear the explication of these words in Ven.
Sariputta's presence.
It would be good if Ven.
Sariputta himself would enlighten me as to their meaning.
“Then in that case, householder, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, venerable sir,” the householder Nakulapita responded.
Ven.
Sariputta said: “Now, how is one afflicted in body & afflicted in mind?
“There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person — who has no regard for noble ones, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma; who has no regard for men of integrity, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma — assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
He is seized with the idea that 'I am form' or 'Form is mine.' As he is seized with these ideas, his form changes & alters, and he falls into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair over its change & alteration.
“He assumes feeling to be the self, or the self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in the self, or the self as in feeling.
He is seized with the idea that 'I am feeling' or 'Feeling is mine.' As he is seized with these ideas, his feeling changes & alters, and he falls into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair over its change & alteration.
“He assumes perception to be the self, or the self as possessing perception, or perception as in the self, or the self as in perception.
He is seized with the idea that 'I am perception' or 'Perception is mine.' As he is seized with these ideas, his perception changes & alters, and he falls into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair over its change & alteration.
“He assumes fabrications to be the self, or the self as possessing fabrications, or fabrications as in the self, or the self as in fabrications.
He is seized with the idea that 'I am fabrications' or 'Fabrications are mine.' As he is seized with these ideas, his fabrications change & alter, and he falls into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair over their change & alteration.
“He assumes consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
He is seized with the idea that 'I am consciousness' or 'Consciousness is mine.' As he is seized with these ideas, his consciousness changes & alters, and he falls into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair over its change & alteration.
“This, householder, is how one is afflicted in body and afflicted in mind.
“And how is one afflicted in body but unafflicted in mind?
There is the case where a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones — who has regard for noble ones, is well-versed & disciplined in their Dhamma; who has regard for men of integrity, is well-versed & disciplined in their Dhamma — does not assume form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
He is not seized with the idea that 'I am form' or 'Form is mine.' As he is not seized with these ideas, his form changes & alters, but he does not fall into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair over its change & alteration.
“He does not assume feeling to be the self…
“He does not assume perception to be the self…
“He does not assume fabrications to be the self…
“He does not assume consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
He is not seized with the idea that 'I am consciousness' or 'Consciousness is mine.' As he is not seized with these ideas, his consciousness changes & alters, but he does not fall into sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair over its change & alteration.
“This, householder, is how one is afflicted in body but unafflicted in mind.
That is what Ven.
Sariputta said.
Gratified, the householder Nakulapita delighted in Ven.
Sariputta's words.
§.
“A sick person endowed with five qualities is easy to tend to: he does what is amenable to his cure; he knows the proper amount in things amenable to his cure; he takes his medicine; he tells his symptoms, as they actually are present, to the nurse desiring his welfare, saying that they are worse when they are worse, improving when they are improving, or remaining the same when they are remaining the same; and he is the type who can endure bodily feelings that are painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable, life-threatening.
A sick person endowed with these five qualities is easy to tend to.
“A nurse endowed with five qualities is not fit to tend to the sick: He is not competent at mixing medicine; he does not know what is amenable or unamenable to the patient's cure, bringing to the patient things that are unamenable and taking away things that are amenable; he is motivated by material gain, not by thoughts of good will; he gets disgusted at cleaning up excrement, urine, saliva, or vomit; and he is not competent at instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the sick person at the proper occasions with a talk on Dhamma.
A nurse endowed with these five qualities is not fit to tend to the sick.
“A nurse endowed with five qualities is fit to tend to the sick: He is competent at mixing medicine; he knows what is amenable or unamenable to the patient's cure, taking away things that are unamenable and bringing things that are amenable; he is motivated by thoughts of good will, not by material gain; he does not get disgusted at cleaning up excrement, urine, saliva, or vomit; and he is competent at instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the sick person at the proper occasions with a talk on Dhamma.
A nurse endowed with these five qualities is fit to tend to the sick.
— Mv.VIII.
“Monks, when an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person makes the statement, 'There is a bottomless chasm in the ocean,' he is talking about something that doesn't exist, that can't be found.
The word 'bottomless chasm' is actually a designation for painful bodily feeling.
“When an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person is touched by a painful bodily feeling, he sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught.
This is called an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person who has not risen up out of the bottomless chasm, who has not gained a foothold.
“When a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones is touched by a painful bodily feeling, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
This is called a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones who has risen up out of the bottomless chasm, whose foothold is gained.
“Monks, an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person feels feelings of pleasure, feelings of pain, feelings of neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
A well-instructed disciple of the noble ones also feels feelings of pleasure, feelings of pain, feelings of neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
So what difference, what distinction, what distinguishing factor is there between the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones and the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“In that case, monks, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “When touched with a feeling of pain, the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught.
So he feels two pains, physical & mental.Just as if they were to shoot a man with an arrow and, right afterward, were to shoot him with another one, so that he would feel the pains of two arrows; in the same way, when touched with a feeling of pain, the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught.
So he feels two pains, physical & mental.
“As he is touched by that painful feeling, he is resistant.
Any resistance-obsession with regard to that painful feeling obsesses him.
Touched by that painful feeling, he delights in sensual pleasure.
Why is that?
Because the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person does not discern any escape from painful feeling aside from sensual pleasure.
As he is delighting in sensual pleasure, any passion-obsession with regard to that feeling of pleasure obsesses him.
He does not discern, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, or escape from that feeling.
As he does not discern the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, or escape from that feeling, then any ignorance-obsession with regard to that feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain obsesses him.
“Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he senses it as though joined with it.
Sensing a feeling of pain, he senses it as though joined with it.
Sensing a feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain, he senses it as though joined with it.
This is called an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person joined with birth, aging, & death; with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is joined, I tell you, with suffering & stress.
“Now, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones, when touched with a feeling of pain, does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
So he feels one pain: physical, but not mental.
Just as if they were to shoot a man with an arrow and, right afterward, did not shoot him with another one, so that he would feel the pain of only one arrow.
In the same way, when touched with a feeling of pain, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
He feels one pain: physical, but not mental.
“As he is touched by that painful feeling, he is not resistant.
No resistance-obsession with regard to that painful feeling obsesses him.
Touched by that painful feeling, he does not delight in sensual pleasure.
Why is that?
Because the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones discerns an escape from painful feeling aside from sensual pleasure.
As he is not delighting in sensual pleasure, no passion-obsession with regard to that feeling of pleasure obsesses him.
He discerns, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, and escape from that feeling.
As he discerns the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, and escape from that feeling, no ignorance-obsession with regard to that feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain obsesses him.
“Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of pain, he senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain, he senses it disjoined from it.
This is called a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones disjoined from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is disjoined, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“This is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor between the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones and the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person.
At that time Ven.
Maha Kassapa was staying in the Pepper Tree Cave, diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then the Blessed One, in the late afternoon, left his seclusion and went to where Ven.
Maha Kassapa was staying.
On arrival, he sat down on a prepared seat and said to Ven.
Maha Kassapa, “I hope you are getting better, Kassapa.
I hope you are comfortable.
I hope that your pains are lessening and not increasing.
I hope that there are signs of their lessening, and not of their increasing.
“I am not getting better, lord.
I am not comfortable.
My extreme pains are increasing, not lessening.
There are signs of their increasing, and not of their lessening.
“Kassapa, these seven factors for Awakening rightly taught by me, when developed and pursued, lead to direct knowledge, to self-Awakening, to Unbinding.
Which seven?
“Mindfulness as a factor for Awakening rightly taught by me, when developed and pursued, leads to direct knowledge, to self-Awakening, to Unbinding.
“Analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, rightly taught by me, when developed and pursued, leads to direct knowledge, to self-Awakening, to Unbinding.
“Persistence as a factor for Awakening…
“Rapture as a factor for Awakening…
“Serenity as a factor for Awakening…
“Concentration as a factor for Awakening…
“Equanimity as a factor for Awakening rightly taught by me, when developed and pursued, leads to direct knowledge, to self-Awakening, to Unbinding.
“Kassapa, these are the seven factors for Awakening rightly taught by me that — when developed and pursued — lead to direct knowledge, to self-Awakening, to Unbinding.
“They are indeed factors for Awakening, O Blessed One.
They are indeed factors for Awakening, O One Well-Gone.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Maha Kassapa delighted in the Blessed One's words.
And Ven.
Maha Kassapa recovered from his disease.
That was how Ven.
Maha Kassapa's disease was abandoned.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Girimananda was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then Ven.
Ananda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, Ven.
Girimananda is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
It would be good if the Blessed One would visit Ven.
Girimananda, out of sympathy for him.
“Ananda, if you go to the monk Girimananda and tell him ten perceptions, it's possible that when he hears the ten perceptions his disease may be allayed.
Which ten?
The perception of inconstancy, the perception of non-self, the perception of unattractiveness, the perception of drawbacks, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation, the perception of distaste for every world, the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications, mindfulness of in-&-out breathing.
“And what is the perception of inconstancy?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'Form is inconstant, feeling is inconstant, perception is inconstant, fabrications are inconstant, consciousness is inconstant.' Thus he remains focused on inconstancy with regard to the five aggregates.
This, Ananda, is called the perception of inconstancy.
“And what is the perception of not-self?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'The eye is not-self, forms are not-self; the ear is not-self, sounds are not-self; the nose is not-self, aromas are not-self; the tongue is not-self, flavors are not-self; the body is not-self, tactile sensations are not-self; the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self.' Thus he remains focused on not-selfness with regard to the six inner & outer sense media.
This is called the perception of not-self.
“And what is the perception of unattractiveness?
There is the case where a monk ponders this very body — from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin, filled with all sorts of unclean things: 'There is in this body: hair of the head, hair of the body, nails, teeth, skin, muscle, tendons, bones, bone marrow, spleen, heart, liver, membranes, kidneys, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, gall, phlegm, lymph, blood, sweat, fat, tears, oil, saliva, mucus, oil in the joints, urine.' Thus he remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to this very body.
This is called the perception of unattractiveness.
“And what is the perception of drawbacks?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling — reflects thus: 'This body was many pains, many drawbacks.
In this body many kinds of disease arise, such as: seeing-diseases, hearing-diseases, nose-diseases, tongue-diseases, body-diseases, head-diseases, ear-diseases, mouth-diseases, teeth-diseases, cough, asthma, catarrh, fever, aging, stomach-ache, fainting, dysentery, grippe, cholera, leprosy, boils, ringworm, tuberculosis, epilepsy, skin-disease, itch, scab, psoriasis, scabies, jaundice, diabetes, hemorrhoids, fistulas, ulcers; diseases arising from bile, from phlegm, from the wind-property, from combinations of bodily humors, from changes in the weather, from uneven care of the body, from attacks, from the result of kamma; cold, heat, hunger, thirst, defecation, urination.' Thus he remains focused on drawbacks with regard to this body.
This is called the perception of drawbacks.
“And what is the perception of abandoning?
There is the case where a monk does not tolerate an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys, it dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He does not tolerate an arisen thought of ill-will.
He abandons it, destroys, it dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He does not tolerate an arisen thought of harmfulness.
He abandons it, destroys, it dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He does not tolerate arisen evil, unskillful mental qualities.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
This is called the perception of abandoning.
“And what is the perception of dispassion?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the stilling of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, dispassion, Unbinding.' This is called the perception of dispassion.
“And what is the perception of cessation?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the stilling of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, cessation, Unbinding.' This is called the perception of cessation.
“And what is the perception of distaste for every world?
There is the case where a monk abandoning any attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions with regard to any world, refrains from them and does not get involved.
This is called the perception of distaste for every world.
“And what is the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications?
There is the case where a monk feels horrified, humiliated, & disgusted with all fabrications.
This is called the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications.
“And what is mindfulness of in-&-out breathing?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
” Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.'
” He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to rapture, and to breathe out sensitive to rapture.
He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to pleasure, and to breathe out sensitive to pleasure.
He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to mental processes, and to breathe out sensitive to mental processes.
He trains himself to breathe in calming mental processes, and to breathe out calming mental processes.
” He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to the mind, and to breathe out sensitive to the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in satisfying the mind, and to breathe out satisfying the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in steadying the mind, and to breathe out steadying the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in releasing the mind, and to breathe out releasing the mind.
” He trains himself to breathe in focusing on inconstancy, and to breathe out focusing on inconstancy.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on dispassion, and to breathe out focusing on dispassion.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on cessation, and to breathe out focusing on cessation.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on relinquishment, and to breathe out focusing on relinquishment.
“This, Ananda, is called mindfulness of in-&-out breathing.
“Now, Ananda, if you go to the monk Girimananda and tell him these ten perceptions, it's possible that when he hears these ten perceptions his disease may be allayed.
Then Ven.
Ananda, having learned these ten perceptions in the Blessed One's presence, went to Ven.
Girimananda and told them to him.
As Ven.
Girimananda heard these ten perceptions, his disease was allayed.
And Ven.
Girimananda recovered from his disease.
That was how Ven.
Girimananda's disease was abandoned.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali, in the Great Forest, at the Gabled Pavilion.
Then, in the late afternoon, he left his seclusion and went to the sick ward, where he saw a monk who was weak & sickly.
Seeing him, he sat down on a prepared seat.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “When these five things don't leave a monk who is weak & sickly, it can be expected of him that, before long — with the ending of the fermentations — he will enter & remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having realized & directly known them for himself in the here & now.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to the body, is percipient of foulness with regard to food, is percipient of distaste with regard to every world, is percipient of the undesirability of all fabrications, and has the perception of death well established within himself.
“When these five things don't leave a monk who is weak & sickly, it can be expected of him that, before long — with the ending of the fermentations — he will enter & remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having realized & directly known them for himself in the here & now.
At that time, Nakula's father, the householder, was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then Nakula's mother said to him: “Don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not be able to support the children or maintain the household after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
I am skilled at spinning cotton, at carding matted wool.
I can support the children and maintain the household after you are gone.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will take another husband after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
You know as well as I how my fidelity has been constant for the past sixteen years.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized death when one is worried.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will have no desire to go see the Blessed One, to go see the community of monks, after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
I will have an even greater desire to go see the Blessed One, to go see the community of monks, after you are gone.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not act fully in accordance with the precepts after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who act fully in accordance with the precepts, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the pure one, the fully self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggus in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Hill.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not attain inner tranquillity of awareness after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who attain inner tranquillity of awareness, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the pure one, the fully self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggus in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Hill.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not reach firm ground in this Doctrine & Discipline, will not attain a firm foothold, will not attain consolation, overcome her doubts, dispel her perplexity, reach fearlessness or gain independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who reach firm ground in this Doctrine & Discipline, attain a firm foothold, attain consolation, overcome their doubts, dispel their perplexity, reach fearlessness, & gain independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the pure one, the fully self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggus in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Hill.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
